Separation of Powers in a Federal System1. Give information about the current situation of banks and financial institutions in Nepal and discuss the role of regulatory bodies in its development. Banks and financial institutions act as intermediaries between savers and investors by collecting deposits from ordinary citizens and providing loans. Such institutions play an important role in economic development by conducting currency and credit transactions, implementing secure payment systems, and implementing monetary policies. Such banks and financial institutions are an integral part of the financial system of Nepal. This includes 'A' class commercial banks, 'B' class development banks, 'C' class financial companies and 'D' class microfinance institutions. Registration, monitoring, supervision, regulation, facilitation and promotion of these bodies Nepal Rashtra Bank Act, 2058, Banks and Financial Institutions Act, According to 2073, Nepal Rastra Bank has been doing this as the central bank. According to the latest economic survey, there are 143 banks and financial institutions in Nepal, including 27 commercial banks, 19 development banks, one infrastructure development bank, 20 finance companies, and 76 microfinance institutions. Role of Nepal Rastra Bank – Nepal Rastra Bank is the regulatory body of banks and financial institutions in Nepal. It plays a major role in maintaining the development and stability of the country's financial system through monetary policy. It stabilizes interest rate, exchange rate, inflation rate, balances money supply in the market through flexible and tight monetary policy. Its role in the development of banks and financial institutions in the country is as follows:- To make the policy of merger of banks and financial institutions simple and transparent, to strengthen and strengthen the financial base of financial institutions, - To make interest rate determination transparent,
2. What are the reasons for the decline in population growth in Nepal? Mention. The preliminary results of the twelfth national census-2078 in Nepal have shown that the population growth rate of Nepal has reached 0.93 percent. This is the lowest since last 80 years. There are some reasons for the decrease in the population growth rate in Nepal, which can be mentioned as follows:- Strict implementation of the legal system of marriage only after reaching the age of 20,- The number of women and men going for foreign employment is high,- The practice of child marriage, polygamy, mismatched marriage is decreasing. Janu, - The desire of more than two children in married couples is decreasing, - The difference between sons and daughters is gradually decreasing, - Safe abortion and contraceptive methods are expanding widely, - The use of permanent sterilization and temporary means of family planning is increasing.
3. What are the crimes investigated by the Nepal Police? write According to the Nepal Police and State Police (Operation, Supervision and Coordination) Act, 2076, the offenses investigated by the Nepal Police can be mentioned as follows:- Offenses against the state,- Offenses related to citizenship and passport,- Offenses related to organized crime,- Offenses related to terrorism,- Human trafficking and Offenses related to trafficking, - Offenses related to cyber crime, - Offenses involving the jurisdiction of more than one province, - Cross-border crimes and any offense that is outside Nepal or should be investigated even outside Nepal, - Offenses that must be investigated by the Nepal Police according to federal law.
4. How is the principle of separation of powers adopted in Nepal's federal system? Mention. The highest body that makes the laws of the state is the Legislature and the Council of Ministers with the ministers who implement the laws of the state is the executive. Similarly, the judiciary is the official body that interprets the constitution and laws. The functions performed by these three organs of the state are separate and independent and autonomous in their field of work. By giving all this power and authority to one person and unit, no matter how democratic the ruler is, despotism is created, arbitrariness increases, and the freedom of citizens ends. Therefore, the principle of separation of powers is the belief that state power should be divided into different units. This is the division of functions of the three parts of the government. Its purpose is to end arbitrariness in governance and protect the rights of citizens. As the federal system is implemented in Nepal, there are three levels of government in the country namely the federal, provincial and local levels, according to the constitution of Nepal, there is a provision for separation of powers between the executive, legislature and judiciary. Which can be mentioned as follows: Executive – The executive power of Nepal shall be vested in the Council of Ministers, Article 75 (1) – A motion of no confidence cannot be submitted for the first two years after the appointment of the Prime Minister, Article 100 (4) – The executive power of the province shall be vested in the Provincial Council of Ministers, – Local level executive The authority rests with the village/municipal executive. Legislature – Bills can be introduced in any house of the federal parliament, Article 110. Judiciary of Nepal is integrated as it has been arranged that the High Court and the District Court can be used only by the courts. - The Supreme Court has the final authority to interpret the constitution and the law, the interpretation of the law, legal principles, orders and judgments made by the Supreme Court must be followed by everyone, if disobedience is punished for contempt. - Article 105 stipulates that cases under consideration in the court shall not be discussed in any house of the federal parliament, and debates shall be prohibited.
5. What are the issues that should be paid attention to while making a prudent decision? write A decision is the act of selecting the appropriate option from among the available options for solving a problem. It is the bridge between thinking and action to do something. This is a regular and continuous work of the organization. Discretionary decision especially emphasizes on making a decision by analyzing various aspects including the collection and analysis of sufficient information, the development of alternatives, the effects and consequences of alternatives, the mechanisms for implementing the decision. Therefore, when making a prudent decision, attention should be paid to these and similar matters, which can be mentioned as follows:- Full compliance with laws and regulations, making decisions in accordance with legal provisions,- Adopting a simple and transparent decision-making process,- Making decisions by making full use of management information systems,- Make a decision in a timely manner.
6. What are the problems in disaster management in Nepal? Mention. Due to Nepal's weak geological structure, geologically dynamic mountain ranges, natural and unnatural disasters occur frequently. The Constitution of Nepal has placed disaster management in the list of common rights of the federal, provincial and local levels and in the list of single rights of the local level. The role of the government at all three levels has been made clear by writing the rescue, relief and recovery work for natural and unnatural disaster preparedness in the list of common rights of the federation and the state. Disaster Risk Reduction National Policy, 2075 and Disaster Risk Reduction and Management Act, 2074 have been issued. Formation of the National Council for Disaster Risk Reduction and Management under the chairmanship of the Prime Minister, An executive committee has been formed under the chairmanship of the Home Minister to support this. The National Disaster Risk Reduction and Management Authority has been established under the Ministry of Home Affairs and an executive head has been arranged. Provincial disaster management committee has been formed under the chairmanship of the chief minister in the province, district disaster management committee has been formed under the chairmanship of the chief district officer in the district and local disaster management committee has been formed under the chairmanship of the head of the municipality. In addition to legal and institutional arrangements, there are various problems in disaster management in Nepal, which can be mentioned as follows: - Failing to strengthen the early warning system for disaster management, - Failing to organize pre-disaster preparations, - Failing to coordinate initiatives, making the role of scattered agencies clear. Not being able to do, - Skilled manpower required for search and rescue work,
1. Since when has Nepal Telecom launched the Voice over Long Term Evolution (VOLTE) service? V.No. March 22, 2078- Through this service based on 4G/LTE network, users will be able to use high quality voice service. In addition, you can get the facility of video calls through voice calls.- Telecom started its testing on 3rd of May last year.- When you make voice calls through 4G service, the sound quality is HD level, you can get quality voice service as if you were talking between people, and the rate of call connection. According to Telecom, it will be fast, the voice will sound clear and natural.- According to Telecom, to get VoLTE service, you should have a mobile phone that supports frequencies of 800 and 1800 MHz band.
2. Who is the tennis player who won the men's singles title in the Australian Open held in Melbourne in January 2022? Rafael Nadal (Spanish tennis star) - The 35-year-old Nadal set a record for a male player by winning the title in the final match held on January 30 in Melbourne. Nadal was tied with Serbia's Novak Djokovic and Switzerland's Roger Federer. Djokovic and Federer have won 20 Grand Slam titles.
3. V.No. The cabinet meeting on January 17, 2078 has decided who will be appointed as the vice chancellor of the open university? Shilu Manandhar - Manandhar is the former Dean of the Faculty of Management of the Open University. - The then Vice Chancellor of the Open University Prof. Dr. The four-year tenure of Lekhnath Sharma ended on 18th May.
4. Argeli produced in Nepal is mostly exported to which country? Japan- High quality paper can be made from argyle.- Currency made from it is strong and does not deteriorate even when soaked in water.- Japan used to import it to make Japanese currency (yen). 200 and 'C' category is sold up to 100 rupees per kg. It is steamed and processed in different categories.- It is produced in Dolakha, Ramechhap, Ilam, Panchthar and Taplejung in Nepal.
5. Which is the successful music video to set the Guinness Book of World Records by shooting at the highest place in the world? Sundar Himal - Five young people involved in journalism and artistry set the record by shooting the music video of the song 'Sunder Nepal' at the highest place in the world. Lyricist Buddhiraj Rai, singer Tek Nachiring and Shikharjung Shrestha, singer Maya Gurung, model and dancer Srijan Kiranti set the record by shooting the video. - Previously, Nepali youth Sancha Bahadur Rai, who shot a music video at a high place, was in the Guinness Book under the title of 'Highest Altitude Music Video on Land'. , Pushkar Nepal, Paul Rai, Laxman Karki and Rajan Kharel broke the existing record 'Sunder Himal' by shooting around Gokyo Lake at an altitude of 4814 meters.
6. When is Martyrs' Day celebrated in Nepal? January 16 - Martyrs' Day is celebrated every year on January 16 with various programs in memory of the martyrs who sacrificed their lives for the establishment and restoration of democracy and freedom of different eras. 
7. Which is the host country of Winter Olympics-2022? China (Beijing) - Date: 2022 February 4-20 - Athletes: 2871 - Men: 1581 - Women: 1290 - Participating Countries: 91 - Number of Games Involved: 7 (Events: 109) - USA, UK, Australia and Canada in Beijing Olympics Despite sending their athletes, diplomatic boycott.- Despite not declaring a diplomatic boycott, Japan did not send any high official to this Olympics.- Beijing became the only city to host Winter and Summer Olympic Games.- Motto : Together for a shared future.
8. Which is the national park of Nepal that received the international conservation award for its excellent work in tiger conservation? Bardia National Park - The park was awarded for doubling the number of tigers while protecting the rare tiger in the world. - The award will be given on the occasion of the second tiger conference held in Russia in September 2022.
9. Who was awarded the Bhairav ​​Award for the year 2078? Satirist Narnath Luintel - Bhairav ​​Literary Award announced from this year was awarded to cultural scholar Tejeshwarbabu Gwang.- Both awards amount to one lakh one thousand 111 rupees. 
10. Who is the player who won the first gold medal of the Beijing Winter Olympics? Therese Johag (Norway) – (She won the title in the women's 15 km skiathlon.)
11. What is the production capacity of Arun 3rd hydropower project? 900 May - The foundation stone of this hydropower project started to be built in Sankhuwasabha district. On 28 May 2075, the then P.M. KP Sharma Oli and his Indian counterpart Narendra Modi from Kathmandu through a switch.- The goal of this project is to be completed within 2080. 54 percent of the work has been completed till now (2078 Paush).- The estimated cost of this project is one trillion four billion rupees.
12. What does Pegasus mean? Spy software program - By using it, you can find out the secrets of any person. - If Pegasus is set on a smartphone, the hacker can get information about the smartphone's microphone, camera, audio, text messages, emails, as well as location. - American newspaper New York on January 28, 2022 After the Times published a report that India had purchased the Israeli spyware Pegasus, there was a ripple in its politics.- In 2021, the matter of recording the calls of leaders, journalists and social activists of several countries through the Pegasus spy software was made public. 
13. How many types of bees are economically kept in Nepal? 2 (AP Serena and Mela Fera) 
14. Who is the first Nepali woman player to take two hat-trick wickets in international cricket? Ruveena Chhetri
15. How long has it been announced by the government of Nepal to end substandard child labor? V.No. 2079- (It was announced to end all types of child labor by the same year 2082.) 
16. In which place of Nepal Autovillage has been built? Butwal 
17. Who is known as horticultural antivirus? Horticulturist Mukund Ranjit
18. V.No. Who won the title of the 20th edition of the Aha Rara Gold Cup football tournament which was conducted in January 2078? APF Club-Sahara Club Pokhara organized and sponsored Himshree Foods Pvt. Ltd. in the final match of the tournament, defeating Manang-Masryangdi Club by 5-4 in the tri-breaker. APF won the title by winning the title for the first time. Despite reaching the finals in 2064, APF, which lost to the Nepal Police Club and lost the title, managed to win the title after 14 years. 10 teams participated including foreigners.- Rajan Gurung of APF and Yuya Kuria of APF were declared as the best player in the tournament.
19. Where has the community seed bank been established? Machapuchche Ga.Pa. (Kaski) 
20. Which place has been declared World Capital of Architecture-2020 by UNESCO? Rio de Janeiro (Brazil) 
21. Which is the only government body producing Ayurvedic medicine in Nepal? Singhdarbar Vaidyakhana - This institution was established as a Vaidyakhana during the reign of King Pratap Malla. - The Vaidyakhana in the palace of Hanumandho was moved to Thapathali during the reign of Janga Bahadur Rana. Singhdarbar Vaidyakhana has been operating since 2051 through Singhdarbar Vaidyakhana Development Committee.- At one time, only 35 types of drugs are being produced in Vaidyakhana, which used to produce 185 types of drugs.
22. Since when did the Montreal Treaty-1999 come into force in Nepal? V.No. 29 December 2075 
23. Who is the world's first female space tourist? Anuseh Ansari 
24. Which is the highest organ of the European Union? European Council Presenter: Tank Casey
Existing situation of cooperatives in Nepal 1. Give information about the current situation of cooperatives in Nepal and discuss the role of regulatory bodies in its development. A cooperative is an organized group of common people established for the purpose of earning income. Cooperatives are an integral part of Nepal's financial system. It collects the scattered savings, mobilizes them, invests them, etc., and prepares an environment for mobilizing resources and investment from the local community. In Nepal, cooperatives are considered as the third pillar of the economy. Article 51(d) of the Constitution of Nepal has a constitutional policy to strengthen the national economy through the participation and independent development of the public, private and cooperative sectors, and to mobilize the cooperative sector in national development. Cooperatives are included in the common list of rights of the federation, state and local levels. Cooperative Act, 2074 and Cooperative Regulations, 2075 continues. There are currently 29,886 cooperative organizations operating across the country. There are 125 under the association, 6002 under the provincial government and 23759 under the local government. The registration and regulation of the cooperatives under the association has been done by the cooperative department. Similarly, the Cooperative Department has put into operation the Internet-based Cooperative and Poverty Management Information System (COPOMIS) software for the promotion, training and effective regulation of cooperative organizations from the local level to the national level. The registration, monitoring and regulation of the cooperatives under the provincial government have been done by the provincial government, while the registration, regulation, monitoring and facilitation of the cooperatives under the local level have been done by rural municipalities and municipalities. Nepal Rastra Bank has a provision to regulate cooperative banks and cooperatives dealing in loans and savings exceeding fifty million. - Registration, monitoring and regulation of the cooperatives scattered all over the country in Nepal have been done by the union, state and local levels. Such regulatory bodies have a multifaceted role in their development, which can be discussed as follows: The role of the Cooperative Department - Making the Cooperative and Poverty Management Information System (COPOMIS) software effective by bringing it to the provincial and local levels, - Regular monitoring and regulation to prevent irregularities in the cooperative sector. Creating,- One person, one cooperative policy to ensure effective compliance,- Implementing an integrated regulation system of federal, state and local level cooperatives,- Preparing and implementing cooperative monitoring and regulation guidelines,- Supporting institutional capacity development for effective regulation of state and local level cooperatives. - To expand the cooperative training work to the provincial and local levels.
2. What is intergovernmental financial management? What are the subjects under this? write Inter-governmental financial management is the process of coordinating and cooperating with each other in the areas of income and expenditure, budget, debt, etc. among the governments at different levels to strengthen their financial capacity. In this, the relationship between the governments at the level is further strengthened by sharing their experience, information, sharing of resources, solving the problems, etc. This is an important aspect of federalism. Therefore, federalism also depends on this. It manages the financial federalism among different levels of government. Subjects under it are: - Revenue rights, - Revenue distribution, - Grant distribution, - Debt management, - Budget management, - Public expenditure management, - Financial discipline and accountability, - To coordinate in financial management. legal and institutional mechanisms,
3. Identify the problems seen in the federal revenue system of Nepal and write suggestions. The Constitution of Nepal envisages sustainable peace, good governance, development and prosperity in the country by implementing the fundamental rights, guiding principles and policies of the state. Similarly, the country has been transformed into a federal structure of the union, state and local levels, and through the mobilization of internal resources from all three levels, it has emphasized on building a self-sufficient economy while reducing the dependence on foreign aid. For this, the constitution has provided revenue rights at the federal, state and local levels. Due to the fact that the federal structure is a new system in Nepal, there is a lack of sufficient experience and information and data at the provincial and local levels, various problems have been seen in the revenue system at all three levels, which can be presented as follows: - High share of the informal sector in economic activities, - Income tax in the total revenue. Inability to increase share,
4. What are the problems in public debt mobilization in Nepal? Mention and present suggestions for solving the problem. To develop physical infrastructure in the country, to create jobs and to maintain social justice and equality, public debt is the instrument used by the government through the deficit budget. In Nepal, the Economic Procedures and Financial Responsibility Act, 2076 and the Regulations, 2077 have provided for the circulation of resources to meet the deficit budget, internal and external debt records, reports, etc. Internal and external loans have been mobilized annually through the budget for the development of the country. In Nepal, the share of debt in GDP is low in South Asia, but due to the inability to mobilize public debt in the areas of national needs and priorities, the expected returns are not being achieved. In this sense, there are various problems in public debt mobilization in Nepal.
1. According to the preliminary results of the National Census 2078, what is the population of Nepal? 2,91,92,480- The total population increased by 10.18 percent in the 2078 census compared to the 2068 census.- According to the 2078 census, the population growth rate was 0.93 percent. 504 and the population growth rate was 1.35 percent.- The Central Statistics Department released the preliminary results of the census conducted from November 25, 2078 to November 9, 2078 on January 12, 2078. – Brief Overview of Census 2078 – Total Population: 2,91,92,480 – Male Population: 1,42,91,311 (48.96 percent) – Female Population: 1,49,01,169 (51.04 percent ) – Population growth rate: 0.93 percent – ​​Urban population: 66.08 percent – ​​Rural population: 33.92 percent – ​​Population density: 198 per sq km – Number of households: 67,61,059 – Number of households: 56, 43, 532) – District with the least population: Manang (5,645) – Major 5 districts with the highest population: Kathmandu, Morang, Ruppandehi, Jhapa and Sunsari respectively – Five districts with the least population: Manang, Mustang, Dolpa, Rasuwa respectively And Humla – District with highest population growth rate: Bhaktapur – Number of districts with negative population growth rate: 32 – Highest population based on municipality: Kathmandu M.N.P. (8,65,906) – Lowest population based on municipality: Thulibheri in Dolpa .Pa. (10,187 people) - Rural municipality with the highest population in terms of rural municipality: Vaijnath District. (Banke, 70,315) - The rural municipality with the lowest population in terms of rural municipality: Manang's Narpabhumi District. (422 people)- The population in 293 municipalities declared by the Government of Nepal is classified as urban population and the population in 460 rural municipalities is classified as rural and urban population. - According to the 2078 census, the population in Terai has increased by 3.9 percent. In 2068, the total population of Terai was 50.27 percent, but in 2078, it reached 53.66 percent. - In the mountains, it was 43.01 percent in 2068, but it fell to 40.25 percent in 2078. People - Mountain region: 3.95 people - Terai region: 4.65 people - The average number of family members on a provincial basis is the lowest: Gandaki Province (3.66 people) - The average number of family members on a provincial basis is the highest: Madhes Province (5.
2. When is International Customs Day celebrated? The 70th International Customs Day celebrated on January 26- 2022 was celebrated with the slogan 'Scaling Up Customs Digital Transformation by Embracing a Data Ecosystem (Kabashlin Gow Rigkatyamak Mnshtab Itchabalkaychambatsyaal Dath Vdachhabashlan bmbatab Rigtigabha Balam Dyagashmishlan bmbatab Vyakathkatzh). 
3. Which is the big snowstorm that happened in the five states of America recently? Bum Cyclone (January 2022) - A state of emergency was declared in five states (New York, New Jersey, Maryland, Rhode Island and Virginia) when the snowstorm became terrible in the East Coast region of America. - This storm is also known as a mid-latitude hurricane. 
4. When did you receive the Nobel Prize of the United Nations Children's Fund? 1965 
5. Which country has a shape like Nepal on the world map? Portugal
6. Which country has the same name as country and continent? Australia 
7. When was Nepal's diplomatic relationship with China established? August 1, 1955 - Peace and friendship treaty between Nepal and China was signed on April 28, 1960. - Border agreement between Nepal and China in 1961. - A border protocol was signed between Nepal and China in 1979. - Manjushree, who settled in Kathmandu valley, came from China. - Huayan Sang was the first Chinese citizen to spread the word about Nepal by writing a travelogue. - Chinese Zhang Jian visited Lumbini for the first time in 406 AD. - There were two Chinese travelers who visited Nepal in ancient times: Huyan Sang and Fahiyan. 
8. What is the theory of H (X) and Th (Y) related to in administration? Motivation 
9. What is the old name of Goswara Post? Nepal Post Office
10. Which country started the trend of wall calendar? Egypt 
11. Which is the device that converts kinetic energy into electrical energy? Dynamo 
12. Which is the device that converts electrical energy into kinetic energy? Motor 
13. Who is the girl who won the title of Miss Eco Nepal 2022? Sofia Bhujel - Bhujel will represent Nepal in the international beauty pageant 'Miss Eco International 2022', which will be held in Egypt. - Previously, Anushma Rayamazhi has succeeded in bringing Nepal the title of 'Miss Eco Asia' in 'Miss Eco International 2020'. - Tourism and environment are the main topics. This competition has been started since 2015 in Egypt. 
14. Which is the first Nepali movie made outside Nepal? Satya Harishchandra – (This is the first movie in Nepali language.)
15. Nepal's authentic time is based on which mountain? Gaurishankar - Nepal's authentic time is determined based on 86 degrees 15 minutes of east longitude passing through the Gaurishankar mountain in Dolakha district, - Nepal's authentic time is effective from 1st Baisakh 2042, - Nepal's time is 5 hours 45 minutes faster than Greenwich time. - Based on the 0 degree longitude line passing through Greenwich, UK, the authentic time of the world was determined on November 1, 1884.
16. According to the report on corruption published by Transparency International on January 25, 2022, what is the position of Nepal? 117th - Among the 180 countries included in the index, Denmark, Finland and New Zealand are the least corrupt countries with a score of 88 out of 100. - South Sudan is the most corrupt country with a score of 11. - Two-thirds of the countries score below 50 on the corruption index Scored as countries with more corruption. - 43 points are considered as the average global score. Those who score less than this are recorded as countries with widespread corruption. Status of South Asian countries 
Country score Bhutan 68 25 points Maldives 40 85 points India 40 85 points Sri Lanka 37 102 points Bangladesh 33 117 points Pakistan 28 140 points Bangladesh 26 147 points Afghanistan 16 174 points
- Transparency International publishes a report on corruption every year since 1995. - Transparency has included Nepal in this list since 2004. Since 2004, Nepal's corruption index 
Year (Year) Location Year (Year) Location 2004 139 2005 1162006 126 2007 1302008 131 2009 1222010 124 2011 1132012 139 2013 1162014 126 2015 1302016 131 2017 1222018 124 2019 1132020 117 2021 117 
Presenter : Tank K.C.
Recruitment Committee in Nepali Army 1. What are the principles of internal control system? write In order to bring economy, transparency and effectiveness to the work of the office, a system of mutual balance and control has been established so that work is divided into different posts and the work done by one balances the work of the other. This is the internal control system of the office. Its basic principle is division of labor, which aims to maintain good governance by bringing cleanliness to the office system and removing irregularities. Its elements can be mentioned as follows: - Division of work, - Internal inspection, - Performance agreement, - Performance evaluation, - Reporting of works, - Monitoring, - Inspection, - Giving instructions, - Internal audit.
2. Discuss the formation of the recruitment committee in the Nepali Army and the work, duties and rights of the committee. The Military Service Regulations, 2069 has provided for the formation of a Vacancy Committee to select and recommend for appointment various vacant posts in the Nepalese Army through open and internal competition and the work, duties and powers of that committee, which can be discussed as follows:
Formation of the Recruitment Committee in the Nepali Army - (a) Chairman of the Public Service Commission or a member of the commission appointed by the commission - Chairman - (b) Secretary of the Ministry of Defense or a gazetted officer of the first class appointed by him - Member - (c) Executive - Member - (d) appointed by the Commander-in-Chief One expert in the relevant subject - Member - (e) Director of Recruitment Selection Directorate - Member - Secretary Forming a separate committee - The recruitment committee will select a suitable candidate based on the prescribed procedure at a lower rank than the authorized cadet and recommend to the appointing authority for appointment, including representatives of the Public Service Commission and the Ministry. There is a provision that a separate committee of at most five members can be formed and delegated authority. Work, Duties and Powers of the Vacancy Committee - Advertising for Vacancies, Conducting and Administering Examinations, - Preparation of Question Papers for Vacancy, Revising Question Papers, Examination of Answer Sheets,
3. Write the objectives of Personal Privacy Act, 2075. The Personal Privacy Act, 2075, which came into force on 2nd August 2075, has the following objectives: - To ensure the right of privacy of every person regarding life, residence, property, documents, statistics, correspondence and character related matters, - Protection and safekeeping of personal information in public bodies or institutions. Arranging usage, - Not allowing the privacy of individuals to be encroached, - Promoting a dignified standard of living.
4. What is a commercial bank? A commercial bank is a bank that helps maintain economic stability in the country through financial intermediation such as accepting deposits from the general public, making payments, and extending loans. It helps to implement the monetary policy formulated by the central bank. Its purpose is to earn profit. It provides modern banking services to common people. It is established with permission from the central bank. It is regulated by the Central Bank.
5. Discuss the strengths of federal system of government. A federal system of governance is a system of governing by dividing a country into more than one province, state or territory. It is a political system in which state power is exercised by multiple governments in the same country. In this system, there are generally three types of government namely central government, provincial/state/province government and local government. The constitution has specified the rights and responsibilities of each level of government and has also arranged for mutual coordination and cooperation. Even though the federal system seems to be somewhat expensive in economic terms, it is an excellent system in terms of inclusive democracy, diversity, management and decentralization of state power. The strengths of this arrangement are as follows: - As responsibilities, resources and opportunities are transferred to the lower governments, the workload of the central government will be reduced.
6. What are the functions, duties and rights of the Local Revenue Advisory Committee? write According to the Local Government Operation Act, 2074, the functions, duties and powers of the local revenue consultation committee, which is formed under the coordination of the vice president of the rural municipality and the deputy head of the municipality, are as follows: - Giving necessary advice regarding the formulation, revision, modification and compliance of revenue related policies and laws, - The source and scope of revenue. and estimate the revenue that can be received in the next financial year by analyzing the rates, etc.,- Analyzing and estimating the internal income based on the revenue rate and area, etc. , giving advice on the rates of non-tax revenue, service charges, duties etc., - giving other necessary advice for improving revenue administration.
7. Nepali lifestyle is the main health problem of Nepal. What do you say to this statement? Of course, people's health is affected by their lifestyle. Most Nepalis are not aware of the importance of health and how to take care of it. Their food, cultural practices, work methods, behavior etc. are not health friendly. Still many people are superstitious and do not realize that their health is deteriorating. They do not know the need and importance of scientific treatment methods. Especially this situation is more in remote places than in accessible ones. Due to lack of production, lack of food, etc., they are using rotten food, dirty drinking water. They gladly accept polluted water and rotten fruits and food in the name of Prasad. Unnecessary fasting without regard to health, They fast. The cooking style of preparing food is also not suitable. There is no regular meal schedule. There is no sense of a balanced diet. More fatty or alcoholic products are used more. Personal hygiene is also poor. Due to this lifestyle, the condition of community health is very critical. Therefore, it can be said that Nepali's lifestyle is the main health problem of Nepal.
What is Integrated Property Tax? What are the bases of this tax? write The system of taxing all the houses and land owned by a person in an integrated manner is called integrated property tax. It is a tax on immovable property like houses and land. The rate of this tax is determined with the objective of encouraging or discouraging investment in real estate. It is also possible to give an integrated property tax exemption up to a specified amount after the integrated assessment of all immovable properties. Generally, property tax is imposed on immovable property in unproductive areas to increase income and employment by encouraging investment in productive areas while discouraging investment in unproductive areas. Integrated property tax base – Generally, any tax base is the ability of the taxpayer to pay the tax. Tax based on the principle that tax should not be imposed on those who cannot pay tax If applied, tax collection will be more effective and the tax productivity will increase and the tax base will expand further. This recognition also applies to integrated property tax. The following are the other bases for levying integrated property tax: - Size, type, structure of house and land, - Standard of living and financial condition of citizens, - Immovable property use status, - Prevailing market value of immovable property, - Depreciation value of immovable property, - Need for revenue. .
9. What are the current groups under the Forest Service of Nepal? write There are currently six groups under the Forest Service of Nepal, which are as follows:- a. General Forestry – b. Forest Research – c. Soil and Water Conservation – d. Botany – e. Hattisar – Ch. National Parks and Wild Life. 
10. What should the local level pay attention to when taxing matters within its jurisdiction? write The local level should pay attention to the following when taxing matters within its jurisdiction: - National economic policy, - Transportation of goods and services, - Capital market, - Labor market, - Things that are not detrimental to neighboring provinces or local levels.
11. How does finance and monetary policy help to control inflation? Mention. The increase in the price of goods and services is inflation. If there is a shortage of goods and services in the market but the amount of money supply does not decrease, inflation occurs. For this, inflation can be controlled by adopting measures such as increasing the production of goods and services through monetary and financial policy, controlling the amount of currency providers in the market. To control inflation, monetary and financial policies help in the following ways: Support provided by financial policy - increasing production by subsidizing production, - improving the supply system by improving the transportation of goods and arranging the storage of goods needed in different places, - monitoring through the market to prevent artificial shortages, To keep the price list of goods, - To help increase investment in the private sector by reducing the government deficit budget.
1. Who won the Prime Minister's Cup T-20 national cricket tournament title (2078)? APF Club, Vs. From December 16 to January 5, 2078 - Nepal APF Club won the title by defeating Nepal Police Club by 21 runs. - APF received a trophy and five lakh rupees after winning the title. Runner-up Nepal Police received three lakh rupees. Nepal Army Club and Bagmati Province, who made their way to the semi-finals, are entitled to 50,000 rupees each. 
2. Who was awarded the Araniko International Award (in 2078)? Literary Hari Adhikari – This award is given every year by the Language, Literature, Culture and Heritage Committee of the Non-Resident Nepalese Association. - The amount of the prize is two lakh rupees. 
3. Which period has been declared as 'Decade of Ecosystem Restoration' by the United Nations? Year 2021-2030
4. Which is the partnership forest group that will be awarded with the best partnership forest award in 2078? Saviya Partnership Forest Management Group (PARSA), prize money Rs. 54 thousand 
5. When was the agreement that Nepali Railways can provide train services from Birgunj and Biratnagar to Kolkata/Hardia for transportation? V.No. June 25, 2078 - (According to the revised railway service agreement between Nepal and India, Indian private sector railway services can also be used for trade with third countries from Nepal. Previously, there was a mandatory situation to use only railway services operated by certain companies for transportation, but now many options are open.)
6. The meeting of the South Asian Olympic Council on July 12, 2021 has decided when to hold the 14th Green Games? March 2023 - (The 14th SAG was decided to be held in five cities of Pakistan, Lahore, Faisalabad, Gujranwala, Islamabad and Silakot.) 
7. What is the full form of MFN related to business? Most Favored Nation 
8. Where has it been decided to place the secretariat of the South Asian Olympic Council? Nepal 
9. Who is the first woman to be appointed as the deputy governor of the National Bank? Neelam Timsina Dhungana – V.No. The Cabinet meeting on February 25, 2077 decided to appoint Neelam Timsina Dhungana and Bam Bahadur Mishra as Deputy Governors in Rashtra Bank. - There is an arrangement to have two deputy governors in the National Bank.
10. Since when has the new Shresta system been implemented in Nepal? V.No. 2nd of Chait 2018
11. Since when has the online system been implemented in the post offices across the country? V.No. Asar 23, 2078 - Six years ago (2072 Shravan 25), the Land Records Information Management System, which was started from Kalangki, was implemented in all 126 Asar offices from 23 Asar. According to the Department of Land Management and Records, which had started in 118 offices earlier, the online system was also implemented in the remaining eight offices. area, border withholding, revenue, etc.) can be viewed in the mobile app.- With the online service system implemented in the customs office across the country, the service of this office will now be fast, efficient, transparent and reliable.
12. When is the longest day? 21 June – (Shortest day: December 22) 
13. Which is considered to be the first man-made planet? Polonium 
14. Since when was the world's biggest Nobel Prize awarded? Year 1901 - The Nobel Prize for economics has been awarded since 1968. - The Nobel Peace Prize is awarded in Oslo, the capital of Norway, while other awards are awarded in Stockholm, the capital of Sweden. - Up to three people can get this award jointly. 
15. What is the energy stored in an object due to change in its position or position? Potential Power - (The power stored in a stretched rubber, the power in water stored in a dam, the power stored in a spring when a spring is compressed or stretched, etc. are examples of potential power.)
16. What is meant by movement power? The power generated due to the movement of an object, i.e., the power stored in an object in a state of motion - (Movement power is contained in a bullet from a gun, flowing water, a moving motor, a flying bird, etc.)
17. When was the constitution of the International Renewable Energy Agency (IRENA) approved by the Parliament of Nepal? V.No. 2074 October 25 - After approval by the Parliament, the way for Nepal to become a member of that body became easy. In 2009, participating in the founding conference held in Bonn, Germany, Nepal pledged to become a member by signing the statute, but the formal process could not proceed. - IRENA was established on January 29, 2009 with the aim of widespread and sustainable use of renewable energy worldwide. 
18. Which is the highest body among the ministry level bodies of the government of Nepal? Office of the Prime Minister and Council of Ministers
19. Who is the exponent of the theory of orderly development regarding excessive offspring production, struggle for survival, natural selection, adaptation and descent, the origin of new races? Charles Darwin 
20. When was Lonely Planet founded? 1972 - The founders of this organization related to the tourism sector are Tony Wheeler and Maureen Wheeler. - This organization, which publishes a list of tourist areas every year, produces and sells tourism-related books, guidebooks and audio-visual materials. - Its headquarters is in Melbourne, Australia (branch offices: London, Beijing and New Delhi).
21. Since when did agriculture census start in Nepal? V.No. 2018 – In Nepal The sixth agricultural census was conducted in 2068.- According to the sixth agricultural census, there are 3.8 million 31 thousand farming families in Nepal. They are golden. 
22. When was the result of the Sixth National Agricultural Census (2068/69) announced? V.No. 9th of January 2070 - According to the 6th National Agricultural Census, the area of ​​land owned by farming families is 2.5 million 25 thousand hectares, which is 1 million 29 thousand hectares less than ten years ago. 
23. Which of the four major tennis tournaments is the first Grand Slam? Australian Open – (Held in January every year.)
24. Robert Peary (USA) discovered the North Pole and who discovered the South Pole? Roald Amundsen, Norway 
25. Which period has been declared as 'Decade of Ecosystem Restoration' by the United Nations? Year 2021-2030 
26. Where is the elephant breeding center located? Meghauli, Chitwan 
27. Which station did the work of the current civil library first? Commandery Bookstore 
28. When was the printing press started in Nepal? V.No. 1908- Rana Prime Minister Janga Bahadur brought this press when he returned from Britain. This was the Columbian printing press.- This press was established in the Thapathali Palace.Presented by: Tank K.C. 
Obligations of Public Bodies in Dissemination of Information
1. How is the formation of Public Service Commission? Mention. The Constitution of Nepal has provided for the formation of Public Service Commission in Nepal. According to which, the Public Service Commission has a chairman and four other members. The President and the members are appointed by the President on the recommendation of the Constitutional Council. At least 50 percent of the members of the Public Service Commission are from among the people who have been in government service for 20 years or more and the remaining members are research, research, science, technology, art, literature, law, public administration, sociology or other fields of national life. There is a provision to be appointed from among the people who have achieved fame through teaching or any other important work. There is a provision that the term of office of the chairman and members of the Public Service Commission shall be six years from the date of their appointment and they shall not be re-appointed, but a member may be appointed to the post of chairman and if such a member is appointed to the post of chairman, there is a provision that when calculating his term of office, the period of being a member will also be counted as a pair. There is a provision that a person who has been the chairman and member of the Public Service Commission is not eligible for appointment to other government services, but can be appointed to a political position, investigation, inquiry, investigation, study of a subject, and submission of opinion after investigation.
2. What is the difference between fiscal policy and monetary policy? write The difference between financial policy and monetary policy can be mentioned as follows: Financial policy - Financial policy is a policy that favorably affects the economy of the country through taxes, government spending and loans. - This government agency is formed by the Ministry of Finance. - The financial policy is issued before the beginning of the financial year. - The scope and impact of the financial policy is broad. It has a direct and indirect effect on all aspects of economic activity. - Finance policy is based on political and social foundations. The general public is interested in its methods, procedures and effects. - economic growth, Among economic stability and social justice, financial policy gives importance to economic growth. - It is closely related to the budget formulated by the government. Monetary Policy- Monetary policy is a policy designed to maintain price stability and interest rate balance. - It is formulated by the autonomous Central Bank established by this Act. - After the financial policy is released, the monetary policy is released. - The scope and impact of monetary policy is smaller than that of financial policy. This has a major impact on the currency and banking sector. - Monetary policy is based on professional and academic foundations. The common people are not very interested in its methods, processes and effects. - Among economic growth, economic stability and social justice, monetary policy gives economic stability a high priority. - It is closely related to currency, its transmission and contraction. Among economic stability and social justice, monetary policy has given economic stability a high priority. - It is closely related to currency, its transmission and contraction. Among economic stability and social justice, monetary policy has given economic stability a high priority. - It is closely related to currency, its transmission and contraction.
3. Which officer has the right to transfer to Nepal Police? write The Police Regulations, 2071 provide that the authority to transfer to the Nepal Police shall be vested in the following officers:- Additional Inspector General of Police by the Government of Nepal, - Senior Superintendent of Police and Deputy Inspector General of Police by the Minister of Home Affairs, - Police officers from Police Inspector to Superintendent of Police by the Inspector General of Police, Deputy Police Inspectors within their area The Inspector General, - The Deputy Inspector General of Police, the Senior Superintendent of Police within his area, - The Superintendent of Police, the Chief of the District Police Office within his area, the police staff from Police Office Assistant to the Assistant Inspector of Police.
4. What is the duty of the employer towards the workers? Mention it. It is mentioned in the Labor Act, 2074 that the employer has the following duties towards the workers:- Creating a safe working environment by making proper arrangements for safety and health at the workplace, - Using, operating, storing and transporting chemical, physical, biological substances and equipment at the workplace that are harmful to safety and health. - Providing necessary information, information and training related to safety and health to workers as needed, - Providing workers with necessary training and information in the appropriate language regarding the use and operation of equipment and work-related chemical, physical, and biological substances, - Entering the workplace safely and making proper arrangements for exiting, - providing workers with personal protective equipment as needed.
5. What kind of actions in the Nepali Army are considered to be offenses related to discipline and conduct? write According to the Military Act, 2063, if any of the following acts are committed in the Nepali Army, it is considered to be an offense related to discipline and conduct:- If you consume drugs, - If you behave in a rude, unnatural, reprehensible manner or if you are cruel, - If you cause physical weakness or illness in yourself, - Body If, while in good health, feigns illness or infirmity or knowingly prolongs illness or prevents recovery, -Inflicts a wound on himself or another with the intention of disqualifying himself or another for service, -Any officer, officer or badger under the jurisdiction of the Military Act shall If a person is mistreated by using criminal force as a lower rank than himself, - if he does not do any work to maintain order and military discipline or if he does any work against order and military discipline,
6. Mention the responsibility of public bodies in providing public information. The responsibilities of public bodies in the flow of public information are as follows: - Classifying information, - Updating information, - Publishing information from time to time, - Publishing and broadcasting information, - Making access to information simple and easy for citizens, - Open operation and To do it in a transparent manner, - Arrange for an information officer to provide information, - Arrange for appropriate training and education for employees, - Respect and protect the right of citizens to information.
7. In the constitution of Nepal, how can the federation control the provinces? Mention. Article 232 of the Constitution of Nepal provides that the Union can control the provinces, which can be mentioned as follows: a. The Government of Nepal can issue directives - The Government of Nepal can issue necessary directives to the Provincial Council of Ministers on matters of national importance and coordination between the provinces in accordance with the Constitution and federal laws. b. The President can alert, suspend or dissolve - If there is an action in a province that seriously affects the sovereignty, geographical integrity, nationality or independence of Nepal, the President can alert such province's Council of Ministers as necessary, suspend or dissolve the Provincial Council of Ministers and the Provincial Assembly for a maximum of six months. In this way, in case of suspension or dissolution of a provincial council of ministers and a provincial assembly, such action must be approved by a majority of the total number of members of the federal parliament immediately existing within thirty-five days. If the action related to dissolution done in this way is approved by the federal parliament, there will be an election of the provincial assembly in that province within six months, but if it is not approved by the federal parliament, there is a provision that such suspension or action related to dissolution will automatically become inactive. c. Implementation of Federal Government - If the suspension by the President is approved by the Federal Parliament, there is a provision that the federal government will continue in such province for the duration of such suspension and until the election of the Provincial Assembly in case of dissolution. In the case of federal rule, the federal parliament can enact laws on the matters included in the list of rights of the provinces as per schedule-6, and such laws shall remain in force until repealed by the relevant provincial assembly by making another law.
8. Write about the formation and work, duties and rights of the resource estimation and budget limit determination committee of rural municipality and municipality. The work of the resource estimation and budget limitation committee is formed under the coordination of the chairperson of the rural municipality and the head of the municipality to determine the budget limit of the internal income received in the rural municipality, the amount received from revenue distribution, grants, loans and other income projections and the balanced distribution plan. Duties and rights are regulated in the Local Government Operation Act, 2074. Which can be mentioned as follows:- a. Chairperson of rural municipality or head of municipality - coordinator - b. Vice President of Rural Municipality or Deputy Head of Municipality - Member - c. Among the members of the Executive Committee, women, Dalits or even minorities - four people designated by the chairman or chief - members - d.
9. How many seats should be reserved for private schools to provide free education to students? The Compulsory and Free Education Act, 2075, which was designed to implement the basic human rights and fundamental rights provided by the constitution, provides free education to students based on the number of students from the primary child development education to the twelfth grade based on the number of students. Provision has been made to reserve a place to provide:- a. Ten percent for schools with up to five hundred students, - b. Twelve percent of schools with 500 to 800 students, - c.
10. What is group work? write The work done by two or more people to achieve a common goal is called group work. This is a collective work done by the group. In this, the members of the group are dependent on each other and interrelated to each other for a common purpose. In this, groups will be formed for special work, mutual trust, harmony and cooperation between group members will be increased, there will be extensive discussions among members, there will be no position of boss and subordinate, members will be independent and self-controlled. This increases work motivation among employees and increases production and productivity. In general, the concept of group work has been developed in order to achieve a specific objective by involving specific individuals within the circle of a formal group. This is also called synergetic work.
11. Mention the characteristics of the national flag of Nepal. The characteristics of the national flag of Nepal are as follows:- with a dark blue ground, - with a dark blue border, - two triangles slightly connected, - at the top, a white shape with eight angles visible in the center of the crescent moon, - at the bottom, with a white shape of the sun with twelve angles. : Hemchandra Sharma 
1.
2. Who is the best FIFA player of the year, 2021? On the men's side: Robert Lewandowski, on the women's side: Alexia Putelas - 33-year-old Lewandowski defended the title for the second time in a row, behind Liverpool's Mohamed Salah and Paris Saint-Germain's Lionel Messi. :Alexia Putelas (Barcelona) – FIFA Best Male Goalkeeper :Edouard Mendy (Chelsea) – FIFA Best Female Goalkeeper : Christian Endler – FIFA Special Award :Cristiano Ronaldo (Manchester United) – FIFA Best Male Coach :Thomas Tuchel (Chelsea) – FIFA Best Women's Coach: Emma Hayes - FIFA Fair Play Award: Denmark - FIFA Best Fan Award: Fans of Denmark and Finland - Puskas Award: Erik Lamela
3. Who is the woman who won the title of Mrs. World 2022, an international beauty pageant for married women held in America? Shelin Ford (USA) - The winner of Mrs. American 2021, Shelin from America won the title after beating 57 competitors from other countries. 2020 Mrs. World winner and Mrs. Ireland Kate Snyder crowned her as Mrs. World. - In the competition, Devanjali Kamastra from UAE became the first runner-up and Mrs. Jordan Jacqueline Stapp became the second runner-up. - The Mrs. World competition is a competition for married women that has been held since 1984. 
4. Who is the talent who won the title of The Voice Kids, 2078? Janice Upreti
5. Which film will win the Golden Globe Award (2022), the famous international award of the film and television world? The Power of the Dog - The Power of the Dog was declared the best film in the competition held in January 2022 in Los Angeles, USA. - King Richard won the best film award under Motion Picture. - The title of the best foreign language film was won by the Japanese film 'Drive My Car'. - Similarly, the award for animated film 'Incanto' and the award for best original score was won by the film Dun. 
6. When was the first successful transplant of a pig's heart into a human? January 7, 2022 - 57-year-old Dave Wenett, a resident of Maryland, USA, had his unhealthy heart removed and transplanted into a pig's heart. - The operation was performed by seven doctors at the University of Maryland Medical Center under the leadership of Dr. Wartley Griffith.
7. When did the Taliban ban co-education in Afghanistan a few days after promising to respect women's rights? 
August 8 , 2021 . Which country will host the Winter Olympics of 2022? China - (The slogan of this Olympics is Together for a shared future.) 
9. In which country was the Omicron variant of corona virus found for the first time? South Africa – Omicron 9Dy.Gy.Gy.Chaddadh0 variant found in South Africa on November 26, 2021. - In Nepal, this variant V. No. Found on November 20, 2078. 
10. When did Kamala Harris become the acting president of the United States (the first female acting president)? November 19, 2021
11. Saving Asia's Vultures from Extinction (SAVE) has declared which country as the world's protected area for vultures? Nepal - The area that is suitable for grazing and grazing in addition to the habitat is considered a safe area. - SAVE is a 'consortium' of nearly two dozen partners cooperating for the protection of endangered vultures. 
12. Since when was the process of determining the fees of the case by the Gola system started in the Supreme Court? V.No. 2078 November 15 
13. When is World Computer Literacy Day celebrated? December 2
14. Which country will build the world's first floating city? South Korea - It is said that the city that will be built in the coastal area of ​​Wusan in South Korea will be resistant to hurricanes and floods. - The project will be constructed on a hexagonal platform using limestone coating that is three times harder than concrete. - The goal is to complete the project by 2025. 
15. A microplanet has been named in honor of which Nepalese girl by the Massachusetts Institute of Technology (MIT) University in America? Devina Thapa - (Respecting Devina's research work in the field of science and technology, the university decided to name the microplanet 'Devina Thapa' in April 2018.)
16. What is 'Times Up Campaign' related to? Sexual violence (started in January 2018) - This campaign was launched by Hollywood actresses, writers and directors with the aim of fighting against sexual violence. - The campaign said that it will make a fund of 150 million dollars for the legal treatment of victims of sexual violence. 
17. When was the conference of foreign women ministers of the world organized for the first time? 2018 September 21-22 
18. Who is the girl who won the title of Miss Universe 2021? Harnaz Sindhu (India) - India managed to win this title after 21 years (Lara Dutt in 2000). - Nadia Ferreira of Paraguay was declared the first runner-up and Lalela Swan of South Africa was declared the second runner-up in this competition. 
19. Which is the first district of Nepal where biovillage model program was conducted? Tanahun
20. If white blood cells are more than necessary, which disease is caused? Leukemia 
21. Who is the chief administrative officer of the government of Nepal? Chief Secretary 
22. 2010-2020 was celebrated by SAARC as which decade? SAARC Interregional Contact Decade 
23. What is the slogan of Industry Day 2078? Indigenous Enterprises and Production: Sustainable Industrial Revival - This day is celebrated on November 9 every year in Nepal. - V. no. This day was started to be celebrated on the occasion of the establishment of Udyog Parishad on November 9, 1993. - V. no. The cabinet meeting on Chait 20, 2071 decided to celebrate this day.
24. When did the Caribbean island nation of Varvados become the youngest republican country in the world by formally removing Queen Elizabeth from the position of the head of state of her country? 2021 November 30 – Dame Sandra Mason becomes President of Varvados. - She became the head of state of Varvados in place of the Queen of Great Britain. 
26. Which is the metropolitan city with the highest number of wards? Pokhara Metropolitan City Presenter: Tank K.C.
Conditions to be fulfilled to be a municipality 1. What are the objectives of self-assessment system? Mention. Self-assessment is a method by which taxpayers self-motivate to determine their own taxes. Since only the taxpayer is aware of the actual business situation of the taxpayer, its paramount purpose is to make him responsible and accountable in tax assessment and to ensure full compliance with the tax law. Its other objectives can be mentioned as follows:- Bringing taxpayers freely under the scope of tax laws,- Developing voluntary tax filing system,- Increasing public trust towards taxes,- Increasing tax awareness,- Reducing tax administration and tax participation costs of taxpayers,- Guaranteeing economic democracy to taxpayers. - To prevent revenue leakage - To increase revenue mobilization by expanding the scope of taxes - To continue revenue collection - To automate the tax system.
2. What are the conditions and facilities to be fulfilled to be declared a municipality? Mention. The conditions and facilities to be fulfilled to be declared a municipality are as follows: a. Permanent resident - must be a permanent resident according to the following: - Himalayan district: at least ten thousand, - Hill district: at least forty thousand, - Inner Madhes district: at least fifty thousand, - Terai district: at least seventy five thousand, - Kathmandu Valley: at least one lakh, b. Internal Income - The annual internal income should be as follows:- The average annual internal income of the last five years should be at least one crore rupees in Himalayan region and at least three crore rupees in other districts. c. Urban facilities – having minimum urban facilities such as roads, electricity, drinking water, communication etc.
3. What are the functions of the Employee Provident Fund? Mention. To manage the Provident Fund on behalf of civil servants, Nepali Army, Nepal Police, employees of organized organizations and other employees. Employees' Provident Fund Act, 2019 issued on 31st August 2019, established as a self-governing organization with inalienable succession, the functions of the Employees' Provident Fund are as follows:- Collecting the funds collected in the name of contributors,- Managing the collected funds,- Safeguarding and yielding the available resources. Mobilizing in the field, - Proportionate distribution of the returns obtained from the mobilization of resources, - Operating and managing social security facilities, - Operating and managing various types of stipend facilities for social needs during service, - Preparing an annual report of the business of each financial year and presenting it to the Government of Nepal.
4. Discuss the role of federal, state and local levels in economic development. The overall development of the economy is economic development. Import substitution through production and productivity growth, export enhancement, broad-based domestic employment, multi-skilled manpower, commercialization of agriculture, development of physical infrastructure, strong administration with information technology, macroeconomic stability, political stability, competent private sector and other aspects are important bases for economic development. If the rate of economic growth is high, sustainable, broad, fair and inclusive, economic development will occur. To achieve this, the government should develop the capacity of the involved parties, motivate them, and create a good work environment through overall stability. The government should lead the overall development by facilitating the work of the private sector, which is the leader of economic development. In this, since Nepal has now gone to a federal system, the Union, The role of the state and local level is multifaceted, which can be discussed as follows: The role of the union - the precondition of economic development is peace, security and stability. Ensuring its full guarantee, - Maintaining macroeconomic stability by providing stability in tax rates, interest rates, exchange rates, inflation rates, - Playing a leading role in the country's economic and social development and prosperity, - Setting national policies and plans, - Determining regulatory standards , to coordinate, - to create an investment-friendly environment in the country by improving the policy, legal, institutional and procedural aspects, - to make the flow of basic goods and services fast, simple and transparent, - to facilitate the activities of the private sector, - to implement large national level and interprovincial level projects, Not implementing small projects at provincial and local levels, - developing the capacity of provincial and local levels, - coordination between the three levels of government,
5. What are the ways to increase public participation in the development of the local level? write The economic, social and physical transformation within the rural municipality and municipal area is the development of the local level. This is a positive and qualitative change in every area of ​​the local level. Since development is a multifaceted issue, it requires active and meaningful participation of all stakeholders at the local level. The participation of the local people has significant significance in the local development. It helps to make the development of the local level sustainable and reliable. Therefore, development should be based on people's participation at the local level. For this, people's participation in local level development can be increased by adopting the following measures:- By selecting development construction projects based on the demands and needs of local people, - By increasing the wide participation of local citizens in project selection, - By conducting local development construction projects through local stakeholders and consumer committees,
6. Mention the strategies to be adopted to make public institutions of Nepal effective. Public enterprises that are wholly or mostly owned by the government are public enterprises that produce and sell goods and services. In Nepal, there are currently 44 public institutions in the industrial sector, service sector, commercial sector, social sector, utility sector and financial sector. Out of which 24 are operating in profit, 18 in loss and two in zero turnover. The laws for the formation of these institutes are different and according to the nature of their work, these institutes are under different ministries. Each of these has its own specific problems. Addressing all these issues, it seems that the following strategies should be adopted to make public institutions effective: a. Classification of Public Institutions:- Objectives of public institutions, results of work done, financial status, professional efficiency, Analyzing the government's policy and classifying the institutes that require government investment and those that do not, b. Divestment of government investment:- Divestment of government investment of institutions operating in areas where the private sector has been enabled and institutions that the government does not consider necessary to operate in the private sector,- Encouraging the investment of the private sector and cooperative sector in this work,- Formulating privatization regulations to implement the Privatization Act, 2050 ,- To activate the privatization committee formed under the chairmanship of the Minister of Finance, to form a sub-committee to make the operations of government investment and disinvestment effective. c. Making management contracts - to engage the private sector in the management by making contracts with the private sector so that the public institutions that are operated at low capacity remain government owned, d. Amalgamation – Amalgamation of public institutions with similar objectives to improve professional efficiency, e. - Giving managerial autonomy, providing freedom in production, pricing, distribution, financial and administrative decisions, - Operating in strategic partnership, - Hiring employees only on the recommendation of the Public Service Commission, - Obligations created without provision of resources will not be borne by government funds, - Bonuses and others Aligning the facility with profit and performance, - Bringing consistency in employee service facilities in all institutions, - Conducting audit within time, - Emphasis on financial governance. Dismissal - Dismissal of institutions in sectors where the private sector is not attracted by reconciling assets and liabilities. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma - Obligations created without provision of resources should not be borne by government funds, - Bonuses and other facilities should be tied to profit and performance, - Uniformity in employee service facilities in all institutions, - Audit within time, - Emphasis on financial governance. Dismissal - Dismissal of institutions in sectors where the private sector is not attracted by reconciling assets and liabilities. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma - Obligations created without provision of resources should not be borne by government funds, - Bonuses and other facilities should be tied to profit and performance, - Uniformity in employee service facilities in all institutions, - Audit within time, - Emphasis on financial governance. Dismissal - Dismissal of institutions in sectors where the private sector is not attracted by reconciling assets and liabilities. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
1. What is the name of the new variant of the corona virus discovered in South Africa by the World Health Organization? Omicron – WHO named the virus Omicron on November 26, 2021. - WHO has named the variant found in UK as 'Alpha', the variant found in Brazil as 'Gamma', the variant found in South Africa (previously) as 'Vita', the variant found in India (B-1.617.2) as 'Delta' and another variant found in India (B -1.617.1) named Kappa. – the country in which the variant was identified, After the dispute arose when the variant of Covid-19 was started to be named based on the name of the same country, the World Health Organization started naming it based on the Greek alphabet from May 31, 2021, i.e. in a new way. - Based on the genetic structure of the virus, it was tested and named for the production of vaccines and medicines. - Named by the International Committee on Taxonomy of Viruses (ICTV) based on the findings of a group of virologists and scientists.
2. Where is the world's second longest zipline built? Kushma, Parbat – The zipline built in Superman style Vs. It has been in operation since December 24, 2078. - Starting from a height of 250 meters above the surface of the Kaligandaki river, the initial speed of the zipline runs at a speed of 130 km per hour and gradually decreases as it approaches the destination. - After crossing a distance of 1480 meters, the company (Harness Pvt. Ltd.) will reach the adventure resort and land the zipline. - The world's longest zipline in Superman style is in Dubai.
3. Who was awarded the best female award at the HR Meet Nepal Award for Corporate Excellence 2021 held in Kathmandu? Anupama Khunjeli (CEO, Mega Bank Nepal) – This award was given to CEO Khunjeli for his excellent work in the banking sector. - CEO Khunjeli is the first female CEO of 'A' class commercial bank of Nepal. - Muktinath Bikas Bank was awarded in the financial services category of the HRM Awards for Corporate Excellence 2021. 
4. Who is the girl who succeeded to become Mrs. Grand International Nepal? Urmila Upreti Silwal (Bhairawa) - (The winner of the contest organized by Rivan Entertainment, Urmila will participate on behalf of Nepal in Mrs. Grand International 2022, an international beauty pageant for married women in Mandalay, Myanmar.)
5. What is the Remembrance Sunday ceremony held in London in November 2021 related to? First World War - (The ceremony was held on the occasion of the 103rd anniversary of the end of the First World War.) 
6. When was the famous scientist Thomas Alva Edison born? February 11, 1847 - He was born in the state of Ohio, USA. Thomas Alva Edison is the scientist who invented gramophone, electric bulb, movie camera and projector. Edison was the first scientist to use the word hello on the telephone. - Edison is known as the scientist who made the most inventions so far. - Thomas Alva Edison died on October 18, 1931.
7. How many official languages ​​of the United Nations are there? 6- UNO officially recognized languages: English, French, Chinese, Russian, Spanish and Arabic. - The latest language officially recognized by UNO is Arabic. - The two languages ​​used in UNO office operations are English and French.
8. According to the Ministry of Federal Affairs and General Administration, which local level has succeeded in becoming the first in the assessment of the state of e-governance at the local level? Chaurjahari Municipality (Rukum West) - According to the report prepared by evaluating seven subjects out of 100 points, Chaurjahari Municipality won the first place with 80 points. - According to the report, the best 15 local level are eight municipalities, three rural municipalities, There are three sub-metropolitan cities and one metropolitan city. - According to the report, the best 15 local levels were ranked at the local level: Angchaurjahari Municipality (West Rukum) 80 Waling Municipality (Syangja) 78 Kirtipur Municipality (Kathmandu) 78 Khairhani Municipality (Chitwan) 76 Dhangadhi Sub Metropolitan Municipality (Kailali) 76 Jwalamukhi Rural Municipality (Dhading) 75 Kankai Municipality (Jhapa) 74 Gaur Municipality (Rautahat) 73 Pokhara Metropolitan Municipality (Kaski) 71 Tulsipur Sub-Metropolitan City (Dang) 71 Sharada Municipality (Salyan) 70 Gurvakot Municipality (Surkhet) 68 Sakhuvankarkatti Rural Municipality (Siraha) 68 Nepalganj Sub-Metropolitan Municipality (Banke) 68 Mellekh Rural Municipality (Achham) 68
9. How many summits decided to keep the SAARC secretariat in Kathmandu? Second - The decision to appoint a secretary general from each country based on the English alphabet was made in the second conference. - The second summit was held on November 17-18, 1986 in Bangalore, India. 
10. Different manufacturers use QR codes in their products. What is the full form of the code? Quick Response Code 
11. When was the non-resident Nepali association established? 2003 October 11 
12. Who is the author of 'Lost in Transition'? Kulchandra Gautam 
13. Nepal was divided into 39 districts during Bhimsen Thapa's time and how many districts were divided during Rana's time? 35- (During the Rana period, 35 (12 in the lowlands and 23 in the mountains) districts were established in Nepal.)
14. What is 'Kirovo'? The first robot to give information by speaking from space - This robot, built by the University of Tokyo in Japan, gave information by speaking for the first time on August 21, 2013. 
15. Who is the author of 'Putli Ghar'? Pushpa Basnet 
16. How many degrees of longitude is Greenwich in the UK? 0 degrees - (The international time is determined based on Greenwich (0 degree longitude) in Great Britain. Nepal's time is 5 hours 45 minutes earlier than Greenwich Minutes.) 
17. Which is the gland that produces insulin hormone in the human body? Pakrias
18. V.No. Who was selected as the president by the eighth congress of CPN (Maoist Center) held in Kathmandu in December 2078? Pushpa Kamal Dahal 'Prachanda' - (The first meeting of the Central Committee selected by the 8th Congress decided to continue Prachanda as the president on December 19.) 
19. What is meant by Baduri Yatra? Traditionally, it is customary to transport salt, rice and other necessary materials through sheep and goats. - Staying under the open sky during the Baduri Yatra is called Baduri Pata. - This custom still exists in Karnali of the past. - A herd of sheep and goats is called Bahkar in the Khas language of Karnali, while its shepherd is called Baduri. Baduri have not abandoned their traditions even though the daily means of transport have reached the road. 
20. What kind of energy sources are solar energy, wind energy, water source energy and tides? renewable
21. What kind of energy sources are natural gas, mineral oil, coal etc.? Indefinable 
22. When did the Piskar incident, known as the Piskar scandal, take place in the history of Nepal? V.No. 2040 March 1- (On the day of Maghe Sankranti in 2040, Ili Thami and Bir Bahadur Thami died on the spot and hundreds were injured and arrested during the Maghe Sankranti Mela at the Mahadevasthan of Piskar village in Sindhupalchok district during the night during the Maghe Sankranti Mela. known as Kanda.) 
23. Which city in the world is known as the kingdom of bicycles? Beijing (China) - Bicycle use reduces environmental pollution and physical exercise while cycling keeps human health fit. - In Beijing, which has six ring roads, there is a separate lane for bicycles on the road. Presenter: Tank Casey
Problems in Nepal's financial sector 
1. What are the processes of privatization of public institutions? Mention. The processes of privatization of public institutions are as follows:- (a) by selling shares, - (b) by co-operatives, - (c) by selling assets, - (d) by leasing assets, - (e) by involving the private sector in management, - (f) by adopting any other means deemed appropriate by the Government of Nepal on the recommendation of the Privatization Committee constituted under the chairmanship of the Minister of Finance,
2. What are the current problems in Nepal's financial sector? Discuss. The financial sector is the sector where capital is demanded, created and supplied. The financial sector, which is known as the backbone of the economy, includes commercial banks, development banks, finance companies, financial institutions that deal with microfinance transactions licensed by Nepal Rastra Bank, cooperatives, and non-governmental organizations. In Nepal, according to the Nepal Rastra Bank Act, 2058 and the Banking and Financial Institutions Act, 2073, Nepal Rastra Bank has been doing the regulation and supervision of the entire financial sector of Nepal as the central bank, and yet it has not been strengthened yet. The current problems in the financial sector of Nepal can be discussed as follows:- Increasing lack of liquidity in banks and financial institutions,- Inability to increase deposits,- Increasing difference between the interest rates given by banks and financial institutions on deposits and loans taken,
3. What are the functions of the National Insurance Institute? write The functions performed by the National Insurance Institute are as follows:- Conducting life insurance business, - Reinsurance, - Investing and taking necessary steps for the recovery and protection of such investment, - Issuing debentures and preference shares, - Any mortgaged property under its control. To keep, to operate such property for the necessary period of time, - to grant loans on the security of movable and immovable property, - to take loans by pledging property, - to lease, sell or dispose of any property in any other way, - to issue shares and debentures of other corporations. Assisting, guaranteeing, - Doing agency business, - Investing abroad, - Investing in the share capital of other organized companies, - Appointing agents, giving them commission, - Buying and selling shares, bonds, debentures, certificates, movable and immovable property etc. ,
4. What are the functions, duties and powers of the National Security Council? Mention. Article 266 of the Constitution of Nepal and the Military Act, 2063 provide for the constitution of the National Security Council and its functions, duties and rights. Which can be mentioned as follows: Formation of National Security Council – (a) Prime Minister – Chairman – (b) Minister of Defense of the Government of Nepal – Member – (c) Minister of Home Affairs of the Government of Nepal – Member – (d) Minister of Foreign Affairs of the Government of Nepal – Member – (e) Government of Nepal Minister of Finance - Member - (f) Chief Secretary of the Government of Nepal - Member - (g) Commander-in-Chief, Nepalese Army - Member - The Secretary of the Ministry of Defense will work as a member-secretary of the National Security Council, work, duties and powers of the National Security Council - the overall national interest of Nepal, Formulating security and defense policy, - Policy on mobilization, operation and use of Nepali Army,
5. What are the grounds for promotion to the post of Inspector General of Police of Nepal Police? Mention. According to Rule 41 of the Police Regulations, 2071, the Government of Nepal has a provision to promote to the post of Inspector General of Police of Nepal Police from among the Additional Inspectors General of Police and in the absence of Additional Inspectors General of Police from among the Deputy Inspectors General of Police on the following basis:- seniority,- efficiency,- efficiency,- ability to bear responsibility, — Ability to provide leadership, — Ability to motivate and mobilize subordinates,
6. What is supervision? Write its objectives. Supervision is the supervision, monitoring, control, coordination, monitoring and evaluation of the work done by the officials of the higher bodies to make the subordinates active. Supervision can be done by observing the work done by the employee at the workplace, studying and asking for progress details outside the workplace, and evaluating the performance. This is a continuous process. This is a management function. This is also a principle of the organization. This is the work done by the higher level of the organization. Objectives of supervision - To observe the work done by the subordinates from different angles, - To evaluate the quality, quantity, cost and time of the work done, - To ensure compliance with laws and procedures, - To compare the goals and progress, - To improve the weak aspects of the work, to continue the strong aspects. To give,- to improve the work environment,
7. What are the services and groups in the Nepalese army? Mention. There are five services and 15 groups in the Nepali Army. The Nepali Army has been formed by combining these services and groups. The services and groups in the Nepali Army can be mentioned as follows: 1. Military General Service:- There is no system of groups in this service. 2. Military Technical Service:- This service has the following groups:- (a) Military Health Group- (b) Military Engineering Group- (c) Animal Development and Animal Health Group- (d) Other Technical Group3. Sainik Prad Service:- There is no arrangement of groups in this service. 4. Military Air Service:- This service has the following groups:- (a) Pilot Group- (b) Air Maintenance Group- (c) Other Air Group5.
8. What are the weaknesses in the implementation of the fundamental rights mentioned in the Constitution of Nepal? Discuss. Part 3, Article 16 to 46 of the Constitution of Nepal has 31 fundamental rights. Due to the resources available in the country, geographical situation, economic and social system, service delivery, good governance, the ability of the government structure, the awareness of citizens, various weaknesses have been observed in the implementation of the fundamental rights mentioned in the constitution, which can be mentioned as follows: - All citizens have not had easy access to health services. - Basic health services not reaching homes free of charge, - Deprivation of emergency health services, this situation is more common in remote areas, - Access to basic education for all citizens could not be increased due to ineffective student enrollment process, - Despite free education up to secondary level, quality Unable to create, teacher's ability to develop,
1. Who won the title of Prime Minister's Cup Women's National Cricket Tournament (2078)? APF Club - In the competition held in Dhangadhi, became the champion and received five lakh rupees in cash along with a trophy. - Province 1, which became the runner-up, received three lakh rupees and a trophy. - The tournament was organized by the Nepal Cricket Association (CAN) and co-organized by the Far West Cricket Association from December 3-11, 2078. - Seven teams from seven provinces and departmental team APF club participated in the competition.
2. When did Desmond Tutu, who played an important role in ending apartheid in South Africa, die? December 26, 2021 - Tutu, a contemporary of Nelson Mandela, was a prominent figure in the movement to end apartheid in South Africa from 1948 to 1991. - Nobel Peace Prize winner Tutu played an ego role together with Nelson Mandela in the apartheid movement. - Tutu, a black race, has always been in struggle with the minority white rulers in South Africa due to his ideas and actions.
3. Who won the AVC Asian Central Zone Women's Volleyball Challenge Cup title held in Dhaka, Bangladesh? Nepal- Nepal won the title by defeating Uzbekistan by 3-2 sets in the final match in Dhaka. - With this, Nepal managed to win this title for the second time in a row. In the first edition held in Bangladesh in 2019, Nepal won the title by beating Maldives 3-0 in straight sets. - Sri Lanka won third place in the second edition of the championship. - Bangladesh, Kyrgyzstan, Maldives, Nepal, Sri Lanka and Uzbekistan are participating in the championship. - The Nepali National Men's Volleyball Team won the fourth place in the men's volleyball team. In the final of this category, Sri Lanka won the title by defeating the home team Bangladesh.
4. When was the first safe drinking water settlement announced in the Himalayan district of Mugu? V.No. December 15, 2078 – Dewada, Naur, Jhapagad and Chan have been declared communities with safe drinking water under the only Chayannath Rara municipality in the district. 
5. Where is the big night festival in vogue? Sudurpaschim - With the belief that the night of the 15th of December is the longest, this night is regarded as a big night and there is a tradition of staying awake and having fun eating delicious food at night, playing deuda and taking a bath without light in the morning. - It is customary to eat 15 types of dishes in this festival, which is also celebrated as Pannari Raat. - There is also a tradition of eating Kunkyuli (forest feast) on this day from the money collected by playing bhaili during Tihar. - December 22nd is called the shortest day all over the world, but here, December 15th is considered as the shortest day. - In India, Pus 15 is celebrated as Lohri festival.
6. When was the friendly relationship established between Byas of Tanahun and Thakurbaba Municipality of Bardia? V.No. December 2078 - Friendly relations were established between the two municipalities with the slogan "Together for Prosperity". - A relationship has been established to attract tourists by exchanging customs, culture and traditions, discussing development models and working as a partnership. - It is believed that friendly relations will play an important role in trade coordination as well as facilitating the exchange of food and products in the mountain and Samathar regions.
7. Who is the successful girl who won the title of Mrs. Nepal World, 2021? Deeksha KC (Waffle, Kathmandu) – Deeksha will represent Nepal in the international beauty pageant Mrs. World in 2022 with the title. Starting from this year, the winner of Mrs. Nepal World will participate in the Mrs. World franchise, which will be Nepal's first participation in the international competition. - Actress Usha Rajak became Mrs Nepal International and Pavita MS International in the competition. They got the opportunity to participate in Mrs. International and MS International to be held in Singapore in 2022 along with the title. - Sunita Lama became Mrs. Nepal World first runner-up, Rajshree Thapa Mrs. Nepal World second runner-up and Manita Pyakurel Mrs. Nepal World third runner-up in the competition organized by Rivan Entertainment and marketing collaboration of Key Advertising.
8. How long has UNMIN worked in Nepal? V.No. 2063 Jan 9 to 2067 Jan 30 
9. Who is the first permanent representative of Nepal to the United Nations? Rishikesh Shah (year 1955-1961) - (Currently Amrit Rai is the permanent representative of Nepal for UNO.) 
10. Nilgai is known by what other name? Donkey 
11. If the animal that cries like a human is a bear, which animal laughs like a human? Hyena 
12. What is the Point Four program related to? Foreign aid 
13. When was the first meeting of the enlightened group consisting of experts from both countries formed to study and review the overall aspect of Nepal-India relations? V.No. 20-21 June 2073 (in Kathmandu) 
14. Which country has developed cooperatives in the world? Britain
15. What is the stored energy in an object due to change in its position or position? Status Shakti 9 Ayatbhalatashb Vhlavachanath0- (The power stored in stretched rubber, the power in water stored in a dam, the power stored in a spring when a spring is pressed or stretched, etc. are examples of power i.e. potential power.) 
16. What is meant by movement power? The power generated due to the movement of the object, i.e. the power stored in the object in the state of motion - (Movement power is contained in a bullet from a gun, flowing water, a moving motor, a flying bird, etc.) 
17. Who is the author of human jurisprudence? Jayasthiti Mall 
18. Who gave Janga Bahadur the title of Rana? Shri 5 Surendra (b. 1905)
19. Who was awarded the Ganki-Dhuswan-Vasundhara Award 2078? Novelist Neelam Karki Niharika – Similarly, this year's Dhuswan Sayami creation award was given to senior artist Govindlal Singh Dangol. - Both prizes are worth 50-50 thousand rupees. 
20. Africa is the second largest continent in terms of area and which is the third largest continent? North America 
21. From Kurintar in Chitwan to Manakamana in Gorkha, how many kilometers is the cable car running? 2.8 km 
22. Where has the world's highest and longest sky cycling service started? Kusma, Parvat (year 2078, 13th December) - The service was launched in Bhir over the Kaligandkinadi. - The length of cycling at a height of 228 meters is 600 meters in two directions. - The Cliff, which is operating the second highest bungee in the world, launched this service.
23. A female pig is called a sow and what is a male pig called? Bucho 
24. When did the government officially start by establishing a central registration department aimed at registering events across the country? V.No. 2071 Chait 8 (Government decided to establish the department on 30 October 2071.) 
25. Who discovered the Ashoka pillar of Lumbini built by Emperor Ashoka? Dr. Führer 
26. How many chapters are there in Ramayana written by Maharishi Valmiki? Seven 
27. Which religious area is understood as Chardham of Nepal? Barah area, Mukti area, Harihar area and Ruru area.
28. Kavi Shiromani Lekhnath Paudyal Literary Award was given to whom? Literary writers Sarubhakta and Ramesh Khakurel - Sarubhakta was honored with an award in 2077 and Khakurel in 2078. - Due to Corona, Poudyal's birth anniversary was not celebrated last year, this year's award was given at the same time as last year. - The prize amount is 50/50 thousand rupees. 
29. What is the place where the battle of Mahabharata took place? Kuru area
Inclusion and positive differentiation 1. Identify the problems of Nepal's public administration and mention the measures to make public administration effective. Public administration is the permanent mechanism for implementing the policies and programs of the government. It continuously serves the country and the people by planning, organizing, coordinating, controlling, and directing the available means and resources to effectively achieve public objectives and goals. For this, civil service, security agencies, courts, community schools, hospitals, public institutes and other structures have been arranged in Nepal. Public administration is active in all governments from the center to the federal, provincial and local levels, and yet Nepal's public administration has not been free from problems. It has various problems, which can be mentioned as follows:
2. Clarifying the concept of inclusion and positive discrimination, mention the measures to promote inclusion. Inclusion is the act of making women, dalits, poor and other class communities who are backward from economic, social, political and administrative point of view participate in the process of decision-making and performance. Inclusion advocates the participation of all in every sector and organ of state administration. It believes that backward or marginalized classes and communities should be given meaningful participation in the state administration. This is the cornerstone of good governance. It further helps those who do not have easy access to state administration to increase easy access, to distribute resources and opportunities equally, to make everyone adopt in development and for social transformation. This concept is found with the beginning of direct and indirect state system. However, its meaningful use is more recent. In Nepal, legal and institutional arrangements have been made to manage inclusion, but still the target group has not been able to benefit from it. Concept of Positive Discrimination- Some different flexible arrangements made by the state to make women, dalits, disabled, poor and backward class communities relatively easy to enter the state administration is called positive discrimination. It is a gateway for the target class to enter the state machinery through an easy route. This is unequal treatment for equality. Since this distinction is made for good deeds, it is called positive distinction. It helps in maintaining social justice. Likewise, it helps everyone participate in social transformation by reducing social conflicts and violence. In Nepal, there is a legal arrangement regarding positive discrimination. Civil Service, Military, Police, Provision has been made for positive discrimination in services such as teachers and public institutions. Measures to promote inclusion - political parties to make target groups participate in the party and government according to the recognition of inclusion, - to ensure full compliance with the provisions mentioned in the constitution and laws of Nepal, - to organize reservations by preparing appropriate criteria, reservation based on indicators such as economic conditions, geographical conditions, physical conditions Applying and adopting it in every sector of the state system without limiting it only to the administration sector, - Identifying the target group and conducting targeted programs, - Making the empowerment program more effective by arranging sufficient funds, - Inclusion methods such as: proportional representation, positive discrimination, reservation , targeted programs,
3. What are the problems seen in Nepal's civil service transfer system? Mention. The job transfer system is a job transfer system in which the employees working in the civil service are given the same job by changing the place. There is no significant change in the salary, facilities, work and responsibilities of the employees. Only the location of the office changes. The Civil Service Act, 2049 and Regulations, 2050 have been implemented to manage the transfer system in Nepal's civil service. The Ministry of Federal Affairs and General Administration, the ministry related to the service group has been carrying out the transfer work and various problems have been observed in the transfer, which can be discussed as follows:- Rapid changes in the criteria and basis of transfer, - Failure to disclose the basis and reason for transfer, - The transfer system once a year cannot meet the needs of both the organization and the employees, - the discretion of the decision maker that the transfer system should be automatic,
4. What is meant by financial transaction report? Mentioning the problems in the reporting system of government financial transactions of Nepal, what should be done to make it effective? Give suggestions. The work of presenting the progress statement of income and expenditure of financial transactions from the lower body to the higher body is called financial transaction report. Based on the systematic records of financial transactions, it is done monthly, quarterly, quarterly and annually according to the law. According to the need, such a report can be made daily and weekly. It also exposes the good and bad aspects of financial transactions by giving information about the real situation of income and expenditure. This includes policies, plans for the future, A program can be made. It is also an indicator of business progress. Problems in the reporting system of government financial transactions in Nepal - To organize the reporting system of government financial transactions in Nepal, there are laws including Economic Procedure and Financial Responsibility Act, 2076 and Regulations, 2077, Intergovernmental Finance Management Act, 2074, Public Procurement Act, 2063 and Regulations, 2064. . In which, monthly, quarterly, quarterly and yearly financial transactions report should be prepared and submitted to the taluk body through computer system and the said report should be made public through the notice board of their office and website. There is a provision to publicize the records and reports of financial transactions on a monthly/quarterly basis by conducting internal audits and final audits after the end of the financial year, and there are also various problems.
1. Who is the elected female leader as the first female president in Honduras? Xiomara Castro - Xiomara is the leader of the Liberty and Refoundation Party of Honduras. - Her tenure will start from January 27, 2022. - She is the wife of the former president of Honduras, Manuel Zilaya. 
2. Since when did the Ministry of Communication and Information Technology start the 'SMS Gateway' service? V.No. December 7, 2078 - The government has launched this service with the aim of connecting service providers and service providers with information technology in a timely manner about the services provided by government service providers. - At present, the Attorney General's Office, Transport Management Department and the Ministry of Labour, Employment and Transport under Bagmati province have an agreement to provide this service. - This service will be gradually extended to other offices.
3. Where has the thami museum been built? Dolakha - The construction of the museum has started in Rangrangthali of Dolakha, which is considered as the birthplace of the Thami race. Along with the museum, modern theater, land, meditation center, opera house, guest house, garden, fountain park and other structures will also be built. - An attractive pond has also been constructed in the museum premises.
4. Who is the youngest politician elected as the president of the Latin American country? Gabriel Borik - a 35-year-old student leader known as a communist leader, was elected as the president there. He became the youngest president in the history of Chile. He won with 56 percent of the total votes. His opponent Jose Antonio Cast received 44 percent of the votes. - He played an important role in the student movement in 2011-12 with the demand that university education should be free. Then, in the lower house election held in 2013, he won as an independent candidate. Similarly, in 2017, he won with the most votes.
5. Since when has it been decided to stop the year-long protest by Indian farmers? December 11, 2021 - The farmers decided to stop the demonstration after the government promised to discuss their demands and guarantee the right price of the products. - About a week after the government announced that it would abandon the controversial agricultural reform program, Indian farmers stopped a year-long mass protest. - Dozens of thousands of farmers protesting by setting up a camp in the border area of ​​the capital Delhi died due to heat, cold and covid. - On November 19, 2021, Prime Minister Narendra Modi announced that his government would withdraw those laws. 
6. Which conservationist of Nepal is known as dolphin celebrity? Bhojraj Shrestha 
7. What is meant by mother house in the context of social campaign? Karnali Province's home for at-risk street children
8. What is meant by Guerrilla of Time? A book based on the biography of Fidel Castro 
9. What is the main provincial slogan of Province 1? Clean, happy and prosperous province 
10. What is the campaign against racial discrimination in America known as in the 1950s/60s? Civil Rights Movement - campaign conducted during the period 1954-1968 to end the discrimination between whites and blacks in America, blacks have less basic rights compared to whites and economic inequality between whites and blacks. - Martin, the main activist of this campaign. Luther King Jr., Rosa Parks, Malcolm X, Cassiel Clay (Muhammad Ali) etc. - Martin Luther King Jr. and Malcolm X were killed during this movement. - Cassiel Clay protested against caste discrimination and abandoned Christianity and converted to Islam and identified himself as Muhammad Ali.
11. Who is the first artist to receive the Madan Award (in 2013)? Satya Mohan Joshi, Chittaranjan Nepali and Balram Joshi – Madan Award established in Happened in 2012. - The first novel to receive the Madan Award: Mana (2014) - Four women who have been honored with this award so far: Parijat (2022), Jhamak Ghimire (2067), Radha Poudel (2070), Neelam Karki Niharika (2074).- The most times Madan Person receiving the award: Satya Mohan Joshi.- Initially the amount of this award: Rs. Four thousand, currently: Rs. Four Lakhs.- The list of books in the Madan Prize library will be called Madan Saurabh and the list of magazines will be called Madan Gaurav. Similarly, the list of authors is called Madan Pourakh. 
12. Which vaccine against Covid-19 will be approved by the World Health Organization for emergency use first? Pfizer
13. A.W. In 2075/76, the average amount of air pollution is 50 micrograms per cubic meter, how much has the 15th periodic plan aimed to reduce? 40 micrograms per cubic meter 
14. Who is the first doctor to transplant human heart? Dr. Christian Varnad (South Africa) - The doctor who transplanted the heart of a dead person into a living person is Kumud Dhital. - The first person who received a heart transplant was Louis Waskanski. 
15. If Yagyaraj Sharma is known as 'Sangeet Shiromani', who is known as 'Vadya Shiromani'? Ustad Ganesh Lal 
16. What is the name of the blood vessels that carry blood from the heart to different parts of the body? Artery (Arteris) 
– (The blood vessels that carry blood from different parts of the body to the heart are called veins.)
17. In which act is defined that "natural, cultural and social systems, economic and human activities and their components and the interaction and interrelation between these components is called environment"? Environment Protection Act, 2053 
18. Who is the first Nepali to receive the highest military medal 'Victoria Cross' awarded by the British government? Kulveer Thapa (showed valor in the First World War.) 
19. How many women have been appointed Secretary General in SAARC so far? One – (Maldives Fathimath Dhiana Shayed) 
20. Which is the first industrial sector established in Nepal? Balaju Industrial Area (2016) 21. Nepal was divided into how many constituencies in the 2015 general election? 109 
22. What is the name of the base established during the time of Prime Minister Janga Bahadur Rana regarding the prevention of corruption? Religion Court
23. How many degrees of longitude is Greenwich? '0' degree 
24. In Nepal, what is the name of the instrument that is played by hitting the drum with a drum? Dhangro 
25. Who wrote 'Madhavi' in which genre? Madanmani Dixit's novel 
26. Where did Kazi Kalu Pandey achieve heroism in Nepal's unification campaign? Kirtipur 
27. When was the provision made mandatory by the customs department for export import code number (EXIM code)? V.No. 2074 July 1 Presenter: Tank KC
Public service delivery1. What are the objectives of public administration? write Public administration is the permanent mechanism for implementing the policies and programs of the government. This mechanism is operated according to the country's political system, constitution, and laws. Its objectives are generally the following: - to protect the independence, sovereignty, geographical integrity and independence of the country, - to protect the lives, wealth, equality and freedom of citizens, - to uphold the rule of law, fundamental rights and human rights, - through social justice To maintain a just system in all areas of national life, - To establish a public welfare state system, - To assimilate the principle of proportionality in the governance system based on local autonomy and decentralization, - To make public service delivery agile and efficient, - To arrange a system for equitable distribution of resources,
2. What are the basic characteristics of public service delivery? Discuss. The basic characteristics of goods and services provided by the government to the common people can be presented as follows: Law-based service:- Public service is based on law as the service must be provided by following the methods and procedures of the prevailing law. Continuity:- It has continuity as it has to be provided yesterday, today and tomorrow regularly. Uniformity:- There is uniformity in service delivery from all government agencies. There is uniformity in language, form, quality. There is equality. Fairness:- Government services are provided without discrimination to anyone. Everyone has equal rights to it. Special rights and arrangements have also been made for backward classes and citizens. Simplicity:- Government services are delivered by following simple methods, procedures and standards. Variety: - Since every type of service has to be provided, there is diversity in public service delivery. Based on organization:- It is based on organization because it provides services by building different organizations from the center to the local level. Services are provided through public organizations. For example: Distribution of citizenship from the district administration office. Based on principles:- It is based on principles because services should be provided by adopting principles such as coordination, communication, hierarchy, control, reporting etc. It brings agility in service delivery. Ubiquitous:- Service flow is ubiquitous as it has to flow everywhere and to all people. Homeland, abroad, people need service from birth to death. Universal acceptance:- Public service is accepted by all citizens as it is required by all and required by all. Quality: - Quality must be maintained in public service delivery. The quality of service should be increased in order to earn the trust of citizens. Changeability:- Service delivery should be improved according to the time frame. It is changing because new services have to be provided according to the demands and needs of the citizens. For example: the current smart passport, online services such as payment of electricity and water through electronic means are changing services. Transparency:- There should be no delay, irregularity in the delivery of public services, as there should be equal access to the service, there should be transparency in it. The monitoring body should always pay attention to this. Online services such as water payment etc. are variable services. Transparency:- There should be no delay, irregularity in the delivery of public services, as there should be equal access to the service, there should be transparency in it. The monitoring body should always pay attention to this. Online services such as water payment etc. are variable services. Transparency:- There should be no delay, irregularity in the delivery of public services, as there should be equal access to the service, there should be transparency in it. The monitoring body should always pay attention to this.
3. What are the functions of Public Debt Management Office? Mention. Public Debt Management Office is an office under the Ministry of Finance of Nepal. Its functions are as follows: - To project the need for public debt that can be collected every year and submit suggestions to the Ministry of Finance, - To prepare short-term, medium-term and long-term policy proposals on public debt management and submit them to the Ministry of Finance, - To determine the limits and mobilization of public debt at the state and local levels. Making suggestions regarding the sector, - Payment of foreign loan principal, interest and other fees according to the foreign loan agreement, reconciling accounts, - Working on share and loan investment on behalf of the Government of Nepal, - Projecting a three-year budget for domestic and foreign loan payments, etc. by the Ministry of Finance and National Submit to Planning Commission.
4. What are the duties, duties and rights of the chief administrative officer of rural municipality and municipality? write The work, duties and rights of the chief administrative officer who works as the administrative head of rural municipality and municipality are stipulated by local laws. Unless specified by local laws, the duties, duties and powers of the chief administrative officer are as follows, as mentioned in the Local Government Operation Act, 2074: - To act as the secretary of the assembly and the executive, - To implement the decisions of the assembly and the executive, - Under the direction of the chairman or the head, annual Formulation of program and budget, implementation and monitoring and evaluation, - keeping records of financial transactions in an orderly manner, - conducting audit of income and expenses, - conducting audits, - preparing reports for project developers and submitting them to the executive committee meeting,
5. What is financial administration? Discuss its significance. The collective form of the government's financial resources including planning, collection and acquisition, distribution, use and implementation, accounting, reporting, auditing, evaluation and maintenance is called financial administration. It is a mechanism for managing the income and expenditure of the government. Dimock and Dimock have defined it as a key component of modern government, which identifies the processes and agencies that collect, spend and account for government services. It is an integral part of public administration. It helps to maintain economic growth, economic stability and social justice in the country. Importance of financial administration- The basic aspects of public administration are general administration, development administration, personnel administration and financial administration. Financial administration is one such aspect. When Jun is excluded from these, all others are often ineffective. Kautilya says – All activities depend on meaning, so the most attention should be given to strengthening Dhukuti. The importance of financial administration can be understood from the presented references and statements. Its other importance can be mentioned from the following points:- It manages the income and expenditure of the government efficiently. - Helps to maintain financial discipline and promote financial accountability by complying with laws and regulations related to financial administration. - It arranges the necessary resources for the regular work, emergency work and development related work of the public administration. - Acts as the backbone of public administration. - the country's economy, Develops social and physical infrastructure and uses and manages economically the financial resources needed to strengthen the entire state. - Assists in complying with constitutional and legal provisions in the country. - Provides accurate information on government income and expenditure.
6. Discuss the role of customs administration in import export trade. The customs administration is the agency that collects the customs duties that are levied during the import and export of goods at the border of the two countries. In customs, the import and export goods are the basis of customs duty, while the importer and exporter are the taxpayers. Customs administration has traditionally collected revenue, but recently it has been performing the role of trade facilitation, social security, revenue collection and border management. The role of customs administration in import export trade is multifaceted, which can be mentioned as follows:- Import export tradeCollecting customs duties, value added tax, excise duty and other taxes due at the border,- Facilitating trade by speedy inspection of goods,- Helping to reduce commercial costs in import and export trade,- Assisting in easy supply of legal goods,- Strengthening security arrangements at border crossings. Strictly controlling illegal goods, - Preventing revenue leakage in customs, - Controlling drug and arms traffic, - Facilitating the movement of honest passengers, - Helping to maintain social security by controlling illegal goods prohibited by law, low-quality goods that harm health, etc. ,- Assisting in the protection and development of the domestic industry by facilitating the import of raw materials needed by the domestic industry and the export of domestically produced goods,- Carrying out border management, - Maintaining good relations with the neighboring customs administration,- Implementation of the Customs Act.
7. What are the problems of project management in Nepal? Mention. The project is a means of supporting the economic and social transformation of the country. The project fulfills the needs of citizens by producing goods and services and distributing them equitably. In Nepal, related project heads and related ministries have been made more responsible for project management. The National Planning Commission and the Ministry of Finance have been assisting in this work. There is a system of monitoring and evaluation even from the level of the Prime Minister to bring effectiveness in the implementation of the project. A project bank has been started to manage the project. Economic Procedures and Financial Responsibility Act rules have made various provisions for project management and even project management has not been organized in Nepal. Various problems have been observed in it, which can be mentioned as follows:
1. When is International Migrant Workers Day celebrated? December 18 – The United Nations adopted the Convention on the Protection of the Rights of Migrant Workers and Members of Their Families, 1990 on December 18, 1990 and brought it into force on July 1, 2003, and after the United Nations General Assembly decided to celebrate December 18 as International Migration Day on December 4, 2000. This day has been celebrated in Nepal as well.- This year (in 2021) this day was celebrated with the original national slogan of 'Conscious, Skilled and Safe Employment: The Basic Basis of Decent Labor Immigration'. 
2. When was the successful test flight of electric aircraft in Britain? 23 November 2021 
3. When was the earth science satellite launched by China? 2021 November 5
4. Who was awarded the Booker Prize of 2021? Damon Galgot (South African writer)5. When was the trial printing of Kohlpur publication of Gorkhapatra? V.No. November 4, 2078 - There is a plan to start regular publication after the trial publication (by February 7). 
6. When was the first oral medicine against corona approved by the UK? 2021 November 3 
7. Since when was Remdesivir production started in Nepal for the first time? V.No. 2078 June 13 
8. Which is the local level that brings the plan of one ward, one black road? Fungling district, Taplejung - (Fungling, the only municipality in Taplejung district, started preparing for the plan to be implemented from the financial year (2077/78).
9. BP Highway was built with the help of which country? This road from Japan-Banepa-Bardiwas is 160 km. It is long.- V. no. The construction started from 2052/53 and completed in 2071, this road was handed over to Nepal government on June 18, 2072. 
10. When was Indian Prime Minister Narendra Modi repealed three controversial agricultural laws? 2021 November 19 
11. What is Vio Floc technology related to? Fisheries 
12. What is the maximum number of members of the District Coordination Committee? 9 
13. In terms of area, the largest sub-metropolitan city is Ghorahi (Dang) and which is the smallest sub-metropolitan city? Nepalganj, Banke - The largest sub-metropolitan city in terms of population: Janakpur.- The sub-metropolitan city with the largest number of wards: Kalaiya (twelve, 27 wards).
14. Which is the brightest star visible from earth? Dog Starr 
15. Since when did agriculture census start in Nepal? V.No. 2018 (occurs every 10/10 years) 
16. Where has the aircraft museum (Aircraft Museum) built in Dhangadhi of Kailali been moved? Nepalgunj - The museum was built by Captain Ved Upreti of Dhangadhi with the aim of supporting the development of tourism in the far west.- It is said that the museum had to be moved to Nepalgunj due to lack of land. Pilotless drone model of aircraft kept for exhibition.- Captain Upreti has also operated Aviation Aircraft Museum in Kathmandu.
17. Which film was successful in winning the best mountain film award at the International Mountain Film Festival (KIMF)? Gudge Buffalo - The movie was made based on the story of a buffalo that was swept away by the flood in Sindhupalchok. It contains the story of having to face great suffering in finding a stray buffalo. - Godz Buffalo also won a prize of 1000 US dollars. - In the 19th edition of the festival, the movie 'Yet Another Winter' directed by Kiran Shrestha became the best narrative film under the Nepal Panorama section. With the win, the film won a cash prize of one lakh rupees.- The 54-minute long film 'Everest: The Hard Way' directed by Pavlo Barbas won a prize of two lakh rupees for the international section. .
18. Since when has the Antibiotic Week been celebrated on the call of the World Health Organization? 2015 - Antibiotic Awareness Week was celebrated worldwide from November 18 to 24 at the joint call of the World Health Organization, the Food and Agriculture Organization and the World Animal Health Organization under the United Nations. It is estimated by the World Health Organization. In the last two or three decades, bacteria have been developing resistance to antibiotics. In this way bacteria develop resistance against antibiotics, the use of more than necessary antibiotics in humans and animals without the recommendation of doctors and veterinarians, the use of less or more than needed, inadequate management of infection prevention in hospitals,
19. According to the commercial coffee cultivation survey 2075/76, which are the provinces where commercial coffee is cultivated? Province 1, Bagmati Province, Gandaki Province and Lumbini Province - According to the survey conducted by the Central Statistics Department, the highest commercial coffee production was done in Bagmati Province. - There are 35 districts where coffee is cultivated commercially. 
20. Who is the author of 'A Poom of Rome' and 'A Thorn of Paris'? Lansingh Bangdel 
21. What is the duration of the five-year plan announced by the government for the protection of the one-horned rhinoceros, which is rare in the world? Year 2017-2021 
22. Which are the main four dhams related to Buddhism? Lumbini, Bodh Gaya, Sarnath and Kushinagar
23. Where are the National Botanical Garden and National Herbarium and Botanical Laboratory located? Godavari, Lalitpur- V. No. This garden, which was established as a royal botanical garden on 12 November 2019, was named as a national botanical garden after the 2062/63 people's movement.- This garden, which is a common repository of decades-old trees and plants, is a suitable research center for scientists.- Currently, this garden has 575 species of flowers, 290 species of birds, 250 species of butterflies and innumerable plants can be found. - National herbarium and plant laboratory (established in 1961) has 165,000 specimens of flowering and non-flowering plants. Presenter: Tank KC
Economic diplomacy strengthens the economy 1. What are the characteristics of Nepal's public administration? Mention. Organized by the constitution and laws, - has been putting political will into practice, - has been conveying information to the political leadership in the formulation of policies and laws, - has been committed to the policies and programs of the government, - has been doing its work regardless of which party the government is formed, - has shown neutrality towards politics, - Accepted as a law enforcement mechanism, - Acting as a permanent government, - Continuously serving the country and the people even in political vacuum, - From border security to peace security, development work, emergency work such as: - fire, earthquake, flood, etc. Rescue, relief and rehabilitation in natural calamities, - There are people who are selected by public service commission through fair competition.
2. Which are the agencies that are necessary to organize the economic diplomacy? Mention. Keeping in mind the country's economic interests, increasing relations with friendly countries and the international community, giving support, understanding and coordinating to strengthen the country's economy is economic diplomacy. This is another major part of foreign policy. It is a multi-faceted subject as many subjects of economy fall under economic diplomacy. Therefore, not only the government agencies but also the involvement of multiple agencies and their roles may be needed to manage it. The agencies required to manage it can be mentioned as follows:- Government of Nepal, Ministry of Foreign Affairs,- Nepali Embassies abroad,- Consulate Generals abroad,- Labor Assistants abroad,- Non-resident Nepalis and their organizations,- Nepal Tourism Board,- Representative organizations of the private sector. Like :- Confederation of Industry and Commerce,
3. Present the tasks to be done while managing a meeting in the office in a point-by-point manner. In the office, meeting management is the task of mutual discussion, deliberation and drawing executable conclusions on various matters such as policies, plans, programs, budgets, and service delivery. This is a regular function of management. It provides transparency, responsibility, accountability and legitimacy to every work of the office. For this, the preparation and operation of the meeting must be done, which can be presented in the following points: Preparation for the meeting - sending written correspondence to the participants in the meeting clarifying the subject of the meeting, the date, time and place of the meeting, - the written or oral notice to be submitted to the meeting, What are the statistics and documents to be prepared,- Considering the number of participants in the meeting, official status, dignity etc.
4. Give a brief introduction about the mission and mission chief in the Nepal Foreign Service. Mission in Nepal Foreign Service refers to Nepalese embassies abroad, permanent missions, Nepali Consulate General, consulates and any other body established by the Government of Nepal to represent abroad from time to time. Similarly, there is provision for the following heads of missions in the mission:- (1) Ambassador, - (2) Permanent Representative, - (3) Consul General, - (4) Acting Ambassador, - (5) Acting Permanent Representative, - (6) Consul, - (7) Other officials designated by the Government of Nepal.
5. How should employees behave towards customers? write The customer is the service recipient, the employee is the service provider. The service provider should treat the customer well. Which should be as follows: - The customer's work should be done on time, if the work cannot be done on time, the basis and reason should be given, - The customer should be treated with respect, - Be polite when answering, - Be responsible to the customer, - Work with the customer's interests in mind, - Elderly, disabled , the disabled, pregnant women, children, the helpless should be given priority, - Provide service in simple and easy language, - Increase the reach of the service recipient in service delivery, - Inform the service recipient in a timely manner about the process of receiving the service, the time it takes, and the cost, - Follow the conduct according to their position, - Fair To provide quality service in the form, - to provide fast and efficient service, - to maintain transparency and frugality in service delivery,
6. Forest Act, 2076 has made what kind of arrangement regarding Nepal's national forest management and utilization? Mention. The Forest Act, 2076 has emphasized on the development, protection and utilization of forests by managing the forests in the following manner in relation to the management and utilization of the national forests of Nepal: 1. National Forest - The National Forest has been arranged as follows:- a. Government managed forests, – b. Forest protection area, - c. Community forest, - d. Partnership forest, – e. Confession Forest – Ch. Religious forest. 2. Private forest 3. Public forest, 4. urban forest,
7. What are the weaknesses seen in Nepal's civil service transfer system? Present. Transfer is the method of making the employees work in the same way by changing the place without changing the salary and facilities of the employees working in the civil service. Only the location of the office changes. Transfers are made according to the nature of the organization, nature of work and geographical location. This is a regular function of civil administration. Civil Service Act, 2049 and Regulations, 2050 have been implemented to manage the existing transfer system in Nepal's civil administration. The Ministry of Federal Affairs and General Administration, the ministry related to service groups have been carrying out the transfer work and also there are various weaknesses in the transfer system of Nepal's civil service, which can be presented as follows:- The bases of transfer change rapidly, the transfer is not done by opening the base,
8. What is copyright? write Copyright is the sole right granted by law to the creator in the creation, presentation and broadcasting of original and intellectually created works for human benefit. It has copyright protection on the creator's creation. It helps to ensure the economic and moral rights of creators over their creations, as creations originate only from the unlimited imagination, deep thinking and continuous intellectual efforts of creators and seekers. One of the two branches of intellectual property is copyright and the other is industrial property rights. Patent rights for inventive works under industrial property rights, Design rights for the protection of the original design of the goods and trademark rights for the protection of the marks used by the manufacturer to distinguish and identify the goods and services from others. Copyright is acquired automatically, registration is not required, but there is a provision that can be registered voluntarily for the ease of providing evidence. There is also a practice of using symbols to indicate copyright. Nepal has ratified the Copyright Convention of 1986, which is the main basis of copyright protection laws to protect the creations of creators. It has become a member of World Intellectual Property Organization and World Trade Organization. Copyright Act, 2059 and Copyright Regulations, 2061 have been formulated and implemented. The office of Nepal Copyright Registrar has been established and yet the awareness and protection of copyright in Nepal has not been organized. There is no need to register, but there is a provision that registration can be done voluntarily for the ease of providing evidence. There is also a practice of using symbols to indicate copyright. Nepal has ratified the Copyright Convention of 1986, which is the main basis of copyright protection laws to protect the creations of creators. It has become a member of World Intellectual Property Organization and World Trade Organization. Copyright Act, 2059 and Copyright Regulations, 2061 have been formulated and implemented. The office of Nepal Copyright Registrar has been established and yet the awareness and protection of copyright in Nepal has not been organized. There is no need to register, but there is a provision that registration can be done voluntarily for the ease of providing evidence. There is also a practice of using symbols to indicate copyright. Nepal has ratified the Copyright Convention of 1986, which is the main basis of copyright protection laws to protect the creations of creators. It has become a member of World Intellectual Property Organization and World Trade Organization. Copyright Act, 2059 and Copyright Regulations, 2061 have been formulated and implemented. The office of Nepal Copyright Registrar has been established and yet the awareness and protection of copyright in Nepal has not been organized. 2061 has been formulated and implemented. The office of Nepal Copyright Registrar has been established and yet the awareness and protection of copyright in Nepal has not been organized. 2061 has been formulated and implemented. The office of Nepal Copyright Registrar has been established and yet the awareness and protection of copyright in Nepal has not been organized. 2061 has been formulated and implemented. The office of Nepal Copyright Registrar has been established and yet the awareness and protection of copyright in Nepal has not been organized. 2061 has been formulated and implemented. The office of Nepal Copyright Registrar has been established and yet the awareness and protection of copyright in Nepal has not been organized.
9. Write about the policy making committee at the police headquarters. The Police Regulations, 2071 provide for a policy making committee as follows in the police head office to make suggestions to the government of Nepal on policy matters that have a greater and long-term impact on the police organization, internal management of the police organization and also to take decisions as per the requirements of the police regulations. ) Inspector General of Police - Chairman - (b) Additional Inspectors General of Police - All - Members - (c) Deputy Inspector General of Police in Valley - All - Members - (d) Deputy Inspector General of Police, Secretariat of Inspector General of Police - Member - Secretary - The seriousness of the content to be presented by the Inspector General of Police in the meeting and Other police personnel as required,
1. Karnali Institute of Health Sciences, Jumla, since when did the MBBS courses start? V.No. 2078 November 19- From this year, the Medical Education Commission has given approval to the institute to study MBBS in Medical Science. - For the first time, the study of nursing and public health has started at the graduate level in B firm along with MBBS. - The Commission has allotted a quota of 20 people to the institution to study in MBBS. 15 quotas for full scholarship and 5 quotas for paid scholarships have been established. A quota of 20 people has also been determined in the pharmacy. - The institution has also brought a hospital with a capacity of 300 beds into operation. - Five people are studying at Post Graduation (MD) level in the institute since last year. Earlier, Nursing Health Assistant, Anesthesia Assistant, MDMS, Pediatrician and MDGP were also being taught at the proficiency certificate level.
2. When was the National Tiger Census 2078 started? V.No. 2078 November 19- The National Parks and Wildlife Conservation Department has started a survey in the forests with tigers across the country including Chitwan from November 19.- The survey was launched by the Minister of Forest and Environment Ram Sahay Prasad Yadav by turning on the camera installed in Bhutan. - It is estimated that there are 121 tigers in Nepal in 2009, 198 in 2013 and 235 in 2018. - Nepal made a commitment to double the number of tigers by 2022 at the international conference on tigers held in St. Petersburg, Russia in 2010.
3. Myanmar's democratic leader Aung Sang Suu Kyi was sentenced to how many years in prison by the military government of Myanmar? Four- He is going to be sentenced to four years in prison on the charges of disobeying the orders of the military government, playing a role in inciting protests and violence. - 76-year-old Nobel Prize winner Netri Suu Kyi has been kept under house arrest in her own residence after the military seized power there. The decision to send him to prison was made on December 6, 2021. In addition, the military government filed dozens of cases against Netri Suu Kyi for financial irregularities, misuse of power and resources.
4. Who is the person appointed as Chancellor of Germany in December 2021? Olaf Scholz - 63-year-old Scholz was the Vice Chancellor in Merkel's government. - 395 votes in favor of Scholz and 303 votes against in the German parliament Wundestag. 
5. V.No. Who was selected as the president by the convention of the National Democratic Party (RDP) held in November 2078? Rajendra Lingden-Lingden was elected as the chairman after defeating his competitor Kamal Thapa by 200 votes in the voting held on November 18 for the selection of 149 working committees including the chairman. - In 2049, Lingden, who became the founding president of RPP's student organization, was elected as a member of the House of Representatives from Jhapa-3 in the parliamentary elections of 2074. Similarly, Dhavalshamsher Rana, Bhuvan Kumar Pathak and Kunti Kumari Shahi were elected as general ministers. 
6. Who is known as the second Gautama Buddha of Nepal? Jai Prithvi Bahadur Singh
7. If the script of Tamang language is Rong, which is the script of Limbu language? Syringa 
8. What was Patan Palace known as earlier? Manigal 
9. The person who discovered the ozone layer was J.C. If it is Farman, who is the person who discovered the fact that the ozone layer is thinning? Sherwood Rowland 
10. If Sri 5 Surendra is known as Sanki king, then who is known as unworthy king? Shri 5 Rajendra 
11. Which national park is closest to the capital city of the country in the world? Shivpuri National Park 
12. How long is the goal of making Nepal a digital Nepal? Year 2025 
13. Who will be the chairman of the International Development Aid Mobilization Policy Implementation Committee? Finance Minister 
14. After Kavrepalanchok, which district has been declared self-sufficient in milk? Chitwan
15. Japan is known as the Great Britain of the East and which is known as the Great Britain of the South? New Zealand 
16. According to the Industrial Business Act, 2076, which industries are included under the energy industry? Industries that produce energy from water sources, solar power, coal, natural oil and fuel or gas, biogas or other sources, industries that manufacture machines/equipment used to produce such energy, power transmission lines, power distribution systems, biogas based energy, sugar industry - Electrical energy produced as a product, an industry that studies the potential of energy. 
17. According to the report published by the United Nations Children's Fund (UNICEF), which country has the highest number of child marriages? Central African Republic 
18. When did agriculture and livestock insurance start in Nepal? V.No. 2069 January
19. Virtual currency started from which country? Japan 
20. Education is a continuous dynamic and comprehensive process. What meaning of education does this statement indicate? Broad Meaning of Education 
21. According to the Industrial Business Act, 2076, what is meant by 'intellectual property'? Intellectual property such as patents, designs, trademarks, geographical indications, trade secrets, etc., as well as the subject matter defined as copyright by prevailing laws. 
22. The United Nations has decided to celebrate which year as 'International Year of Creative Economy for Sustainable Development'? Year 2021 
23. In which district is the proposed Ranitar Airport located? Panchthar
24. What is Sister Robert related to? Support for patients with infectious diseases including covid-19 - This robot, manufactured by the Nepal Engineers Association under the leadership of Bagmati province, can be used to protect health workers from patients who are infected with covid-19 and are in isolation. Can be used. 
25. In which country was Leonardo da Vinci, a rich and great painter, born? Italy - He was born in Italy on April 15, 1452 and died in France on May 2, 1519. - Mona Lisa, The Last Supper, The Virtuous Men, Lady with an Ermine are his world famous paintings.
26. When was the establishment of Asia Pacific Economic Cooperation 'APEC'? 1989 - At the time of establishment, there are only 12 countries in this organization, currently there are 21 member countries. - Its head office is in Singapore. - The first conference of this organization was held in Australia in 1989. 
27. Since when has the government implemented the grading system (technical side) in the SLC examination (currently SEE)? From the year 2071 SLC exam - (Since 2072, the grading system has been implemented in the general section as well.) 
28. What is the wind blowing in the Indian Ocean and Bay of Bengal known as? Cyclone – (Hot air flowing in the Thar and Govi ​​deserts is known as 'Lu'.) 
29. What is the minimum educational qualification required for appointment to the post of Chief Election Commissioner or Election Commissioner? Graduate level
30. Indo-Pacific Strategy is a program led by which country? America (American foreign policy taken with the aim of maintaining American dominance in Asian economic politics with the rise of China in world economic politics) Presenter: Tank KC
Public body of Nepal1. Give a brief introduction to public administration. Public administration is a permanent mechanism that is neutral towards politics and committed to the policies of the elected government and implements the plans and programs formulated by the same government in a fair and efficient manner. It is also a mechanism established by the government to plan, organize, coordinate, control and direct the available means and resources to effectively achieve public objectives and goals. The government is usually changed in five years, but it is not changed with the change of government, so it is also called permanent government. Public administration is an administrative mechanism established by law and operated by law. Nepal has constitutional, legal and institutional arrangements to manage public administration. The Constitution of Nepal, Provisions have been made regarding the formation and operation of state and local government services and staff adjustment. Public administration has been established in all governments from the central to the federal, provincial and local levels, but the public administration of Nepal has not been organized yet. There are many problems such as policy, legal, institutional, procedural, technological, behavioral etc. Addressing this in time, public administration should be established as a people-oriented, transformative and competent body that brings the benefits of democracy to the citizens. There are many behavioral problems. Addressing this in time, public administration should be established as a people-oriented, transformative and competent body that brings the benefits of democracy to the citizens. There are many behavioral problems. Addressing this in time, public administration should be established as a people-oriented, transformative and competent body that brings the benefits of democracy to the citizens.
2. How does taxation help to achieve the objectives of fiscal policy? Discuss. Finance policy is the policy of economic development of the country through the mobilization and distribution of resources. It is a part of macroeconomic policy. It helps to deal with economic recession and price rise in the economy. Its scope and influence are extensive. It stands on a political and social foundation. It is formulated by the government. It is closely related to the government budget. It is issued before the beginning of the financial year. Economic growth, economic stability and social justice are the objectives of financial policy. To achieve these objectives, taxation, which is one of the main instruments of financial policy, helps in many ways. It can be discussed as follows: a. Support in economic growth - To achieve economic growth, investment in the productive sector should be increased. Taxes do the work of raising resources for investment. The production and productivity of goods and services can be increased by giving discounts on exports, by giving concessions to industries in remote areas, by providing facilities to industries that provide more employment. It seems that this will help to increase the production of goods and services and increase the economic growth in the country. b. Support in economic stability - to create jobs, develop and promote domestic, small, medium and large scale industries, increase exports, tourism development, physical infrastructure development and other areas by bringing stability to the economic stability of the country. Taxes directly and indirectly help in economic stability in the country by improving taxpayer education, market monitoring through taxes, black market control, end of artificial shortages, etc. c. Aid in Social Justice – Progressive taxation helps in maintaining social justice. The money raised by taxing higher income earners can be spent on poverty alleviation. Income tax helps to maintain social justice. Customs, excise duty and value added tax help to protect domestic industries and increase exports. These actions also helped to maintain social justice.
3. What are the arrangements regarding the establishment of the procurement unit in the public bodies of Nepal and the work it does? Mention. In Nepal, the Public Procurement Act, 2063 and Regulations, 2064 stipulate that public bodies should establish a separate procurement division, branch or unit as per the need based on the workload and the nature of the work related to procurement. It is also provided that during the establishment of the procurement division, branch or unit, a procurement officer should be appointed to bear the responsibility of the head of such division, branch or unit. The work it does can be mentioned as follows: - preparing and updating the procurement master plan and annual procurement plan, - preparing prequalification documents, tender documents and procurement contract documents related to public procurement, - preparing documents related to the offer of consulting services, - publicly publishing procurement information ,
4. What are the duties, duties and rights of the Ward President? Mention. The Local Government Operation Act, 2074 has provided for the duties, duties and rights of the Ward President, which can be mentioned as follows. - To act as the chairman of the ward committee, - To coordinate and facilitate the work of the members of the ward committee, - To prepare the development plan, budget and program of the ward, to implement and submit it to the rural municipality or municipality for approval, - To implement the plan and program to be implemented by the ward , to monitor and periodically review the same, - to make recommendations and verifications related to various matters, - if he is absent from the ward for more than seven days, assign responsibility to a member of the related ward committee to carry out the daily administrative and recommendation related work of the ward and inform the chairman or chief, - Perform other tasks assigned by the Executive, Assembly or Ward Committee.
5. What is development aid? Discuss the arrangement regarding development aid mobilization in Nepal. Assistance received from foreign donor agencies and friendly countries in the economic and social development of the country is called development aid. This includes grants, loans, material assistance, technical assistance, humanitarian assistance etc. received from abroad. By bringing foreign capital, technology and skills to the country, the country needs development assistance to build a self-sufficient, independent and advanced economy. It seems that foreign aid, which occupies about 33 percent of the total government budget of Nepal and about 66 percent of the overall development budget, has become both a necessity and an obligation for Nepal. - Arrangements related to development aid mobilization in Nepal - Constitutional, legal and institutional arrangements have been made to organize development aid mobilization in Nepal, which can be discussed as follows: a. Provisions in the Constitution of Nepal - When receiving foreign aid, national needs and priorities should be based on it, make it transparent, and include all the received funds in the national budget, - The right to take foreign aid and loans will belong to the Government of Nepal, so that when such aid or loans are taken, the overall economic stability of the country will be ensured. Provision to be made, b. In order to help achieve the goal of prosperous Nepal and happy Nepali, the Development Aid Policy, 2071 was canceled and the International Development Aid Mobilization Policy, 2076 was issued, c. A high-level international development assistance mobilization policy implementation committee was formed under the chairmanship of the finance minister, d. The international financial aid coordination division has been arranged in the Ministry of Finance, e. The International Development Aid Mobilization Policy, 2076 sets the priorities for international development aid mobilization, To make it transparent, to include all the received funds in the national budget, - The government of Nepal will have the right to take foreign aid and loans, and to take such aid or loans in such a way that the overall economic stability of the country is ensured, b. In order to help achieve the goal of prosperous Nepal and happy Nepali, the Development Aid Policy, 2071 was canceled and the International Development Aid Mobilization Policy, 2076 was issued, c. A high-level international development assistance mobilization policy implementation committee was formed under the chairmanship of the finance minister, d. The international financial aid coordination division has been arranged in the Ministry of Finance, e. The International Development Aid Mobilization Policy, 2076 sets the priorities for international development aid mobilization, To make it transparent, to include all the received funds in the national budget, - The government of Nepal will have the right to take foreign aid and loans, and to take such aid or loans in such a way that the overall economic stability of the country is ensured, b. In order to help achieve the goal of prosperous Nepal and happy Nepali, the Development Aid Policy, 2071 was canceled and the International Development Aid Mobilization Policy, 2076 was issued, c. A high-level international development assistance mobilization policy implementation committee was formed under the chairmanship of the finance minister, d. The international financial aid coordination division has been arranged in the Ministry of Finance, e. The International Development Aid Mobilization Policy, 2076 sets the priorities for international development aid mobilization, Arrangements to be taken in such a way as to ensure macroeconomic stability of the country while taking such aid or loan, b. In order to help achieve the goal of prosperous Nepal and happy Nepali, the Development Aid Policy, 2071 was canceled and the International Development Aid Mobilization Policy, 2076 was issued, c. A high-level international development assistance mobilization policy implementation committee was formed under the chairmanship of the finance minister, d. The international financial aid coordination division has been arranged in the Ministry of Finance, e. The International Development Aid Mobilization Policy, 2076 sets the priorities for international development aid mobilization, Arrangements to be taken in such a way as to ensure macroeconomic stability of the country while taking such aid or loan, b. In order to help achieve the goal of prosperous Nepal and happy Nepali, the Development Aid Policy, 2071 was canceled and the International Development Aid Mobilization Policy, 2076 was issued, c. A high-level international development assistance mobilization policy implementation committee was formed under the chairmanship of the finance minister, d. The international financial aid coordination division has been arranged in the Ministry of Finance, e. The International Development Aid Mobilization Policy, 2076 sets the priorities for international development aid mobilization, A high-level international development assistance mobilization policy implementation committee was formed under the chairmanship of the finance minister, d. The international financial aid coordination division has been arranged in the Ministry of Finance, e. The International Development Aid Mobilization Policy, 2076 sets the priorities for international development aid mobilization, A high-level international development assistance mobilization policy implementation committee was formed under the chairmanship of the finance minister, d. The international financial aid coordination division has been arranged in the Ministry of Finance, e. The International Development Aid Mobilization Policy, 2076 sets the priorities for international development aid mobilization,
6. Mention the methods of public private partnership in Nepal. A public-private partnership is a public-private partnership, in which both public bodies and private investors do all the managerial work jointly in the construction of infrastructure, from gathering resources to construction, operation, distribution of returns, and risk-bearing. To manage this in Nepal, the Public Private Partnership and Investment Act, 2075 has been issued and an Investment Board has been formed under the chairmanship of the Prime Minister to promote domestic and foreign investment. There are various methods/models for public-private partnership in infrastructure construction and public service delivery projects in Nepal, which can be mentioned as follows:- Construction and transfer - Construction, operation and transfer - Construction, ownership, operation and transfer - Construction, transfer and transfer Operation – Lease,
7. What are the features of Vehicle and Consignment Tracking System? write It is a software vehicle and consignment tracking system designed to enter the details of goods to be transported from one place to another for commercial purposes. This Vehicle and Consignment Tracking System, called VISITIS for short, has been implemented by the Revenue Research Department since 1st of Shravan 2076. The following are the features of this system implemented to further organize the internal movement and purchase of commercial goods: - Web based software, in which entry into the BillBiz computer before transporting the commercial goods, no need to re-enter after entering the bill into the computer, - where the commercial goods have reached on the way. that can be monitored from the computer, - there is no charge for entering the Billbiz computer,
8. What are nutritious foods and their sources? Mention. Nutritional food is food with a balanced amount of carbohydrates, proteins, fats, minerals, vitamins and water, which are necessary to provide strength to the body, grow the body and protect the body. Nutritious food contains nutrients. Nutrients are needed to mobilize body parts and avoid diseases. Its sources are as follows:- Foods that give strength to the body like: corn, wheat, rice, barley, potatoes, millet, papa etc.- Foods that increase the body like: meat, flowers, fish, milk, pulses, pulses etc.- Protects the body. Foods like: vegetables, fruits.
 
1. Who is the successful footballer to win the 2021 Ballon d'Or award? Lionel Messi - Argentine captain and PSG striker Lionel Messi won the award for a record seventh time. - Barcelona's Alexia Putelas won the women's Ballon d'Or title. - Bayern Munich's Robert Lewandowski was declared 'Striker of the Year'. - Barcelona's Spanish midfielder Pedri Gonzalez was declared the best young player of 2021. - Italy's goalkeeper Gianluigi Donnarumma to receive the Yassin Trophy. Successful.- Chelsea was declared the best club of the year.
2. Currently, who is the world's tallest woman in the Guinness Book of World Records? Rumesya Gelgi (Turkey) - The height of 24-year-old Gelgi is 7.07 feet. - She is said to be the tallest living woman in the world. - Previously, this title was held by Yao Defen, who was 7 feet 7 inches tall from China. He died at the age of 40. 
3. Which Nepali bank will be honored with 'The Banker of the Year Asia 2021' awarded by the famous magazine The Banker published from London, UK? NMB Bank - NMB has been declared the best bank in Asia, beating competitors from countries like China, India, Hong Kong, South Korea and Japan. - NMB Bank has also won the 'The Bank of the Year 2021' award.
4. What is the slogan of the 12th national census? My count, my participation (2078 November 25-November 9) - In the 12th series of national census that started from November 25 across the country, 100 percent of the population participated in the census except for Lipulek, Limpiyadhura Kalapani and scattered households, according to the Central Statistics Department. - The preliminary results of the census will be announced within two months , Similarly, within one year, the department will prepare a national report containing the main statistics of the census, and the thematic report will be published within a year of the publication of the national report.
5. Which is the Nepali bank that got ISO 27001:2013 certificate from International Organization for Standardization (ISO)? NIC Asia Bank - (According to the requirements of ISO 27001 standards, the bank received a certificate for showing its commitment to continuously improve the security of its customers' personal details and other information and ensuring the security of such details.)
6. What is the power generation capacity of the Likhu-4 hydropower project built on the Likhu river flowing on the border of Ramechhap and Okhaldhunga? 52.4 May. (Connected to the national transmission line in December 2078) - A dam was constructed at a place called Vimire to divert the water of the Likhu River flowing between Bhuji-7 Bhuji of Ramechhap and Khizidemba Rural Municipality of Okhaldhunga at 4.24 km. Dropped to the production house built at Ragni Fedi in Khizidemba through a long underground tunnel.- Electricity is generated from two turbines in the production house.- The generated electricity is connected to New Khimti substation built at Manthali District-6 Khimti in Ramechhap district through 220 KV transmission line. 
7. According to the 2068 census, among the languages ​​of the Burmese language family, which language is spoken by the largest number of people in Nepal? Tamang 
8. Who said that 'business has two parts: marketing and innovation'? Peter Drucker
9. According to the Administrative Courts Act, 2076, if the appeal filed by the Supreme Court or the Administrative Court is not resolved, if the appellant retires from service or dies, what is the provision regarding the appeal? 10. Appeal not to be dismissed (to be final) 
. Who is the author of 'From Third World to First'? Lee Kwan Yew 
11. How long has it been announced that Nepal will become digital Nepal? Year 2025 
12. What is the main provincial slogan decided by Province-1? Clean, happy and prosperous province 
13. When was the title of Kavi Shiromani awarded to Lekhnath Paudel? V.No. 2008 
14. If ancient fort is in Mahottari district then where is Dugunagadhi? Sindhupalchok 
15. After which event in the world, the need for partnership between the government and the private sector was emphasized? The Depression of the 1930s
16. Who is the thinker who said that 'excessive ambition causes even the gods to fall'? Shakespeare 
17. According to the Citizen Pension Scheme implemented by the Citizen Investment Fund, how many years does the saver have to accumulate money in order to get a pension? 15 years
18. When was Tejav and other hazardous chemical substances (regulation) Ordinance, 2077 issued? V.No. 2077 Ashwin 12 - There are provisions in the ordinance with imprisonment for up to 20 years in case of acid attack. - The ordinance provides for the provision of immediate compensation to the victim by freezing the assets of the acid attack and in case of damage to the face, eyes, nose, ears, neck and sensitive organs, the perpetrator is sentenced to imprisonment for up to 20 years. .- There is a provision in the ordinance that even if acid is spilled on any part of the body, a 10-year sentence must be served. There is also a provision in the ordinance that acid cannot be kept in bottles of other beverages. The ordinance stipulates that acid can only be sold in sealed bottles and completely bans open sale and distribution.- The seller must also keep a photocopy of the identity card that reveals the quantity of acid he brought, punishment for acid attack cannot be waived, acid attack cases should be given priority by the court and grocery should be ordered, treatment from the attacker There is a provision in the ordinance that the amount to be spent and the fine should be recovered from the criminal's property within 35 days from the date of the court's decision.
19. Which is the first bank to start electronic payment system in Nepal? Nabil Bank 
20. From when has the Public Service Commission arranged the entrance examination for non-technical gazetted first class (Naib Subba) and second class (Kharidar) posts? A.W. 2072÷73 - (The Public Service Commission has already been conducting the examination in two stages for the gazetted third category i.e. branch officer (non-technical) post.) 
21. If Sir Walter Scott of Canada is known as 'Wizard of North', who is known as 'Uncle Ho'? Ho Chi Minh (Vietnam)
22. Since when has the Child Labor Prevention National Master Plan (2075-2085) been implemented in accordance with the objective of ending all forms of child labor in the country and creating a country without child labor? V.No. 2075 Shravan 1- (This master plan was approved by the Council of Ministers on June 24, 2075 and implemented from Shravan 1, aiming to end unlimited and substandard child labor and all forms of child labor during the plan period by 2079.)
23. What is the average monthly salary of employees working as employees according to the national economic calculation conducted for the first time by the Central Statistics Department? Rs. 20,543- According to the report, 1.7 lakh nine thousand people are involved in various organizations for getting paid. - According to the nature of the organization, there is a wide difference in the monthly average salary. The average monthly salary of employees working in large organizations is 26,700 rupees. 25,800 employees working in medium-sized organizations and 16,768 rupees average monthly salary of employees working in small organizations. The difference between the monthly salary of employees working in large organizations and small organizations is more than 10 thousand rupees.- According to the report, 4 trillion 21 billion 31 million rupees are spent on salaries annually. However, the share of salary in the total income earned by such institutions included in the study is very low. It was found that the two hundred and nineteen thousand and three hundred institutions covered by the report across the country had an annual income of 24 trillion 86 billion 11 billion. Out of that, the annual expenses of such organizations including salaries are 17 trillion 83 billion 35 billion rupees. The report pointed out that the remaining seven billion two billion 750 million rupees were earned. Profit share is 28.3 percent of total earnings. Similarly, the expenditure for salary is 16. Only 9 percent. In other words, the profit made by such organizations is two trillion 81 billion rupees more than the salary of the employees.- In the study, 21 different sectors were classified and the data was collected accordingly. Out of that, it was seen that the organizations which are operating after registration are spending 4 trillion 6 billion rupees annually and the industries/organizations which are operating without registration are 14 billion 84 billion rupees annually.
24. When was the first edition of 'Amarkosh' published by Nepal Pragya Pratishthan? V.No. 2026- (The second edition of Amarkosh, an epic book of historical significance, was published in 2077 (51 years after the first edition was published).) 
25. According to a recently published report, which country has the highest number of Internet users? China 
26. When did the Ministry of Communication and Information Technology ban the sharing, publishing and broadcasting of obscene content from the Internet? V.No. 2075 Ashwin 5 
27. Nepal's largest national park She-Foksundo is spread over how much area? 3555 KM – (Located in Dolpa and Mugu, there is Phoksundo Lake within this national park.) Presenter: Tank KC
Principles of Social Justice 1. What are the components of fiscal federalism of Nepal? Mention. The components of the financial federalism of Nepal are as follows: - Expenditure responsibility - Revenue authority - Intergovernmental financial transfer - This includes revenue sharing and grant distribution. – Internal debt mobilization – Natural resource mobilization and distribution
2. The Right to Information Act, 2064 stipulates that information related to what subjects should not be transmitted by public bodies? Section 3 of the Right to Information Act, 2064 provides that every Nepali citizen has access to information in public bodies, but provides that public bodies should not transmit information related to the following subjects:- (a) Nepal's sovereignty, integrity, national security, public peace and order and - (b) directly affecting the investigation, investigation and prosecution of crimes; Directly disturbing inter-communal relations,- (e) personal privacy and personal life, life, property,
3. Discuss the reasons why Nepal's constitution regarding social justice could not be implemented in practice. Not all citizens of the country are prosperous. All citizens do not have the same status and condition. As the state is the protector of all the citizens of the country, the state should distribute services and resources fairly to the disadvantaged classes and communities, this is social justice. Social justice is a multifaceted issue. It is connected with every aspect of human being. In order to organize social justice, the Constitution of Nepal has made various fundamental rights and constitutional policies including the right to social justice in Article 42. Almost all the 31 fundamental rights of the constitution are related to social justice. Social security allowance is applicable for social security rights. According to the policy of inclusion of women, tribal tribes, Madhesi, disabled, Dalit, backward areas, there is a system of reservation, information is accessible to all, Complete freedom of communication, freedom of religion, freedom of language, the right to acquire and enjoy property under the law, the end of human trafficking and exploitation, the end of racial untouchability and discrimination, the rights of women, equal rights of couples, the equality of all citizens in the eyes of the law, the right to live with dignity, Provisions such as non-death penalty, freedom of thought and expression have been implemented. However, the protection, empowerment and development of economically disadvantaged people, free higher education for Dalits, disabled and economically disadvantaged, equal access to health services for all, clean environment, clean drinking water, access to sanitation, unemployment assistance, universal access to food, housing for all, helpless, orphans, Special protection for the disabled, senior citizens, conflict victims and displaced persons, land and housing for landless Dalits, Provisions such as access to land for farmers are not being implemented sufficiently in practice. The economic condition of the country, administrative capacity, political condition, social and geographical structure etc. are responsible for this, which can be discussed as follows: - The condition of public service delivery of the state cannot be agile, efficient, frugal, transparent and modern, - Fair competition between political parties. There is a lack, even though the political system is institutionalized, political good manners are still not institutionalized, so that there is confusion, controversy, and instability in some areas of social justice, for example, social security allowance, - the country's administrative system cannot be strengthened, federalism and its presence according to people's expectations. , not being able to improve conduct, behaviour, competence, responsibility, accountability and transparency, - Not being able to identify the target class and community to achieve social justice and security and to determine the appropriate criteria, as a result of which there is a double benefit on the one hand, and on the other hand, it has been blamed that it is distribution oriented. - The country is agrarian but the commercialization and modernization of the agricultural sector has not been achieved, due to this the right to food sovereignty has not been implemented, the availability of food in remote areas has not been achieved, - there is a lack of resources for the state operation. As a result, unemployment assistance could not be provided, - In the budget structure of the country, the budget for current expenses is more, the budget for capital expenses is less. The allocated capital budget is not being spent every year. - Law is the main basis for maintaining social justice, but laws have not been formulated to implement some of the provisions provided by the constitution. It seems that social justice has not been implemented due to this. - There is geographical crisis in Nepal. There are settlements scattered in the mountains, there is a situation where it is difficult to distribute development infrastructure to homes. This has also hindered the implementation of social justice.
4. What is the arrangement for the formation of Nepal Securities Board? The Securities Act, 2063 provides for the formation of the Nepal Securities Board as follows to regulate and manage the operations of the securities market and persons involved in the securities business by organizing the issuance, purchase, sale, distribution and exchange of securities to protect the interests of investors who invest in securities by developing the capital market. (a) Person appointed by the Government of Nepal – Chairman – (b) Joint Secretary, Ministry of Finance – Member – (c) Joint Secretary, Ministry of Law, Justice and Parliamentary Order Member – (d) Representative, Nepal Rastra Bank – Member – (e) Representative , Nepal Chartered Accountants Institute - Member - (f) Representative, Nepal Confederation of Industry and Commerce - Member - (g) At least master's degree from a recognized university in economics, management, finance, commerce or law, securities market, management,
5. Which are the institutional structures that support the implementation of the federal system in Nepal? The institutional structures that support the implementation of the federal system in Nepal are as follows: a. Constitutional Bench - There will be a constitutional bench in the Supreme Court to deal with jurisdictional disputes between the three levels of government, and election disputes, and there will be a Chief Justice and four other judges appointed by the Chief Justice on the recommendation of the Judicial Council in Article 137 of the Constitution of Nepal. b. Inter-Province Council - Inter-Province Council under the chairmanship of the Prime Minister to resolve political disputes between the three levels of government is provided by Article 234 of the Constitution of Nepal. c. National Coordinating Council - The National Coordinating Council will be formed under the chairmanship of the Prime Minister to organize coordination and interrelationships between the federation, state and local levels. It is done in section 16 of the State and Local Level (Coordination and Interconnection) Act, 2077. d. Provincial Coordinating Council - Section 24 of the Federation, Provincial and Local Level (Coordination and Interconnection) Act, 2077 provides for the formation of a Provincial Coordinating Council under the chairmanship of the Chief Minister in each province to organize coordination and interrelation between the provinces and local levels. e. Inter-Governmental Finance Council - Section 33 of the Intergovernmental Finance Management Act, 2074 provides for the establishment of an Intergovernmental Finance Council under the coordination of the Minister of Finance of the Government of Nepal for the necessary consultation and coordination between the federation, state and local levels. f. National Natural Resources and Finance Commission - revenue distribution between federal, state and local levels, grant distribution, internal debt limit, distribution of natural resources,
6. The Espionage Act, 2018 stipulates what kind of action is considered to be espionage? Mention. The Espionage Act, 2018 stipulates that if a person obtains any kind of inducement from such a foreign country for the benefit of a foreign country with the intention of adversely affecting the interests and security of Nepal inside or outside Nepal, the Espionage Act, 2018 shall be deemed to have committed espionage: - (a) If information is given about the military situation, strategic arrangement and internal security arrangements of Nepal, if there is any industry on that day and if there is any dissuasion, if the material is collected for the purpose of giving such information, - (b) if any diplomatic note or any other secret government document kept secret on behalf of the Government of Nepal is given notice. And if he does business on that day, if he discourages him from giving such notice,
7. According to the Constitution of Nepal, what are the work, duties and rights of the Attorney General? Mention. According to Article 158 of the Constitution of Nepal, the work, duties and rights of the Attorney General are as follows: - The Attorney General shall be the main legal advisor of the Government of Nepal, it shall be the duty of the Attorney General to advise the Government of Nepal and other officials designated by the Government of Nepal on constitutional and legal matters, - The rights, interests or concerns of the Government of Nepal The Government of Nepal shall be represented by the Attorney General or a government lawyer under him in the case involved, - Unless otherwise provided in the Constitution, the Attorney General shall have the right to make the final decision whether or not to prosecute a case on behalf of the Government of Nepal before any court or judicial body or official, - The Government of Nepal shall be the plaintiff or the defendant. To defend against the Nepal government in the cases filed, Duties and powers may be delegated to subordinate public prosecutors in order to use and comply with the prescribed conditions, - Other duties, duties and powers of the Attorney General shall be in accordance with the Constitution and federal laws. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
1. How long has the United Nations General Assembly passed the resolution to upgrade Nepal from underdeveloped to medium-level developing country? Year 2026 - The recommendation made by the United Nations Committee for Development Policy (CDP) for upgrading Nepal to a developing country in 2026 was approved by the General Assembly on November 24, 2021. - Along with Nepal, the proposal to upgrade Bangladesh and the Republic of Laos to developing countries was approved. - The proposal related to upgrading was given a five-year preparation period. facilities will be reduced) will be added.- Concessional loans given by donor agencies and foreign countries after developing countries, Subsidy will decrease. The concessions and facilities received in international trade will also be reduced. Since these various concessional facilities will be cut, Nepal has to prepare more now. Industrial infrastructure should be built for export-oriented industries to increase exports by substituting imports.
2. Ashtimki festival is prevalent in which caste? Tharu - There is a tradition in the Tharu community of celebrating the festival of Ashtimki for two days by fasting for women. Lord Krishna will be worshiped in the morning on the second day of the festival. After the puja, the puja materials offered there are washed in the river that morning. After taking a bath from the river, they eat phuloori, fish sukuti, khariya and other dishes at home. Before eating, some portion is removed from each dish, which is called farhar. It is customary to give this dish to married daughters as an agrasan (Koseli).
3. Who led the Nepali military team sent to help British India in World War II? Ekraj Shamsher and Brahm Shamsher 
4. How long was the practice of writing the date and bar when mentioning the date in the documents in Nepal? V.No. 1961 January 
5. What kind of electoral system is there to be adopted in the election of members of the House of Representatives and Provincial Assembly? First-past-the-post electoral system and proportional electoral system 
6. How many houses is the provincial assembly of Nepal? A 
7. Who is considered the first poet of Nepali language? Suwananda Das 
8. When was the foundation stone of dry port laid in Rasuwa's Gosainkunda Rural Municipality-2 Timure? V.No. November 4, 2076 - A memorandum of understanding was signed between Nepal and China on May 29, 2076 regarding the construction of this port.
9. What is the full form of FTTH? Fiber to the home - Nepal Telecom launched high speed internet service (FTTH) on 23rd August 2076 at Suryapura Bazar located in Gaidhwa village of Rupandehi district. - Through FTTH technology, instead of traditional copper wire, optical fiber can be delivered to the house and triple play i.e. voice, high speed internet and video service can be provided. 
10. Where is the famous Gokarneshwar Mahadev temple located? Kathmandu - (The Gokarneshwar Mahadev Temple, also famous as an ancestral shrine, is located on the banks of the Bagmati River, about 10 kilometers north-east of Kathmandu.) 
11. When was Karnali province declared free of human traffic? V.No. January 4, 2076 - (The province has been declared a free province for prostitutes, helpless, disabled, parents without support)
12. When was the famous Oscar Award, which is regarded as the Nobel Prize in the field of film, awarded for the first time? 1929 - (This award established in 1929 was first given to the movie 'Wings' in 1929. So far, 'Benhur' and 'Titanic' movies have won Oscar awards in the most 11-11 categories.) 
13. When was the first paper currency introduced in Nepal? v. No. 2002 October 1 - Rana Prime Minister Juddha Shamsher issued an ordinance in Nepal. From October 1, 2002, paper currency was introduced. - For the first time Rs. 1 hundred, Rs. 10 and Rs. 5 rate paper notes were issued.- The cashier Janakraj was the one who signed those notes issued by Sadar Mulukikhana. 14. When did the Internal Revenue Department start the Central Billing System? V.No. 2074 November 1
15. Where is the Center for Nepal and Asian Studies (SINAS) located? Tribhuvan University, Kirtipur Campus - This institution was established as a research center for linguistics, history, geography, political science, social science and religious studies. - V. no. Institute of Nepal Studies established on July 1, 2029. In August 2034, the then Tri.V. According to the Act, it was converted into Center for Nepal and Asian Studies (SINAS). - The journal published by SINAS reaches the universities of 112 countries in the world, but currently it reaches only 58 universities. - Tri.V. Economic Development and Administration Center (SEDA), Practical Science and Technical Research Center (SERID) are operating under SINAS. 
16. When was the first liver transplant done in Nepal? V.No. 22 November 2073 
17. Where is Autovillage in Nepal? Butwal
18. Buddha Theme Park will be built in which country? Sri Lanka 
19. If Yari Bhanjyang is in Humla district, where is Namja Bhanjyang? Mugu 
20. Jewelery Museum is in Bhadrakali (Kathmandu) and where is Bagmati Civilization Museum? Guhyeshwari (Kathmandu) 
21. How many species of snakes are found in Nepal? 83- (The latest discovery is the flying snake (looks like a dried wave) found in Shuklaphanta National Park.) 
22. Which is the first country to use credit card in the world? America
23. According to the Forest Act, 2076, what is meant by 'forest'? An area fully or partially covered with trees or shrubs - According to that Act, private forest means a forest planted or protected on private land to which a person is entitled according to the prevailing law. - National forest means forest managed by the government, forest conservation area, community forest, partnership forest, religious Forests, confessional forests, national forests within the province or inter-regional forests are understood. 
24. In which place of Nepal is the Habre (Red Panda) breeding center? Elam 
25. Which is the mammal that lays eggs? Platypus26. When was the start of the undergrounding of electrical wires in Kathmandu? V.No. 2076 February 5
27. When was Nepal Tourism Board established? V.No. 16th of January 2055 - V.No. The tourism department established in 2018 was abolished and the board was established with the participation of the government and the private sector. The Ministry of Tourism was established on February 12, 2033. In that ministry, V. No. In 2039, the Department of Aviation was renamed the Ministry of Tourism and Civil Aviation. In addition to the work of culture, V. No. The Ministry of Culture, Tourism and Civil Aviation was formed in 2057.- National Tourism Promotion Committee was formed in Done on June 31, 2072. It will be chaired by the Minister of Culture, Tourism and Civil Aviation. There is a provision to be the Secretary of the Ministry of Tourism and Civil Aviation.- The Chairman of the Tourism Council will be the Prime Minister. The policy was replaced by the Tourism Policy-2065 which was formulated later. The tourism master plan was formulated in 2029.- The Lumbini master plan was formulated by Japanese citizen Kenzo Tange in 1978.- The tourism development vision, 2020 was formulated for the promotion of the tourism sector. - Takashi Miyahara from Japan is the person who presented the tourism concept called 'Vision 2005'. - The concept of environmental tourism in Nepal has been adopted since the Sixth Plan. 250) considered. Presenter: Tank Casey
Revenue Powers in Fiscal Federalism
1. What are the strengths of Nepal's civil service? write The strengths of Nepal's civil service, which is neutral towards politics and committed to the policies and programs of the government, are as follows:- It is managed by laws and regulations. Civil Service Act, 2049 and Rules, 2050 are applicable for this. - The institutional arrangement is clear. The Ministry of Federal Affairs and General Administration has acted as the central body. There is an arrangement of ministries related to service groups. - According to the three-level federal system, there is a civil service network up to the federal, provincial and local levels. Federation, State, There is an institutional structure through the local level to the ward level. - Selection of employees is based on merit. For this purpose, Public Service Commission in the Union and State Public Service Commission in the state have been arranged. - The age limit of the employee is 58 years. - There is a legal guarantee of service security. - The aspects of professional development including appointment, posting, transfer, promotion are determined by law. - It is kept separate and neutral from politics. - The civil service is committed to the policies and programs of the government.
2. How is the right of revenue organized under the fiscal federalism in Nepal? Mention. The revenue rights, which are the essence of financial federalism, have been regulated by the Constitution of Nepal, the Intergovernmental Finance Management Act, 2074. which can be mentioned as follows: - Tax revenue: customs, excise duty, value added tax, corporate income tax, personal income tax, salary tax, - non-tax revenue: passport fee, visa fee, tourism fee, service fee fee, casino, fines of the province Rights – Real estate registration fee, advertisement tax, vehicle tax, entertainment tax, agricultural income tax, tourism tax, service tax levy, fine Local level rights – real estate registration fee, advertisement tax, vehicle tax, entertainment tax, house restoration tax, business tax , property tax, property collection, land tax (property), tourism tax, service charge levy, fine, Three levels of common rights - tourism fee, service fee collection, fines, royalties from natural resources - the government of Nepal will determine the system of taxing and collection of the common list, revenue distribution a. Value added tax and excise duty raised from domestic production - 70 percent, 15 percent, 15 percent respectively at the federal, provincial and local levels - will be provided monthly, and the accounts will be reconciled in the last month of the financial year, b. Royalties of natural resources (electricity, forest, mountain climbing, water, mining and minerals)- 50 percent, 25 percent, 25 percent respectively at federal, state and local levels, - Matters to be considered when taxing by states and local levels - National economic policy, - Item and transportation of services, - capital market, - labor market, - in a way that does not adversely affect the neighboring provinces and local levels, - the basis of non-tax rate determination - the cost of goods and services at three levels, Operation and Maintenance Expenses - Single Tax Administration The following taxes in the list of rights of both provincial and local levels are levied and collected as follows: a. Vehicle tax - The province will set the tax rate and collect the tax, 60 percent of the raised tax will be the share of the province and 40 percent will be the share of the local level - but the municipality will set the tax rate and collect the tax on rickshaws, rickshaws, autorickshaws and electric rickshaws, b. Real estate registration fee - The province imposes the fee rate and the municipality collects the fee, but until the province and municipality have the means, resources, technology, manpower and office management to collect this fee, the relevant office of the Government of Nepal collects the fee according to the fee rate imposed by the province (60 percent by the municipality and 40 percent by the municipality). Percent Province) Da 60 percent of the raised tax will be the share of the province and 40 percent will be the share of the local level - but the municipality will set the tax rate and collect the tax on rickshaws, rickshaws, autorickshaws and electric rickshaws, b. Real estate registration fee - The province imposes the fee rate and the municipality collects the fee, but until the province and municipality have the means, resources, technology, manpower and office management to collect this fee, the relevant office of the Government of Nepal collects the fee according to the fee rate imposed by the province (60 percent by the municipality and 40 percent by the municipality). Percent Province) Da 60 percent of the raised tax will be the share of the province and 40 percent will be the share of the local level - but the municipality will set the tax rate and collect the tax on rickshaws, rickshaws, autorickshaws and electric rickshaws, b. Real estate registration fee - The province imposes the fee rate and the municipality collects the fee, but until the province and municipality have the means, resources, technology, manpower and office management to collect this fee, the relevant office of the Government of Nepal collects the fee according to the fee rate imposed by the province (60 percent by the municipality and 40 percent by the municipality). Percent Province) DaProvisions for the interim administration of Khila have been made by the Financial Ordinance. c. Entertainment tax - The province will set the tax rate and the municipality will collect the tax, 60 percent of the tax raised will be the share of the municipality and 40 percent will be the share of the province, d. Advertising tax - The municipality will set the tax rate and collect the tax, 60 percent of the tax raised will be the share of the municipality and 40 percent will be the share of the province.
3. Discuss the reasons why corruption cannot be controlled in Nepal. Corruption is the act of using public property for personal gain. It is both economic and non-economic crime. In Nepal, legal and institutional arrangements have been made to control it. All the organs of the state are active in controlling corruption and yet it is not found to be under control. It is not only due to one reason but it has various reasons. Which can be discussed as follows: - Lack of development of structures and systems for spontaneous service delivery and information flow in government offices, - Failure of civil servants to be responsible, accountable, modern and transparent, - Failure of public service delivery to be simple and regular, - Legal The system is not simple and transparent, - there is a lack of functional coordination between the agencies involved in service delivery, - the state of citizen awareness cannot be strengthened,
4. What are the areas of international development aid mobilization? write The International Development Aid Mobilization Policy, 2076, designed to realize the national aspirations of a prosperous Nepal and a happy Nepali, has taken a policy to mobilize international development aid in eight areas of national needs and priorities, which are as follows: - a. Construction of physical infrastructure, - b. Education, health, drinking water, sanitation, - c. National production and productivity growth, - d. Job creation and poverty alleviation, - e. Development and transfer of science and technology, - f. Environmental protection and climate change, - Ch. Disaster management, – h. The appropriate areas determined by the Government of Nepal among the areas where the capacity of the public, private, cooperative and community sectors have not been reached,
5. What are the basic characteristics of bureaucracy? Discuss. Bureaucracy is a professional group of employees who join the organizational structure and achieve the set goals by judicious use of legal rights. Its basic features can be discussed as follows: - The positions of the organization are in a hierarchical series, tasks such as ordering, controlling, and coordinating the employees are done according to the hierarchical arrangement, employees must follow the rules of the hierarchical arrangement while working in the organization, - Employees are qualified through written, oral and practical tests. To be selected, to be given appropriate responsibilities based on qualifications, abilities, knowledge, skills, and experience, - to fully comply with the law, to act in accordance with laws and regulations, - to serve as an organization, not as an individual, to make decisions based on the law, to maintain fairness, to be equal before the law ,- providing impartial service while being politically neutral,
6. What are the financial responsibilities that departmental ministers/state ministers have to bear in Nepal? Mention. Section 50 of the Economic Procedures and Financial Responsibility Act, 2076 in Nepal has made provisions regarding the financial responsibility to be borne by the departmental minister/state minister, which are as follows: - Proposing the budget, - Making the budget surrender, - Choosing the plan, - Planning and Monitoring of the program, - Preparation of medium-term expenditure structure, - Protection and management of government property, - Likewise, the Prime Minister has provided for monitoring whether the above financial responsibilities have been discharged from the departmental minister/state minister.
7. What are the characteristics of Nepal's financial policy? Discuss. Financial policy is a policy that positively affects the country's economy through taxes, government spending and loans. Fiscal policy is a part of macroeconomic policy. The government formulates this policy based on political and social foundations. This policy, which is issued before the beginning of the financial year, is closely related to the budget formulated by the government. The financial policy of Nepal is guided by the annual budget and periodical plan. The characteristics of Nepal's financial policy, which has been advanced in the basic framework of economic and social development in accordance with the long-term objective of making 'prosperous Nepal, happy Nepali', can be discussed as follows: Wanted, - unity, coordination and partnership between the federation, state and local levels,
1. Which award is also known as Alternative Nobel Prize? Right Livelihood Award - This award was established in 1980 by the German-Swedish citizen Jakob von Mukskull. - This award will be given to (four individuals/organizations) who make significant contributions in the fields of environmental protection, sustainable development, human rights, peace, education, etc. - This award has been given since 1980. - In 2021, this award was given to Marth Wandou, Vladimir Slivjak, Freda Husson and the Legal Initiative for Forest and Environment (LIFE). - The amount of this award is two hundred thousand euros. 
2. When was Nepal's first bank 'Nepal Bank Limited' established? V.No. 30th of October 1994 - V.No. On October 30, 2078, this bank completed its 84th year and entered its 85th year.- At present, 51 percent of Nepal government and 49 percent of the public share in this bank.
3. When is World Antimicrobial Awareness Week celebrated? November 18-24 - The World Health Organization, Food and Agriculture Organization and World Animal Health Organization under the United Nations have celebrated awareness week around the world. - It has been held since 2015 to spread awareness about infection prevention and appropriate use of antimicrobial drugs to face the global challenge of antimicrobial resistance. The day has started to be celebrated.- Since there is no new group of effective antibiotic drugs being invented since the last 30 years, there is an urgent need to use them properly to maintain the effectiveness of the existing antimicrobial drugs that we have.- Based on the topic Spread Awareness, Stop Resistance Let's use antimicrobials carefully (antimicrobials:
4. When did the government start using the electronic passport (e-passport)? V.No. November 1, 2078 - E-passport was introduced with the aim of displacing the currently in use Machine Redevel Passport (MRP). There is a goal. 
5. When was Kulman Ghising appointed as the Executive Director of Nepal Electricity Authority for the second time? V.No. July 15, 2078 
6. Which day has been approved by the United Nations as Epidemic Prepared Day? December 27
7. On the occasion of National Tax Day, 2078, which company is honored by paying the most tax? Surya Nepal - The entrepreneur who has been honored with the highest tax payer is Siddharth Shamsher Jabra, the executive chairman of Sipradi Trading Pvt. Ltd. - The slogan of National Tax Day 2078: Increase in voluntary tax participation: Good governance, development and prosperity. - Persons / organizations honored on the occasion of the tenth National Tax Day 
. . What is called the system that controls and coordinates all the activities of our body? nervous system
9. Who is the person to be selected as the president of SAARC Finance? Ne.Ra. Bank Governor Mahaprasad Adhikari - The 42nd meeting of the SAARC Finance Governors Group held on 29th October 2078 through virtual means elected him as the chairman. - The meeting organized by the Maldives Monetary Authority was attended by the governors, deputy governors and related officials of other central banks of the SAARC countries including the Nepal Bank. The current situation of the Asian economic and financial sector, research and development situation, total foreign exchange reserves, inflation, credit flow, development, hydropower, tourism and other common interests and cooperation were discussed. 
10. To whom it was decided to posthumously award Nepal's biggest honor 'Nepal Ratna' (on 2078 Ashwin 2)? Former Prime Minister Krishna Prasad Bhattarai
11. When did the Taliban announce the interim government in Afghanistan under the presidency of Mullah Mohammad Hassan Akhund? 2021 September 7 
12. In the Open City Incubator program of The Golab, which is run under the New York University School of Engineering, which municipality of Nepal has succeeded in being among the top 10 municipalities in the world? Changunarayan Na.Pa. (Bhaktapur) 
13. Who is the first woman Chief Minister of Nepal? Ashtalakshmi Shakya (year 2078 August 2 to November 10, Bagmati Province)
14. Mohammed Yunus, who is considered to be a successful user of micro credit and micro finance, is a citizen of which country? Bangladesh - Yunus is an economist and banker who established a rural bank in Bangladesh and provided loans to millions of poor Bangladeshis through that bank to improve their living standards through self-employment. - Yunus and the rural bank he established were awarded the Nobel Prize in 2006. He was also honored with the Magsaysay Award.- Yunus Center was established at the head office of Grameen Bank in Dhaka. 
15. Which country produces more milk in the world? India 
16. What is the 'Motto' (Motto) set by the International Olympic Committee? Faster, Higher, Stronger - Together - New motto decided on July 20, 2021. - The previous motto was 'Faster, Higher, Stronger'.
17. According to the list published by the travel guidebook Lonely Planet, which are the top 10 places/countries in the list of must-visit countries in the world in 2022? Cook Islands, Norway, Mauritius, Belize, Slovenia, Anguilla, Oman, Nepal, Malawi, Egypt respectively 
. When did US-based SpaceX announce a new plan to take tourists to the moon using the Wig Falcon rocket (VFR)? 2018 September 12 
19. Which event in the history of Nepal is also called Basnet festival? Bhandarkhal Festival 
20. Who is the founder of Harit Petika Abhiyan (Greenwelt Movement)? Wangari Mathai 
21. The 2.2 km footpath from Hanumandhoka to Swayambhu, which is listed in the World Heritage List, is going to be developed as a footpath? Heritage Trek i.e. heritage trail
22. Khmer Rouge is a rebel group of Cambodia and Hamas is a rebel group of which country? Palestine 
23. When did Nepal ratify the 'Realkhabhalatsyaal yal Bhishlabatsyaal Ya Bhiychak Ya Mshkachashlabatsyaal Banbashalkat Dhyambhal' which is an international document for the protection of women's human rights? 
24 of 1991 . What is the process of separating the rays of different seven colors from sunlight using a prism? Light Discontinuity 
25. What is the total number of waves generated per second? frequency
26. Which organization is the first to take census in Nepal? Census Goshwara – Census in Nepal v. no. Started from 1968.- Until the fourth census in Nepal (year 1998), the scientific census was started from the fifth census (2009-11). Since 2018, the Central Statistics Department has been taking. From 2028, the use of computers in the census will be started. 
Tax policy of Nepal
1. What are the characteristics of the tax policy adopted by Nepal? write Tax policy covers topics like tax rate, scope, tax administration, tax collection process, tax leakage control, tax utilization etc. The features of the tax policy adopted by Nepal are also related to this topic. There is no separate tax policy document in Nepal. Periodic plans and annual budgets guide Nepal's tax policy. The characteristics of Nepal's tax policy can be mentioned as follows: - Emphasis on expanding the scope without increasing the tax rate, - Emphasis on creating an investment-friendly environment through taxes, - Emphasis on expanding the scope by identifying new tax areas, - Identifying the areas of revenue leakage, foreign exchange embezzlement and wealth laundering, and controlling the leakage. Emphasis, - Apply the concept of taxpayer-friendly tax administration by making tax administration clean, simple, transparent, efficient and technological, - Increase in tax concessions and facilities,
2. What are the bases of planning? The bases of planning are as follows: - State directive principles and policies, - Nation's socio-economic situation, - People's demands, expectations and basic needs, - Resource situation, - Achievement of past plans, - National production and income status, - Nation's commitments in external forums. ,- Priority subjects of the nation.
3. Explain the meaning and types of migration. Migration is the act of people leaving their village, place or country and moving to another village, place or country. People generally migrate for convenience. As migration is a continuous process, it cannot be stopped completely but can be systematically controlled. In order to systematically control it, special development programs should be conducted at both the origin and destination of migration. Types of migration - Migration is classified on different basis. Migration is generally of the following types: (a) Based on time1. Permanent Migration – Migration for 10 years or more. 2. Temporary migration – migration for a period of 5 to 10 years, contact with the old place may sometimes remain. 3. Seasonal Migration – Migration usually lasts up to six months to escape winter or summer. The relationship of birthplace will remain. The inhabitants of the Himalayan region make such a migration to escape the winter. (b) On the basis of location1. Internal migration - migration within the country, such migration is usually of the following types: - from the mountains to the plains - from the village to the city - from the city to the village2. International Migration – Migration from one country to another country is international migration. Such migration is of two types as follows:- Immigration: Migration is the process of migration of people from one country to another country. For example: If Indian citizens immigrate to Nepal, they become immigrants. - Migration: Migration is the act of leaving one's country and moving to another country. For example, if Nepali citizens migrate to India, they become migrants. Such migration is usually of the following types: - from the mountains to the plains - from the village to the city - from the city to the village2. International Migration – Migration from one country to another country is international migration. Such migration is of two types as follows:- Immigration: Migration is the process of migration of people from one country to another country. For example: If Indian citizens immigrate to Nepal, they become immigrants. - Migration: Migration is the act of leaving one's country and moving to another country. For example, if Nepali citizens migrate to India, they become migrants. Such migration is usually of the following types: - from the mountains to the plains - from the village to the city - from the city to the village2. International Migration – Migration from one country to another country is international migration. Such migration is of two types as follows:- Immigration: Migration is the process of migration of people from one country to another country. For example: If Indian citizens immigrate to Nepal, they become immigrants. - Migration: Migration is the act of leaving one's country and moving to another country. For example, if Nepali citizens migrate to India, they become migrants. International Migration – Migration from one country to another country is international migration. Such migration is of two types as follows:- Immigration: Migration is the process of migration of people from one country to another country. For example: If Indian citizens immigrate to Nepal, they become immigrants. - Migration: Migration is the act of leaving one's country and moving to another country. For example, if Nepali citizens migrate to India, they become migrants. International Migration – Migration from one country to another country is international migration. Such migration is of two types as follows:- Immigration: Migration is the process of migration of people from one country to another country. For example: If Indian citizens immigrate to Nepal, they become immigrants. - Migration: Migration is the act of leaving one's country and moving to another country. For example, if Nepali citizens migrate to India, they become migrants.
4. What are the measures of waste management? Discuss. The following measures should be adopted for waste management: a) Less production of waste: The production of waste can be reduced through the following measures:- Classification: Arrangements should be made to collect the waste by classifying it into groups of perishable, non-perishable and metallic etc. The items should be processed and put to use.- Recycling: The broken plastic and polythene items should be collected and put to use as raw materials. Useful goods can be produced from such items. b) Garbage collection: Garbage collection to manage the garbage. Transfer and management should be done in a systematic way. c) Making organic manure: Cattle excrement and organic waste should be mixed to make organic manure. Such manure is very good for agriculture.
5. What are the principles of food sovereignty? write The term food sovereignty was first used in 1996 by members of Via Campesina. Via Campesina is a network of 148 small and medium-sized farmers' organizations in Asia, Europe, the Americas and Africa, committed to sustainable agriculture based on family farming. Since 1999, this organization has continued the global agricultural reform movement against market-oriented agricultural reform. The Spanish term Via Campesina means: Farmer's Way. The organization has determined seven principles related to food sovereignty regarding the interests of tribals, farmers, fishermen, villagers, rural youth and environmentalists, which are as follows: a) Food is the basic need of human beings: - Every human being with full dignity, in sufficient quality and quantity, clean, You should be able to eat nutritious and culturally appropriate food. b) Agricultural reform: - Landless and farming people, especially women, need land reform to establish land rights. c) Protection of natural resources: - Food sovereignty includes the protection of natural resources such as land, water, seeds. d) Reorganization of food trade: - Food first. It is a source of nutrition and only an item of trade. Therefore, the local production of food should not be affected by its import. e) Ending globalization of hunger: - Multinational companies and organizations have reduced the sovereignty and dignity of food. Hence the attractive but deadly regulation of capital, There is a need for control and a strict code of conduct to control it. f) Social peace: - Every person has the right to be free from violence. Food cannot be used as a weapon and casteism cannot be imposed on tribal farmers. G) Democratic control: - Direct access of all small farmers should be ensured in the formulation of agricultural policy at every level.
6. Give a brief introduction to the Raute caste. A nomadic caste in the dense forest, a caste that does not stay in one place for more than two months, a caste with no permanent residence, - living in the districts of Dang, Salyan, Jajarkot, Surkhet and Kalikot, - a very backward minority caste, - not doing agriculture, hunting monkeys, living by eating wild tubers - When a person dies, the custom of burying the body with a monkey trap, - Raut and Saut, two surnames, - Raut's Nike is called Man Bahadur, - worshiping nature, - speaking the Khamchi language, - the custom of marrying in Hadnata, - this backward caste is gradually disappearing. It seems that attention should be paid to conservation.
7. Mention the importance of foreign trade in Nepal. Nepal is a landlocked, It is an underdeveloped and agricultural country. This country is slowly moving towards industrialization. Despite being rich in various natural resources, it cannot be self-sufficient for all consumer goods due to its geographical location and economic situation. For example, it does not have its own sea and oil fields. Essential commodities like salt and oil have to be imported from other countries. According to the theory of modern trade, a country tries to earn profit by achieving specialization in the production of a limited number of goods without producing all the goods. International trade is mandatory for the export of raw materials and manufactured agricultural products found in Nepal and the import of other daily consumables and luxury goods. Currently, Nepal's trade deficit is high. It is also necessary to expand foreign trade in order to bring the balance of trade in one's favor. The current state of the world market and Nepal's entry into the World Trade Organization Foreign trade has become a mandatory requirement. The importance of foreign trade in Nepal can be pointed out as follows:- Helping the economic development of the country through import and export,- Economic crisis can be avoided,- Monopoly in trade can be ended,- Easy supply of goods that cannot be produced in the country, such as: salt, Gold, petroleum products, etc. - production technology can be improved, - foreign capital, technology can be obtained, - favorable environment can be prepared for investment, - international relations can be developed, - world economy can be connected.
8. What are the problems seen in Nepal's tourism sector? write Although it is known internationally as a major destination for tourism, the tourism sector of Nepal has not been able to flourish due to various problems mentioned below: - Lack of full guarantee of peace and security, - Lack of proper development of tourism infrastructures, - Lack of proper security for tourists, - Environmental pollution problem in tourist areas, - Lack of proper protection of natural and cultural heritages, - Lack of reliable air transport, - Problems related to hotels and accommodation, - Problems related to transport and communication, - Bandhs, strikes, protests, strikes, - Inability to develop domestic and rural tourism, - Between the government and the private sector Lack of proper coordination, - Inability to identify and develop new tourist areas, - Political instability, - Lack of proper hiking trails and guides, - Competent, strong,
1. When did Zhurong Rover, which was sent by China to study Mars in 2021, land on the surface of Mars? May 14, 2021 - After about seven months of space travel, the rover reached Mars. - Named after the legendary god of fire and war, Zhurong Rover weighs 240 kg. - China previously launched the Tianwen-1 spacecraft on July 23, 2020 to study Mars. - So far EU, USA, UK, Russia, UAE, Japan and China have sent spacecraft for Mars mission.
2. Who is the Nepali-speaking writer of India who will be honored with India's prestigious Padma Shri award in 2021? Leal Bahadur Chhetri - The Nepali language writer Leil Bahadur Chhetri, who lives in Guwahati, Assam state, India, was awarded this honor by the President of India, Ram Nath Kovind, on November 8, 2021. - Known as a storyteller, dramatist, essayist, and critic, Chettri has made a great contribution to Nepali language literature. - The novel 'Basai' written by him is read even in the universities of Nepal.
3. When was the decision to start the trial distribution of electronic passports? V.No. November 1, 2078 - The Passport Department has announced that the trial distribution of e-passports, which are going to be formally introduced in Nepal with the beginning of 2022, has been started. - In September of last year, the production of electronic passports was started with an agreement with a French company. - ISO 1903 recognized electronic passport as third generation passport. - Even if a new passport is issued, if the old MRP passport has not expired, the same passport will be recognized until it expires.
4. Who was awarded the Madan Award for the year 2077? Bhagiraj Ingnam (Limbuvan's Historical Document Collection Book) 
5. Who was awarded the Jagdambashree award for the year 2077? Dance teacher Bhairav ​​Bahadur Thapa 
6. When is World Diabetes Day celebrated? November 14- (Slogan of 2021: Access to diabetes treatment) 
7. When did the biggest avalanche in Mustang in the past three decades? V.No. October 28, 2078 - The avalanche occurred in the Tukuche Himal in the Thasang Rural Municipality of Mustang. The avalanche came down to about five kilometers. - 11 people including students and local people were injured when they ran for fear that the avalanche would reach Thasang Rural Municipality-2, Kowang. - It is reported that half a dozen huts were damaged and more than 150 huts were buried in the landslide when the snow rocks fell down due to the landslide that lasted for about half an hour.
8. Padmakanthagiri is the legendary name of which place? Swayambhu 
9. Since when was the Social Reform Act implemented in Nepal? V.No. 2033 
10. Who is the scientist who discovered that sunlight has seven colors? Sir Isaac Newton (UK) 
11. Which colors are included in the primary colors? Red, Blue and Green 
12. Which is the oldest pagoda style temple? Changunarayan 
13. Who performed the Navadurga dance? Suvarna Mall 
14. Which is the festival that Vyasi people celebrate Bhailo Kheli in the month of January? Dhawala
15. On the occasion of its Silver Festival, Nai Prakashan awarded the title of 'Mahasmalochak' and Nai Rajat Mahotsav Award to whom? Prof. Dr. Vasudev Tripathi – Tripathi was awarded the title of 'Mahasmalochak' along with five lakh rupees and nine silver festival awards. - On the same occasion, Tripathi was also given the Nai Ishwar Baral Award of one lakh rupees. - New Silver Festival Medal Centenary Men Satyamohan Joshi, Prof.Dr. Mahadev Awasthi, Prof. Keshav Subedi, Prof. Dr. Dedicated to 50 people including Lakshman Prasad Gautam. - Indian Nepali writer Durga Prasad Shrestha was awarded the Nai Derunikh International Award (with two lakh rupees). - Doctor Dr. Gaurishankarlal Das was awarded the new Bhavi Award, Sankarnath Rimal was awarded the Kirtinidi Award, Manisha Koirala was awarded the Bhupal Durga Award, Madankrishna Shrestha and Harivansh Acharya were awarded the Derunikh Sukirti Award and Prof. Dr.
16. SAARC logo was designed by the artist of which country? Nepal (Sailendra Maharjan) 
17. Who is the author of black letters? Kamalmani Dixit 
18. Who is the first writer to receive Prithvi Pragya Award? Balkrishna Sam 
19. Metric system started from which country? France 
20. Udhauli and Ubhauli are festivals celebrated by which caste? Rye 
21. Which district is the main residence of Chantyal caste? Myagdi 
22. Which planet is known as red planet? Tuesday 
23. A place called Tose in Ramechhap district is famous for which metal? iron
24. Embossed no. in five provinces by the Ministry of Physical Infrastructure and Transport. Since when was it decided to make the plates mandatory? V.No. 2078 November 1- From November 1, 2078, embossed number plates are mandatory for newly registered vehicles. - Similarly, from February 1, 2078, it is mandatory to wear the embossed number while registering the vehicle. - From June 1, 2079, the embossed number plate must be worn when renewing the vehicle registration certificate. - According to the ministry, the implementation of embossed number plates has been made mandatory for public vehicles, tourist vehicles, private vehicles, government vehicles and company vehicles. - Now Bagmati, Gandaki, Lumbini, This will be implemented in Karnali and Sudurpaschim provinces. In Provinces 1 and 2, the name of the province has been postponed until it is decided. - According to the federal regulations, the work of installing embossed number plates falls under the jurisdiction of the province. The Ministry of Physical Infrastructure and Transport has published a notice in the Gazette using the authority given by serial number 14 of Schedule 2 of the Vehicle and Transport Management Act, 2049 to be implemented in the offices under the province.
25. Which is the most abundant gas in the air? Nitrogen 
26. If nicotine is found in tobacco, what is found in coffee? Caffeine 
27. If Mustang is known as the desert of Nepal, which place is known as Sri Lanka of Nepal? Kositappu 
28. Which is the world famous work also known as Economic Magna Carta? The Wealth of Nations 
29. Who is known as Shah Jahan of Nepal? Khadgashamsher
30. Which country won the title of World Cup T-20 tournament (2021)? Australia - Australia won the title by defeating the neighboring country New Zealand by 8 wickets. - Australia, who have won the ODI World Cup five times, won the T20 World Cup for the first time. - New Zealand scored 172 runs for the loss of four wickets after losing the toss and batting first in the final of the seventh edition of World T20. Australia achieved the target by scoring 173 runs at the loss of two wickets with seven balls remaining. – T-20 World Cup Champion Presenter: Tank K.C. 
1. Who is the Nepali who will receive the Order of Rising 2021 medal from Japan? Himalayan Shamsher Jabra
2. At present, which organization has the most of Nepal's total foreign debt (up to 2077-78)? World Bank (54 percent) - Only 50.44 percent of the International Development Organization (IDA) under the World Bank Group. - ADB (31.36 percent), Japan (4.41 percent) and IMF (3.51 percent) are the second, third and fourth lenders in total foreign loans. - The share of multilateral donor agencies in the total foreign debt is 87.88 percent. The remaining 12.11 percent are bilateral. 
3. Who is the Nepalese who will be honored by the World Book of Records? Abhishek Vikram Shah (General Manager of Chandragiri Hills Limited) – (The award was given by the World Book of Records in the UK for his contribution to the field of hospitality and tourism.)
4. When and where was the COP-26 World Conference on Climate Change held? 2021 October 31 - November 12, Glasgow, Scotland - The World Leaders Summit was held on November 1 and 2 along with the 26th International Conference on Climate Change held in the city of Glasgow, UK. - The COP Summit was attended by the signatory countries of the United Nations Framework Convention on Climate. - Nepal is also a party to the treaty in 1994. - The 25th edition of the Conference on Climate Change was held in Spain in 2019. 
5. In the climate change conference COP-26, how long has Nepal expressed its commitment to reduce carbon emissions to zero? Year 2045
6. At the climate summit held in Glasgow in 2021, how long have world leaders pledged to control deforestation? Year 2030 (The agreement was signed on November 2, 2021.) 
7. Who is the girl who won the title of Miss Universe Nepal 2021? Sujita Basnet - She managed to wear a diamond-studded crown with 1 million cash. - The winner of the title, Basnet, will represent Nepal at the Miss Universe to be held in Israel on December 12, 2021. In the competition, Ninakanta Mandal was the first runner-up, Raksha Upreti was the second runner-up, Pratishka Mahara Chhetri was the third runner-up and Dr. Keshu Khadka was declared the fourth runner-up. 
8. When did Prime Minister Sher Bahadur Deuba leave for London to participate in the United Nations Conference on Climate Change (COP-26)? V.No. November 12, 2078
9. When and where was the G-20 meeting of the world's 20 most economically prosperous countries held? October 30-31, 2021, Rome, Italy - At the conference, a commitment was expressed to jointly deal with the situation caused by the Covid-19 epidemic. - The G-20 countries agreed on close coordination between producer and consumer states on energy price issues. - The significant increase in gas and oil prices and instability have weakened the global growth, emphasizing the need for coordination between producer and consumer states.
10. When did Nepal get permission to sell electricity at a competitive rate in the Indian energy market? V.No. October 15, 2078 (November 1, 2021) - In the first phase, a total of 39 MW of electricity produced by the 24 MW Trishuli and 15 MW Devighat power plants operating in Nuwakot owned by the authority was allowed to be sold to the Indian Energy Exchange (IEX). - It is believed that electricity from other projects such as Upper Tamakosi will be exported to the Indian market soon, even though the electricity export started with a small amount. - The authority has started exporting electricity through the Dhalkewar-Muzaffarpur 400 KV international transmission line from 17 October 2078. - The average price of electricity exported to India from November 17 is four rupees 33 paise per unit. - NTPC Electricity Trading Corporation (NVVN), the designated liaison body for electricity trade with Nepal, will handle all transactions in the exchange market on behalf of the authority. – Nepal to India Energy Exchange (IEX) has already received permission to purchase and import electricity. The Authority has been importing electricity at competitive rates through IEX since May 17, 2078. - Electricity trade between Nepal and India has entered a new phase with the permission to export. - Nepal became the first country in South Asia to enter the Indian energy market for sale and purchase of electricity.
11. What is the name of the path connecting Hariharpurgarhi and Sindhuligarhi, which has a proud history of Nepal? Integration footpath - (After the plan to connect the two forts by footpath is made, tourism activities will increase along with the preservation of historical heritage.) 
12. When was the result of the first national economic census, 2075 announced? V.No. June 16, 2076 - (The preliminary report of the calculation was published on August 28, 2075.) 
13. According to the Civil Crimes (Code) Act, 2074, what is meant by serious crime? Crime punishable by imprisonment for more than three years up to ten years 
14. According to the Civil Crimes (Code) Act, 2074, what is meant by heinous crime? Crime punishable by life imprisonment or imprisonment for more than ten years 
15. If Arnico is known as Leonardo da Vinci of Nepal, who is known as Michael Angelo of Nepal? Vekharaj
16. According to the Education Act, 2028, what is meant by community school? School with permission or approval to receive regular subsidy from the Government of Nepal - According to the Act, institutional school means school with permission or approval without receiving regular subsidy from the Government of Nepal. - Similarly, school education means basic and secondary education. 
17. Who has been given the responsibility of conducting, monitoring and managing the basic level (class 1-8) examination? Local level 
18. According to the constitution of Nepal, which level has been given the sole authority to manage secondary level schools? local level
19. When was the National Cyber ​​Security Monitoring Center established? V.No. June 18, 2076 - (The center will monitor security challenges and threats to sensitive information and communication infrastructure, government websites, web applications and web services and provide early warning. In addition, it is believed that the establishment of the center will control the growing cyber risk. done.)
20. Where has the government started the construction of Bhanubhakta Zoological Park? Tanahun - V.No. The decision of the Council of Ministers dated February 11, 2073 and published in the gazette on May 18, 2074, the construction of Bhanubhakta Zoological Park in the name of National Bibhuti Adicavi Bhanubhakta Acharya has been started. - The park will be built to cover wards 11 and 12 of Byas Municipality and 5 and 6 of Bhanu Municipality. - An entertaining children's park for children, necessary infrastructure for internal and external tourist promotion will be built in the park. - It is said that animals such as elephants, rhinos, tigers, bears, giraffes will be brought from the country and abroad and left in the zoo.
21. Which is the technology that has recently been used to measure the speed of vehicles on the wide roads of the valley? Laser Speed ​​Gun – Laser Speed ​​Gun is said to be more advanced than radar. - The work of measuring the speed of vehicles with a laser speed gun was started on May 20, 2076. 
22. Since when was the start of 'Action for Peace Keeping' by UN Secretary General Antonio Guterres? March 28, 2018 
. Who is known as butterfly expert in Nepal? Prof. Dr. Bhaiya Khanal - Khanal wrote a book called 'Butterflies of Kathmandu Valley' in collaboration with British butterfly expert Colin P. Smith. - He has published more than 150 articles and research reports about butterflies in national and international magazines and newspapers. - Khanal, who has visited most of the country's districts in the course of studying butterflies, has been visiting this area for about four decades.
24. Which was the highest civil rank during the Rana period? Badakaji- (During the time of Rana, there were Badakaji, Kazi, Sardar, Mirsubba, Subba, Nayabsubba, Khairar, Ditha, Mukhiya, Bahidar and Nausinda in order from top to bottom.) 
Presenter: Tank K.C. 
Importance of public hearings
1. There is a provision that a metropolitan corporation can be declared based on the fulfillment of what conditions and facilities? Mention. According to the Local Government Operation Act, 2074, the Government of Nepal can declare a metropolitan city in consultation with the relevant local level and state government on the basis of fulfilling the following conditions and facilities: - Having at least five million permanent residents, - Average annual income of the last five years is at least one billion Rs. Hospitals with services, with at least one general hospital of 100 beds including at least 500 bedded hospital facilities, - having organized vegetable and fruit sales centers, - having shopping malls,
2. Discuss the need for democratic values ​​and recognition for development. By using democratic values ​​and principles in the governance system, periodical elections will be held, governance will be conducted according to the fresh votes of the people, and the system of ruling party and opposition will increase transparency in the functioning of the government. This leads to development and construction according to the demand of the people, responsibility, accountability and timely quality work in the development work. Therefore, democratic values ​​and recognition are needed for development. Its other needs in development can be mentioned as follows:- To carry out development works according to the sentiments of the sovereign people,- To run the government by the party with a majority from the people and implement development plans according to the sentiments of the people,- To have party independence, to have positive actions by the parties to get votes from the people in periodic elections,- Participation in governance will increase, rule of law will be maintained,
3. What is a public hearing? Discuss its importance in maintaining good governance. The government provides goods and services to the common citizens as public services. In order to make this public service delivery clean, transparent and easy, the work of discussing and exchanging ideas with the service users and officials of the government agencies and concerned service users is called public hearing. It is also a formal meeting between the service provider and the customer. Such program shall be notified in advance to the subscriber on the date fixed, Happens in time and place. Its importance in maintaining good governance - It helps to improve the service delivery by maintaining good governance and removing the deficiencies found through extensive discussion regarding the service facilities and functions provided by the public bodies. This is its paramount importance. Other important aspects of this can be discussed in the following points: - The service users will be informed about the working of the office, - The working of the office will be discussed, - The strong and weak points of the office can be discovered and the advice and suggestions will be received accordingly, - Help to make the working of government agencies public-oriented, transparent and law-abiding. Reaching,- As people's grievances can be addressed, good relations with service users will increase, coordination and communication aspects will be strengthened,- It will help to gather people's participation in public development, construction and sanitation work,- Responsibility and accountability will increase in the officers of public bodies,
4. Mention the reasons for the decline in productivity of arable land in Nepal. Agriculture is the cornerstone of Nepali economy. Agriculture is the main source of livelihood of Nepali people. About 75 percent of the people of Nepal are dependent on agriculture. Agriculture accounts for about 33 percent of the total domestic product. Agriculture has a significant role in the economy and yet due to geographical difficulties, migration, increasing urbanization etc., on one hand, the arable land has decreased and on the other hand, the productivity of the arable land is also decreasing. Thus, the reasons for the decline in the productivity of arable land are as follows:- Farmers do not have knowledge of advanced methods of farming,- Lack of irrigation facilities in arable land,- Lack of advanced seed sowing and chemical fertilizers,- Lack of full use of arable land,- Lack of development of agricultural road network,- In agriculture Not being able to commercialize, - not attracting private sector investment for commercial agricultural development,
5. What are the measures to be taken to reduce environmental pollution? write The measures to be taken to reduce environmental pollution are as follows: - Minimizing emissions from industry, factories, transport and human activities, - Preventing deforestation due to poverty and other causes, - Making human activities and development processes environmentally friendly, - Institutionalizing environmental impact assessment, - Determining and implementing pollution standards, - Implementing international treaties and conventions on environmental protection and climate change, - Adopting the concept of green economy, - Formulating and implementing low carbon emission development strategy, - Increasing public awareness regarding environmental protection, - Proper waste management To do, - to arrange systematic urbanization and proper housing, - environmental monitoring,
6. What are the responsibilities of civil society? Mention. Civil society is a non-political, non-profit voluntary organization outside the government. The responsibility of the government towards the citizens may not be the responsibility of the civil society because the civil society is an organization that does not reside in the government, but the civil society has a certain responsibility for the welfare of the country. Which can be mentioned as follows:- Ensuring the rights of citizens,- Playing a necessary role in the development of the democratic system,- Making the government accountable to the people,- Rising above personal, institutional and party interests, raising a loud voice especially about the backward class, region, gender,- In political intervention. To socially exclude those who do corruption without being involved, - not only focusing on cities but also focusing on rural areas, and strongly supporting the development of the country.
7. What are the strengths and weaknesses of internal recruitment? write Internal recruitment is the filling up of vacancies by promotion of employees within the service. While promoting employees within the service, promotion is done on the basis of performance evaluation, seniority, training, educational qualification, leadership ability, etc. Its strengths and weaknesses are as follows: Strengths - Since employees are promoted within the service, employees are more responsible for their work, - Training is not required because employees are promoted within the service, - Experienced and competent employees are promoted in the service, - The process of filling posts is simple, fast and less expensive. - Experienced and skilled employees within the service will be less likely to leave the service, - Employees within the service will receive sufficient opportunities for career development.
8. What are the measures to prevent money laundering? Discuss. Illegal activities and criminal activities such as corruption, tax evasion, terrorist activities, drug dealing, human trafficking, extortion, etc. This is the act of clearing or purifying illegal currency. This is an economic and social crime. Therefore, it should be remedied and stopped. In Nepal, legal and institutional arrangements have been made to prevent this. Prevention of Money Laundering Act, 2064 and Regulations, 2073 is applicable. A coordination committee has been formed under the coordination of the Finance Secretary to maintain inter-agency coordination in the prevention of money laundering and to give necessary suggestions to the government. Similarly, Nepal Rastra Bank has a financial information unit to collect and analyze information related to money laundering. A Money Laundering Investigation Department has been established to investigate and investigate money laundering offences. Asset laundering will have a negative impact on the social, economic and legal aspects of the country, banks and financial institutions will go bankrupt, so it needs to be effectively remedied. For this, the following measures should be adopted: Promotional measures - mass media such as radio, TV, newspapers, etc., to spread wide publicity about wealth laundering, its area, its negative effects and its prevention, to increase public awareness, - to put up hoarding boards in public places,
Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma 
Recruitment Process in Civil Service
1. Give a brief introduction to Value Added Tax. The tax levied on the difference between the purchase price and the sale price of goods and services is value added tax. This is a tax levied on the increase in the price of goods and services. It is an improved form of sales tax. In Nepal, this tax is considered as the main source of revenue. In Nepal this tax V.No. It came into effect from 1st November 2054. The date of implementation of Value Added Tax is November 1. It has been celebrated as 'National Tax Day' since 2069. Currently, the value added tax rate is 13 percent. Value Added Tax Act, 2052 and Value Added Tax Regulations, 2053 have been implemented to manage this tax in Nepal. Value Added Tax is based on self-assessment system. According to which the taxpayer shall keep his own records of his transactions, determine his own taxes, collect his own taxes, They act like filing the tax return at the tax office by themselves. It has guaranteed economic democracy to taxpayers. This is its main feature. This is a modern tax based on accounting.
2. What are the causes of drug addiction? write Narcotics are substances that relax and stimulate the body parts by directly affecting the nerves and brain of a person. Marijuana, bhang, hashish, heroin, cocaine, smack etc. are drugs. The main reasons for getting addicted to drugs are basically a person's nature, association, family situation, financial independence, social situation, education, consciousness etc. In general, any person falls into drug addiction for the following reasons: - to get rid of unnecessary worries, - the company of an addict friend, - failure at work, being away from home, depressed, - unemployment, - imitation of Western style, - temptation of drug traffickers.
3. Explain the concept of social justice. Not all citizens of the country are prosperous. All citizens do not have the same status and condition. As the state is the protector of all the citizens of the country, the state should distribute services and resources to the disadvantaged classes and communities fairly, this is social justice. This is the end of all kinds of discrimination. This is an action to eliminate economic and social inequality, increase equal participation and access of all citizens in the state system. It has equal distribution of opportunities and benefits. This is a concept based on the principle of equality. It is a concept developed along with the concept of public welfare state. It is also a topic related to the Universal Declaration of Human Rights, 1948.
4. Mention the issues that should be taken into consideration while making a prudent decision. Prudent decision-making advocates the collection and analysis of sufficient information, the development of options, the impact and consequences of options, and the mechanism for implementing decisions. Therefore, when making prudent decisions, attention should be paid to these and similar matters, which can be mentioned as follows: - Full compliance with laws, regulations, laws, - Adoption of transparent decision-making process, - Full use of management information system, - Timely decisions, - Extensive improvement in risk-taking tendency, - Adoption of decision-making process based on information, - Full use of modern information technology, - Accurate analysis of the situation, - Freedom from bias, - Assessment of results and effects, - Addressing problems and challenges.
5. What are the rights under the right to freedom in Nepal's constitution? Mention. Article 17 of the Constitution of Nepal includes the following rights: - Freedom of thought and expression - Freedom to assemble peacefully without arms - Freedom to form a political party - Freedom to form an association - Freedom of movement and residence in any part of Nepal - Freedom of movement in any part of Nepal Also freedom of occupation, employment and establishment and operation of industry, trade and business.
6. Explain the meaning of Artillery Force, Air Defense Artillery Force, Signal Force, Supporting Force and Combat Arms Force related to Nepal Army. a. Artillery Army - A force equipped with various large arms and cannons to provide fire support to the basic fighting forces during war, b. Air Defense Artillery Force - During the war, the basic fighting force is a force that takes direct defensive action to disable or reduce the air attack by the use of various weapons and tools of the enemy or the opponent, c. Signal Force - A resourceful force that provides support to basic fighting forces during war by providing communication facilities as needed, d. Supporting Forces – The forces that support the basic fighting forces in war, it also includes artillery, air defense artillery, army aviation, engineers and signal forces.
7. What is the role of the principal in school management? Discuss. The principal is the academic and administrative head of the school. The overall management of the school, including the admission of students to the school, educational environment, quality, discipline, coordination, and records, is the responsibility of the principal. In the school, the principal is also the parent of the student's parents. Therefore, the role of the headmaster in school management is multifaceted, which can be mentioned as follows:- To maintain the educational environment, quality, and discipline in the school,- To create an environment of mutual cooperation between teachers, staff, students and parents by coordinating with the teachers and staff of the school,- Discipline, regularity in the school , Maintaining politeness, - Prepare a program related to the conduct of classes in the school in consultation with the teacher and inspect whether the classes are conducted in accordance with such program,
8. Mention the important aspects of government papers. a. Public Information - Public information is shared in government papers. b. Office Name, Address:- Since this letter is written by a government agency, it mentions the name, address, contact number of the office concerned. c. Formality - Official letters are related to formal dignity and the letter also presents the same dignity. It requires politeness or order, official dignity. This letter is more formal. d. Chalani number - aspects like chalani number, letter number, purpose, function are mandatory in government letters. e. Simple and clear language - Government papers should have linguistic accuracy, simplicity, uniformity. f. office letterpad, Seal and Chief's signature - Government letters cannot be written on any type of paper. It is written on the designated letterpad of the office. The signature of the head of the office and the seal of the office are mandatory in such a letter.
9. What are the posts in the gazetted category of Nepal Police? write The posts in the gazetted category of Nepal Police are as follows: (a) Special Category – Inspector General of Police – Additional Inspector General of Police (b) First Category – Deputy Inspector General of Police – Senior Superintendent of Police (c) Second Category – Superintendent of Police – Deputy Superintendent of Police (d) Third Category – Inspector of Police
10. Mention the steps of recruitment process in civil service of Nepal. Vacancy in the civil service is the act of supplying staff by recruiting new employees. Recruitment is a continuous process. There are various stages in the recruitment process in Nepal's civil service, which can be mentioned as follows: - publication of annual schedule, - collection of demand and determination of percentage, - publication of advertisement, - collection of application, registration and acceptance of application, - educational qualification and curriculum creation, modification and Revision, – Creation and modification of question paper, Selection of question paper, – Conducting written test, – Double coding in answer book, – Examination of answer book, – Written test result, – Practical test, skill test, group discussion, – Interview, – Publication of result of final qualification ,- Recommendation for appointment.
11. What are the functions of leadership? write Leadership is the ability to bring the tendencies and habits of followers and stakeholders into one shape and make them active in achieving collective goals in any situation. Since leadership influences others, makes them work and also has to work themselves, leadership should be diligent, trained, democratic, motivated and objective. Leadership has to perform many functions, which are:- determining the objectives and goals of the organization,- making policies,- making decisions,- performing managerial functions,- performing time management functions,- giving instructions,- coordinating, communicating,- motivating Acting on awakening, - Identifying and mobilizing resources, - Using power and authority, - Fulfilling responsibilities, fulfilling duties, - Representing followers and organizations, - Monitoring, evaluating, - Giving side nutrition. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
1. Which country recently passed an education law aimed at reducing the amount of homework given to students after school? China - The new bill on education was passed by the Standing Committee of the National People's Congress and the Standing Legislative Assembly of the country (on October 23, 2021) - by government agencies to ensure that parents have enough time for their children to rest and exercise, not to spend more time on online studies. Instructions were also given not to give.- In August 2021, China banned the written examination of children aged six and seven years. Last year, the Chinese government adopted many measures to control children's addiction to the Internet and other popular culture.
2. Who is the fastest female climber to climb Mount Everest? Sang Yi Hong (Hong Kong), May 23, 2021 - She completed the ascent in 25 hours and 50 minutes. - Previously, this record was held by Phunzo Zhangju Lama (39 hours and 6 minutes). She climbed it on May 15, 2019.
3. Which is the local body that provides animal maternity allowance? Jaljala Gaonpalika (Parvat) - For the promotion of commercial agriculture, animal delivery allowance has been started to be given to the farmers who have artificial insemination. It is said that this program will be effective in ending the practice of slaughtering young cows at birth and encouraging the raising of young cows. - If artificially inseminated cattle are bred and their calves are reared, the rural municipality gives an allowance of two thousand five hundred rupees per animal. The municipality has implemented this program for the past three years (2076).
4. When was the Asian Infrastructure Investment Bank (AIIB) inaugurated? January 16, 2016 - AIIB, which is seen as a competitor of the World Bank and the Asian Development Bank, is a new international development partner organization established under the leadership of China. This bank was established with a capital of one billion US dollars. With the goal of connecting Asia and Europe to Africa in the long term, Chinese President Xi Jinping Western economists are analyzing the establishment of this bank by China to raise investment in the Silk Road project initiated by Chin Fing.) 
5. Which is the main administrative body of the United Nations (UNO)? Secretariat
6. When was the North Atlantic Treaty Organization (NATO) founded? April 4, 1949 - There are currently 30 member states in this organization. - The last member state (30th) is North Macedonia. having been 
7. When did the International Labor Organization (ILO) receive the Nobel Peace Prize? 1969 
8. What is a brief newspaper published by the government or an organization called? Bulletin 
9. If Nandbhauju lake is in Chitwan district, where is Ghodaghodi lake? Kailali 
10. Who is the originator of the universal law of gravity? Sir Isaac Newton
11. According to Forbes magazine's 2021 list of the world's richest people, who is the richest person who has succeeded in being on the first place? Jeff Bezos (USA) - The five richest people according to the list - The youngest richest person according to the list is Ken David Lehmann (Germany: 925th place). - The richest woman - Françoise Wettenerkot Meyers and family (France, 12th richest). - The oldest rich 99-year-old George Joseph (USA, 1580th place). - Vinod Chaudhary of Nepal (2141st place) is in that list. 
12. Which is the highest peak of Mahabharata mountain? Shailung (Dolakha) 
13. What type of climate is found in Terai, Bhawar, Dun, Inner Madhes, Tar etc. of Nepal? Hot monsoon climate 
14. Nepal's north-south maximum width is 241 km and what is the minimum width? 145 km. – (North-South average width 193 km)
15. What is the other name of the second phase of the Russian revolution? Bolshevik Revolution - October Revolution 
16. Who is the king who started the practice of worshiping the girls of Shakya dynasty as virgins? Gunakamadeva 
17. Who is the king who reigned for the longest time in Shah dynasty history? King Tribhuvan 
18. Which civilization is known as Vedic civilization? Aryan Civilization 
19. Which is the most extended language family in the world? Bharopeli 
20. What was Janakpur, the beginning of civilization in the eastern part of Nepal, known as in ancient times? Videh 
21. Available soil in Nepal is divided into how many parts? Five – (loamy soil, sandy-stony soil, red-brown soil, valley soil and mountain soil)
22. According to the constitution of Nepal (2072), who will be the chairman of the inter-provincial council formed to resolve political disputes between the federation and the provinces and between the provinces? Prime Minister - (In addition to the chairman, the other members of the four-member interprovincial council include the home minister of the government of Nepal, the finance minister and the chief minister of the respective province.) 
23. If the Pacific Ocean is triangular in shape, what is the shape of the Andhra Ocean? 'S' of English alphabet 
24. What is meant by three dimensions? Length, width and height
25. The part that rises above the Moddar hill is called Pratinati and what is the part that goes down? Circumcision 26. Which country has recently manufactured a flying bike? Japan-Ali Technologies based in Japan manufactured the bike and brought it to the market from October 27, 2021.-The hoverbike worth 628,000 dollars can fly for 40 minutes at a speed of 100 per hour.
27. When is World Food Day celebrated? October 16- On the initiative of the World Food and Agriculture Organization of the United Nations, this day is celebrated worldwide on October 16.- The global slogan of the World Food Day celebrated this year (year 2021) is 'Our Actions Are Future. "Better Production, Better Nutrition, A Better Environment and a Better Life" - Similarly, the national slogan "Our Initiative: Increase in Production and Nutrition: Environmental Protection and Prosperity in People's Livelihood" has been decided.
28. Who is the world's tallest (living) person? Edward Nino Hernandez (Colombia) - Hernandez is currently the tallest living person in the world recorded in the Guinness book.- His height is 72.1 cm. - His height is 71 cm and his weight is 13 kg.- Previously, Chandra Bahadur Dangi from Dang and Khagendra Thapamgar from Pokhara have already held records in the Guinness Book of World Records. 
29. What type of assessment is continuous student assessment? Constructive Evaluation Presenter: Tank K. C. Jurisdiction 
of the Judiciary Committee
1. What kind of rights are there against untouchability and discrimination as fundamental rights in Nepal's constitution? Mention. Article 24 of the Constitution of Nepal provides the following rights against untouchability and discrimination as fundamental rights:- No person shall be subjected to any kind of untouchability or discrimination in any private or public place on the basis of his origin, caste, caste, community, profession, business or physical condition,- When producing or distributing a product or service facility, such product or service facility is prohibited from being purchased or received by a person of a particular caste or caste, or such product, service or facility is not sold or provided to a particular caste or caste person, - origin, caste , Describing a person or community as superior or inferior on the basis of caste or physical condition, caste,
2. What should be the role of the National Vigilance Center and the Abuse of Authority Investigation Commission in the corruption control work in Nepal? write Corruption is the act of using public property for personal gain. It is both economic and non-economic crime. In Nepal, all the organs of the state are active to control it, and the main responsibility for controlling it is the National Vigilance Center and the Commission for Investigation of Abuse of Authority. It seems that the roles of these two bodies in the corruption control work in Nepal should be as follows:
The role of the National Vigilance Center is to identify corruption-related activities and alert the relevant offices, to identify the institutions where corruption is most prevalent and to increase monitoring and surveillance, to create an environment in which corruption does not occur by systematically improving the work of public bodies, to find ways to simplify the public service process, Constantly advising the government on the reform of laws, rules and regulations, - Increasing the awareness of the service users by conducting a survey of the service users, - Ending the corruption related activities by coordinating and cooperating with the A.D.U.A.A.
The role of the Commission for Investigation of Abuse of Authority - to play a strong role as the main and responsible body for controlling corruption by adopting promotional, controlling and punitive policies to control corruption, - to speed up the investigation of corruption-related activities, to find the real culprits through informative investigations, - to be involved in the control of corruption Increasing operational coordination between agencies, - Other constitutional agencies such as: Expanding operational coordination with agencies including the Department of Malep, establishing information sharing system, - Identifying risk areas where corruption may occur and increasing surveillance, - Factual investigation of corruption so that more success is achieved in corruption cases. - To provide opinions, advice, and suggestions to the government on corruption control, - To create an environment where corruption does not occur rather than taking action after corruption.
3. According to the Local Government Operation Act, 2074, what kind of disputes does the local judicial committee have the right to decide? Mention. According to the Local Government Operation Act, 2074, submission of the following disputes to the local judicial committeeHas the right to do: - Distribution and use of Alidhur, Dam Pani, Kulo or Panighat, - Damage to other's crops, - Pasture, grass, firewood, - Non-payment of wages, - Domestic animals lost or found, - Non-maintenance and care of senior citizens, - Failure to provide food or education to minor children or spouses according to their income, - Restoration of damaged houses up to 2.5 lakh rupees per annum, - Planting trees in such a way as to affect the house, land or property of other people, - From one's own house or the house of another, Watering on land or public road, - Building a house with a window towards Sandhiar land without leaving the amount of land that should be left according to law, - Road that has been in public use since time immemorial, even if it is owned or owned by someone, an exit for livestock, cattle grazing square, ditch, canal, pond , Patipauwa, burial ground,Not allowing or hindering the use of religious places or any other public places, - Other disputes stipulated by the federal or provincial laws to be resolved at the local level.
4. What are the strengths of Nepal's planned development? Mention. The plan is a means of economic and social transformation of the country. In Nepal Since 2013, planned development has been practiced and fourteen plans have been implemented so far. Another fifteenth plan is being implemented. At this time of the planning period, some progress has been made in the infrastructure sector such as transport, electricity, communication, irrigation. Significant work has been done in the field of social, administrative and legal reforms. Poverty has dropped to 18.7 percent from 49 percent in 2049, the beginning of the Eighth Plan. In this period of the planning period, a new constitution with federalism has been issued in the country, the republic has been institutionalized, the principle of inclusiveness and proportional representation have been implemented. In the country through reservation, backward areas, classes, Community participation has been increased. This is a strong aspect of planned development. Overall, the strengths of Nepal's existing planned development can be mentioned as follows:- Planning is focused on achieving sustainable peace, good governance, development and prosperity,- Investments from all sectors are accepted,- Emphasis is placed on partnership between public, private and cooperative sectors, Three-pillar economic policy is adopted,- The role of public sector, private sector, cooperative sector, non-governmental organizations, civil society, community sector has been established. , increasing investment in social sectors such as health and social security, - acceleration in infrastructure development, - implementation of medium-term expenditure structure to bring harmony between periodical plan, annual budget,
5. Mention any five functions of Infrastructure Development Bank. Infrastructure Development Bank is an 'A' class bank. Some of the five tasks it performs are as follows: - Providing loans to infrastructure development projects, investing in shares, - Investing in securities of companies operating infrastructure development projects, - Taking the approval of Nepal Rastra Bank to raise funds needed to invest in infrastructure development projects, various types of domestic and foreign Issuing financial instruments in currency, obtaining loans, - mobilizing resources by accepting deposits of a long-term nature and issuing debentures, - conducting leasing transactions with the approval of Nepal Rastra Bank.
6. Discuss the causes of excess liquidity in the financial system, its effects and liquidity management measures. Savings i.e. increasing deposits in banks and financial institutions, but accumulating money in banks without increasing credit utilization and investment is more liquidity. Although there are policy, legal and institutional arrangements for liquidity management in the financial system of Nepal, this task is becoming complicated in the economy of Nepal. Due to excess liquidity in Nepal's economy, its effects and its management measures can be discussed as follows:
Reasons for more liquidity - Lack of demand for new loans, - Accumulation of deposits, - Government not raising internal loans, - Banks and financial institutions' loan disbursement process is complicated, - Inability to identify new areas of investment, - Stakeholder bodies such as: Government of Nepal, Lack of coordination between the Ministry of Finance, Nepal Rastra Bank, banks and financial institutions, industrialists and investors, etc., - Lack of favorable environment for investment in the country, - Banks and financial institutions not being able to take risks, - Regulatory body Nepal Rastra Bank's regulation, guidance and supervision Not being effective.
Effects of more liquidity - Decrease in the interest rate of depositors' savings, - Increased cost of banks because there is no demand for new loans but interest on deposits, - When the interest rate on deposits is low, citizens save less in banks and financial institutions. Citizens' cash may increase, this has two disadvantages: firstly - that cash may flow to unproductive areas, secondly - that cash may migrate abroad through informal means, - due to excessive liquidity, the investment environment in the country may be deemed to be unfavorable, and foreign investment may not even come in, - economic, social And capital formation activities may be affected.
Liquidity management measures - providing incentives for lending, increasing new credit demand, - raising internal debt by the government, this can have two benefits for the government, firstly, the interest rate of the loan will be cheap, secondly, the favorable impact on the investment environment will increase, - identifying new areas of investment, such as: Providing loans in the field of commercial agriculture, creating young entrepreneurs groups and giving loans. - Providing more loans to businesses that are in trouble, - Taking new policy initiatives to increase more economic activity, - Making development work more effective, - Searching for new opportunities in the digital economy, - Making credit flow procedures, methods, standards simple and practical, - Not only looking at the profit and loss of the organization in the loan flow, banks and financial institutions also take normal risks by looking at the behavior of the borrowers, - Government of Nepal, Ministry of Finance should prepare a favorable environment for investment.
7. Introduce information technology. Information technology is the use of electronic devices including computer systems and their software, hardware and internet to manage information. It is a computer-related work, in which devices such as the Internet, servers, hardware, software, printers, TVs, and telephones are used. It is the design of hardware and software. It is also a function of data processing. It performs information processing, storage and protection. It helps to increase efficiency, reduce costs, maximize utilization of resources and prevent leakages and embezzlement. It provides online services, e-government, e-business, e-education, e-learning, Concepts like electronic admissions can be implemented. It helps to control corruption by establishing automatic system in every sector. Therefore, information technology can be considered as a major tool for corruption control. The Electronic Transactions Act, 2063 and the Electronic Transactions Regulations, 2064 have been drafted and implemented in Nepal. This Act has made various arrangements. Provision has been made for the establishment of Information Technology Tribunal to initiate and prosecute computer related offenses. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma This Act has made various provisions. Provision has been made for the establishment of Information Technology Tribunal to initiate and prosecute computer related offenses. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma This Act has made various provisions. Provision has been made for the establishment of Information Technology Tribunal to initiate and prosecute computer related offenses. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
1. Who won the Nepal Super League (NSL) title, Nepal's first franchise football tournament? Kathmandu Razors - The title winner Kathmandu Razors won 3.5 million rupees as a prize. - The runner-up Dhangadhi FC won 1.5 million rupees. - The final match of the tournament was held on 1st May 2078 at Dasharath Stadium in Tripureshwar. 
2. In the 76th General Assembly of the United Nations (September 2021), when has Nepal expressed its commitment to reduce non-climate change activities to zero percent? Year 2050 - Minister of Foreign Affairs Dr. This commitment was expressed by Narayan Khadka in his address to the General Assembly on September 28, 2021. Similarly, it is stated that Nepal's goal is to rise above the list of underdeveloped countries by 2026.
3. What are the goals set by the United Nations for 2016-2030 regarding sustainable development and prosperity? 17- (Similarly 169 quantitative targets and 232 global indices were determined.) 
4. Who is the creator who will be honored with the best peace award given in 2078? Sarita Aryal (for the work named 'My Kidnapping') - Guthi said that the best Kunwar Smarak Award has been presented through this work in the field of Niatra Essay. - The amount of the award is one lakh rupees. Since 2044, the works composed in non-narrative prose genre have been honored with awards. 
5. When is World Youth Skills Day celebrated? July 15
6. Who is the Nepali personality who will be honored with the Vision Excellence Award 2020 given by the International Agency for Prevention of Blindness (IAPV)? Dr. Sanduk Ruit, Prof. Dr. Ram Prasad Pokharel and Dr. Gopal Prasad Pokharel 
7. When is World Handwashing Day celebrated? October 15 - World Handwashing Day 2021 was celebrated with the slogan 'Our future is in our hands - let's move forward together'. - This day has been celebrated since 2008 in Nepal. 
8. Sweet Cream, Coated Red, Anti Guva Orange, Discovery Yellow which are the types of flowers? Centipede 
9. When did the government take the decision to remove the hoarding boards, posters and other materials placed to make the city ugly? V.No. December 10, 2076
10. Where is the headquarters of the International Criminal Court? The Hague in the Netherlands - This court was formally established on July 1, 2002. - Currently (April 2018), there are 122 member states in this organization. 
11. Which SAARC countries are affiliated to the Non-Aligned Movement? All eight nations 
12. Which country will win the gold medal in men's football in the Olympic Games held in Tokyo, Japan in 2021? Brazil - Brazil won the gold medal by defeating Spain by 2-1. - Brazil won the men's football title in the 2016 Rio Olympics. - Canada won the women's football title in the Tokyo Olympics. Canada won the gold medal by defeating Sweden 3-2 in the penalty shootout in the final.
13. When is International Dance Day celebrated? April 29- This time (year 2021) the International Dance Day was celebrated virtually due to Covid-19.- The International Dance Committee of the International Theater Institute, which cooperated with the United Nations Educational, Scientific and Cultural Organization UNESCO, started celebrating this day since 1982. 
14. Budhanilkanth is located at the foot of which hill? Shivpuri
15. Since when has Nepal Oil Corporation decided to implement Enterprise Resource Planning (ERP) software for the purpose of controlling fuel leakage? V.No. May 2, 2078 - A team was mobilized from the central office under the leadership of high-level employees to implement ERP in all depots across the country. - It is believed that fuel transportation, distribution and accounting systems will be improved after implementation of the ERP software to help control leakages. - Oil stock in depots across the country, road transportation The amount of oil being consumed, the amount of oil given by the Indian Oil Corporation (IOC) and all other statistics can be easily obtained through the software.- Since the pump businessmen demand oil through the software, they can easily see where the oil has gone less or more, and the demand and supply can be coordinated. - Businessmen can demand and pay for oil from the comfort of their homes.
16. When is my quota system launched? V.No. 2078 Baisakh 2- (This system is going to be put into operation so that services such as map, plot registrar, field drawing application etc. can be obtained online. It is said that this system is also related to aspects such as agriculture, production and productivity.) 
17. Who is the author of human jurisprudence? Jayasthiti Mall
18. What place did Nepal achieve in the SAFF Championship held in Male, Maldives in October 2021? II- Among the SAFF championships so far, Nepal has presented the best game in this championship. - The cabinet meeting on November 1, 2078 decided to give five lakh rupees as a prize to each member of the Nepali national football team who became the runner-up. Similarly, it was decided to give three lakh rupees to the coach of the Nepali team.- India won the title by defeating Nepal 3-0 at the National Stadium in Male. 
19. When has the government announced a 10-year strategic plan with the aim of making public administration agile and efficient? V.No. 2077 Chait 25 
20. Which period in the history of Nepal is considered to be the first documented reign? Lichhavi period
21. What is the full form of intel used in computers? Integrated Electronics 
22. According to the World Health Organization, what should be the Air Quality Index (AQI) in terms of environmental cleanliness? Below 50 AQI - (The World Health Organization considers the condition below 50 AQI as normal. The government of Nepal has determined it below 100, that is, the condition of AQI up to 100 is considered normal.) 
23. Which is the first ASEAN country to establish diplomatic relations? Malaysia (January 1, 1960) 
24. Nepal's largest national park She-Foksundo is spread over how much area? 3555 km - (Foksundo lake is located within this national park located in Dolpa and Mugu districts.) 
25. How many landlocked countries are in South America? Two (Bolivia and Paraguay)
26. Who is considered to be the first prose writer and dramatist of Maithili literature? Jyotireshwar 
27. Which country is known as the 'diamond of the desert'? Livia 
28. When was the National Food Bank inaugurated? V.No. 2078 Baisakh 2- (The slogan of the National Food Bank, which has its head office in Nyanbaneshwar, is 'sustainable agriculture for nutritious food'.) 
29. When did the United Arab Emirates (UAE) announce that they can give citizenship to foreign citizens who can contribute to the development of the country? January 30, 2021
30. When was Lonely Planet founded? 1972 - Tony Wheeler and Maureen Wheeler were the founders of this organization related to the tourism sector. - This organization, which publishes a list of tourist areas every year, produces and sells and distributes books, guidebooks and audio-visual materials related to tourism. Its headquarters is in Melbourne, Australia (branch offices: London, Beijing and New Delhi). Presenter: Tank Casey
Provisions on Affirmative Discrimination1. What do you mean by civic education? Discuss the importance of civic education. Education provided to make a person a good citizen is called civic education. Civic education helps to create a situation where people can form political opinions, evaluate those opinions, implement their decisions, and realize their duties. This is the teaching of self-governance. It is also an act of awareness, debate and advocacy. In fact, civic education makes every citizen conscious and aware of their rights and duties. It enables the individual to reach self-mastery in his own affairs by exposing the inherent potential of the individual. It develops the ability of self-determination, self-management and self-control. capable, The purpose of civic education is to create a cultured and responsible citizen class. Civic education makes the way of life of democracy organized and functional. The importance of civic education - The awareness of the citizen is developed and his activity increases in every aspect. It helps to develop leadership skills.- It helps to make the individual's household self-sufficient.- It helps to comply with the law.- It helps to create capable people who are needed for the economic and social transformation of the country.- It helps to maintain national unity, harmony and social justice. .
2. What is positive discrimination? Under the right of equality, what kind of positive discrimination provision has been made in Nepal's constitution? Mention. Some different and flexible arrangements made by the state to make women, dalits, disabled, poor and backward classes and communities relatively easy to enter the state administration is called positive discrimination. It is a gate that allows the target class to enter the state machinery through an easy route. This is unequal treatment for equality. This is a distinction, the act of discriminating is not good, but it is called positive discrimination because people are discriminated for doing good. It helps in maintaining social justice. Likewise, it helps everyone participate in social transformation by reducing social conflict and violence. In Nepal, there is a legal arrangement regarding positive discrimination. Civil Service, Military, Police, Provision has been made for positive discrimination in services such as teachers and public institutions. In the Constitution, Article 18 (3) of the Constitution of the Legislative Assembly (2072) provides for positive discrimination under the right to equality. The state can make special arrangements for the protection, empowerment or development of the following citizens in accordance with the law: - Socially or culturally backward women, Dalits, tribals, tribes, Madhesi, Tharu, Muslims, - Oppressed classes, backward classes, minorities, marginalized, - Farmers , workers, youth, children, senior citizens, - gender and sexual minorities, persons with disabilities, pregnant persons, disabled or helpless, - backward areas and - citizens including economically disadvantaged Khas Arya - in this, 'economically disadvantaged' means the income specified in the federal law. There is a provision to remember people with low income.
3. What are the duties, duties and rights of the Tribal Commission? Mention. In order to identify, protect, promote and empower the history and culture of the tribal communities in Nepal, the Tribal Commission has been established in the Constitution of Nepal and the Tribal Commission Act, 2074 has been drafted. 6: - To study the overall situation of the tribal communities and recommend to the Government of Nepal regarding the policy, legal and institutional reforms to be done in this regard, - To formulate and recommend to the Government of Nepal for the implementation of national policies and programs for the protection and promotion of the rights and interests of the tribal communities and the empowerment of such communities. ,
4. What is population management? What are the ways to manage population? write The act of distributing the population correctly according to the available resources is called population management. Populations are constantly changing. It should be managed according to resources. The population that cannot be supported by resources should be controlled, while the population needed to mobilize resources should be increased. This is population management. The availability and scarcity of resources affects population growth and control. Therefore, the population situation should be analyzed while providing immediate resources and making future plans. The way to manage the population is to increase the population according to the availability of resources and to control the population according to the scarcity. As natural resources continue to deplete or shrink, but the population continues to grow, population control has become a major area of ​​population management rather than population growth. Therefore, controlling population growth under population management seems to be the need of the moment. By following the steps below Population can be controlled by:- marrying at an appropriate age, preventing child marriage and polygamy,- giving birth to children at an interval of 4 or 5 years,- both children are children. Accepting the equal existence of both and maintaining gender equality, not discriminating between sons and daughters, - Paying attention to women's education and health, - Making permanent and temporary means of family planning accessible, - Implementing public awareness programs to control population, - Managing migration.
5. What are the measures to be taken to reduce the impact of climate change? write Climate change is caused by the emission of gases including carbon dioxide, so such gas emissions from industries, factories, transportation and human activities should be minimized. The following measures should be taken to reduce the impact of climate change: - Preventing deforestation caused by poverty and other causes, - Making human activities and development processes environmentally friendly, - Institutionalizing environmental impact assessment, - Determining and implementing pollution standards, - Environmental protection and climate change Implementation of international treaties and conventions, - adopting the concept of green economy, - formulating and implementing a low carbon emission development strategy, - increasing public awareness on environmental protection, - proper management of garbage,
1. Who was awarded the Intangible Heritage Award this year (year 2021)? Dilkumar Barahi - The award was given to Barahi Nike Dilkumar, who has been involved in making the chariot of the red Matsyendranath for 55 years. - Similarly, Dr. from Tajikistan. Sirinvek Davlatmamadov and El Felz from Italy were also honored with the award. 
2. According to the South Asian 'Economic Focus' published by the World Bank on October 7, 2021, What is the estimated economic growth rate of Nepal in 2078/79? 3.9 percent There is a government target of achieving an economic growth rate of 6.5 percent in 2078-79. According to Economic Focus, the status of South Asian countries is: - Maldives: 11 percent - India: 7.5 percent - Bangladesh: 6.4 percent - Nepal: 3.9 percent - Bhutan: 3.6 percent - Pakistan: 3.4 percent - Sri Lanka: 2.1 percent
3. Who is the person who will be appointed as the Prime Minister of Japan on October 4, 2021? Fumio Kishida 
(appointed as the 100th Prime Minister of Japan) 
4. Who was awarded the Nobel Peace Prize of 2021? Journalists Maria Ressa (Philippines) and Dmitry Muratov (Russia) (For their efforts to protect freedom of expression.) 
5. Who was awarded the 2021 Nobel Prize in medicine? David Juliers (USA) and Ardem Pataposian (Lebanon) (The Nobel Committee said that the discovery of researchers about how the human body feels the warmth of sunlight and the touch of a loved one's embrace, that is, the human ability to feel heat, cold and touch, is very important for living.)
6. Who was awarded the 2021 Nobel Prize for Literature? Abdul Rajak Gurnah (Tanzanian novelist) - The award was given to Gurnah for his stand and compassion expressed through literature on the impact of colonialism. - 73-year-old Gurnah has written about a dozen novels including 'Paradise and Discourse', 'Delication to Truth'. 
7. Who was awarded the 2021 Nobel Prize in Chemistry? Benjamin List (Germany) and David McMillan (USA) (for developing a new way of making molecules (which could help research in the field of medicine).)
8. Under the leadership of Prime Minister Sher Bahadur Deuba, When did the Council of Ministers formed in June 2078 get complete? V.No. 2078 October 22- The Council of Ministers was formed by appointing, reorganizing and dividing the work of the existing Council of Ministers on the recommendation of the Prime Minister by President Bidya Devi Bhandari.- The Council of Ministers now has a total of 25 people including the Prime Minister, 21 Ministers and three Ministers of State. There is no deputy prime minister in this cabinet that has been completed, while six women have been given the responsibility of ministers.- The cabinet led by Prime Minister Deuba has been expanded for the fourth time. On the same day (June 29) when the government was formed, there were two ministers each from the Congress and the Maoist Center. Then Umesh Shrestha became the Minister of State for Health and Dr. Dr. as the Minister of Foreign Affairs. Narayan Khadka was appointed.- Industry, Commerce and Supply Minister Gajendra b. Hamal has already resigned from the post of minister.
2078 Ashwin 22 expanded cabinet. Name, Surname Work Division 1. Sher Bahadur Deuba Prime Minister 2. Balkrishna Khan Griha3. Gyanendra b. Karki Communication and Information Technology4. Pampha Bhusal Energy, Water Resources and Irrigation5. Rajendra Pr. Best federal affairs and general administration 6.7. Opposition Khatiwadjanardan Sharma Health and Population Meaning 8. Dr. Minendra Prasad Rizal Raksha9. Umakant Chaudhary drinking water 10. Dr. Narayan Khadka Foreign Affairs 11. Renukumari Yadav Physical Infrastructure and Transport 12. love b. Other culture, tourism and civil aviation 13. Dilendra Prasad Vadu Law, Justice and Parliamentary Affairs 14. Devendra Poudel Education, Science and Technology 15. Mahendra Rai Yadav Agriculture and Livestock 16. Uma Regmi women, children and senior citizens 17. Shashi Shrestha land management, cooperatives and poverty alleviation 18. Ramkumari Jhankri Urban Development19. Ram Sahay Prasad Yadav Forest and Environment20. Krishna Kumar Shrestha Shram, Employment and Social Security21. Maheshwarjung Gahatraj Youth and Sports
Minister of State 22. Office of Umesh Shrestha Prime Minister and Council of Ministers 23. Bhawani Prasad Khapung Health and Population 24. Bodmayakumari Yadav Education, Science and Technology 
9. When did the government announce the Tobacco Control Convention, 2030 strategy to control the use of tobacco products and make the next generation smoke-free? V.No. This strategy was formulated to fully implement the Tobacco Control and Regulation Act of 2018 in Nepal. The Tobacco Control and Regulation Act was implemented with amendments from May 1, 2072. It is arranged that the picture should be printed.) 
10. Since when the evening aarti was started in Pashupatinath? V.No. 2064
11. When was the foundation stone of the dry port laid in Rasuwa's Gosainkunda rural municipality-2, Timure? V.No. It is estimated that the construction of the port, which is to be completed in two and a half years, will cost one billion and 98 million rupees. A memorandum of understanding was signed on May 29, 2076. 
12. What is the full form of FTTH? Fiber to the Home – Nepal Telecom launched high-speed Internet service (FTTH) Done on 23rd August 2076 at Suryapura Bazar in Gaidhawa Rural Municipality of Rupandehi District. - Through FTTH technology, instead of traditional copper wire, optical fiber can be delivered to the house and triple play, i.e. voice, high speed internet and video services can be provided.
13. When did the Ministry of Communication and Information Technology ban the sharing, publishing and broadcasting of obscene content from the Internet? V.No. 2075 October 5 
14. Which is the first country in the world to use facial verification? Singapore 
15. When did the Internal Revenue Department start the Central Billing System? V.No. 2074 November 1 
16. Since when has the District Education Office been made 'Education Development and Coordination Unit'? V.No. 2074 Chait 29 (The Ministry of Education, Science and Technology abolished all district education offices on Chait 28 and instructed the district education officer to establish a unit office. The ministry has arranged for the district education officer to work as the head of the office. Since 2018 across the country, district education He was living in the office.)
17. Where is the Center for Nepal and Asian Studies (SINAS) located? Tribhuvan University, Kirtipur Campus - This institution was established as a study-research center in Linguistics, History, Geography, Political Science, Sociology and Religion-Culture. - V.No. Institute of Nepal Studies established on July 1, 2029. In August 2034, it was transformed into Center for Nepal and Asian Studies (SINAS) according to the then Tertiary Act. - The journal published by SINAS reaches the universities of 112 countries in the world, but currently it reaches only 58 universities. - Center for Economic Development and Administration (SEDA), Center for Practical Science and Technical Research (SERID) are operating under the university.
18. Where is the tallest giraffe in the world? Australia - The giraffe in the Queensland zoo in Australia has been declared by the Guinness World Records (August 2020) to be the tallest in the world. - The height of the giraffe is 18 feet 8 inches. 
19. Which Nepali bank won the leading partner bank award given by Asian Development Bank's trade and supply chain finance program? Nabil Bank Ltd.
20. On the occasion of 66th Police Day (2078), who is the female police officer honored with Lifetime Achievement Award? Chaitamaya Dangol- Dangol is the first female police officer to receive the Lifetime Achievement Award.- Similarly, the Police's prestigious Full Peace Award was given to DSP Dharmaraj Bhandari.- Yogendra Smriti Award was given to Sai Sumesh Pandey.- The Best Researcher Award was given to Police Inspector Babindra Nemwang.- Similarly. The best researcher award was given to Deputy Superintendent of Police Phanindra Prasain, Police Inspector Mani Ram Thapa, Police Deputy Inspector Santosh Thapamar and Krishnaraj Sedha. 
21. What kind of electoral system is there to be adopted in the election of members of the House of Representatives and Provincial Assembly? First-past-the-post electoral system and proportional electoral system
22. Who is considered the first poet of Nepali language? Suwananda Das 
23. According to the concept of energy banking, when was the electricity produced in Nepal started to be exported to India? V.No. 
June 27 , 2076 When did the Nepal Science and Technology Pragya-Pratishthan (NAST) establish the Youth Scientists Forum (YSFN) with the aim of developing and promoting science and technology? V.No. 2077 October 9 - The forum was established with the aim of developing the science sector by expanding coordination and cooperation between Nepali researchers at home and abroad. - This organization is the only youth scientific forum formed by the government mechanism, according to Nashta. 
25. V.No. How many parts are there in the Civil Code that came into effect on August 1, 2075? Part 6
26. Which is the first SAARC country to ratify the Paris Agreement on climate change? Maldives (Approved by Nepal: October 24, 2016) 
27. What is the name of the voluntary organization that runs for the protection of the citizens in the conflict-affected areas of Syria? White Helmets 
28. According to the World Meteorological Organization, how many periods of average weather conditions are generally called climate? 30 years 
29. When is World Tourism Day celebrated? September 27 (After the United Nations World Tourism Organization was established on September 27, 1970, this day has been celebrated since 1980 in commemoration of the same day.) 
30. When is Children's Day celebrated in Nepal? August 29- V.No. The 57th National Children's Day was celebrated on August 29, 2078.- This year's slogan is 'Normal situation or Covid epidemic: protection of children's rights is the responsibility of all of us'.
Public Finance Management1. What are the areas of improvement in Nepal's public finance management? Discuss. Public finance management is the management of public income and expenditure. It is also the task of managing the government's annual budget. In public finance management, high, sustainable and broad economic growth is achieved by systematic mobilization of public income and expenditure. This includes increasing revenue mobilization, mobilizing spending in productive areas, creating jobs, arranging sustainable sources of revenue, and building a self-sufficient economy. Its purpose is to maintain economic growth, economic stability and social justice. In relation to public finance management in Nepal, constitutional, legal, There is an institutional arrangement. There are three levels of government in operation in the country and public finance management is done by all the three levels of government and yet the public finance management of Nepal has not been managed. There is a need for various reforms, the areas of reform can be mentioned as follows: Public income - Public income includes revenue, foreign subsidies, internal debt and foreign debt. It seems that the following improvements should be made:- Reducing the tax rate and increasing the scope, bringing all business, employment and investment under the scope of income tax, - Expanding the value added tax to the retail level, removing the discount facility, making the process of taking bills through market monitoring more effective, - Actual valuation of goods in customs. To prepare the environment, to organize the declaration and classification of goods, to emphasize on trade facilitation by simplifying and transparent customs clearance, - To mobilize all types of foreign aid in the national budget system, - To regulate and make transparent the aid that comes through national international non-governmental organizations, - To announce the period of aid mobilization by making clear provisions about the foreign aid policy, loan policy, aid mobilization policy through national international non-governmental organizations, - To increase the negotiation capacity to receive aid from the development partner as promised, to include it in the budget only after the aid is guaranteed, to promote the responsibility and accountability of the development partner in the aid mobilization by improving the research enrollment system, - to adopt a policy of internal debt mobilization without affecting the domestic private sector, short-term rather than long-term Emphasis on debt mobilization. Public expenditure - Public expenditure includes current expenditure, capital expenditure and financial arrangements. It seems that the following improvements should be made: - Reducing current expenditure and bringing it within certain limits, - Preparing sectoral expenditure policies and organizing expenditure further, - Increasing the amount of capital expenditure and deploying it in productive sectors, - Developing capital expenditure as a source of sustainable revenue by spending it in productive sectors that create jobs. - To strengthen the spending capacity by providing regular training, - To strengthen the financial discipline by effectively following the economic procedures and financial responsibility law, - To reduce the amount of debt by providing regular funds for internal and external debt payments. Financial administration - Budget under financial administration. Management, project management, financial coordination. It seems that the following improvements should be made:- Analyzing the implementation mechanism and formulating a practical budget that can be implemented, - Budget formulation, disbursement, expenditure, accounting, - Provincial and local level capacity development to increase budget formulation, expenditure, revenue mobilization. Financial stability - High economic growth, economic stability brings financial stability. For this purpose:- To create an investment-friendly environment by improving policies, laws, institutional structures, procedural arrangements, - To make economic growth high, sustainable, broad, judicial and inclusive by promoting domestic and foreign investments, - Finally, public finance management is a multifaceted subject. The role of multi-agency is necessary in the reform. For this, there should be a coordinated initiative from the government, private sector, cooperative sector, banks and financial institutions. Creating an investment-friendly environment by improving procedural arrangements, - Making economic growth high, sustainable, broad, fair and inclusive by promoting domestic and foreign investment, - Finally, since public finance management is a multifaceted subject, the role of multi-agency is necessary in its improvement. For this, there should be a coordinated initiative from the government, private sector, cooperative sector, banks and financial institutions. Creating an investment-friendly environment by improving procedural arrangements, - Making economic growth high, sustainable, broad, fair and inclusive by promoting domestic and foreign investment, - Finally, since public finance management is a multifaceted subject, the role of multi-agency is necessary in its improvement. For this, there should be a coordinated initiative from the government, private sector, cooperative sector, banks and financial institutions.
2. What are the objectives of Double Taxation Agreement? Mention. A double tax exemption agreement is an international agreement between two countries that does not impose taxes on the same basis in the same year. So far, Nepal has signed such agreement with 11 foreign countries including India, Pakistan, Qatar, South Korea, Mauritius, Norway, Thailand, Austria, China, Sri Lanka and Bangladesh. The objectives of the Double Taxation Agreement made by Nepal can be mentioned as follows: - Eliminate double taxation, - Broaden the scope of taxes, - Prevent tax leakage, - Maintain neutrality in the tax system, - Bring equality between taxpayers, - Protect the rights and interests of taxpayers, - International transactions. To increase, - to encourage foreign investment, - to clarify and implement tax exemption facilities, - to resolve tax disputes between countries. 3. Local Government Operation Act, What are the objectives of 2074? write The objectives of the Local Government Operation Act, 2074 have been clarified in the preamble of the Act, which are as follows: - To implement the provisions related to the rights of the local level in accordance with the Constitution of Nepal, - To promote cooperation, coexistence and coordination between the federation, state and local level, - To ensure people's participation, accountability, transparency To provide accessible and quality services, - to distribute the benefits of democracy in a proportionate, inclusive and fair manner, - to strengthen the socialist-oriented federal democratic republican governance system from the local level in accordance with the concept of the rule of law and sustainable development, - to strengthen the local governance system by developing local leadership, - To institutionalize legislative, executive and judicial practice at the local level.
4. Discuss the role of customs administration in import export trade. The customs administration is the agency that collects the customs duties that are levied during the import and export of goods at the border of the two countries. In customs, the import and export goods are the basis of customs duty, while the importer and exporter are the taxpayers. Customs administration has traditionally collected revenue, but recently it has been performing the role of revenue collection, trade facilitation and border management. The role of customs administration in import and export trade can be mentioned as follows: - Collecting customs duties, value added tax, excise duty and other taxes incurred in import and export trade, - Facilitating trade by quickly passing goods inspection, - Helping to reduce commercial costs in import and export trade. - Assisting in easy supply of legal goods, - Strict control of illegal goods, - Preventing revenue leakage that may occur in customs,
5. Mention the constitution of the Constitutional Council according to the Constitution of Nepal. In Article 284 of the Constitution of Nepal, there is a provision regarding the constitution of the Constitutional Council to recommend the appointment of the Chief Justice of Nepal, heads of constitutional bodies and officials, which can be mentioned as follows:- (a) Prime Minister- Chairman- (b) Chief Justice- Member- (c) House of Representatives Speaker - Member - (d) Speaker of the National Assembly - Member - (e) Leader of the Opposition in the House of Representatives - Member - (f) Deputy Speaker of the House of Representatives - Member, - When the position of the Chief Justice is vacant, when recommending the appointment of the Chief Justice, the Minister of Law and Justice as a member of the Constitutional Council Remaining, - The Chief Secretary will work as the Secretary of the Constitutional Council, - One month before the post becomes vacant, and within one month of the vacancy due to death or resignation. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
1. When was the criminal property management department established? V.No. October 12, 2078 - The department was established under the Ministry of Home Affairs with the aim of making the management of criminal assets effective. The Act was passed by the Parliament in 2070 and the regulations were made about seven months ago. Similarly, V. No. On July 15, 2077, the Criminal Assets Management Unit was formed.- The department can search and take control of the assets used in crime and hidden and the court has decided to confiscate them. In addition, if it is found that there is a profit from the seized and seized assets and instruments, it can be leased to interested persons and organizations in accordance with the law on leasing government assets. . For this, there is a provision to form a five-member evaluation committee under the leadership of the director general of the department. belonging to the department. For this, there is a provision to form a five-member evaluation committee under the leadership of the director general of the department. belonging to the department. For this, there is a provision to form a five-member evaluation committee under the leadership of the director general of the department.
2. Which is the company in the Nepali communication sector that received the 'Social Contribution Award Crisis Response Award' under the Global Business Outlook Award 2021? Ncell
3. What is known as the program conducted by companies to detect 'bugs' in digital products such as mobile apps, computer software and to avoid major damage? Bug Bounty Program - In order to find weaknesses, those companies hold bug bounty contests and give invitations for it. - In this work, everyone from ethical hackers who are veterans in cyber security can participate. It is reported and the person who can be the first to find such a weakness is awarded the amount announced by the company, which is called 'Bug Bounty Reward'. Tech companies such as Google, Facebook, and Microsoft regularly conduct such programs. 
4. When was the official launch of 'Smart Gorkhapatra-2018'? V.No. 2074 February 2
5. How many types of standards has the government determined in milk, taking into account the various problems that occur in the health of consumers? Four- four types of processed milk, full-fat, low-fat, fat-free and flavored, have been implemented. Previously, only the standard of pasteurized milk was being implemented. - According to the standards, fat in full-fat milk should be at least 5 percent and the amount of solids except fat should be at least 8 percent, the presence of coliform should be zero and sterile, low-fat processed milk should have fat at least 1.5 percent and the amount of milk solids excluding fat should be 8 percent, coliform should be zero and sterile, fat-free processed milk If the amount of fat is maximum 0.5 percent and the amount of solids other than fat is 8 percent,
6. Since when was the world's biggest Nobel Prize awarded? Year 1901 - The Nobel Prize for economics has been awarded since 1968. - The Nobel Peace Prize is awarded in Oslo, the capital of Norway, while other awards are awarded in Stockholm, the capital of Sweden. - Up to three people can get this award jointly. 
7. When is World Non-Violence Day celebrated? October 28 
. When was the Consulate General of Nepal established in Guangzhou, China? V.No. 25 August 2074 (10 September 2017)
9. Where is the Karnali Institute of Health Sciences located? Khalanga, the headquarters of Jumla district (to provide easy access to health services in remote and backward areas, to provide high-level studies and research in the field of health sciences, to produce the necessary skilled manpower and to provide accessible and quality health services to the common people. established.) 
10. When was Tinjure-Milke-Jaljale declared as the capital of Laliguras? V.No. 2055
11. When was the establishment of the Belt and Road literary network? September 7, 2021 - Literary Network of the Belt and Road, a literary organization related to the Belt and Road, founded by the founder of the Chinese Writers' Association and the Nepal Pragya Foundation, was established. - Study of literature, culture and civilization. - This network was established with the purpose of research, translation, copyright protection, publication, literary and cultural exchange, etc. The establishment of the comprehensive network was announced during a ceremony held in Beijing through a webinar.
12. Which is the path that has been drawn recently covering various districts of eastern Nepal? Mundhum Footpath - (The concept of footpath was put forward with the aim of promoting tourism in Khotang, Bhojpur, Sankhuwasabha and Solukhumbu areas by a team with experts with the support of Nepal Tourism Board and the activity of Mayung-Temke-Salpa-Silichung Tourism Promotion Center.) 
13. When did Dravya Shah establish the Gorkha kingdom? V.No. 1616 August 25 
14. Who is known as the first martyr of Nepali literature? Subba Krishnalal Adhikari 
15. When was the traffic mobile app launched with the aim of making traffic management effective by increasing the use of smart technology? V.No. May 20, 2073
16. Lujendra Ojha is the Nepali scientist who presented the fact that there is water on Mars, and who is the Nepali scientist who presented the theoretical basis for the discovery of a new planet? Suman Satyal 
17. In which article of the Constitution of Nepal (2072) the right to education is provided? Article 31 
18. According to the current constitution of Nepal, education is compulsory and free of charge for every citizen from the state to which level? Basic level 
19. When did Abal Brahmachari Shadananda Adhikari establish a Sanskrit school at Dingla in Bhojpur? V.No. 1932 
20. Who is Rana Prime Minister who stopped the charkha prachar conducted by Tulsi Mehr with the aim of raising public awareness? Bhimshamsher
21. When and where is the South Asian nation's biggest football tournament (South Asian Football Federation-SAF) 2021 being held? 2021 October 1-16, Male (Maldives) 
22. When was the mobile postal service started in Kathmandu Valley by Goshwara Post Office? V.No. May 15, 2074 
23. Who is the thinker that 'the real source of intelligence is not knowledge, but imagination'? Albert Einstein 
24. Municipalities with equal area are Dhulikhel and Banepa (55 sq km), which are the rural municipalities with equal area? Champadevi and Chishankhugadhi of Okhaldhunga district (126.91 km) 
25. According to the Constitution of Nepal (2072), there is a provision in the name of the executive function of the province? State Govt
26. According to the current constitution of Nepal, what is the state's executive, legislative and judicial powers and residual rights? State power 
27. What is known as the budget of the nature of equitable allocation of public resources to maintain equality between women and men? Gender budget - in Nepal Gender budget has been implemented since 2064/65. - Helping to maintain equality between women and men, enhancing women's capacity through budget programs and projects, addressing the different needs of women and men in different ways, making active and meaningful participation of women in all processes of the project cycle, women's share in benefit sharing The purpose of gender budget is to increase and distribute public resources equitably.
28. Where is the main residence of the Sonaha caste, who have been making a living by digging gold and fishing in the river? Bardia, Kailali and Kanchanpur (Sonaha caste numbering about 1,240 are deprived of service facilities from the state because they are not listed.) 
29. What does Skylab mean? 
30. A laboratory set up in space to conduct various types of research about Earth . Which is the largest gland in the human body? Presenter: Tank KC 
Single Account Funding System
1. Discuss the single account fund system and describe its positive aspects and challenges in public financial management. The system in which all government offices transact through one account is called a single account fund system. In this, all the bank accounts in the name of government offices, such as revenue, appropriation, bond, etc., are limited, and all government office transactions are done through that account by opening one account to be operated by the Office of the Controller of Funds and Accounts in their place. Under this system, the spending agency approves the expenditure, A payment order should be sent to the Office of the Controller of Funds and Accounts for issuing a check and collecting a receipt for the expenditure by attaching the document. The Treasury and Accounts Controller's office should check whether the budget is outstanding under the relevant budget title and prepare a check and send it to the relevant office. The check amount received in this way should be considered as disbursement by the concerned office and the check should be handed over to the party to be paid. A single account fund system has been adopted in all the districts of the country with the aim of making government expenditure and cash management simple, frugal, transparent, effective and development friendly. Received on time, - Information on the actual status of the accumulated fund is received on a daily basis, - Government cash management is effective,
2. Mention measures to promote inclusion. Inclusion is the participation of all in the state machinery. By increasing the participation of the stakeholders in the fields of politics, administration, economy, social etc., everyone's commitment to the state should be increased. In order to promote it, the following measures should be adopted: - political parties should make the target groups participate in the party and government according to the principles of inclusion, - make them fully comply with the provisions mentioned in the Constitution of Nepal, - organize reservations by preparing appropriate standards, based on indicators such as economic conditions, geographical conditions, and physical conditions. Implementing reservation, adopting it in every sector of the state system, - Identifying the target group and conducting targeted programs, - Making the empowerment program more systematic by arranging sufficient funds, - Methods of inclusion such as: proportional representation, positive discrimination, reservation, targeted programs,
3. What amount is collected in the provincial reserve fund? make it clear The Provincial Government Fund is the Provincial Accumulated Fund, which collects all the income of the Provincial Government. According to Article 204 of the Constitution of Nepal, the following funds are accumulated in this fund:- All types of revenue received by the provincial government, except the Guthi amount, all loans taken as security of revenue, - All money received during the recovery of any debt given under the authority of the provincial law, - Grants received from the Government of Nepal, loan
4. Mention the process of auctioning confiscated goods as per Customs Act, 2064. According to the Customs Act, 2064, the process of auctioning confiscated items can be mentioned: - Auctioning of goods only with the written order of the customs officer, - The customs officer must maintain a minimum price for the auctioned goods, - Auctioning of vehicles and heavy equipment with a minimum price of more than one lakh rupees. For the sale, a notice should be published in the daily newspapers of the national level within twenty-one days, and bids should be invited.- For the auction sale of goods other than vehicles, a notice should be published on the notice board of the relevant customs office within a period of 15 days. jewels,
5. Mention the tax administration system of taxes in the list of rights of both state and local levels in the schedule of the constitution of Nepal. In the schedule of Nepal's constitution, the list of rights of both provincial and local levels includes real estate registration fee, vehicle tax, entertainment tax and advertising tax. Regarding the tax administration system of these taxes, the Intergovernmental Finance Management Act, 2074 has made the following arrangements: - Vehicle tax rates are set and collected by the province, - Real estate registration fee rates are set by the provinces and collected by rural municipalities/municipalities, - Entertainment tax rates are set by the provinces and collected by rural municipalities/municipalities. Collecting,- Setting and collecting the rate of advertising tax by the rural municipality/municipality,- Sixty percent of the amount collected by the rural municipality/municipality from taxes other than the vehicle tax, the rural municipality/municipality must deposit 40% of the amount into the provincial accumulated fund monthly.
6. Write about the monthly report to be made by every government office after the implementation of the budget. The following are the monthly reports to be made by each government office after the implementation of the budget: - Statement of expenditure, - Statement of outstanding balances, - Statement of revenue, - Statement of bond, - Statement of bank account of revenue, - Statement of reconciliation of bond account, - Statement of assets and liabilities, - Balance sheet Details.
7. Write measures to prevent domestic violence. Domestic violence is domestic violence. It is an act of physical, mental, sexual and financial torture and pain inflicted by one person living in the same family on another person. Domestic violence includes beatings, insults, mistreatment, pressure of dowry, harassment, hatred, contempt, and forcing to commit suicide. Although domestic violence is usually committed by men more towards women, it has been found that women also commit it against men due to time and circumstances. The Domestic Violence (Crimes and Punishments) Act, 2066 is in force in Nepal to prevent domestic violence. each district, There is an arrangement of Nepal Police units up to the locality and ward level. There is a provision of the National Commission for Women. From law enforcement to free legal aid, there is a situation where it has not been prevented. Domestic violence is basically a product of poverty and illiteracy. Therefore, attention should be paid to prevent it. The measures to prevent domestic violence are as follows:- Emphasis on income generation to eliminate poverty, modernize and commercialize agriculture for this, - Develop knowledge, skills and abilities to eliminate illiteracy, - Professional knowledge through mechanisms such as skill development centers and agricultural centers at the local level, Providing skills, - Ensuring peace and security from the district to the ward and village, toll, and home, - Conducting public awareness programs, - Emphasis on addressing it when the union, state and local levels formulate the annual budget, - Ending all kinds of discrimination against women,
8. Define non-tax revenue and mention its sources. The government provides goods and services to the common people, the people consume them and pay a fixed amount to the government for consumption, this type of revenue received by the government is called non-tax revenue. This is another revenue other than the tax revenue received by the government. This is a charge for goods and services. For example: telephone charges, electricity charges, water charges, postage stamps, passport fees etc. are non-tax revenues. Sources of non-tax revenue - Duties and fees - Penalties, fines and confiscation - Sale of government property - Income from sale of government goods and services - Royalty - Return of capital - Interest - Dividend - Donations, gifts and miscellaneous income.
9. What are the objectives of giving judicial authority at the local level? Applying the concept that disputes can be resolved outside the court, - Adopting simple alternative methods of dispute resolution such as: negotiation, conciliation, mediators, - Increasing everyone's access to justice, - Getting justice through a speedy process, - Resolving disputes at low cost, - Fair by people's representatives. Justice. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
1. When is the National Day against Human Trafficking celebrated? August 20 - This day was celebrated on August 20, 2078 with the slogan 'A society free from human trafficking, our commitment: everyone's efforts and solidarity'. Commemorating the day that was approved by the then House of Representatives on August 20, 2063, every year August 20 has been celebrated as the National Day against Human Trafficking. 
2. Which country has the first female majority parliament in Europe? Iceland - Women were elected to 33 (52 percent) of the total 63 seats in the recently concluded elections.- Women won nine more seats compared to the 2017 election, setting a new record.
3. V.No. On the occasion of the Constitution Day of 2078, it was announced who will be given Nepal Ratna, the highest honor of Nepal? Former Prime Minister Krishna Prasad Bhattarai (posthumously) (Also, former Chairman of the Council of Ministers Mr. Suvarna Shamsher Rana and former Prime Minister Jhalnath Khanal were awarded Rashtra Gaurav honors.) 
4. Since when the work of laying optical fiber has been started in Nepal? V.No. June 6, 2076- With the slogan 'Digital infrastructure is the basis of prosperity: our effort is the expansion of information technology', the work of laying optical fiber started from Galchi of Dhading as well as Khurkot of Sindhuli and Hile of Dhankuta.- High speed bandwidth can be flowed through optical fiber.
5. Who is the first woman to be elected president of the European Commission? Ursula von der Leyen - who took charge of Germany's defense minister, Ursula is the first woman to be elected as the president of the EU. - Her term of office began on November 1, 2019. 
6. Since when was the general election day celebrated in Nepal? V.No. 2073- In Nepal Commemorating the first general election on February 7, 2015, this day is celebrated every year on February 7. The slogan of the 5th Election Day celebrated on February 7, 2077 is 'All in Elections, Always, Together'. V.No. In 2076, this day was celebrated with the slogan 'Clean, free, fair, reliable and frugal elections: peace, stability, prosperity and good governance'. 
7. If 'Guru Dakshina' is the first Sanskrit language film, which is the first Nepali language film? Satya Harishchandra
8. Where is Indra Sarovar Lake? Makwanpur – The seven kilometer long reservoir built for the Kulekhani hydropower project in Makwanpur district is called Indra Sarovar. Named 'Indra Sarovar' in memory of Princess Indrarajyalakshmi Devi Shah, it is the largest man-made lake in Nepal. - This lake has become an attractive place for fishing and tourism. 
9. What is meant by 'Earth Hour'? A campaign run by WWF to protect the environment and the earth.
10. When was Nepal re-elected as a member of the United Nations Human Rights Council? October 13, 2020- Nepal was elected for the term of 2021-2023.- Previously, Nepal was elected for the term of 2018-2020.- In this council there are 13 from the Asia Pacific region, 13 from Africa, six from Eastern Europe, Latin America and the Caribbean region. Provision to have 47 members consisting of eight, seven countries from Western Europe and others.- This organization was established on March 15, 2006.- Its head office is located in Geneva, Switzerland. 
11. Who is the first woman Director General of World Trade Organization? Ngozi Okonjo (Nigeria) - Appointed on February 15, 2021, Okonjo took office from March 1, 2021. - The tenure of the WTO Director General will be four years.
12. Who are the successful Nepali sisters who danced continuously for two days and wrote their names in the Guinness book? Ruvisha and Elisha Shrestha 
13. When and where was the first summit of the Non-Aligned Movement held? September 1-6, 1961, Belgrade (Yugoslavia) - Its 19th conference was held in Baku, Azerbaijan from October 25-26, 2019. - At present, the number of member states of this organization is 120. Similarly, there are 17 observer countries and 10 observer organizations. 
14. When and where was the 13th BRICS conference held? 2021 March 27, India - (The 12th BRICS Summit was held in Russia from July 21-23, 2020 (via video conference).)
15. According to Henley Passport Index-2021, what is the position of Nepal in the list of powerful passports? 109th – The countries with the strongest passports in the world are Japan (193 destinations), Singapore (192 destinations), Germany, South Korea (191 destinations), Finland, Italy, Luxembourg, Spain (190 destinations), Austria, Denmark (189 destinations). ).- Countries in the list of weak passports: Afghanistan (26 destinations), Iraq (28 destinations), Syria (29 destinations), Pakistan (32 destinations), Yemen (33 destinations). 
16. Which province is conducting the campaign called 'One Nurse One School'? Province 3 
17. Where is Hester Biosciences Pvt. Ltd., which manufactures vaccines for animals and birds, established? Kavrepalanchok 
18. Who will be the chairman of the International Development Aid Mobilization Policy Implementation Committee? Finance Minister
19. B3W 9dyagashmi dyabup dyabhatatbhach dyachami0 is the plan brought by which country? United States - The United States put forward this concept for the first time at the G-7 meeting held in Britain on June 21, 2021. - This plan was introduced with the aim of developing infrastructure in low and middle income countries. This concept was introduced as a competitive scheme of Balam Chyabam Kshlashtashbatskhabha). 
20. There are 111 articles in the United Nations Charter, how many articles are there in the SAARC Charter? 10
21. When was the Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) signed between Nepal and Bangladesh on bilateral energy cooperation? V.No. July 25, 2075 - The MoU includes the issue of hydropower investment between Nepal and Bangladesh, creation of mechanisms such as energy secretary-level joint steering committee, joint secretary-level joint working group. 
22. When was the formation of the international body (IPCC) under the United Nations with the purpose of making necessary policies and analyzing scientific facts related to climate change? 1988 
23. Where is the electricity and energy museum in Nepal? Pharping (Kathmandu)
24. What is meant by Operation Nightingale? Permanently running program to provide medical services to the people suffering from natural calamities 
25. Which is the first local level to establish information technology center? Sanfebagar Municipality (Achham) 
26. Which is the first Arab country to get full membership of 'Financial Action Tax Force'? Saudi Arabia 
27. How many art cities has Lalitpur Metropolitan City been declared by the World Art Council? 35th 
28. Indonesia's currency is called rupiah, but what is Malaysia's currency called? Ringgit 
29. In the middle ages, there were Baise kingdoms in the far west, and what kingdoms were there in the central region? Twenty-four states
30. Which is the local level that was declared as 'completely institutionalized maternity rural municipality' for the first time in Gulmi? Malika Rural Municipality (V. No. 2078 Oct 7) - The rural municipality was declared a fully institutionalized maternity rural municipality after fulfilling the criteria of the Nepal Government's local level health program management guidelines. - There are Worthing Centers in all the wards of this rural municipality. Presenter: Tank KC 
Distribution of state power
1. What are the areas of improvement in Nepal's public service delivery? Discuss. The services provided by the government to the general public are included in public services. Constitutional, legal and institutional arrangements have been made to manage public service delivery in Nepal. In order to make service delivery more efficient in the country, the country has been transformed into a federal democratic republic state and seven provinces and corresponding districts have been arranged, and yet Nepal's public service delivery is traditional and has not been modernized. There is a need for comprehensive reform, the areas of reform can be discussed as follows: Acts, Rules, Guidelines Reforms:- Acts, Rules, making the laws contemporary, integrating the laws related to service delivery, ensuring its full implementation, making the regulation, promotion and facilitation work done by the government level more effective, creating laws in a coordinated manner between the three levels of government, creating clear laws and policies on common rights. . Improvement in the institutional structure:- Making all the institutional mechanisms of the union, state and local levels fast and coordinated, adopting a one-door system in service delivery, making the transfer and promotion system transparent by assigning responsibilities based on leadership ability, decision-making ability and honesty, service delivery and information flow in the office Establishing a structure and system that will be automatic automatically, institutionalizing a system of ethics in the three-level government, preparing a people-oriented structure. Use and expansion of modern technology: - Making maximum use of modern technology in service delivery, expanding the use of technology, making the office completely technology-friendly and providing online services, implementing the concept of paperless and faceless offices, making mobile services effective in remote areas. Encouraging service delivery staff:- To modernize the salary facilities of the staff, arrange regular training, implement reward and punishment system based on work. Emphasis on coordination and cooperation:- At the level of government, private sector, cooperative sector, non-governmental sector, civil society, media and To maintain functional coordination among the people who receive services, to facilitate the work of these sectors and to emphasize cooperation. Improvement in behavior: - Developing development-oriented culture, building a neutral, committed and professional administrative mechanism, developing a competitive private sector and a supportive civil society. - Transparency: available resources. efficient use of equipment,
2. What are the causes of poverty in Nepal? Mention. Economic and social backwardness is poverty. According to economic data, 18.7 percent of people in Nepal are currently below the poverty line. Economic, social, political, geographical, administrative, cultural and many multifaceted reasons are responsible for the increase in poverty in Nepal, which can be mentioned as follows:- political instability, lack of continuity in poverty alleviation policies and programs,- economic growth rate is high, sustainable, broad, judicial and not being inclusive, - High price increase in basic necessities, - Lack of development of major employment sectors such as industry, tourism, agriculture, - Weakness of individual's ability to earn income, - Lack of fair distribution of economic achievements, - Persistence of social discrimination, - Education , lack of accessible and quality health care, - lack of equitable distribution of land, - lack of physical infrastructure development,
3. What are the rights of people with disabilities? write The Rights of Persons with Disabilities Act, 2074, which was designed to end discrimination against persons with disabilities and respect their civil, political, economic, social and cultural rights, has made clear provisions regarding the rights of persons with disabilities by classifying disabilities in Nepal, which can be mentioned as follows: - The right to enjoy the rights according to prevailing laws, - The right against discrimination, - The right to community life, - The right to protection, - The right to political participation, - The right to participate in policy making, - The right to open an organization, - The right to participate in cultural life, - Services, facilities and The right of access to justice, - the right to social security, - the right to information and information, - the right to movement.
4. What are the principles of inclusion adopted in the civil service of Nepal? write Inclusion is the act of making everyone's identity, representation and easy access to the state system. According to the Civil Service Act, 2049, the service period for women in the civil service will be reduced by 1 year, the probationary period is 1 year for men, 6 months for women, the age limit for entering service is 35 years for men, 40 years for women, and the age limit is 58 years after 18 years of service. Provisions have been made for inclusion in the civil service, such as the right to choose pension or gratuity upon retirement, unpaid leave for 6 months for maternity care, etc. According to which, 45 percent of the posts to be filled through open competition are allocated and that percentage is taken as 100 percent, women 33 percent, tribals/tribals 27 percent, Madhesi 22 percent, Dalits 9 percent, disabled 5 percent, In 4 percent backward areas, there is a provision to fill the posts by conducting separate competition only among the respective candidates. In this sense, the bases of inclusion adopted in the civil service of Nepal are found to be as follows: - Gender base: arrangement for women. - Caste basis: provision for tribals/tribes, Dalits.- Geographical basis: provision for backward areas and Madhesi areas. - Basis of physical condition: provision for disability. 5. What is communication in the office? Mention its reasons. The act of exchanging information between one office and another office is called office communication. It is the process of a person, group or office understanding another person, group or office, knowing their thoughts, opinions, values. The sender, receiver, information, media are involved in communication. Communication is a continuous process. This is a managerial task. Methods of Communication - Sender: The person who sends the content and information to the recipient is the sender.- Receiver: The person who receives the content and information sent by the sender is the recipient. - Content and information: The details sent by the sender to communicate to the receiver are content and information. - Medium: The medium is the medium used by the sender to send content and information to the receiver. For example: If there is a conversation between two parties over the telephone, the telephone is the medium.
6. What is food security? Easy supply of food according to demand and safe storage of food without food crisis is called food security. It believes that everyone should have easy access to food. Grass, shelter, cotton and security are the most important basic needs of people. Among these, grass, i.e. food, has a special importance. It is the natural right of everyone to get adequate and suitable nutritional food after being born as a human being. Nutritional food largely determines the health status of a person. The Constitution of Nepal includes food security as a fundamental right. According to Article 36 of the Constitution, every citizen has the right to food, to be protected from life-threatening situations in the absence of food, and to have the right to food sovereignty according to the law. 7. What is the provision in the constitution of Nepal regarding the distribution of state power between the three tiers of government? Mention. The constitution of Nepal divides the state power into three tiers of government. The distribution of state power divided at the federal, state and local levels is done as follows according to Articles 57 and 58 of the Constitution of Nepal:- The power of the Union is provided in Schedule-5 of the Constitution, and the exercise of the rights vested in the said matter shall be in accordance with the Constitution and federal laws. In Schedule-5 of the Constitution, the rights of the Union are organized in 35 matters. - The rights of the province are stipulated in schedule-6 of the constitution and the exercise of the rights contained in the said matter shall be in accordance with the constitution and provincial laws. In Schedule-6 of the Constitution, the powers of the provinces are organized in 21 matters. - The common rights of the Union and the provinces are provided in Schedule-7 of the Constitution, and the exercise of the rights inherent in the said matter, the Constitution, Provisions are made in accordance with federal laws and state laws. In Schedule-7 of the Constitution, common rights of the Union and the provinces are organized in 25 matters. - The rights of the local level are stipulated in Schedule-8 of the Constitution and the exercise of the rights contained in the said matter shall be in accordance with the constitution and the laws made by the village assembly or city assembly. In schedule-8 of the constitution, the authority of the local level is organized in 22 matters. - The common rights of the federation, state and local level are provided in schedule-9 of the constitution and the exercise of the rights contained in the said matter shall be in accordance with the constitution and federal laws, state laws and laws made by the village assembly or city assembly. In Schedule-9 of the Constitution, common rights are organized in 15 subjects of the Union, State and local levels. - Residual rights of the Union: There is a provision that the Union will have rights in matters that are not included in the list of rights of the Union, State and local levels. - Provincial Assembly,
1. When was the first private sector cargo train entered Nepal from India? V.No. August 30, 2078 - The train of Hind Terminals, which has been operating cargo train services in various countries based on India, entered the dry port at Sirsia in Birganj. - Previously, only the Indian Railway Company and Container Corporation Limited (Concor), which are owned by the Government of India, were providing cargo train services in Nepal. .- According to the provisions of the railway service agreement signed between Nepal and India on June 25, private sector cargo trains from India have been allowed to enter.
2. Who was appointed as the chairman of the land related problem solving commission in the meeting of the council of ministers on August 29, 2078? Keshav Niraula - Nemendrahadur Khadka appointed as the vice-chairman of the commission.- Earlier, the government decided to cancel the commission formed under the leadership of Devi Gyawali on 19 July 2078. 
3. What is the minimum age limit for becoming president and vice president? 45 years (the term of office of the President and Vice President will be 5 years.) 
4. How many members of the Judicial Council and the Judicial Service Commission are there in the constitutional provision? 5/5 member
5. When was the labor agreement between Nepal and Mauritius? June 11, 2019-Mauritius is the first African country to sign a labor agreement with Nepal.- The agreement was signed by Gokarn Bista on behalf of Nepal and Sudesh S. Kalirchan on behalf of Mauritius. South Korea, Israel, Japan, Jordan and Mauritius). 
6. According to the 'Doing Business Report-2020' published by the World Bank, in terms of the ease of doing business, Nepal is in which position? 94th
7. Since when has the World Bank not published the 'Doing Business Report'? Year 2021 - The Bank suspended the publication after questions were raised about the credibility of the report, which will be published containing the economic and business indicators of almost all countries around the world. - Especially in the Doing Business report published by the World Bank in 2018 and 2020, there are accusations of data manipulation. The World Bank, conducting an internal investigation on the same accusation, has decided to stop the publication of another report.- The bank has made it clear that it will proceed differently to identify the business and investment environment in the future. 
8. Who is the talent who won the title of television reality comedy champion-2? Bharatmani Paudel (Taplejung) - Paudel received a car and 2.5 million cash along with the title.- Vicky Aggarwal from Sikkim, India was the first runner-up and Santosh Thapa from Gorkha was the second runner-up.
9. According to Henley Passport Index-2021, what is the position of Nepal in the list of powerful passports? 109th - Among the countries with the most powerful passports in the world are Japan (193 destinations), Singapore (192 destinations), Germany, South Korea (191 destinations), Finland, Italy, Luxembourg, Spain (190 destinations), Austria, Denmark (189). Destination).- Afghanistan (26 destinations), Iraq (28 destinations), Syria (29 destinations), Pakistan (32 destinations), Yemen (33 destinations) are among the countries in the list of weak passports. 
10. Where is the electricity and energy museum in Nepal? Pharping (Kathmandu)
11. When was Nepal re-elected as a member of the United Nations Human Rights Council? October 13, 2020- Nepal was elected for the term of office from 2021-2023.- Previously, Nepal was elected for the term of office from 2018-2020.- In this council, 13 from the Asia Pacific region, 13 from Africa, 6 from Eastern Europe, 8 from Latin America and the Caribbean region. , West Europe and other 7 countries with 47 members.- This organization was established on March 15, 2006.- Its head office is located in Geneva, Switzerland. 
12. Who is the first woman Director General of World Trade Organization? Ngozi Okonjo (Nigeria) 
- Appointed on February 15, 2021, Okonjo took office from March 1, 2021. - The tenure of the WTO Director General will be 4 years.
13. When and where was the first summit of the Non-Aligned Movement held? September 1-6, 1961, Belgrade (Yugoslavia) - its 19th conference was held in Baku, Azerbaijan from October 25-26, 2019. - At present, the number of member countries of this organization is 120. Similarly, there are 17 observer countries and 10 observer organizations. 
14. When and where was the 13th BRICS conference held? 2021 March 27, India - (The 12th BRICS conference was held in Russia from July 21-23, 2020 (via video conference).) 
15. Who are the Nepali sisters who have been successful in writing their names in the Guinness book by dancing continuously for two days? 
 Ruwisha and Elisha Shrestha 
16. Which province is conducting the campaign called 'One Nurse One School'? Bagmati Province
17. Hester Biosciences Pvt. Ltd. produces vaccines for livestock. Where is it established? Kavrepalanchok 
18. Who will be the chairman of the International Development Aid Mobilization Policy Implementation Committee? Finance Minister 
19. B-3 W 9dyagashmi dyabup dyabhatatbhach dyachami0 is the scheme introduced by which country? United States - The United States put forward this concept for the first time at the G-7 meeting held in Britain on June 21, 2021. - This plan was introduced with the aim of developing infrastructure in low and middle income countries. - The BRI was announced in 2013 by Chinese President Xi Jinping. This concept was introduced as a competing scheme of Dyabhati Balam Chyabam Kshlashtashbatskhabha). 
20. There are 111 articles in the United Nations Charter, how many articles are there in the SAARC Charter? 10
21. When was the Memorandum of Understanding (MoU) signed between Nepal and Bangladesh on bilateral energy cooperation? V.No. July 25, 2075 - The MoU includes the issue of hydropower investment between Nepal and Bangladesh, the creation of mechanisms such as joint steering committee at the energy secretary level, joint working group of the two countries. having been 
22. When was the establishment of the International Organization (IPCC) under the United Nations with the purpose of making necessary policies and analyzing scientific facts regarding climate change? 1988
23. Since when was the general election day celebrated in Nepal? V.No. 2073- In Nepal Commemorating the first general election on February 7, 2015, this day is celebrated every year on February 7. The slogan of the 5th Election Day celebrated on February 7, 2077 is 'Electing everyone, always, together'. V.No. In 2076, this day was celebrated with the slogan 'Clean, free, fair, reliable and frugal elections: peace, stability, prosperity and good governance'. 
24. What is meant by Operation Nightingale? Permanently running program to provide medical services to the people suffering from natural calamities 
25. Which is the first local level to establish information technology center? Sanfebagar Municipality (Achham) 
26. Which is the first Arab country to get full membership of Financial Action Tax Force? Saudi Arabia
27. The World Art Council has declared Lalitpur Metropolitan City as how many art cities? 35th 
28. Indonesia's currency is called rupiah, but what is Malaysia's currency called? Ringgit 29. Who is the Nepali writer known by the nickname 'Madsav'? Madanmani Dixit 
30. In the Middle Ages, there were many kingdoms in the far west, and what kingdoms were there in the central region? Chaubise State Presenter: Tank KC 
Public-Private Partnership
1. What is public-private partnership? What are the related problems in Nepal? Discuss. Public-Private-Partnership is when both the public sector and the private sector jointly do all the managerial work, including gathering resources, building, operating, sharing returns, and bearing risks, in the work of building infrastructure. It is also an act of risk sharing in the private sector. It develops the competitiveness of both the private sector and the public sector. It is a work of both government agencies and private organizations to build infrastructure and provide public services. It uses the managerial skills of both. It includes voluntary participation, cooperation, coexistence, coordination and equitable distribution. In Article 51 (d) of the Constitution of Nepal, Arrangements have been made to strengthen the national economy through the participation and independent development of the private and cooperative sectors. The Public Private Partnership and Investment Act, 2075 has been issued and implemented. In order to promote domestic and foreign investment, the Investment Board has been formed under the chairmanship of the Prime Minister, and the work, duties and powers of the board have been specified, and public private partnership has not been effective. Various problems have been observed in it. Which can be mentioned as follows:- lack of sufficient capital with both the government and private sector,- the inability of the government to guarantee peace and security and complete security of investment to the private sector,- the inability to maintain political and policy stability in the country,- the private sector is more involved in the trade of imported goods than domestic production. To be concentrated,- Private sector does not see profit in collaboration with the government,- between government and private sector benefits, costs,
2. What kind of people are considered ineligible to get a driver's license in Nepal? Mention. The Vehicle and Transport Management Act, 2049, which is designed to prevent road accidents, provide compensation to victims of accidents, arrange insurance, provide simple and accessible transport facilities, strengthen, enable and make transport services more efficient, requires the following persons to obtain a driver's license. - (a) A person who has not reached the age of 21 years for a large vehicle, - (b) A person who has not reached the age of eighteen years for a medium and small vehicle, - But a person who has reached the age of 16 years for a motorcycle and other small two-wheeled vehicles is a driver. There is a provision to obtain a permit,- (c) a person suffering from epilepsy or a person suffering from dementia or a disease that causes sudden tremors or fainting,
3. Discuss the measures to control inflation, savings and maintain financial stability through monetary and fiscal policy. Monetary policy is the policy to manage the supply and demand of money in the market. It has been issued by Nepal Rastra Bank as the central bank. Similarly, the policy of maintaining economic stability through taxes, government spending and public debt is the financial policy. In Nepal, the Ministry of Finance has been issuing the annual budget through the Economic Act. The ultimate objective of both these policies is to maintain economic growth, economic stability and social justice. Through these two policies, the following measures should be adopted to control inflation in the market, to maintain savings and financial stability: Inflation control - Nepal Rastra Bank will use indirect monetary instruments, including increasing the bank rate on loans given by Nepal Rastra Bank to banks and financial institutions. - Increasing the maximum use of information technology and expanding electronic service delivery, making the banking system clean, efficient, competitive and reliable, implementing cashless banking services through electronic means, making payment services simple and accessible and ending the compulsion of people to carry cash, - every person's bank account Mandatory expansion of financial access, - Conducting financial literacy programs, - Establishing a separate regulatory body to make the regulation of D category microfinance institutions more effective, - Empowering government institutions, merging with each other, increasing regulation, - Maintaining functional coordination between the regulatory bodies of the financial sector. , such as: Ministry of Finance, Nepal Rastra Bank, Nepal Securities Board, Insurance Committee. - Through the above arrangement, inflation control, savings and financial stability can be maintained in the country. Making it competent, competitive and reliable, implementing cashless banking services through electronic means, making payment services simple and accessible and ending the compulsion of people to carry cash, - Expanding financial access by mandating every person's bank account, - Conducting financial literacy programs, - d Establishing a separate regulatory body to make the regulation of microfinance institutions more effective, - Empowering government institutions, merging with each other, increasing regulation, - Establishing functional coordination between the regulatory bodies of the financial sector, such as: Ministry of Finance, Nepal Rastra Bank, Nepal Securities Board, Insurance Committee . - Through the above arrangement, inflation control, savings and financial stability can be maintained in the country. Making it competent, competitive and reliable, implementing cashless banking services through electronic means, making payment services simple and accessible and ending the compulsion of people to carry cash, - Expanding financial access by mandating every person's bank account, - Conducting financial literacy programs, - d Establishing a separate regulatory body to make the regulation of microfinance institutions more effective, - Empowering government institutions, merging with each other, increasing regulation, - Establishing operational coordination between the regulatory bodies of the financial sector, such as: Ministry of Finance, Nepal Rastra Bank, Nepal Securities Board, Insurance Committee . - Through the above arrangement, inflation control, savings and financial stability can be maintained in the country. Making payment services simple and accessible, ending the compulsion of people to carry cash, - expanding financial access by mandating every person's bank account, - conducting a financial literacy program, - arranging a separate regulatory body to make the regulation of D category microfinance institutions more effective, - government Empowering institutions, merging with each other, increasing regulation, - Establishing functional coordination between the regulatory bodies of the financial sector, such as: Ministry of Finance, Nepal Rastra Bank, Nepal Securities Board, Insurance Committee. - Through the above arrangement, inflation control, savings and financial stability can be maintained in the country. Making payment services simple and accessible, ending the compulsion of people to carry cash, - expanding financial access by mandating every person's bank account, - conducting a financial literacy program, - arranging a separate regulatory body to make the regulation of D category microfinance institutions more effective, - government Empowering institutions, merging with each other, increasing regulation, - Establishing functional coordination between the regulatory bodies of the financial sector, such as: Ministry of Finance, Nepal Rastra Bank, Nepal Securities Board, Insurance Committee. - Through the above arrangement, inflation control, savings and financial stability can be maintained in the country. - Establishing a separate regulatory body to make the regulation of class D microfinance institutions more effective, - Empowering government institutions, merging with each other, increasing regulation, - Establishing functional coordination between the regulatory bodies of the financial sector, such as: Ministry of Finance, Nepal Rastra Bank, Nepal Securities Board, Insurance Committee. - Through the above arrangement, inflation control, savings and financial stability can be maintained in the country. - Establishing a separate regulatory body to make the regulation of class D microfinance institutions more effective, - Empowering government institutions, merging with each other, increasing regulation, - Establishing functional coordination between the regulatory bodies of the financial sector, such as: Ministry of Finance, Nepal Rastra Bank, Nepal Securities Board, Insurance Committee. - Through the above arrangement, inflation control, savings and financial stability can be maintained in the country.
4. Giving a brief introduction about the responsibilities of citizens, what kind of provisions are there in the constitution of Nepal regarding the responsibilities of citizens? write The duty of a good citizen to follow the country's constitution and laws, maintain social harmony in society, be active in economic and social development, and play a positive role in society is called the responsibilities of a citizen. It is related to emotional aspects like dedication, devotion, loyalty, love towards the country. This is a good act and behavior that a good citizen should perform. Obligations of Citizens in the Constitution of Nepal - In Article 48 of the Constitution of Nepal, some topics are mentioned as the duties of citizens, as those duties must be followed by every citizen, such duties are also the obligations of citizens, which can be mentioned as follows: - Being loyal to the nation, - Nepal's nationality, sovereignty and To protect the integrity, - to follow the constitution and laws,
5. What are the functions, duties and powers of the National Security Council? Mention. The work, duties and powers of the National Security Council formed under the chairmanship of the Prime Minister are as follows according to the Constitution of Nepal and the Military Act, 2063: - To formulate policies related to the overall national interest, security and defense of Nepal, - To prepare policies, plans and programs related to the mobilization, operation and use of the Nepali Army. To submit to the Government of Nepal, - To submit suggestions to the Government of Nepal regarding the number and organizational structure of the Nepalese Army, - To submit necessary suggestions to the Government of Nepal regarding the management of the Nepalese Army, - To submit necessary suggestions to the Government of Nepal regarding the management of weapons, ammunition and other military materials of the Nepalese Army, - To prepare an annual report and submit it to the President and the President shall cause such report to be submitted to the Federal Parliament through the Prime Minister,
6. Write about the importance of information technology. To increase government efficiency, reduce costs, - to make the best use of resources and prevent leakages and embezzlement, - to help make the world a village, - to help in building a knowledge-based society, - to increase transparency through the highest use of information technology, to help control corruption and maintain good governance To reach, - to be information technology as the basis of new inventions, - to have access to international efforts and development, - to help increase the production and productivity of economic, social and commercial industries and establishments, to establish knowledge-based industries, - to help in the search and creation of jobs, - studies Helping in research and writing work, - Helping in preparedness, mitigation and rescue of natural disasters, - Helping to improve public service delivery. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
1. By Finance Minister Janardan Sharma What is the amount of the budget (replacement budget) presented in the meeting of the House of Representatives of the Federal Parliament on August 25, 2078? Rs. 16 trillion 32 billion 83 crore - This budget is less than the budget brought by the previous government through an ordinance by about 15 billion rupees. - The amount of the budget presented by Finance Minister Bishnu Prasad Paudel on June 15, 2078 is 16 trillion 47 billion 57 million rupees. Income-Expenditure Details - Current expenses: 6 trillion 77 billion 99 million (41.52 percent) - Capital expenditure: 3 trillion 78 billion 10 million (23.16 percent) - Financial management: 1 trillion 89 billion 44 million (11.6 percent) - Financial transfer: 3 trillion 87 billion 30 billion (23.72 percent) Resource management - Revenue: 10 trillion 50 billion 82 billion - Foreign grants: 59 billion 92 billion - Foreign debt: 2 trillion 83 billion 9 billion - Internal debt : Two trillion 39 billion – from the budget allocated for financial transfer, including equalization subsidy for current expenditure, Rs. 3 trillion 25 billion 75 crores (84.11 percent) and on the capital side Rs. 61 billion 55 crores (15.89 percent). Objectives of the budget - to reduce existing multidimensional poverty. - Reviving the economy and achieving a high rate of economic growth. - Building an inclusive and socialist-oriented economy as envisioned by the constitution. Features of the budget - Through the budget, the government aims to achieve an economic growth rate of 7 percent. - Targeted to limit price increase to 6.5 percent. - Kidney transplant, Five thousand rupees will be provided monthly to cancer patients and spinal paralysis patients. - 3000 per month will be provided for the family who sacrificed in the movement of political change. - To provide assistance at the rate of 10,000 rupees (once per family as relief) to five lakh families who have lost their jobs due to the covid epidemic. The government's goal is to distribute this assistance within the month of October 2078. - A program to provide unsecured loans to 500 people at each local level. - The program will be started as a model in some schools of all the provinces by studying and earning students up to class 12 who are studying in technical fields. - Relief will be provided to industries employing more than 300 people. - Agricultural insurance premium subsidy has been increased and maintained at 80 percent. - Conducting structural and managerial reforms of public institutions that have been continuously losing money, A policy of canceling or managing by other methods will be adopted. - Reservoir and semi-reservoir hydropower projects above 200 megawatts will get full income tax exemption for the first 15 years and 50% income tax exemption for the next six years from the date of commencement of business. - Safe and accessible food will be provided at 10 places in Kathmandu Valley. - A religious museum will be established. Easy food will be arranged. - A religious museum will be established. Easy food will be arranged. - A religious museum will be established.
2. When is International Literacy Day celebrated? September 8 - (2021 Slogan: Literacy for human-centered recovery, reduction in the inequality of technology use 
3. What is the date set according to the revised schedule for National Census-2078? 
4. When did the government decide to establish the 'BP Koirala National Award' in the name of the first elected Prime Minister BP Koirala? 21 August 2078 5. 
Eighteenth Civil Service Day, What is the slogan of 2078? Professional and Creative Administration: Development, Prosperity and Good Governance - In commemoration of the day when the Civil Service Act was promulgated for the first time in Nepal on August 22, 2013, every year August 22 is celebrated as Civil Service Day. The day has been celebrated since 2061.
6. When did the army revolt and seize power in Guinea? Year 2021 September 5 
7. Which Nepali bank will get the Green Deal of the Year 2021 title? NMB Bank - (NMB Bank received the title under the Corporate and Investment Banking Award category awarded by Singapore's Asian Banking and Finance magazine.) 
8. Who is the Nepalese recipient of the KLF Book Awards given by Calling Literary Festival of India for 2020-21? Vasant Chaudhary (Industrialist and Writer)
9. Who is the civil servant who will be awarded with the best civil service award on the occasion of Civil Service Day 2078? 1. Bimal Paudel (Joint Registrar, Supreme Court)2. Dr. Kiran Rupakheti (Joint Secretary, National Planning Commission)3. Rajendra Kumar K.C. (Joint Secretary, A.D.A.A.) 4. Vishnudatta Gautam (Joint Secretary, Ministry of Federal Affairs and Public Affairs)5. Dr. Bhimsin Tinkari (Director, Department of Health Services)6. Harishankar Gyawali (Deputy Attorney, Attorney General's Office)7. Netra Prasad Paudel (Director, Auditor General's Office) 8. Sumana Aryal Wagle (Director, Land Management and Records Department)9. Chabilal Subedi (Chief Administrative Officer, Beni Municipality, Myagdi)10. Kamla Dhakal Kafle (Deputy Subba, Women and Children Department) – Similarly, among the 30 civil servants who will be honored with the Civil Service Award on the occasion – Laxmikumari Basnet (Joint Secretary), Gyanraj Subedi (Joint Secretary), Koshal Chandra Subedi (Joint Secretary), Bishnu Prasad Sharma (Joint Secretary), Dilip Kumar Gautam (Deputy Secretary), Bholaprasad Chapagarin (Deputy Secretary), Shanta Nepal Marasini (Deputy Secretary), Dr. Bhojraj Sharma (Kafle) (Deputy Secretary), Guru Prasad Wagle (Deputy Attorney), Vipul Kumar Lal Das (Senior Divisional Engineer), Surya Prasad Sapkota (Deputy Secretary), Kedar Prasad Nepal (Senior Divisional Engineer), Vigyan Banjara (Surveying Officer), Pramila Wagle (Agricultural Development Officer), Kulshekhar Aryal (Branch Officer), Sheela Gyawali (Assistant Forest Officer), Sujit Kumar Singh (Tax Officer), Maheshvikram Lageju (Branch Officer), Bhakti Prasad Bhattarai (Accounts Officer), Bhesharaj Panth (Chief Administrative Officer), Vindhya Karki ( Accounts Officer), Jaleshwar Ram (Branch Officer), Jijisha Rai Yankhurung (Engineer), Bharat Prasad Timalsina (Ta.Na.Su), Uttam Khanal (Senior Printing Assistant), Khadanand Poudel (Computer Operator), K.I.Sin. Galan (Vice Subba), Ramnaresh Shah (Vice Subba),
10. Which are the two bird species of Nepal included in the Red Data Book List of the International Fund for Nature Conservation (IUCN) as sensitive list (January 2021)? Raga Mahachil and Kurari Falafyale 
11. Which place is known as bird paradise in Nepal? Kosi Tappu Wildlife Reserve 
12. The world's longest trekking route 'The Great Himalayan Trail' is located in which country? Nepal
13. What is the target of reducing the rate of malnutrition in Nepal by the year 2030? 14 percent - The target is to reduce malnutrition to 24 percent by 2025 and to 14 percent by 2030. This rate is decreasing among children in Nepal. Malnutrition, which was 57 percent in 2001, decreased to 36 percent in 2016.- According to the Nepal Demographic and Health Survey, 2016, 36 percent of children under five years of age are stunted, 27 percent are underweight and 10 percent are underweight.- Overweight of children under five years is 1.2 percent, According to the National Micronutrient Survey 2016, 32 percent of adolescents in Nepal are underweight due to the risk of starvation. Similarly, 23 percent of teenagers and 14 percent of teenage girls were underweight.- A five-year multi-sectoral nutrition plan was implemented from 2013 to solve the problem of malnutrition.
14. Where is Gurase Pond located? Meringden rural municipality of Taplejung 
15. Since when has the government operated a 'call center' to listen to complaints related to foreign employment? V.No. 2075 Chait 18 
16. When was the trade and investment agreement between Nepal and Myanmar? V.No. 14 November 2075 (30 November 2018) 
17. Since when did the Montreal Treaty of 1999 come into force in Nepal? V.No. November 29, 2075 
18. Which place in Kathmandu valley was also called 'Ashokapatan'? Patan 
19. When did the government decide to implement the foreign employment information management system? V.No. August 25, 2075 
. When the effect of El Nino increases in the Pacific Ocean, what effect does it have on Nepal's monsoon? Monsoon is weak and rainfall is low
21. What framework has the Nepal government started implementing instead of 'Bilateral Investment Promotion and Protection Agreement (WIPPA)' for investment with foreign countries? Bilateral Investment Agreement (BIA) 
22. Where is the stork breeding center in Nepal? Kapilavastu 
23. Which is the first hydropower company to get ISO 9001:2015 quality mark in Nepal? Chilime Hydropower - (The first government office to receive the ISO 9001:2015 quality mark is District Administration Office Rupandehi, Passport Department in the Department and Nabil Bank in the Commercial Bank.) 
24. When was the establishment of G-20? September 26, 1999 Presenter: Tank KC 
Constitution of Parliamentary Committee and Scope
1. What is the Sustainable Development Goals? write The United Nations General Assembly made a global declaration in September 2015 with a commitment to transform the world and leave no one behind in every dimension of development from 2016 to 2030, called the Sustainable Development Goals. It has 17 goals, 169 quantitative goals and 232 global indicators. It has accepted the recognition of participatory, rights-oriented and equitable development in all countries of the world. It includes three dimensions namely social, economic and environmental. It covers issues such as ending poverty and hunger, bringing education and health to all, gender equality, clean water for all, access to energy for all, promotion of employment, economic growth, industry, infrastructure development and sustainable urbanization.
2. Discuss the role of financial policy in maintaining economic growth, economic stability and social justice in the country. Financial policy is the policy that affects the country's economy through taxes, government spending and loans as needed. It is a means of mobilization and distribution of public resources. Being an integral part of the macroeconomic policy, its scope and influence is wide and it helps to deal with economic recession and price rise in the economy. This policy, which stands on the political and social foundation, plays the following role in order to maintain economic growth, economic stability and social justice in the country: - To increase investment in the productive sector to achieve economic growth by mobilizing revenue according to the target, - Gathering public and private sector resources for public investment, - Tax on exports Increasing exports by giving concessions, encouraging establishment of industries in remote areas, tax exemptions,
3. What should be the behavior and conduct of employees towards customers? write The customer is the recipient of the service. Employees are service providers. The service provider must display good behavior and conduct towards the service customer. which should be as follows: - The work of the client should be done on time, if the work cannot be done on time, the basis and reason should be given, - The client should be treated with respect, - Be polite when answering, - Be responsible to the client, - Work with the interests of the client in mind, - Elderly, disabled, Disability, pregnant women, children, the helpless should be given priority, - Providing services in simple and easy language, - Increasing the reach of service recipients in service delivery, - Providing timely information to service recipients about the process, time required, cost, - Adhering to the conduct according to their position, - Fairly Providing quality service, - providing fast service,
4. What are the basic principles of fiscal federalism? write Financial federalism is the main aspect of federalism that is adopted to mobilize resources among the levels of government involved in the federal system. Fiscal federalism is a prerequisite for a successful federal system. The more effective it is, the stronger the federalism in the country. It plays an important role in maintaining relations, cooperation and interdependence between different levels of government. The basic principles of fiscal federalism are as follows: 
a. Responsibility for expenditure, - it clearly shows the scope of the government at the level. It is the Constitution itself that determines which government will invest in which areas and serve the country and the people. 
b. The right of revenue mobilization, - this includes taxes and non-taxes. 
c. Financial transfer, - This includes grant distribution and revenue sharing. 
d. debt mobilization,
e. Mobilization of foreign aid, 
f. Mobilization of natural resources.
5. What are the duties, duties and rights of the chairman of the rural municipality and the head of the municipality? write The division of duties and performance of the executive bodies of rural municipalities and municipalities shall be in accordance with the regulations approved by the respective executive bodies. There is a rule that the work, duties and rights of the president and chief, vice president and deputy chief, ward president and members should be mentioned in such division of labor regulations. The Local Government Operation Act, 2074 states that the duties, duties and powers of the chairman of the rural municipality and the head of the municipality shall be as follows until the division of duties, tasks, duties and rights of the officials are specified in the above regulations: To submit the agenda and proposal of the meeting in the meeting of the executive body, to prepare the annual program and budget and submit it to the meeting.
6. What is office layout? Write about its importance. After choosing a suitable place for the office and arranging a suitable building, the process of decorating the office in such a way that the manager can make maximum use of the available space is called office layout. This is the work of designing the office. - Under this, the tasks of organizing tables, chairs, drawers, decorative items, various devices etc. in a scientific manner and attractively in different departments and rooms are included. This helps to flow the work done by the office in an economical and efficient manner. Importance of office layout - proper use of available space and equipment, - simple and transparent service delivery, - disabled-friendly office management, - economy in office expenses, - improvement in office efficiency, - easy supervision, fair assessment of work, - effective control, - appropriate communication management, - Increase in employee morale,
7. How can urban population management be done? Discuss. A city is an area with roads, electricity, drinking water, education, health, industry, trade and facilities. Urbanization is the expansion of this city. The population is naturally more in the city due to various service facilities and employment in the city. Therefore, the best way to manage the population in the city is to prevent the population from increasing in the city by creating an environment for the people of the village to live in the village. For this, the following measures can be adopted: - To provide government service facilities easily to the villages, - To prepare the environment for the establishment of industries and factories in the villages, - To extend the road network to the villages, to pave unpaved roads, - To make household electricity charges free of charge. ,- Arranging free Wi-Fi in government schools and rural settlements,
8. Why is a parliamentary committee formed in the parliament? Give a reason. The parliament is big and the number of MPs in the parliament is also high. Therefore, it is often impossible to hold a parliament meeting at any time. Party influence is more in the parliament and the parliamentarian, being the representative of the party, has to put the party's opinion before his personal opinion. There is also a lack of time for all parliamentarians to hold their views in one meeting. Subject matter experts may be needed in some subjects and fields, but it is not possible to invite subject matter experts to the Parliament. It is also difficult to reach a consensus on the bills that have been submitted. Therefore, taking into account the knowledge, experience and background of the members of the parliament, the parliamentary committee is formed in a small size so that all the members are represented as much as possible. This is the main reason to form a parliamentary committee in the parliament. There are other reasons, which are as follows: - To reduce the workload and time of the Parliament, - To discuss the bill in a comprehensive, intensive and detailed manner,
1. Who is the Nepalese recipient of the National Geographic Explore Award-2021? Uttambabu Shrestha - Environmental science scholar and researcher Shrestha received the award of 43 thousand dollars (about 5.5 million rupees). - The National Geographic Society of America has provided a research scholarship especially for the research of conservation area of ​​Nepal. The main objective of the research is to study the effects of Corona on Nepal's tourism, wildlife, flora and other biodiversity areas and the dependent communities.
2. By the National Bank According to the statistics published in August 2078, How much is the economic growth rate of the country estimated to be maintained in 2077-78? 4.01 percent - According to the report, the growth rate of agriculture sector is 2.64 percent, industry sector is 5.05 percent and service sector is 4.43 percent. - The share of agriculture, industry and service sector in the gross domestic product is 25.83 percent, 13.11 percent and 61.06 percent respectively. - A.V. In 2077/78, remittance inflow increased by 9.8 percent and reached 961.5 billion rupees. 
3. Who is the only player from Nepal to participate in Paralympics held in Tokyo? Palesha Govardhan 
(15 days after the end of the Summer Olympics, it is customary for the Olympic host city to hold the Paralympics.)
4. When did the United States completely withdraw its troops from Afghanistan after almost 20 years? October 30, 2021 - Some of the remaining troops in Afghanistan are said to have withdrawn by October 30. A few days ago, the US started the process of withdrawing its troops. - The US started the Afghanistan mission immediately after September 11, 2001. The United States launched the mission to search for Osama bin Laden, the head of the Al-Qaeda organization, who claimed to have attacked the American Twin Towers. 
5. Where is the 74th annual meeting of Southeast Asia of the World Health Organization held? In Kathmandu (Year 2078 August 21-25) (Nepal got the opportunity to host the meeting again after 11 years.) 
6. When was the first World Bicycle Day celebrated? June 3, 2018 (The United Nations decided to celebrate this day on April 12, 2018.)
7. What is the name of the agreement made regarding direct bus service operation in Nepal, India, Bhutan and Bangladesh? BBIN Initiative (An agreement was signed on June 15, 2015 in Thimphu, Bhutan.
8. The concept of transformative (game changer) plan was introduced for the first time in which periodic plan? 15th - The government passed the 15th periodic plan (2076/77-2080/81) on February 19, 2076. - In the fifteenth five-year plan period, the poverty rate has been limited to 11 percent.- For this periodic plan, 39 projects in the economic sector, 34 in the social sector, 40 in the infrastructure sector, 10 in democracy and good governance, two interrelated projects, 18 transformational projects and 22 national pride projects have been approved.- In this plan, the concept of transformative (game changer) plan was adopted for the first time.- Separate indicators of happiness and prosperity were determined in this plan; In which four indicators of happiness and prosperity have been determined.- The five-year plan has also determined goals with 25-year long-term thinking. 
9. In the Licchawi period, the district was called a subject and what was the district chief called? subject master
10. What is the slogan of the long-term Aadhaar paper formulated by the Ministry of Health and Population? Healthy citizens for a prosperous country (the Ministry has prepared a long-term basic document up to 2100) 
. 11. Which article of the Constitution of Nepal (2072) mentions that there will be no discrimination in remuneration for equal work between women and men? Article 18 (4) 
12. Which language was the medium of education in Lichchavi period and Malla period? Sanskrit 
13. Which states were known as the three powers of Nepal unification campaign? Palpa, Lamjung and Tanahun 
14. Kot Parva, Bhandarkhaal Parva and Alau Parva are events that happened during the reign of which king? Rajendra Vikram Shah 
15. Who is the king who started the practice of calling land owners Talsing and land earners Mohi? Jayasthiti Mall 16. The main food crop of Nepal is paddy, which is the second main food crop? corn
17. Victoria Falls is located on the border of which country? Zimbabwe and Zambia 
18. Paddy dance is popular in Limbu caste, while stick dance and sword dance is popular in which caste? Tharu 
19. Since when has the practice of stamping been implemented in all government offices? V.No. January 1, 2019 (The new stamp that is currently in use has been implemented since December 15, 2063) 
20. Who will be honored with the John Witts Clark Award 2021 also known as Bevy Noble? Irsya Andrews 
21. What does i-familia mean? A database launched by Interpol from June 2021 to identify missing persons through family DNA. 
22. What is genetic engineering called? DNA Technology 
23. The Jhangad language spoken in the eastern terai of Nepal belongs to which language family? Dravida
24. In which period is considered to be the highest development of woodworking in Nepal? 
25 during the Malla period . When was the first paper currency introduced in Nepal? V.No. 2002 October 1 
- Rana Prime Minister Juddha Shamsher issued an ordinance in Nepal. From October 1, 2002, paper currency was introduced. - Paper notes of 100, 10 and 5 rates were issued for the first time. - Janakraj was the treasurer who signed those notes issued by Sadar Mulukikhana. 
26. Since when the publication of the Guinness Book of World Records began? August 27, 1955 
(Guinness Book of World Records, which is published every year with various records in the world, was first published on August 27, 1955 in London, England.) 
27. Which organization is known as the child of war? League of Nations
28. Who was awarded the Awell Award 2021? Avi Wigderson -Hungary) 
- The amount of the award, which is given to a mathematician with strong ability, is about six million euros. - This award is given by the Norwegian government. - Established in 2001, this award has been awarded since 2003. - For the first time, this award was given to Jean-Pierre Sire from France. 
29. When was the China-South Asian Poverty Alleviation and Cooperative Development Center established? July 8, 2021 - This six-member organization includes China and five South Asian countries (Nepal, Bangladesh, Pakistan, Afghanistan and Sri Lanka). - This organization was established with the aim of working together in poverty alleviation. - There will be branch offices in five South Asian countries.
30. When is International Cooperative Day celebrated? First Saturday of July (2021 slogan: Revealed Better Together 
)
1. What is beruju? What are the causes of increase in beruju while discussing about the system of beruju in Nepal? write According to the prevailing law, the amount of money that is transacted in a manner that should not be transacted, that is not kept in the account that should be kept, and that the financial transaction is done in an unreasonable manner is called beruju. It is embezzlement of financial transactions, which is considered as a product of financial indiscipline. This is an irregular amount that appears when public income and expenditure work is not completed in accordance with the prevailing legal methods and procedures. There is a provision that the auditor will point out illegal economic transactions during the audit. á Legal and institutional arrangements related to illegal gambling in Nepal. Economic Procedures and Financial Responsibility Act, 2076 and Regulations, 2077 has made a clear provision in this regard and also in Nepal, the total amount of unclaimed amount to be recovered and settled is Rs. 6 trillion 76 billion, which is 41 percent of the current budget. Beruju should be recovered in Nepal. There is a system of beruju fasroat that should be regularized and classified into three categories. There is a provision that the responsible person shall be responsible for unjustified fraud, and the responsible accounting officer shall be responsible for monitoring whether or not unjustified fraud has been committed according to prevailing laws. After being audited by the Auditor General, there is a provision that the relevant office should submit the report to the Auditor General for review within 35 days or an extension of the deadline indicated in the preliminary report. In case of non-compliance or audit mentioned in the preliminary report within the deadline, the Auditor General will inform the responsible accounting officer and after receiving such information, the relevant responsible accounting officer will be responsible for carrying out such work. According to this, if the accountable officer does not fulfill his responsibility within the stipulated time, the Accountant General There is a provision that the examiner should inform the relevant departmental minister or the minister of state about the failure and include the details of the failure or failure to be audited in his annual report. á Reasons for the increase in corruption - not competing in public procurement and construction works, breaking large works into small ones, the state of transparency is weak, - the state of internal control in government offices is weak, - the related offices do not report on time the irregularities and errors seen from internal audit, - Failure to fully comply with existing laws and regulations including the Economic Procedure Act, Rules, Public Procurement Act, - Not keeping accounts according to the accounting form prescribed by the Office of the Auditor General, - Not spending according to the budget title, violating the limits of the budget title, - Head of Office, Head of Accounts and Head of Finance of the relevant office Failure to be responsible and accountable, - Beruju is an irregular amount. As this indicates a lack of financial discipline and increased corruption, the best solution is to avoid it as much as possible. For this, the prevailing laws and regulations must be fully followed. Cleanliness should be maintained in financial transactions. Separate audit groups should be arranged for raising and lowering the balance sheet. Priority should be given to the old beruju fasrot work.
2. Discuss the role of capital market in economic development. Capital market is a market where demand and supply of capital is more than one year. In this, long-term financial instruments other than treasury bills are bought and sold such as fixed deposits, bonds, development bonds, shares, bonds, etc. The capital market acts as a pool between capital demanders and suppliers. The capital market plays an important role in economic development, which can be discussed as follows: - integration of scattered resources, - support in savings mobilization, - increase in investment, - support in revenue mobilization, - help in job creation, - support in high economic growth, - economic development and support in expansion, - capital growth and construction, - support in creating an investment-friendly environment, - growth, development and expansion of financial instruments, - increase in the transactions of banks and financial institutions, - support in increasing financial literacy.
3. What are the goods imported into Nepal as part of trade with Nepal and China's Tibet? Mention. Nepal and China's Tibet still have a traditional immigration system. Under this, after any goods are exported from Nepal, the following six types of goods of equal value can be imported into Nepal under barter: a. Brown cow and brown cow's tail, b. Live sheep Changra, c. Herbs, d. Carpet, g. wool, f. salt 4. What are the problems seen in the implementation of public policy in Nepal? Discuss. The government's public commitment to the people is policy. It is also a means of economic and social transformation of the country. Generally, policies are formulated to solve problems, meet needs, bring change, and resolve conflicts. The constitution, laws, rules, policies of sectoral subjects are public policies. Politics in Nepal has been unstable in the past. Due to the unstable politics, the government became unstable, when the government became unstable, the policy also became unstable, extensive interference was also done in the bureaucracy, due to which the implementation of public policies remained very weak. Poverty did not decrease, the work of economic and social transformation was delayed, the basis of job creation continued to decline. Other problems seen in the implementation of public policy in Nepal can be discussed as follows:- Policy not being formulated based on the needs and demands of the local people,- Lack of action plan for policy implementation,- Lack of active and meaningful participation of stakeholders in policy implementation, failure to establish the role of stakeholders,- Lack of necessary resources for policy implementation, - Lack of skilled manpower in policy implementation, - Failure to analyze policy implementation in the case of policy formulation, - Lack of operational coordination between the government agencies that implement the policy, - Lack of clarity of the responsible agency to take responsibility for policy implementation and bear accountability, - Lack of working environment necessary for policy implementation, - Lack of clarity on the role of taluk bodies, monitoring and evaluation work done by taluk bodies is not effective. Not being able to do, - not accounting for the effect and impact of policy implementation, - not being able to support the situation. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
1. Who was recently appointed as the Commander-in-Chief of the Nepali Army? General Rathi Prabhuram Sharma (tenure started on August 24, 2078)- General Rathi Sharma, who has been holding the duties of the Permanent Commander-in-Chief of the Nepalese Army, was appointed to that position (August 11, 2078). - Sharma, who spent 37 years in the Nepali Army, is the first commander from the Brahmin caste to reach that position. - He has a master's degree in history from Tribhuvan University and an MPhil in defense and strategic science from Madras University, India. 2. Janwadi singer JB Tuhure (Juth Bahadur Khadgi) died when? V.No. August 2078 103. When was the CPN (Unified Socialist) led by Madhav Kumar Nepal recognized as a party? V.No. August 9, 2078 - (Departing from NCP UML, Madhav Kumar Nepal Party submitted an application to Election Commission for registration of CPN (Unified Socialist) Party.) 4. How many basic guidelines have been issued by international development partners regarding providing aid in Nepal? 15 points - Various fourteen international development partners issued 15 points basic guidance for the operation of the program in June 2019, saying that they will provide accountable and fair, transparent and inclusive support based on internationally accepted principles and not on the basis of caste, religion, sect and political party in Nepal. – United Nations, European Union, Danida Program Support Unit Nepal, Swiss Agency for Development and Cooperation (SDC), Norwegian Embassy, ​​Association of INGOs, Australian Aid, Korean Development Agency (KOICA), Embassy of Finland, German Cooperation Agency, Netherlands Development Organization, US Embassy, Basic guidance issued by UK Aid and JICA.- Basic guidance on operations was first issued in 2002 during the armed conflict and then with minor modifications in 2007. 5. Since when was the start of the national campaign of farmer registration in Nepal? V.No. February 22, 2077 - The campaign was launched by launching the farmer listing management system prepared by the Ministry of Agriculture and Livestock Development. - It is believed that the real farmers will get the services provided by the government after the listing campaign. National Planning Commission has approved how many industrial areas to proceed as multi-year projects?- Three. (Daiji-Chela of Kanchanpur, Banke's Nauvasta and Makwanpur's Mayurdhap)- In the meeting of the Commission on Chait 9, 2077, a decision was also taken to seek the approval of the Ministry of Finance to ensure resources while giving approval to advance those industrial areas as a multi-year project. - These are also included in the project bank of the Industrial Area Commission. - According to the multi-year contract standards, 2077, the commission has approved the development of these industrial areas as multi-year projects. It is mentioned in the standards to be promoted. 7. Who is the Rana Prime Minister who stopped the Charkha Prachar campaign conducted by the famous social worker Tulsi Mehr with the aim of raising public awareness? Bhimshamsher 8. When was the establishment of the International Renewable Energy Agency (IRENA) with the objective of widespread and sustainable use of renewable energy worldwide? After the Parliament meeting of January 29, 2009 - October 25, 2074 unanimously approved the legislation, the way for Nepal to become a member of that body became easy. Nepal will formally become a member of the body after sending the document approved by the parliament to the IRENA headquarters in the UAE. In 2009, participating in the founding conference held in Bonn, Germany, Nepal pledged to become a member by signing the relevant statute, but the formal process could not proceed. - A total of 165 countries, including all member states of SAARC, became members of the delegation. 9. Since when did the Nepal Electricity Authority make arrangements to pay the electricity tariff through the online system? V.No. August 2074 510. Patan's Sundari Chowk has been opened for public since when? V.No. 2074 November 1211. Dadichi means charity and tyagi, but what does Bhagirath mean? Hardworking12. If the method used in the treatment of cancer is chemotherapy/radium therapy, which method is used in the treatment of leprosy? Multi drug therapy 13. Which is the first Asian country to be declared land mine free? Nepal
 Abolition of child labor 
15. When was the first postage stamp published in Nepal? V.No. 1938 
16. When was the establishment of the Money Laundering Investigation Department? V.No. 2068 July 20 
17. When was the National Project Bank launched? V.No. January 26, 2076 - (After the implementation of the National Project Bank, only the projects included in it will be included in the budget.) 
17. When was the Asia Pacific Economic Cooperation established? 1989 - This organization, which had only 12 countries at the time of its establishment, currently has 21 member countries. - Its head office is in Singapore. - The first conference of this organization was held in Australia in 1989. 
18. Since when has the government arranged for a 'smart card' in driver's license? V.No. 2072 November 14
19. What is the name of the world's first Artificial Intelligence (AI) female journalist built by China? Shin Shaomeg - Shaomeg can read the news for 24 hours and read the news like a professional news anchor. - Shaomeg was released on February 20, 2019. Presenter: Tank K.C. 
Ratio of revenue to gross domestic product
1. What should be done to increase the ratio of revenue in Nepal's GDP? describe. Gross domestic product is the value of goods and services produced within the country in a year. Revenue mobilization in proportion to GDP in Nepal. In 2063/64, it was 12.1 percent and now it is 24 percent. Currently, the gross domestic product of Nepal is 42 trillion 76 billion. In the current fiscal year 207879, the government has set a target of revenue collection of 10 trillion 24 billion. Which is 24 percent of the current gross domestic product. The current Fifteenth Plan expects the ratio of revenue to reach 32.2 percent of the country's gross domestic product by the fiscal year 2080/81. In developed countries, its ratio has reached 45 percent. 45 percent in France, Denmark, Norway, Italy, Cuba, The Netherlands has a high ratio of revenue collection of 40 percent. Even in Nepal, the ratio of revenue to gross domestic product should be increased. For this, the following measures should be adopted:- Because of the open border between Nepal and India, a large amount of revenue has been leaking for years. It should be stopped. Fences should be put up on the border, border patrols should be increased. - Taxation by bringing all informal economies under the scope of taxation, - Reducing the tax rate and increasing the scope, - Taxing all areas of income generation, - Creating an investment-friendly environment in the country by improving policy, institutional and procedural aspects, developing small and large industries, import and consumption. Making the based revenue production-oriented, - Making every citizen's bank account and permanent account number compulsory, - Reviewing the discount facilities given in value added tax and customs,
2. Public finance of NepalWhat are the problems seen in management? Mention. Public finance management is the task of achieving high and sustainable economic growth through systematic mobilization of public income and expenditure. It is the function of managing the income and expenditure of the government. This is also the task of managing the annual budget. This includes increasing revenue mobilization, mobilizing expenses in productive areas, creating jobs, arranging sustainable sources of revenue, and building a self-sufficient economy. Its purpose is to maintain economic growth, economic stability and social justice. Nepal has a constitutional, legal and institutional arrangement regarding public finance management. There are three levels of government in operation in the country and public finance management functions have been done by all three levels of government and various problems have been seen in it, which can be mentioned as follows:- lack of resources, Not being able to maintain cooperation and interdependence, - Not being able to institutionalize the medium-term expenditure structure, project banks to the provincial and local levels, - Not being able to develop capital expenditure as a source of sustainable revenue by spending it in productive sectors that create employment, - In the work of managing public income and expenditure. Weakness of financial discipline, - Lack of full compliance with financial procedures and financial responsibility law, rules, budget direction, - Lack of functional coordination between monitoring and evaluation agencies. - Due to the above mentioned problems, Nepal's public finance management has not been successful. For this, there should be full compliance with prevailing laws, sufficient coordination and cooperation between the three levels of government, formulating an executable budget, developing the capacity of the implementation mechanism, and making monitoring and evaluation result-oriented.
3. Which are the agencies involved in the development of insurance business in Nepal? Mentioning what should be the role of those bodies? Discuss. The process of transferring risk to one another by paying a fixed fee is insurance business. It is a financial security. Currently, one reinsurance company, nineteen life insurance companies and twenty non-life insurance companies are operating in the insurance business, which is an integral part of the financial system of Nepal. About one lakh insurance agents and about four hundred and fifty insurance surveyors are employed in the insurance business. Both the government and private sectors have made insurance compulsory. As a result of all these efforts, insurance services have reached twenty-seven percent of the total population. Legal and institutional arrangements have been made to manage the insurance business and yet this sector is not problem-free. In particular, the scope of insurance business is still narrow, the level of public awareness about insurance is low, Unable to expand the institutional structure of insurance according to the federal structure, complex and slow insurance claim payment process, inability to increase qualitative services with the numerical increase of insurance companies, concentration of insurance companies and their branches in cities, time-to-time evaluation of the assets and liabilities of insurance companies and giving confidence to the insured. There are problems such as not being able to work effectively. The Ministry of Finance, Insurance Committee, Insurance Companies, Insurance Surveyors, Insurance Agents, Insured Persons and General Citizens are involved in the development of Nepal's insurance business. The role of these bodies in the development of insurance business should be as follows. à Role of the Ministry of Finance - The Ministry of Finance is the leader of policy making for the overall economy of Nepal. It has a multifaceted role in the development of insurance business, which can be mentioned as follows:- V.No. Since the Insurance Act and Regulations of 2049 cannot cover all aspects of insurance, it needs to be reformed and amended at the same time. According to the federal structure, increasing the institutional presence up to the state and local levels, - Creating an environment of fair competition by setting criteria for the selection of insurance committees and executive heads of insurance companies, - The role of the insurance committee - The insurance committee is a body that regulates and supervises the insurance business. Therefore, it has a great role in the development of the insurance business, which can be mentioned as follows: - Preparing simple and transparent standards for the regulation and supervision of insurance companies, - Monitoring workplaces and non-workplaces, - Risk-based inspections, Its extensive expansion and development is necessary as it helps to protect not only social activities but life itself. It seems that insurance should be developed as a reliable sector of financial investment by the above bodies performing their respective roles.
4. What are the functions of federal parliament? write The constitution of Nepal has provided for a bicameral legislature as a federal parliament. The lower house of the federal parliament of Nepal is called the House of Representatives and the upper house is called the National Assembly. The functions of the Parliament are as follows:- Making laws on the jurisdiction of the Union,- Forming the government,- Discussing and passing the government's policies and programs,- Discussing and passing the budget, controlling the budget,- Amending the constitution,- Referendum collection Making decisions, - monitoring the regular work of the government, - giving necessary suggestions to the government, giving instructions, - approving international treaties and agreements, Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
1. When was the Judicial Museum inaugurated with the purpose of providing information about the judicial system and judicial history? V.No. August 1, 2078 - In the museum built in the Supreme Court complex, documents reflecting the step-by-step history of the justice sector were collected. Civil Act issued in 1945, V.No. Amendments up to 1991, Civil Act of 2020, V.No. Materials such as the Nepal Gazette of 2008 have been collected in the museum. It is believed that the museum will help the future generations of the justice and legal sector to study the development, condition and changes of the justice system of Nepal. 
2. Who is the successful politician to become the first woman Chief Minister of Nepal? Ashtalakshmi Shakya (NECPA UML parliamentary party leader Ashtalakshmi Shakya has been appointed as the Chief Minister of Bagmati Province.)
3. Since when has the online monitoring system been implemented with the aim of regulating public transport? V.No. 2077 November 4 
4. Who is the Nepali creator who set a world record by recording 12 lines of songs in 12 international languages? Dr. DR Upadhyay 
5. V.No. According to the public report by the Urban Development Fund in February 2077, which municipality is the best in terms of project implementation and management? Lalbandi Municipality (Sarlahi)
6. When will the 10th World Conference of Non-Resident Nepali Association be held? V.No. October 6-8, 2078 (Kathmandu) - The government of Nepal has given priority to the policy of mobilizing the knowledge, skills, capital, technology, network and access of Nepalis abroad for the economic and social development of Nepal. - In the conference, Nepalis who are scattered around the world gather in their homeland, where the new direction of action necessary to raise the identity of Nepalis in the world is searched for and new leadership is selected along with the reform and modification of the association. 
7. Which is the new drug recently recommended by the World Health Organization for the treatment of corona infection? Interleukin-6 (IL-6) - WHO recommended this drug on July 6, 2021. - This drug is believed to be effective in increasing immunity.
8. Who is the Nepali doctor who will be honored with the World Health Award 2020? Dr. Pashupati Mahat and Dr. Arun Raj Kunwar 
9. When was the inauguration of the reconstructed tower? V.No. Baisakh 11, 2078 - The newly built tower is 83.85 meters high from the ground to the gajur. This Dharahara built in style was designed by Vishnu Panthi.- The old name of the Dharahara was Minar.- The old Dharahara was built by Bhimsen Thapa. On December 12, 2075, by the then Prime Minister KP Sharma Oli. V. No. for the construction of the tower. On February 4, 2072, the campaign 'I will make my Dharahara' was announced (by the then prom KP Sharma Oli).
10. What is the changed slogan of government media of Nepal? Communication for Samaddhi - The previous slogan was 'Communication for development'.- Nepal Television, Radio Nepal, Rasas and Gorkhapatra are the government media of Nepal. 
11. Where is the first liquid oxygen plant established in the country? Simarhawa (Rupandehi) – It was inaugurated in B.S. Held on June 30, 2078.- 60 metric tons of oxygen will be produced daily in this plant. 
12. Who is Nepal's first female FIFA referee? Kalpana Sharma 
13. When is World Tuberculosis Day celebrated? March 24 (2021 Slogan: Sign Time to End Tuberculosis)
14. When is National Women's Rights Day celebrated? May 16 – V.No. The third National Women's Rights Day was celebrated with the slogan 'Women's safety and rights: crisis management is our concern' on May 16, 2078.- The resolution submitted in the House of Representatives regarding women's rights and rights V.No. Commemorating the day passed by the House of Representatives on 16 June 2063, this day was started to be celebrated every year on 16 June. With attention to reaching the goal of participation, the guarantee of participation of at least one-third of women in all structures of the state, the repeal of discriminatory laws and the end of violence against women are included in the proposal.
15. A.W. How much senior citizen allowance has been provided through the 2078/79 budget? Rs. Four thousand - A.V. The budget of 2076/77 increased the allowance from two thousand rupees to three thousand rupees.- At present, monthly allowance is given to senior citizens who have reached the age of 70.- A.W. Senior citizen allowance has been provided since 2051/52. Initially, a monthly social security allowance of 100 rupees was provided to the elderly who completed 75 years. 
16. Writer Dr. When did Wanira Giri pass away? V.No. 2078 June 9- (Dr. Girika Karagar (novel), Shabdatheet Santanu (novel), Yuk Akro Janga Bahadur (poetry collection) and other famous works have been published.) 
17. When did the Supreme Court issue a 6-point order to the government to effectively implement the announcement to ban the use of thin plastic bags (less than 40 microns)? V.No. 28 July 2078
18. When did Saudi Arabia lift the embargo on Qatar? January 5, 2021 - (Qatar was banned by Saudi Arabia 3 years ago.) 
19. Before 2007, Nepal had diplomatic relations with how many countries? Four (UK, US, India and France) 
20. Where is the world's tallest hotel opened? China (J Hotel) - The hotel built in Shanghai, China has been operating since June 19, 2021. - The height of the hotel is 632 meters. 
21. Which country has the most refugees in the world? Syria 
22. When is World Turtle Day celebrated? May 23 
23. Who is the first Dalit secretary in the history of Nepal? Dr. Man Bahadur V.K.
24. When was the campaign called 'Smart Daughter' launched in line with the objective of providing digital literacy and financial literacy to 10,000 girls and women? V.No. 2075 February 11 
25. When was Kisan Credit Card and Kisan App launched by Krishi Bikas Bank? V. No. 2077 January 7 
26. Janakpur-Jayanagar rail-way train service has been resumed since when? V.No. October 3, 2077 (Service operated by 2 trains.) 
27. Where is the statue built in honor of tea workers? Elam (Unveiling: 25 November 2077) 
28. The United Nations has called for which year to be a therapeutic year? Year 2021 
29. When was the establishment of Armed Police Force, Border Security Post (BOP) of Nepal in Kalapani border area (Vyas rural municipality-1, Changru) of Darchula district? V.No. 2077 Baisakh 31
30. During the Lichchavik period, what was the name of the place for revenue collection, land purchase and sale and land related issues? Kuther Tribunal Presenter : Tank K.C. 
Gender Responsive Budgeting
1. What is Gender Responsive Budgeting? How does it empower women? Mention. Gender responsive budgeting is the act of fair allocation of public resources to maintain equality between women and men. This is not a separate budget for women. It is such a budget or program or project, which helps to bring about positive change in the lives of women by making numerical and qualitative participation of women in all aspects of project formulation, implementation, monitoring and evaluation and impact evaluation of the project. This budget started in 1984 from Australia. In Nepal Gender budget has been implemented since 2064/65.- It helps to maintain equality between women and men, to distribute public resources and assets equitably, women and men have different needs, It helps to address them in the same way. Gender Responsive Budget Empowerment of Women - It empowers women by making active and meaningful participation of women at all levels including project and program formulation, implementation, monitoring and evaluation and impact assessment. Project design level:- By making equal participation of women and men,- By making women participate qualitatively and numerically,- By prioritizing projects that benefit women,- By choosing projects that increase women's employment, Project implementation level:- By giving the leadership of project implementation to women, - By implementing the project with the collective participation of women, - By increasing the capacity of women, - By increasing the employment and income of women, - By creating an environment in which women control the income, - By involving women in removing obstacles and obstacles at the implementation level, - The cost of income and expenses of the project. , accounting,
2. What are the basic issues of Nepal's national interest? Mention. In Article 5 of the Constitution of Nepal, there is a provision of national interest that some subjects remain as the national interest of Nepal. The constitution also provides that conduct and actions adverse to the national interest are punishable according to federal laws. The basic issues of Nepal's national interest highlighted by the constitution are as follows:- Independence of Nepal,- Sovereignty,- Geographical integrity,- Nationality,- Independence,- Self-respect,- Protection of the rights and interests of Nepalese,- Border security,- Economic growth and prosperity.
3. What are the strengths and weaknesses of Nepal's government accounting system? The accounting system adopted for the systematic recording of income and expenditure of the government agencies of Nepal and its accurate reporting is the new Sresta system. This Sresta vs. no. Effective from 2019 It was gradually implemented throughout Nepal until 2024-25. In this accounting system implemented at both the central level and operational levels, accounts are kept in cash, the rest of the transactions are not accounted for. This accounting is based on double accounting system. The following are the strengths and weaknesses of this accounting system, which is keeping separate accounts of allocation, revenue, bonds, and projects. Transparent,- fixed form to keep accounts,- system of budget control,- strong system of internal control,- uniformity in all offices,
4. What is the reason for more rain in the eastern region of Nepal? Mention. Rainfall in Nepal is mainly due to monsoon winds. This type of air starts from the Bay of Bengal in summer and enters from the eastern region of Nepal, the high mountains of Nepal trap such moist air and make it rain. Due to this, the influence of monsoon air is longest in the east and least in the west. Therefore, the rainfall is more in the eastern part of Nepal, less in the west and even less in the Himalayan and Trans-Himalayan districts of Manang, Mustang.
5. Which are the agencies involved in the development of Nepal's capital market? Mentioning what should be their role? Discuss. A capital market is a market where there is a demand and supply of capital for more than one year. It is a tool to measure the financial strength of the country. It plays an important role in building capital by mobilizing the scattered small amount. For the development of the capital market in Nepal, the Securities Act, 2063 and various regulations under it, Commodity Exchange Act, 2074 and Regulations, 2074 etc. have been made. Ministry of Finance, Nepal Rastra Bank, Nepal Securities Board, Nepal Stock Exchange, Commodity Exchange, There is involvement of institutional and individual general investors including share traders. Their role in the development of the capital market should be as follows: Role of the Ministry of Finance - The Ministry of Finance is the leader of the overall economy of Nepal. It has a multifaceted role in the development of the capital market, which can be mentioned as follows: - Amending the laws and regulations related to securities, - Increasing the institutional capacity of the Nepal Securities Board, - Attracting foreign investors by creating an investment-friendly environment in the country, - Providing assurance of policy stability, - Uncharacteristic of the stock market. Creating an environment that does not allow prices to increase or decrease, - Establishing a new stock exchange, - Starting a barter market, - Nepal Securities Board, Choosing professional leadership in Nepal Stock Exchange. Role of Nepal Rastra Bank - Nepal Rastra Bank plays a major role in maintaining the development and stability of the country's financial system through monetary policy. It stabilizes interest rate, exchange rate, inflation rate, balances money supply in the market through flexible and tight monetary policy. Its role in the capital market should be as follows: - Creating a favorable environment for investment in the stock market, - Increasing credit flow in the stock market, - Making credit flow simple and transparent, - Strengthening banks and financial institutions, - Strengthening the financial base of financial institutions by effective merger policy. - Helping manufacturing companies to enter the stock market - Conducting financial literacy campaigns - Expanding bank and financial institution branches up to the local ward level and increasing financial access. - Assisting in creating an investment environment in the capital market. Role of Nepal Securities Board - Nepal Securities Board is the body that regulates and supervises the capital market. Therefore, it has a great role in the development of the capital market, which can be mentioned as follows: - Preparing standards for the regulation and supervision of the stock market, - Monitoring workplace and non-workplace, inspecting based on risk, - Preventing stock market fluctuations, - Listed companies, investors and To prepare an environment of fair competition among share traders, - to emphasize on maintaining institutional governance, - to set and apply various standards in capital market development, - to increase barter transactions by giving permission to companies with infrastructure for barter market, - to take the initiative to establish stock exchange outside the valley, - Strictly controlling the insider trading of the stock market which is done in secret, - Arranging incentives for institutional investors in the stock market.- Role of Nepal Stock Exchange Nepal Stock Exchange is the only body that deals in the secondary market of shares. Its role in the capital market should be as follows:- Increasing the number of listed companies,- Increasing the number of manufacturing sector companies in the listed companies,- Developing clean competition between them by increasing the number of share traders,- Increasing the presence of share traders outside the valley,- Communicating accurate stock market information,- New technology. Increasing usage, - Increasing the involvement of foreign strategic partners and making institutional improvements. The role of the barter market - Preparing the necessary infrastructure and starting the barter market transactions, - Keeping the transaction price of goods in harmony with the local market price, - Maintaining transparency and cleanliness in the bartering of goods. Share The role of businessmen – to expand nationwide network, - Promoting online share buying and selling, - Maintaining hygiene in the buying and selling of shares, - Conducting financial literacy programs, - Supporting the development of the stock market through competition, the role of investors - Investing by analyzing the risks of the company you are investing in, - Investing by understanding the state of stock fluctuations. - Emphasizing on institutional investment - Understanding the financial condition of the company you have invested in, regularly participating in the company's activities, - Assisting in expanding public awareness about the capital market, - Finally, since the capital market is a source of long-term capital formation and mobilization, it needs to be clean, competitive and developed. is For this, it seems that the related agencies have to play their respective roles. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma - Supporting the development of the stock market through competition, the role of the investor - Investing after analyzing the risks of the company you invest in, - Investing by understanding the stock fluctuations, - Emphasis on institutional investment, - Understanding the financial condition of the company you invest in, Regular participation in the company's activities, - Assisting in expanding public awareness about the capital market, - Finally, since the capital market is a source of long-term capital formation and mobilization, it needs to be clean, competitive and developed. For this, it seems that the related agencies have to play their respective roles. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma - Supporting the development of the stock market through competition, the role of the investor - Investing after analyzing the risks of the company you invest in, - Investing by understanding the stock fluctuations, - Emphasis on institutional investment, - Understanding the financial condition of the company you invest in, Regular participation in the company's activities, - Assisting in expanding public awareness about the capital market, - Finally, since the capital market is a source of long-term capital formation and mobilization, it needs to be clean, competitive and developed. For this, it seems that the related agencies have to play their respective roles. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma Regular participation in the activities of the company, - Assisting in the expansion of public awareness about the capital market, - Finally, since the capital market is a source of long-term capital formation and mobilization, it needs to be clean, competitive and developed. For this, it seems that the related agencies have to play their respective roles. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma Regular participation in the activities of the company, - Assisting in the expansion of public awareness about the capital market, - Finally, since the capital market is a source of long-term capital formation and mobilization, it needs to be clean, competitive and developed. For this, it seems that the related agencies have to play their respective roles. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
1. By Nepal Rastra Bank When was the monetary policy of 207879 announced? V.No. July 29, 2078 - In the policy announced virtually by Governor Mahaprasad Adhikari, the goal of limiting inflation to an average of 6.5 percent has been taken, - Continuation of the package affected by Covid in the monetary policy, - Banks undergoing mergers will get concessions for the next two years, - The existence of development banks and finance companies in the monetary policy. The policy of merging into commercial banks has been discouraged in order to save, - The expansion of wide currency providers will be 18 percent and the expansion of loans to the private sector will be 19 percent, - The limit of co-financing loans will be increased from one billion to two billion, - At least one branch and one ATM at the local level should be made disabled-friendly, - Commerce Microfinance financial institutions with double investment (cross holding) of banks, development banks and finance companies should go for merger by the end of June 2079.
2. Which country will win the first, second and third place in the 32nd Summer Olympic Games held in 2021? Respectively, America, China and Japan - America got 113 medals with 39 gold, 41 silver and 33 bronze, China got 88 medals with 38 gold, 32 silver and 18 bronze and Japan managed to get 58 medals with 27 gold, 14 silver and 17 bronze. - The countries that managed to stay in the third to tenth place in the competition are Britain, Russia, Australia, Italy, Germany, Netherlands and France respectively.- 33 games were included in this sports competition. 
3. When did the government declare Bhakti Thapa as a national hero? V.No. June 14, 2078 - With him being declared a national hero, the number of national heroes in Nepal has reached 17. - Thapa achieved heroism at the age of 73 in the battle of Deuthal.
4. When was the National Food Bank inaugurated? V.No. 2078 Baisakh 2- (The slogan of the National Food Bank, which has its head office in Nyanbaneshwar, is 'sustainable agriculture for nutritious food'.) 
5. When was the start of offering offerings through 'QR code' system in Pashupati? V.No. 2077 February 14- (Donations can be made to the account of Pashupati Area Development Fund through the online payment system using mobile phones.) 
6. When was the foundation stone of 165 roads laid all over the country? V.No. 21 March 2077 
7. When was the vaccination campaign against Corona started in Nepal? V.No. January 14, 2077 
8. Since when has Mobile Device Management System (MDMS) been implemented in Nepal? V.No. July 1, 2078
9. When was the establishment of the Global Center for Cyber ​​Security? January 26, 2018 - This organization was established by the World Economic Forum with the aim of providing a safe cyberspace by discouraging cybercriminal activities. - Its headquarters is in Geneva, Switzerland. 
10. The main residence of the Lepcha race is Elam and where is the main residence of the Gandharva race? Batulechaur, Kaski 
11. Who is the successful Nepali talent in Forbes Under Thirty Asia 2021? Gaurika Singh (swimmer) 
12. When was the Young Scientists Forum (YSFN) inaugurated by NAST with the aim of developing science and technology? V.No. 2077 October 9 
13. When was the peace agreement between Israel and the UAE? September 15, 2020
14. Who is the person who made the maps used by the geographical explorers Christopher Columbus and Vasco da Gama? Muhammad al-Idrisi 
15. When is International Forest Day celebrated? March 21- (2021 Slogan: Forest Restoration: A Path to Recovery and Well Being) 
16. When was the 47th meeting of the G-7 nations completed? 2021 June 11-13 
17. Who is the Nepali who succeeded in becoming an international judge in all three categories of Taekwondo (Gerogi, Poomse and Para)? Ashok Khadka
18. When was the draft peace agreement signed between the government side and the opposition party (Sudan People's Liberation Movement-SPLM) in Sudan, which has been in the grip of conflict for a long time? January 24, 2020 - Security and governance issues were included in the agreement. - The opposition party SPLM Southern Region led an armed rebellion in the Blue Nile region. The group has been active in the border region of South Sudan since 2011. 
19. Which is the local level that brings the plan of one ward, one black road? 20 , Taplejung, Fungling District 
. Ramon Magsaysay Award, known as Asia's Nobel Prize, has been awarded since when? 1958 - Nepalese who have received this award till now - 1. Maheshchandra Regmi 1997-2. Bharatdatta Koirala 2002-3. Dr. Ark Ruit Year 2006-4. Mahavir Pun 2007-5. Shakti Group Year 2013
21. When did Nepal get membership of Interpol? September 27, 1967 - Established in September 1923, the head office of this organization is located in Lyon, France. - The official languages ​​of this organization are four - English, French, Spanish and Arabic. Issuance.- It has 194 members. 
22. In terms of area, the largest sub-metropolitan city is Ghorahi (Dang) and which is the smallest sub-metropolitan city? Nepalganj, Banke - The largest sub-metropolitan city in terms of population: Janakpur.- The sub-metropolitan city with the largest number of wards: Kalaiya (twelve, 27 wards). 
23. Kosi Agreement Vs. If it was on 12th Baisakh, 2011, when was the Gandak agreement? V.No. December 19, 2016
24. When did American President Joe Wyden announce the withdrawal of American troops from Afghanistan on May 1, 2021? 2021 April 14 
25. Jewelery Museum is in Bhadrakali (Kathmandu) and where is Bagmati Civilization Museum? Guhyeshwari (Kathmandu) 
26. When was lidar survey started by surveying department to get information about land form? V.No. 21 May 2078
27. When was the 'Montreal Convention, 1999' passed by the Parliament of Nepal, which provides for the unification of international air transport regulations? V.No. August 7, 2075 - With the passage of the convention, Nepal became a party to this convention. - The provision that this convention will be implemented after 60 days of registration with the International Civil Aviation Organization (ICAO) along with the information about the passage of the convention. Foreign travelers will get insurance facilities in various incidents that may occur. Now, in case of loss of passenger's life while traveling through international air services, compensation of around two and a half million rupees will be received.- Before this, Nepal was only a party to the 'Warsaw Convention 1929' and the Hague Protocol 1955. According to that, the Nepali people who lost their lives in the air accident will get only 20 thousand US dollars.
28. When did the United Arab Emirates (UAE) announce that it can grant citizenship to foreign citizens who can contribute to the country's development? 2021 January 30 
29. How many species of snakes are found in Nepal? 83 
30. Astronomical bodies including stars, planets, satellites, asteroids, meteors, comets and very large groups of dust and gaseous matter are called what? Star cluster - (The star cluster in the solar system is called galaxy star cluster, which is arch-shaped.) 
Presenter: Tank K.C. 
Project management and implementation
1. What are the problems of project management in Nepal? Mention and write measures to make project implementation effective. It is a means and means project to support the economic and social transformation of the country by producing and distributing goods and services. The National Planning Commission and the Ministry of Finance are active in project management in Nepal. In this, the relevant project heads and related ministries have been made more responsible. There is a system of monitoring and evaluation from the highest level to bring effectiveness in project implementation. A project bank has been established to manage the project. Legal and institutional arrangements have been made for project management, but the project has not been managed in Nepal. Various problems have been seen in it, which can be mentioned as follows: - Inability to design an implementable project based on the real needs of the people, - Designing the project, Not to transfer the employees involved throughout the project period, - To maintain discipline by fully following the laws and regulations, - To arrange tools, mechanisms and procedures, to arrange the budget on time at the implementation site, - To have the active participation of the people concerned from the project design and implementation to the maintenance level, - In the project design To increase functional coordination between executing, implementing and monitoring agencies, to prepare indicators and monitor continuously, - to receive progress reports from the implementation level from taluk agencies, - to award projects only after analyzing the technical and financial capabilities of project contractors, to hold projects that exceed the capacity of contractors Termination of the work, - taking strict action against those who do not complete the contract, purchase and construction work on time, - In Nepal, the state has already invested heavily in the project. This is a matter related to the prosperity of the country. Government investment can be utilized only when, When the project gives the right return. For this, special emphasis should be placed on effective implementation, monitoring, maintenance and supervision from project formulation. Projects of national needs and priorities should be drawn up. People's participation should be given more importance.
2. What are the indicators of economic development? write Indicators of economic development are indicators of the overall development of the economy. These indicators are related to four sectors of the economy. The indicators related to the real sector of the economy, public finance sector, banking and financial sector and external sector or foreign trade and payment sector are as follows: - Gross Domestic Product, - Gross Domestic Savings, - Total National Income, - Total National Savings, - Inflation Rate, - Revenue mobilization: - Tax revenue, non-tax revenue, - Government expenditure: - Current expenditure, capital expenditure, financial system, - Pending public debt: - Internal debt, foreign debt, - Credit flowing to the private sector, - Compressed money supply and Detailed money supply, – total bank deposits, – export and import situation, – trade deficit, – income from tourism, – remittance income,
3. Discuss the ways to solve social evils. Social distortions are obstacles to social development, they are social diseases. In Nepal, especially, there are social disorders such as untouchability, dowry, drug addiction, child labor exploitation, sale of virgins, corruption, superstition, deuki, jhuma, kamaiya, chaupadi. In Nepal, such deformities are basically due to poverty and illiteracy. For this, it should be resolved by creating jobs and expanding education and public awareness. Other measures are as follows: - Reducing gender discrimination and inequality, - Ending violence against women from home, - Emphasizing women's education and adult education in all remote and accessible places. ,- To inform about the rights given to women by the Constitution, Acts, Rules and Laws and to ensure that they are followed, - To arrange sufficient resources for the rescue and rehabilitation of women who are victims of violence, - Dowry,
4. Give a brief introduction to the World Customs Organization and discuss the role it plays in trade facilitation. The World Customs Organization is an independent intergovernmental body that manages the world's customs administration. It was established on January 26, 1953 as the World Customs Co-operation Council. Currently, there are 183 national members in this organization. The head office of this organization is in Brussels, Belgium. Nepal became a member of this organization on July 22, 1985. In this organization, the general secretary of the organization is the executive head. The annual council meeting of this organization is held every year. The annual council determines policy, In which the heads of customs of the member states are represented. The World Customs Organization follows the principles and practices set forth by the World Trade Organization. - The role of the World Customs Organization in trade facilitation - Trade facilitation is a situation where goods are imported and exported simply and regularly without any obstacles in trade between countries. The World Customs Organization and the World Trade Organization have been working at the international level to facilitate the import and export of goods. The role played by the World Customs Organization in trade facilitation can be mentioned as follows: - Formulating and implementing international policies, plans and programs related to customs management, - Interpreting international treaties related to customs and maintaining uniformity in the implementation of such treaties, - Providing opinions to the World Trade Organization on customs assessment. counseling,
5. What kind of development policies are there in Nepal's constitution? Mention. Article 51 (f) of the Constitution of Nepal has made a policy arrangement regarding development in Nepal, which can be mentioned as follows: Development - Balanced and inclusive economic development in all accessible and remote areas of the country, - Formulation and coordinated implementation of strategies and programs for sustainable socio-economic development, - Backward from the point of view of development. Prioritizing the affected areas, - Physical infrastructure (balanced, environmentally friendly, quality and sustainable) development, - Increasing local people's participation in the process of development, - Priority in the distribution of the benefits of development, fair distribution to the general public. Research and development - Scientific study research, - Science and technology Increasing investment in development, - Protection of scientific, technical, intellectual and special talents. - Information technology - Development and expansion of information technology, - Easy and simple access of citizens, - The highest use of information technology in every field of development. - Integrated national identity card - Development of integrated national identity card management information system, - Integrated management of all/every type of information and details of citizens, - Affiliation with state service facilities. - Population statistics - Update of population statistics, - Linkage with development plan.
6. What should be the behavior and conduct of employees towards customers? write The customer is the service recipient, the employee is the service provider. The service provider must display good behavior and conduct towards the service customer. Which should be according to the following: - The work of the client should be done on time, if the work cannot be done on time, the basis and reason should be given, - The client should be treated with respect, - Be polite when answering, be responsible to the client, - Work with the interests of the client in mind, - Elderly, infirm, disabled , pregnant women, children, the helpless should be given priority,- providing service in simple and easy language,- increasing the reach of the service recipient in service delivery,- timely informing the service recipient about the process of getting the service, the time required, the cost,- following the conduct according to their position,- fair and quality Providing service, - providing service quickly,
 
1. When did Paras Khadka, former captain of the Nepali national cricket team, announce his retirement from international cricket? V.No. On July 19, 2078 - he announced his retirement from international cricket through social media. - Under his leadership, the Nepali team got ODI recognition and reached the T20 World Cup.
2. What is the process of bending or changing direction when a ray of light enters another medium? Rotation of light - (Because the speed of light is different in different mediums, the rotation of light occurs.) 3. When will the government announce the results of Secondary Education Examination (SEE) of class 10? V.No. On July 23, 2078, the results were published based on the internal evaluation of the school. - According to the National Examination Board, out of 517,122 students who applied to the board, 32,844 students missed the certification. The assessment of the board is that those students may not have participated in the examination or may have dropped out in the middle.- Last year also due to the corona virus, the examination results were released based on the internal evaluation done by the school itself.
4. Which is the first province to form the Provincial Sports Development Council? Province 3 (year 2076 June 24) 
5. The script of Lepcha language is called Rong and what is the script of Tamang language called? tamihg
6. When was the computer system developed by Employees Provident Fund for Contributory Pension Scheme launched? V.No. On August 31, 2076, the fund issued V.No. With the responsibility of implementing the contribution-based pension plan for all employees of the government service who will be permanently appointed from July 1, 2076, the computer system was created in terms of the preparation for the operation. In addition to this, the fund said that other necessary structural, procedural and systemic preparations have also been completed.- To meet the needs of savers, the fund has been providing savings facilities such as special loan, educational loan, house loan, house repair loan and saver simple cycle loan from the amount accumulated in the fund. - Similarly, by setting up a social security fund from the profits, maternity care, rent expenses, Accident Compensation and Savings Funder Health Insurance Program is being conducted.- The Fund has invested loans in various hydropower projects promoted by Upper Tamakosi, Chilime Hydropower Company for the infrastructure development of the country. Similarly, the Nepal Air Service Corporation has invested in a loan for the purchase of an aircraft.- The fund has also started the construction process of Karnali hydropower project so that the majority of the shares are owned by the funders.- According to the Employees' Provident Fund Act, 2019. This organization was established on August 31, 2019. It has invested loans in various hydropower projects promoted by Chilime Hydropower Company. Similarly, the Nepal Air Service Corporation has invested in a loan for the purchase of an aircraft.- The fund has also started the construction process of Karnali hydropower project so that the majority of the shares are owned by the funders.- According to the Employees' Provident Fund Act, 2019. This organization was established on August 31, 2019. It has invested loans in various hydropower projects promoted by Chilime Hydropower Company. Similarly, the Nepal Air Service Corporation has invested in a loan for the purchase of an aircraft.- The fund has also started the construction process of Karnali hydropower project so that the majority of the shares are owned by the funders.- According to the Employees' Provident Fund Act, 2019. This organization was established on August 31, 2019.
7. When and where was Mother Teresa born? 26 August 1910, North Macedonia (She is of Albanian descent) – (Died 5 September 1997, India) 8. According to Land Use Act, 2076, what is meant by agricultural area? Land that is or may be used for agricultural crops production, animal husbandry, farm house, fishery, beekeeping, sericulture including agricultural products, vegetable garden or forest garden, herbs and agroforestry.
9. Where is the famous Ramdhuni temple located? Sunsari - Located at a distance of seven kilometers from Jhumka Bazar on the East-West highway, fairs are held in this temple on important festivals such as Balachaturdashi, Shivratri, Ram Navami. The fire (dhuni) believed to have been lit by Lord Rama at that time is still burning. In addition, important historical objects such as the wheel of the chariot, the well, the jar used by Sita can also be seen here in the temple premises. 
10. Since when was the global campaign started with the aim of preserving the language of the indigenous tribes of Nepal? V.No. June 15, 2076 (from Thailand) 
11. What is meant by Operation Nightingale? A permanently running program to provide medical services to people suffering from natural disasters.
12. Which is the metallic planet found between Jupiter and Mars? Psyche - (This planet was discovered by the astronomer Anibal de Gasperis from Naples, Italy. It is estimated that there is a lot of gold in this asteroid.) 
13. Which country has started the gold card visa scheme for foreigners? United Arab Emirates (UAE) 
14. When was the Global Center for Cyber ​​Security established by the World Economic Forum? January 26, 2018 – The organization was established with the aim of providing a safe cyber space by discouraging cyber crime related activities. - The headquarters of this organization is in Geneva, Switzerland.
15. Where is the world's highest bungee jump made? China - This bungee jump was put into operation in the second half of 2020. - The bungee jump has been built on a 430-meter long glass-span bridge between Takura, two mountains in Hunan province, China. Visitors to the Zhangjiajie Ground Canyon Glass Bridge can enjoy themselves by bungee jumping from a height of 260 meters. 16. What is the process of separating the rays of different seven colors from sunlight using a prism? Light Discontinuity 
17. Which planets are known as the inner planets (kshlalabach ubilbhatak) i.e. the planets closest to the sun? Mercury, Venus, Earth, Mars – (Jupiter, Saturn, Arun and Varuna are known as outer planets (igatavacha abilbhatak) i.e. planets far from the Sun.)
18. With the aim of stopping the use of plastic and plastic-related materials, when was the 'Plastic-Free Society Building Campaign from Himal to Terai' started from Rara Lake? V.No. 26 November 2075 
19. What is the target of reducing the rate of malnutrition in Nepal by the year 2030? 14 percent (24 percent by 2025) 
20. Japan is known as the Great Britain of the East and which is known as the Great Britain of the South? New Zealand 
21. If Mercury is known as the planet without atmosphere, which planet is known as the planet without magnetic field? Fri
22. Since when did the BBC Nepali service start? June 7, 1969 - First weekly, then three days a week, then five days, now it is presented daily on dozens of FM frequencies across the country with news, opinions and analysis from the country and abroad. - BBC Nepali Service, which has been presenting objective news along with its background and in-depth analysis, has been popular among Nepali-speaking listeners in Nepal and around the world. 
23. Rijachayayinatha means the science of studying chronology, and what is meant by Riyakmayayinatha? The science of studying the origin of brands 
24. Which is the first SAARC country to ratify the Paris Agreement on climate change? Maldives – (Nepal ratified this agreement on October 24, 2016.)
25. 26. Under which Ministry is the Central Registration Department (body responsible for registering personal incidents)? Ministry of Federal Affairs and Local Development
Constitutional arrangement regarding the head of state 1. How much income tax is currently levied on employment income in Nepal? Mention. According to the Income Tax Act, 2058, income tax is levied on employment income in Nepal as follows: (a) In case of individuals: - One percent on taxable income up to four lakhs, - Ten percent on taxable income exceeding four lakhs up to five lakhs, - Twenty percent on taxable income exceeding five lakhs up to seven lakhs, - Thirty percent on taxable income exceeding seven lakhs and up to twenty lakhs, - In case of taxable income exceeding two lakhs, additional twenty percent additional tax at the tax rate of thirty percent of the taxable income, whichever is higher. Ten percent on taxable income exceeding four lakh fifty thousand up to five lakh fifty thousand, - Twenty percent on taxable income exceeding five lakh fifty thousand up to seven lakh fifty thousand, - Thirty percent on taxable income exceeding seven lakh fifty thousand up to twenty lakh, - If the taxable income is more than 20 lakhs, an additional twenty percent tax will be added to the tax rate of thirty percent of the taxable income, whichever is higher. An example of salary tax calculation: - A natural person with a taxable income of five lakhs and fifty thousand will be taxed up to four lakhs by one percent of Rs. Four thousand, four lakh to five lakh Rs. Ten percent of one lakh is Rs. Ten thousand and twenty percent of the remaining fifty thousand Rs. 10000 total to him Rs. Twenty-four thousand tax is levied. Exemption provision:- In case of taxpayers who are registered sole proprietorships, on pension income, There is a provision that one percent tax will not be levied on the income of a person who contributes to the pension fund and contribution-based social security fund.- There is a provision that the tax will be calculated only on the amount remaining after deducting from the taxable income up to a maximum of fifty thousand as prescribed for the remote allowance of the person working in the remote areas designated by the Government of Nepal. - Seventy-five percent of the foreign allowance of employees working in Nepal's diplomatic missions abroad will be deducted from the taxable income and tax will be calculated on the remaining amount. There is a provision to calculate the tax only.- The annual premium paid by the person for insurance or twenty five thousand rupees, whichever is less,
2. According to the Good Governance (Management and Operation) Act, 2064, what kind of policies does the Government of Nepal have to authorize while performing the administrative work of the country? Mention. While performing the administrative work of the country in addition to the policies stipulated in the Constitution and other prevailing laws in Section 7 of the Good Governance (Management and Operation) Act, 2064, which was designed to guarantee good governance in the country by transforming the administration mechanism into a service provider mechanism and facilitator, The government of Nepal is in a position to authorize the following policies:- (a) economic liberalization,- (b) poverty alleviation,- (c) social justice,- (d) sustainable and efficient management of natural and other public resources,- (e) women empowerment. and development of gender justice, - (f) environmental protection, - (g) upliftment of tribes, Dalits, economically and socially backward classes,
3. What is a commercial bank? Write the objectives of commercial banks. Banks that support the economic development of the country by collecting deposits from the general public, making payments, providing loans, and implementing monetary policy are called commercial banks. Its purpose is to earn profit. It is established with permission from the central bank. Objectives of commercial banks - Accepting deposits, - Providing loans, - Acting for economic interests, - Earning profits, - Implementing monetary policy, - Assisting in economic development, - Providing modern banking services.
4. Introducing self-tax assessment system in revenue, what kind of arrangement is there in Nepal? Discuss. Self-tax assessment system is the process by which the taxpayer determines the tax payable by himself and submits the tax amount and revenue by himself. Under this system, taxpayers do their own business records, determine their own taxes, collect their own taxes, file their income statements and tax returns at the tax office. Nepal's tax system is based on this belief. It holds the view that since only the taxpayer is aware of the real business situation of the taxpayer, he should be made responsible and accountable for tax assessment. With this, taxpayers automatically remit their tax amount to the government regularly, the tax administration's tax collection costs are reduced, taxpayers comply with tax laws, It helps in controlling tax evasion and ultimately increases revenue collection. Provisions on self-tax assessment system in Nepal - In both of these taxes, taxpayers have to keep records of their transactions, determine their own taxes, collect taxes themselves, file income statements and tax statements at the tax office. According to section 96 of the Income Tax Act, 2058, the taxpayer must submit the income statement for that year within three months of the end of the income year, according to section 98, the deadline for submitting the income statement has been extended for a maximum of three months, so the income statement must be submitted accordingly. According to this section, if the taxpayer submits the income statement, it is considered as if the taxpayer has determined the tax in section 99 of the same Act. Value Added Tax Act, According to section 18 of 2052, the taxpayer should determine the amount of tax to be paid each month and file the tax return within 25 days of the end of the month and according to section 19, the tax amount should be filed within 25 days of the end of the tax period. Provisions on Excise Duty – There are two provisions in particular. One is a physical control system and the other is a self-expulsion system. A physical control system is in place for alcoholic products, which is directly supervised and controlled by the tax administration. Raw materials from purchase to finished goods cannot be exported from the factory without the permission of the tax administration. A self-discharge system is applicable to all goods except alcoholic goods, which are not directly supervised and controlled by the tax administration. Revenue should be filed by determining the tax on the basis of the transaction by keeping records of the transaction itself. Excise Act, 2058 and regulations do not require the permission of the tax administration to export goods. According to 2059, the goods can be removed from the factory by filing the excise duty and other tax amount as revenue. In this, there is indirect supervision and control of the tax administration. Arrangements in customs - There is an arrangement for self-declaration in customs. Customs Act, According to Section 13 of 2064, the importer has to declare the transaction value by himself through the customs declaration form, attaching the documents proving the value of the imported goods. If the transaction value declared by the importer is in accordance with the General Agreement on Customs Tariffs and Trade of the World Trade Organization, the customs officer must recognize the same transaction value and pass the goods inspection. Here, transaction value means the total amount of rent, insurance and other related expenses incurred or likely to be incurred in bringing such goods to the border of Nepal, directly or indirectly paid or payable by the importer directly or indirectly to the seller of the imported goods.
5. What kind of provision is there in the constitution of Nepal regarding the head of state? Discuss. Part 13 of the Constitution of Nepal has provisions related to the provincial executive and part 14 of the provincial legislature. According to these arrangements, the head of the state will be a representative of the government of Nepal and his appointment will be made by the president. It seems that the role of the head of state in the state is similar to the role of the president in the federal parliament. The President of Nepal has to be elected by the members of the Federal Parliament and the Provincial Assemblies, while the Provincial Heads are appointed by the President on the recommendation of the Council of Ministers and the President can remove him from office immediately even though the term of office of the Provincial Heads is five years, it seems that in the federal system, the center has control over the provinces. Duties, duties and rights of the provincial chief - Appointing the leader of the parliamentary party with majority in the provincial assembly as the chief minister.
6. What is the right to information? What are the obligations of public bodies in the provision of public information? Mention. The right to request and receive information of public importance in public bodies is called the right to information. It also refers to the following rights: - the right to study or observe any documents, materials and the functioning of the public body, - the right to obtain a certified copy of any document in the public body, - the right to visit and observe the site of construction of public importance, - The right to take a certified sample of any material, - The right to receive information placed on any type of device through such a device. Obligation of public bodies in providing public information - Every public body must respect and protect citizens' right to information Act on the right to information, 2064 has done. For this purpose, it is the responsibility of the public body to perform the following tasks: - classifying and updating information, - making it public from time to time, - publishing and broadcasting it, - making citizens' access to information simple and easy, - operating in an open and transparent manner. , - Arranging information officers to disseminate information, - Arranging suitable training and education for employees.
7. According to the Labor Act, 2074, what type of employment can employers employ? According to the Labor Act, 2074, which is designed to regulate the rights, interests and facilities of workers, employers can engage workers in any of the following types of employment: (a) Regular employment – ​​any type of employment other than functional employment, temporary employment and casual employment (b) Functional employment – ​​by the employer (c) Temporary employment - Employment given by the employer to the worker for a specified period of time to complete a certain task within that period (d) Casual employment - The employer assigns the worker to the worker for a period of seven days or less in a month. (e) Part-time employment - Employment given for thirty-five hours or less in a week. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
1. Who has been appointed by the government as the vice-chairman of the National Planning Commission? Dr. Vishwa Paudel (2078 July 12) 
2. When was Sindhuligarhi War Museum inaugurated? V.No. July 13, 2078 - A museum was built in the historic Sindhuligarhi, where the Nepalese won the British-Nepal war in 1824. - The construction of the Sindhuligarhi War Museum is said to help in the preservation of historical heritages as well as the development of Sindhuli district as a tourist area. The museum was started. 
3. When is World Ranger Day celebrated? July 31st
4. When was the foundation stone laid for the reconstruction of South Asia's first tunnel Churiamai Tunnel? V.No. July 14, 2078 - 104 years after the construction of the tunnel, the restoration was started with the aim of protecting the heritage and developing it as a tourist destination. Due to the lack of maintenance, the tunnel of historical and archeological significance is dilapidated. It was built in 1974. It took two years to complete the construction of the tunnel under the leadership of Brigadier Colonel Dillijung Thapa, the designer of the tunnel. Until 2020-21, small vehicles such as jeeps used to travel through this tunnel.- The length of the tunnel is 500 meters with a width of two and a half meters and a height of three meters. 
5. Which continent is known as 'island continent' and 'kangaroo continent'? Australia
6. Which is the longest mountain range in Europe? Alps Mountains 
7. When and where was the first international conference on ozone layer protection held? 1987, Montreal, Canada 
8. Since when was it started to check traffic pollution in Kathmandu Valley? V.No. 2051 Baisakh 
19. What is the full form of cytis (rikshtbhk)? Riyalkhabhalatsyal yal kslatbhachalbatshyalab itchabambhash bhlambalanbhachabham kuvaashvak ya dyachami mbgalab balam yichb (Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species of World Fauna and Flora)- This convention came into effect on July 1, 1975, with the aim of protecting rare and endangered species of fauna and flora.- Nepal signed this treaty. 
10. What is the program conducted for the reform of the central bank and commercial banks in Nepal? Financial Sector Reform Programme
11. Which institute has the largest number of employees in Nepal? Nepal Electricity Authority 
12. Which is the first industry or institute established in Nepal? Biratnagar Jute Mill (Ed. 1993) 
13. Since when the bilateral exchange rate system was implemented with the aim of increasing exports in Nepal? V.No. 2034 
14. Who was selected as the permanent Commander-in-Chief of the Nepali Army? Prabhuram Sharma - (V.S. No. 2078, with effect from 26th July, empowered Rathi Sharma has been selected as the Permanent Commander-in-Chief.)
15. How long has the army announced that the crisis will continue in Myanmar? August 2023 - The Myanmar Army, which deposed the elected government and imposed military rule, announced that the crisis period has been extended by two years on August 1, 2021. - In February 2021, Chief of Army Staff General Min Aung Hleung announced Apoom as the Prime Minister. Army chief Min Aung declared a one-year emergency on the same day military rule was imposed. 
16. Who is the poet who formulated the experimental trend in the field of Nepali poetry? Mohan Koirala 17. What was the purpose of the Jharrowist movement? Making the proper Nepali language of its own by stopping foreign and foreign visitor words 
18. When did the Council of Ministers decide to establish employment service centers at all 753 local levels across the country? V.No. 2075 November 3
19. What is the duration of the five-year plan announced by the government for the protection of the one-horned rhinoceros, which is rare in the world? Year 2017-2021 
20. When was Kathmandu declared as the capital of modern Nepal? V.No. 1826 Chait 10 
21. Who is the king who started vocational education in Nepal? Jayasthiti Mall 
22. Where is Sundravati Setidevi Kund, a famous religious and touristic place? Dolakha- Sundravati Setidevi Temple is surrounded by seven amazing and attractive kundas in a single stone. - A big fair is held in Sundravati Setidevi Kunda on festivals like Ekadashi, Ram Navami, Phagu Purnima.
23. Who is the king who established 'Samarjung Company'? Ran Bahadur Shah - During the Rana period it was known as Peon Company.- Bhimsen Thapa appointed this company for the security of prisons and other public offices. - Chandrashamsher used it in the construction of roads and palaces of Rana. 24. When was Nepal's trade policy reviewed in the World Trade Organization for the first time? Year 2012 - The second review of Nepal's trade policy was held on December 3 to 5, 2018. Similarly, the next trade policy of Nepal will be reviewed in 2025.- In WTO, the trade policy of underdeveloped member countries is reviewed every six years. 
25. What is the process of breeding between two organisms with different qualities called? Hybridization
26. Since when was the mobile app named 'Parliament of Nepal' launched? V.No. 2074 July 12- (Through this app made with the help of UNDP, the parliamentary activities, i.e. the meeting of the Parliament, can be watched and heard directly.)
27. The sacred pilgrimage site and tourist area Devghat is located at the confluence of which rivers? Located at the confluence of Kaligandaki and Trishuli – Chitwan, Nawalpur and Tanahun districts, this place is about seven km from Narayangadh market. It is in the north. Along with Kaligandaki flowing from Damodar Kund and Trishuli flowing from Gosainkund, Seti, Masryangdi, Daraudi, Madi and other rivers also come here. It is mentioned in the Puranas that Lord Shiva as well as Rishimuni did penance in this holy land. It is said that Vashishtha, the Guru of King Ramchandra of Ayodhya, performed penance here in ancient times. There is also an idol of Vashishta here. It is believed that the real form of Sita was hidden here when Ramchandra lived in exile.- Bathing here is believed to bring more merit than performing a big yagna, cow donation, Chardham pilgrimage.- Maghe Sankranti, Vaishakh Sankranti, Big Ekadashi,
28. Where are the National Botanical Garden and National Herbarium and Botanical Laboratory located? Godavari, Lalitpur- V. No. Established as a royal botanical garden on 12th November 2019, this garden was named as a national botanical garden after the 2062/63 people's movement.- As a common repository of decades-old trees and plants, this garden is a suitable research center for scientists.- The National Herbarium and Botanical Laboratory located here More than 165,000 specimens of flowering and non-flowering plants have been kept. 
29. Which is the local level that brings one ward, one black road plan? Fungling district, Taplejung - (Fungling, the only municipality in Taplejung district, has implemented this plan from the financial year 2077/78).
30. When did Nepal get membership of Interpol? September 27, 1967 Presenter: Tank Casey 
Foreign Trade 
1. What are the problems seen in Nepal's foreign trade? UllDo b. Foreign trade is the buying and selling of goods and services between two or more countries. Foreign trade is also a major means of connecting with the world economy. Generally, foreign trade is done to export goods produced in their own country and to provide easy supply of goods that are not produced. As a landlocked country, Nepal is located between two big countries, India and China, in terms of economy and geography. There is an open border between Nepal and India. Due to the lack of effective border security and a strong customs system, there is no complete control over smuggling. Real information and statistics of import and export are not available. This is a major problem in Nepal's foreign trade. Its other problems can be mentioned as follows:- Imports are more than exports, increasing the trade deficit due to this, etc. Imports in 2077/78 were Rs. 15 trillion 39 billion and export Rs. 1 trillion 41 billion and the trade deficit is Rs. 13 trillion has reached 98 billion. Which is the current gross domestic product of Rs. 42 trillion 66 billion 32.77 percent and the current year's budget is Rs. It comes to 84.88 percent of 16 trillion 47 billion. Such a trade deficit is In 2076-77, import was Rs. 10 trillion 99 billion and A.W. Imports in 2075/76 were Rs. 13 billion was 21 billion. - Nepal's foreign trade should be more import-oriented, even more India-oriented, etc. Trade deficit with India in 2077/78 was Rs. 8 trillion 65 billion, which is 62 percent of the total trade deficit. With China There was not much trade in 2077/78, yet the trade deficit with China was Rs. One trillion 32 billion, which is 9.5 percent of the total trade deficit. In 2077/78 Rs. Imports of two trillion 14 billion, 15 percent contribution to the total trade deficit, - Export trade of Nepal is not reliable and sustainable, Being of a nature to be exported to India by using raw materials from India and undergoing general processing, such as; Palm oil, - Increase in production cost due to traditional production technology, - Increasing use of expensive vehicles, luxury items such as gold, - Inability to study, research and identify exportable items, - Increasing import of agricultural items such as vegetables, fruits, food grains, - Domestic and Not being able to diversify objective trade, - Not being able to use the opportunities obtained from multilateral and regional trade treaty agreements, - Not being able to increase business in third countries due to the fact that economic diplomacy from Nepali diplomatic missions abroad is not effective, - Not being able to increase foreign investment in industry, business sector, - Industry, Lack of sufficient infrastructure in trade and import export sector.- Thus, there are these and similar problems in Nepal's foreign trade. For this, the domestic production and productivity of goods imported from India should be increased. The use of electricity should be increased instead of petroleum products. It seems that the high trade deficit should be controlled through multilateral efforts and efforts by emphasizing on large and cheap electric public vehicles rather than small and expensive private vehicles.
2. What kind of political arrangements are there in the constitution of Nepal regarding national unity and national security? Mention. Article 51 (a) of the Constitution of Nepal has made a political arrangement regarding national unity and national security in Nepal, which can be mentioned as follows: , maintaining mutual harmony, tolerance and solidarity between religions, languages, cultures and sects, - development of cooperative relations between federal units, - promotion of national unity. Policy, - To make the security agencies strong, strong, professional, inclusive and responsive to the people, - To make citizens ready and able to serve the country, - Knowledge of former national servants,
3. Discuss the role that individuals can play in overcoming health problems. People have different types of health problems. A person can play a multifaceted role in cleaning all areas where health problems can be seen, such as his body, family, society, environment, etc., and raising awareness. The role of individuals is immense in controlling communicable diseases like covid. In order to eliminate health problems as a whole, a person can perform the following roles: - washing hands thoroughly before and after eating, advising others to do the same, - eating food properly cleaned and cooked and consumed in a balanced manner, - regularly cleaning body parts, cleaning others as well - to use the toilet and to advise others to use it, - not to smoke and drink, to advise others not to use it,
4. According to the Constitution of Nepal, 2072, what policies are there to be adopted by the state regarding economy, industry and commerce? write According to Article 51 (d) of the Constitution of Nepal, 2072, the state shall adopt the following policies related to economy, industry and commerce: - Strengthening the national economy through the participation and independent development of the public, private and cooperative sectors, - Giving importance to the role of the private sector in the economy, the available means and Achieving economic prosperity by maximizing the use of resources, - Promoting the cooperative sector and making excessive use in national development, - Encouraging and mobilizing in all-round national development by providing regulation to maintain cleanliness, accountability and competition in all activities of the economic sector, - Available means, resources and economic Equitable distribution of the benefits of development,
5. What are the procedures that Nepal government can adopt to privatize public institutions? Mention. Privatization Act, 2050 has been formulated to privatize public institutions in Nepal. There is a Privatization Committee chaired by the Minister of Finance or the Minister of State for Finance. According to the Privatization Act, 2050, the Government of Nepal can privatize a public institution classified for privatization by adopting any or all of the following procedures: - By selling shares, - Selling the shares of the public institution to the general public, employees, workers and persons or companies willing to manage such institution. By doing this, there is a provision that the general public, workers and employees will participate as much as possible in view of the nature and financial condition of the company while selling shares in this way. - By co-operating, - By selling property, - By leasing property, - By involving the private sector in management,
6. What are the duties, duties and rights of the ward chairman? Mention. According to the Local Government Operation Act, 2074, the tasks, duties and powers of the ward chairman are as follows: - To act as the chairman of the ward committee, - To coordinate and facilitate the work of the members of the ward committee, - To prepare, implement and approve the development plan, budget and program of the ward. To submit to the rural municipality or municipality, - to implement the plans and programs to be implemented by the ward, to monitor and periodically review them, - to make recommendations and verifications on various matters, - if he is absent from the ward for more than seven days, daily administrative and recommendation related matters of the ward Assign responsibility to a member of the Ward Committee concerned and inform the Chairman or Chief, - Perform other tasks assigned by the Executive, the Assembly or the Ward Committee.
1. Who is the youngest player in the 32nd edition of Tokyo Olympics? 
 Hand Zaza (Syrian table tennis player) (Zaza, who participated in the Olympics for the first time, was only 12 years old. She was only 11 years old when she secured a place in the Olympic qualifiers held in Jordan last year.) 
2. Who is currently the president of the International Olympic Committee? Thomas Bach 
3. The American Space Agency (NASA) has named a mountain of which planet 'Norge Montus' after the Nepali climber Tenzing Norge who took the first step on Mount Everest? Pluto 
4. Who is the author of the famous book 'Animal Farm'? George Orwell
5. Where has the Sirigai, which is said to be extinct from Nepal, been found? In Taplejung (Sirigai which was said to be extinct about three years ago) have been found in Sablakhu, Sinam and Ankhop of Taplejung. The cows, bulls and calves found there have been taken to the Agricultural Research Council (NARC) for research and conservation. The breed of cows and bulls has been taken to Khumaltar by NARK. It is said that NARK has launched a collection and identification campaign for the protection and additional production of endangered species of cows.
6. Since when has the Terai-Madhes prosperity program been implemented at the local level of Terai-Madhes, which is relatively behind in the human development index? A.W. 2075-76- The Tarai-Madhes Samriddhi Program emphasized on increasing access to the public sector by developing physical infrastructure, as well as employment and income generation.- In this program, which is run by the cost sharing of the federal and local governments, there is a provision that the federal government should contribute a maximum of 90 percent and the local government a minimum of 10 percent. - Collective housing building, community infrastructure, roads, agricultural development, drinking water and sanitation, irrigation and river control, energy, disaster mitigation infrastructure projects were conducted under the program.
7. What is the semicircular imaginary line connecting the north and south poles of the earth called? Longitude - There are 360 ​​lines of longitude with a one-degree difference of 180 degrees in the Eastern Hemisphere and 180 degrees in the Western Hemisphere. For every 1 degree of longitude, there is a difference of four minutes in time.- To find out the local time of a place, the help of the longitude line is taken. 
8. When was the first college of Nepal 'Trichandra College' established? V.No. 1975- In 1976, I came to Tri-Chandrama. A. and I.Sc., B.No. In 1981, B.A. and V. no. In 2004, teaching of B.Sc has started. After the implementation of new education in 2030, it was renamed from Tri-Chandra College to Tri-Chandra Campus. 
9. Ashad Shukla Ekadashi is called Harishayani Ekadashi and what is Kartik Shukla Ekadashi called? Harivodhini Ekadashi
10. What is the name of the wet land that is always soaked with water along the seam, solution, pond, river bank for the habitat of different kinds of animals, animals and insects? Wetlands 
11. Who is the thinker who said, "Our biggest weakness is in giving up trying, the surest way to achieve success is to try one more time"? Thomas Alva Edison, Scientist 
12. If Yagyaraj Sharma is known as 'Sangeet Shiromani', who is known as 'Vadya Shiromani'? Ustad Ganesh Lal 
13. In Nepal, what is the name of the instrument that is played by hitting the drum with a drum? Dhangro 
14. What is the amount of matter in an object called? Mass (The mass of an object is measured by physical scales. The mass of a cover made of platinum iridium metal kept at the International Bureau of Weights and Measures is considered to be one kilogram.)
15. What is called the process of development of new offspring with new qualities that did not come from the ancestors but suddenly appeared later? Mutation - The disparity that appears between living organisms of the same race is called mutation (some difference in the offspring than in the parents). - Differences appear while growing up in different environments despite having the same genetic background is called environmental change. 
16. What is the name of the blood vessels that carry blood from the heart to different parts of the body? Artery (Bchatavachashka) (The blood vessels that carry blood from different parts of the body to the heart are called veins (Khabashlak).) 
17. Where was the great philosopher Socrates born? 
18 in Athens, Greece . What is the art of making various sculptures, pots and windows, tundals, furniture etc. using wood? carpentry
19. Which is the first industrial sector established in Nepal? Balaju Industrial Area (2016) 
20. What is the name of the base established during the time of Prime Minister Janga Bahadur Rana regarding the prevention of corruption? Religion Court 
21. Subas Ghising is the author of the work called 'Oo Mari Are' and who is the author of the work called 'Oo Mareki Chani'? Balkrishna Sum 
22. Which language family does the Jhangad language belong to? Dravid 
23. What is considered to be a strong basis for poverty alleviation through sustainable economic development and strong rural economy in Nepal? Agriculture 
24. The sound played with two hands is called clapping and what is the sound played with two fingers called? Pinch 
25. Where was Madame Marie Curie, the world's first woman to receive a Nobel Prize, born? 
 Warsaw, Poland
26. How many types of joints are there in the human body? Three (fixed joints, semi-movable joints and movable joints.) 
27. When was the Dairy Development Institute (DDC) established? V.No. 2026 July 1 – This institute was established under the Institute Act, 2021. - This institute was established with the objective of providing a fair price of milk as well as a certain market to the milk producing farmers in the rural areas and regularly supplying quality processed milk and milk products to the urban consumers in an accessible manner.
28. What is a teleprompter? During a public address, a technique to facilitate the speaker in the presentation of his written speech - a teleprompter has one or two transparent screens placed near the podium as needed. Common people cannot see it easily, but if you look a little deeper, you can see it. In this, the letters are moved with the speed of the speaker by sitting somewhere near the speaker so that the speaker is comfortable. The speaker can easily read those letters on the screen. With this, the speaker can effectively express his written opinion spontaneously looking at the audience.- For the first time in Nepal V.S. This technology was used on June 16, 2075.
29. When was the beginning of Jayatu Sanskritam movement? v. No. June 1, 2004 (Students of the Sanskrit Hostel Kathmandu started a movement by making various demands to the government. The movement was inspired by the fact that the then Prime Minister Padma Shamsher called the Sanskrit language a dead language.)
30. When did Uttam Nepali (Karmacharya), a senior artist of Nepali modern art, pass away? V.No. 2078 July 6 (at the age of 84) – V.S. Born in Kilagal, Kathmandu in 1994, the Nepali was educated in Lucknow, India. For some time, he worked in the Information Department, Postal Service Department and Radio Nepal. The main profession of Nepalis who are also interested in art and literature is modern painting. Besides, Nepali was also a skilled actor. He also introduced the first Nepali villain by acting as a villain in Aama, the first Nepali film made in Nepal with Nepali actors. In addition, the Nepali people He also acted in various roles in films like Parivartan. - In the year 2061, his work 'Uttam Nepali Ka Kavitaharu' was published.- He has two sons, two daughters and a wife.
A good tax system
1. What are the qualities of a good tax system? write The tax system is the holistic form of tax policy, tax laws, tax rates, tax administration, tax collection process, sustainability of tax collection resources through productive use of tax. The tax system should be simple, transparent, taxpayer friendly and modern technology friendly. These are the qualities of a good tax system. Other qualities can be mentioned as follows: Equality:- More tax for those with higher income and less tax for those with lower income, tax according to the ability to pay tax. Certainty:- Tax where the amount of tax to be paid, time, method, etc. is fixed. Convenience:- Place of paying tax, time And the method should be convenient and beneficial to the taxpayer. Thrift:- Maximum tax collection should be done with minimum expenditure. The utilization of taxes should also be frugal. Productivity:- When taxes are levied, they should be applied to the areas that receive continuous taxes, the collected taxes should also be invested in productive areas and get taxes again. Flexibility: - When the taxpayer's income is higher, more tax should be levied and when the taxpayer's income is lower, less tax should be levied. The tax system should be flexible. Tax according to capacity:- Taxes should be levied according to the ability of individuals to pay taxes. Simplicity:- Tax rates, forms, tax laws, tax procedures should be simple for everyone to understand. Coordination:- Taxes should be levied in coordination between central, provincial and local governments so that there is no duplication.
2. In Nepal, what kind of people do not get social security allowance? In Nepal, Dalit and single women who have completed 60 years of age and other citizens who have completed 70 years of age, senior citizen allowance, indigent citizen allowance for the poor, disabled and helpless allowance for the disabled, allowance for the helpless single woman, allowance for the disabled, extremely poor, endangered and five years specified by the Government of Nepal. Child maintenance allowance for children who cannot take care of themselves, care allowance for those who cannot take care of themselves There is a provision of social security allowances like Endangered Castes Allowance for endangered castes. The Constitution of Nepal has taken social security as a fundamental right and ensured the right of social security to the designated citizens. According to this arrangement, the Social Security Act-2075 has been issued and implemented. The Social Security Act, which was drafted to manage social security, provides that the following persons will not receive the social security allowance that is currently distributed monthly in Nepal: - a person appointed, elected and nominated to a government or public position, - a person receiving pension from government funds, - any other A person who regularly receives salary, pension, retirement benefits and other benefits.
3. What is development finance? Write its purpose. Development finance is the tool needed to manage development. Resources are needed for the implementation of development plans, which are collected through development finance. Development finance includes revenue, foreign grants, deficit budget, internal debt, foreign debt and other sources. These resources are mobilized for the economic and social development of the country. Legal and institutional arrangements have been made for development finance mobilization in Nepal. According to the Constitution of Nepal, the statement of income and expenditure must be submitted to the Budget Parliament on the 15th of June every year. Offices under the Ministry of Finance are active in revenue mobilization. All agencies of Nepal government are involved in non-tax revenue mobilization. Nepal Rastra Bank has been managing the nation's debt and yet the development finance of Nepal is not effective. Revenue collection, development expenditure, budget expenditure, Foreign grant mobilization has not been in accordance with the target. For this, it seems that effective coordination should be established between Nepal government, state government and local level to bring effectiveness in budget implementation. The objectives of development finance - to increase income, - to increase employment, - to improve the living standards of citizens, - to achieve double digit economic growth, - to maintain economic stability, - to build economic, social and physical infrastructure, - to maintain social justice, - Building a self-sufficient economy.
4. What are the policy provisions related to labor and employment in Nepal's constitution? Mention. Article 51 (i) of the Constitution of Nepal has made a policy arrangement related to labor and employment in Nepal, which can be mentioned as follows: Labor - making the labor force skilled and professional, - basic rights of all workers, - guaranteeing social security, - ending all forms of labor exploitation including child labor, - Good relationship between workers and entrepreneurs, - Encouraging participation of workers in management. Employment - Ensuring that everyone can work. Regulation and management, - Investment in the productive sector: Encouragement to invest the capital, skills, technology and experience gained from foreign employment in the productive sector in the country.
5. What are the objectives of the World Trade Organization? write The World Trade Organization is a platform for making international trade simple, easy, transparent, predictable and rule-based. It is the only intergovernmental organization that regulates multilateral trade. This is another form of GATT established in 1947. It was established on January 1, 1995. Its head office is in Geneva. In this organization, which currently has 164 member countries, Nepal became a member as the 147th country on April 23, 2004 (2061 Baisakh 11). The objectives of this organization, which has intellectual property jurisdiction related to goods trade, service trade and trade, are as follows:- To make the products of developing and less developed countries join the world trade in a simple, easy and accessible way,- To gradually reduce trade barriers including customs duties,- To promote trade liberalization further. widening,
6. What is balance of payments? Discuss its importance. The condition of receiving and paying foreign currency in a certain period is called balance of payments. This is the difference between income and expenditure of foreign currency. If the income of foreign exchange exceeds the expenditure, the balance of payments is considered to be in favor of the country. A favorable balance of payments means strengthening the country's economic position. The balance of payments also provides information on the current account situation. Balance of payments can also be taken as the sum of current account and capital account. Foreign trade, tourism and remittances are included in the current account. Foreign Grants under Capital Account, Includes loans and investments. Developing countries have a current account deficit and a capital account surplus. The main cause of current account deficit is foreign trade. There are two types of balance of payments: favorable balance of payments and unfavorable balance of payments. Importance of Balance of Payments- Balance of payments provides statistics and information about import and export. This helps in the following areas: - The balance of payments reveals an important element about the state of the country's economy. - Helps in comparative study of import and export. - It provides a basis for formulating industry, trade and commerce policies. - It helps in formulating policies that affect national income. - It helps to formulate the overall economic policy, revenue policy, monetary policy, financial policy. - It is helpful in improving every work in the economic sector. - It is enough to get information about the condition of foreign property itself. It helps in formulating financial policy. - It is helpful in improving every work in the economic sector. - It is enough to get information about the condition of foreign property itself. It helps in formulating financial policy. - It is helpful in improving every work in the economic sector. - It is enough to get information about the condition of foreign property itself. It helps in formulating financial policy. - It is helpful in improving every work in the economic sector. - It is enough to get information about the condition of foreign property itself. It helps in formulating financial policy. - It is helpful in improving every work in the economic sector. - It is enough to get information about the condition of foreign property itself. It helps in formulating financial policy. - It is helpful in improving every work in the economic sector. - It is enough to get information about the condition of foreign property itself. It helps in formulating financial policy. - It is helpful in improving every work in the economic sector. - It is enough to get information about the condition of foreign property itself. It provides a basis for formulating trade and commercial policies.- It helps in formulating policies that affect national income. - It helps to formulate the overall economic policy, revenue policy, monetary policy, financial policy. - It is helpful in improving every work in the economic sector. - It is enough to get information about the condition of foreign property itself. It provides a basis for formulating trade and commercial policies.- It helps in formulating policies that affect national income. - It helps to formulate the overall economic policy, revenue policy, monetary policy, financial policy. - It is helpful in improving every work in the economic sector. - It is enough to get information about the condition of foreign property itself.
7. Mention the main features of government papers. A letter prepared by a government office for a specific purpose is a government letter. Its main features are as follows: - Public information is exchanged in government papers. Since this letter is written by a government agency, it mentions the name, surname, address, contact number of the office or person concerned. - There is a relationship of formal dignity in official letters and the same dignity is presented in the letter. - Aspects such as invoice number, letter number, meaning, function are mandatory in government letters. - Linguistic accuracy, uniformity, politeness or order, official dignity are necessary in government letters. This letter is more formal. - Government letters cannot be written on any type of paper. It is written on the designated letterpad of the office. Signature and seal are mandatory in such a letter.
8. What are the elements of office operation and management? Present. All the work done to achieve the goals and objectives of the office is the operation and management of the office. It includes the work of formulating the plan of the office, implementing the plan, arranging staff and budget, coordinating, directing, monitoring, evaluating, etc. Since these and similar tasks are organized together with office operation and management, they can be considered as the main elements of office operation and management. Other principles of office operation and management are as follows: Objectives and goals:- Organizational goals and objectives are achieved by making office operation and management effective. Thriftiness:- Management works to perform quality work at low cost and within the specified time. Efficiency: - The goal should be achieved by maximum utilization of available resources. Effectiveness:- You should increase your effectiveness by achieving progress according to the target. Information technology:- You should use modern information technology to perform management tasks. Transparency:- Management should inform stakeholders about their actions and decisions. Accountability:- The management should answer the questions raised in relation to every work done by them. Morality and ethics:- Not only the work done by the management, but the behavior and character of the manager should be clean. Must be customer friendly. - The management should answer the questions raised in relation to each work done by them. Morality and ethics:- Not only the work done by the management, but the behavior and character of the manager should be clean. Must be customer friendly. - The management should answer the questions raised in relation to each work done by them. Morality and ethics:- Not only the work done by the management, but the behavior and character of the manager should be clean. Must be customer friendly.
9. What are the theoretical basis of Nepal's federal system? Mention. Federalism is a political system in which state power is exercised by multiple governments in one country. In the past, Nepal had a unitary state system with central authority. A three-level federalism has been created by decentralizing the authority of this center. It is not the integration of states that were independent and autonomous in the past that created federalism in Nepal. Therefore, the federalism of Nepal is a federalism created by decentralizing the powers according to the constitution. That is why the three governments of Nepal's federal system are interdependent. The theoretical basis of Nepal's federalism is centered on this, which can be mentioned as follows: Interdependence: - The three levels of government are interdependent in every way. There is more interdependence in the matter of common rights. Some single rights are also interdependent. For example: Although the Border Security Association has sole authority, the local level and state governments are also alert and vigilant in border security. The local level has become the guard of border security. Reciprocal support:- The association provides grant support. The state and local levels have helped in achieving the national goals set by the association. Such as: sustainable development goals, price stability, economic growth, etc. Cooperation:- There is mutual agreement between the three levels. There has been cooperation in budget creation, project selection, etc. Based on the budget of the federation, the state has formulated the budget based on the budget of the federation and the local level. The association has been helping with its experience and expertise in budgeting. Coexistence:- The three tiers of government should not be subordinate to each other. There is a constitutional system where everyone is free and autonomous in their work. Coordination:- If there is any dispute between the three levels, there is a provision to solve the problem through mutual understanding and dialogue. Partnership: The provision of developing and expanding harmonious and cooperative relations between the government by sharing administration, responsibilities and resources is provided by Article 51 (b) (6) of the Constitution of Nepal. is
1. How many sports are included in the 32nd Olympic Games held in Tokyo, Japan? 33.- The Tokyo Olympics will be held from July 23 to August 8, 2021.- Earlier, the Tokyo Olympics were scheduled to be held from July 24 to August 9, 2020. Due to the corona virus epidemic, the Olympics, which are held every four years, are going to be held after five years this time.- Nepal first participated in the World Sports Mahakumbh Olympics in Tokyo Olympics in 1964.- Five athletes from four sports (shooting, judo, athletics and swimming) participated in the Tokyo Olympics. to be 
2. What is the slogan of the 18th National Paddy Day celebrated on 15 June 2078? Increase in rice production: food security, self-reliance and prosperity.
3. When was Nepali Congress Chairman and Congress Parliamentary Party leader Sher Wahadur Deuba appointed as Prime Minister for the fifth time? June 29, 2078.- President Bidya Devi Bhandari administered the oath of office and secrecy to the newly appointed Prime Minister Deuba on the same day.- According to Article 76 (5) of the Constitution of Nepal, Deuba was appointed as the Prime Minister. . 
4. When did Prime Minister Sher Bahadur Deuba take the vote of confidence in the House of Representatives? 2078 July 3. - Prime Minister Sher Bahadur Deuba received a vote of confidence in the House of Representatives on July 3, 2078. In the voting in the House of Representatives on July 3, there were 165 votes in favor, 83 against and one neutral vote. - There are 266 MPs in the House of Representatives and 249 MPs are present.
5. When was the first meeting of the House of Representatives held in Nepal? June 1, 2016. 
6. Who has been given the Vidyapati Award in the field of Maithili language literature by the Vidyapati Award Fund established by the government? Saptari's Maithili Sahitya Parishad (award amount: Rs. two lakhs) – Similarly, writer Vriseshchandra Lal from Nepal Vidyapati Maithili Translation Award, journalist and writer Sujit Jha from Nepal Vidyapati Maithili Research Award, Amarendra Yadav from Nepal Vidyapati Maithili Manuscript Award and Nepal Vidyapati Maithili Art-Culture Awarded to Ajith Kumar and Sunita Kumari Sah.- The amount of these four awards is Rs. One lakh.
7. Since when has Nepali Army implemented the new organizational structure? 2078 July 1.- A new organizational restructuring has been implemented to make the chain of command of the organization more agile and fast. A total of four commands have been implemented based on the Kosi, Gandaki and Karnali river systems and one for the Kadmadau Valley.- This structure has been named 'Three Jod One Central Command'. Dismissed from July 1st.- National Security Policy-2075 Implementation Integrated Action Plan and Nepali Army's long-term thinking 2087 was restructured based on the basis.
8. Who discovered the Ashoka pillar of Lumbini built by Emperor Ashoka? Dr. Fuhrer. 
9 Chardham of Nepal refers to which religious area? Varaha Kshetra, Mukti Kshetra, Ruru Kshetra and Harihar Kshetra. 
10. Among the languages ​​of the Bharopeli family in Nepal, which language is spoken by the largest number of people? Nepali.
11. When did Nepal make an agreement on reducing carbon emissions while protecting forests? February 2077.- Nepal has implemented carbon reduction program while protecting forests. - Nepal is the fifth country in the Pacific Asia region to benefit from the carbon agreement. Nepal is the 12th country in the world.- When the industrialized countries of the world emit more carbon, the countries that emit less and do not emit have to bear the loss of pollution equally. In order to reduce that imbalance, the concept has been developed that industrialized countries should pay compensation or rewards to countries like Nepal that emit less carbon and contribute to forest and environment protection. Accordingly, Nepal will receive more than five billion rupees through the World Bank.
12. Global Positioning System (GPS) was started from which country? America.- This technology was first used in 1973 in the US Department of Defense. This technology has been used with full capacity since 1995.- Badford Parkinson, Roger L. Aston and Evan A. Getting contributed to the development of this technology that can be obtained from pictures taken from the sky.- This is a space-based satellite navigation system. 
13. Who is the thinker who said "Good health is the best gift and contentment is the best wealth"? Gautama Buddha. 
14. Who was appointed as Attorney General by President Bidya Devi Bhandari on the recommendation of Prime Minister Sher Bahadur Deuba? Khammahadur Khati (2078 June 31). (Former Secretary General of Nepal Bar Association Khati is an established legal practitioner.)
15. Who is the first woman to be appointed as the head of the World Trade Organization (WTO)? Ngozi Okonjo-Ibela (Former Minister of Finance, Nigeria).- Okonjo, who succeeded in becoming the first woman head in the history of the WTO, is also the first African to reach that position.- Okonjo assumed office from March 1, 2021. His term will be till August 31, 2025. 
16. Who are the players who were successful in being declared the best player of the year in the award program held on December 28, 2077? For men: Mandekaji Shrestha and for women: Gaurika Singh 
17. Who was awarded the Booker International Award 2020? Marrick Lucas Rijneveld.
18. When was the 'Global Center for Cyber ​​Security' established by the World Economic Forum? January 26, 2018.- This organization was established with the aim of providing a safe cyber space by discouraging cyber attacks. 
19. When was the foundation stone of Motipur industrial area in Butwal? February 21, 2077. 
20. In which district is the longest part of National Pride Road Project Madhyapahari Lokmarg? Baglung (137 km). 
21. When did the government of Nepal launch the 'Citizen App' with the slogan 'Communication and Information Technology Support, Hand in Hand Government Service'? January 2, 2077.
22. When was the start of nuclear medicine service for the first time in Nepal? Year 2077 Pus 6.- This technology will be used to detect cancer, thyroid and bone related problems (pain) in particular.- Through this technology, low level radioactive material can be entered into the body through oral and injection to get information about the condition of the body. 
23. The President's Chure Conservation Program is running in 26 districts, while the Chure Watershed Conservation Program is running in how many districts? 13. 
24. Where is the headquarters of Green Climate Fund? South Korea.
25. Who will the Nepal Pragya Pratishthan award the Nepal Pragya Lankar Award in 2077? Chinese professor Wang Hongwei. - The 35th Proclamation of the Institute honored Hongwei with the special award for his contribution to the development of Nepal in the fields of language, literature and diplomacy. Birendra Prasad Mishra and Nepal Pragya Bhasha Award of two lakhs to Prof. Dr. Awarded to Tejaratna Kansakar.- Likewise, the Nepal Pragya Nepali Literary Award worth one lakh was awarded to Harihar Khanal and Raviman Lamjel, Purna Vaidya, Indra Bahadur Gurung, Chatrabhujlal Das Kevarat and Hansawati Kurmi for the mother tongue literature spoken in Himal, Hills and Terai. Bhanu Pragya International Nepali Literary Award worth Rs.1 lakh, Lil Bahadur Chhetri from Assam (India),
26. When and where was the 37th ASEAN summit held? November 11-15, 2020, Hanoi (Vietnam) 
. When was the English version of Nepal's updated map approved? 2077 July 30. 
28. How many chambers is there in Nepal's provincial assembly? one 
29. Since when have two trains resumed operation on the Janakpur-Jayanagar railway? 2077 October 3. 
30. What is the 'Beijing +5' conference related to? women's development 
Savita Sharma
Kathmandu, July 1st. The central office of the Public Service Commission will be shifted from Anamnagar to Kamalpokhari. The Public Service Commission is going to move to Kamalpokhari from Friday after the construction of a modern building with earthquake resistant structure. The commission has also published a notice that the health service ninth level interview scheduled for Sunday will be held in the new building of Kamalpokhari. Toynarayan Subedi, the spokesperson of the Public Service Commission informed that it will be partially shifted from July 1st and the interviews will be conducted from the Kamalpokhari building from the 3rd. he said, "Commissioners will go from the 1st, other branches will move gradually." After the old public service building was damaged by the 2072 earthquake, the National Reconstruction Authority Central Project Implementation Unit constructed a new building. The new building is earthquake resistant and spacious. Engineer Surendra Vaidya of National Reconstruction Authority Central Project Implementation Unit said, "The earthquake, It has been designed to avoid fire and other hazards." The cost of building construction is 71 crore 12 lakh 28 thousand. There are two elevators in the building, which has two floors below the ground and six floors above. Vaidya said that the construction period was three years and it took three months more than the scheduled time. The construction of the building was started from Chait 2074. Vaidya also clarified that the new building has the capacity to house all the employees in the central office. He informed that there is a multipurpose hall and a library that can accommodate up to 150 people. Even before moving to Anamnagar, the central office of public service was in Kamalpokhari. The old public service building was destroyed in the earthquake. The commission moved to Anamnagar before the building collapsed. It has been almost 10 years since the commission moved to Anamnagar. After the commission moved, the Ministry of Youth and Sports was there for some time. After the building was damaged by the earthquake, the Ministry moved to Singha Darbar. Earlier, the Public Service Commission was located in Kamalpokhari for a long time. Spokesperson Subedi said, "It became like an institutional memory, that place became a special place, it became a place where I had been sitting since before." Umesh Mainali, the then chairman of the Public Service Commission, inaugurated the new building constructed in Kamalpokhari on February 26.
 
Finance and Monetary Policy 1. Discussing the difference between financial policy and monetary policy, what are the reforms to be made in Nepal's financial policy? Mention. The difference between financial policy and monetary policy can be discussed as follows: Financial policy: - Financial policy is a policy that favorably affects the economy of the country through taxes, government spending and loans. - This government agency is formed by the Ministry of Finance. - The financial policy is released before the beginning of the financial year. - The scope and impact of the financial policy is greater. It has a direct and indirect effect on all aspects of economic activity. - Finance policy is based on political and social foundations. The general public is interested in its methods, procedures and effects. - economic growth, Among economic stability and social justice, financial policy has given importance to economic growth. - It is closely related to the budget formulated by the government. Monetary Policy - Monetary policy is a policy designed to maintain price stability and interest rate balance. - It is formulated by the autonomous Central Bank established by this Act. - Monetary policy is issued after the financial policy is issued. - The scope and effect of monetary policy is smaller than that of financial policy. This has a major impact on the currency and banking sectors. - Monetary policy is based on professional and academic foundations. The common people are not very interested in its methods, processes and effects. - economic growth, Among economic stability and social justice, monetary policy has given economic stability a high priority. - It is closely related to currency and its transmission and contraction. Reforms in the financial policy of Nepal - The financial policy includes taxes, government expenditure and debt and through them it has a positive effect on the country's economy, therefore, by making tax, government expenditure and debt effective, the financial policy can be improved, which can be mentioned as follows: - Economic and social development , regional equality, human development, focusing more government spending on infrastructure development areas that do not attract the private sector, - the government will not invest in areas where the private sector has achieved success and gradually withdraw the investment, - linking government spending with returns, development projects with weak returns Eliminate or merge, - Develop a clean, neutral and transparent tax system,
2. Mention the formation and functioning of the local level legislature. Article 221 of the Constitution of Nepal stipulates that the administrative authority of the local level shall be vested in the Village Assembly and Municipal Assembly. That is why village councils and municipal councils can be called local legislatures. Similarly, in Article 222 and Article 223 of the Constitution, there are provisions regarding the formation of Village Assembly and Municipal Assembly, which can be mentioned as follows: Formation of Village Assembly and Municipal Assembly: a. Chairman/Chief of Village/City Executive - Chairman b. Vice President of the Village/Executive/Deputy Chief - Vice-Chairman. Chairman of each ward - member d. Four members elected from each ward - members. The main task of the local legislature is to enact laws on the tasks assigned to the local level by the two members elected from the Dalit or minority community by the village-municipal assembly. Its functions can be mentioned as follows: - Setting the rate of local taxes,
3. What are the functions, duties and rights of the Social Security Fund Board of Directors? Mention. The contribution-based Social Security Act-2074 has established a Social Security Fund Board of Directors under the chairmanship of the Secretary of the Ministry of Labor and Employment for the operation, supervision and management of the work to be done on behalf of the Social Security Fund and the duties, duties and rights of the committee, which can be mentioned as follows - Formulating policies related to social security plans, - Making suggestions to the Government of Nepal on matters related to social security, - Operating and managing funds after approving social security plans, budgets and programs, - Formulating investment policies and submitting them to the Government of Nepal for approval, - Various social To arrange funds necessary for the proper operation and management of the security plan,
4. What is the provision in which the tax officer can determine the tax in value added tax? Mention. Value added tax is a tax based on the self-assessment system, according to which the taxpayer has to record his purchase and sale bill in a systematic manner, determine the tax he has to pay and submit the tax statement to the Internal Revenue Office at the specified time. However, the tax officer can determine the value added tax in any of the following cases as stipulated in Section 20 of the Value Added Tax Act-2052: - If the tax return is not submitted within the deadline, - If the tax return is incomplete or incorrect, - If the false tax return is submitted, - If the tax officer has reason to believe that the amount of tax is understated or incorrect, - If there is reason to believe that the tax officer has underinvoiced the supply price, - In case of underinvoiced supply to the group company,
5. What are the functions of the Federal Parliament of Nepal? write The constitution of Nepal has provided for a bicameral legislature as a federal parliament. The lower house of the federal parliament of Nepal is called the House of Representatives and the upper house is called the National Assembly. The functions of the Parliament are as follows: - Making laws on the jurisdiction of the Union, - Forming the government, - Discussing and passing the government's policies and programs, - Discussing and passing the budget, controlling the budget, - Amending the constitution, - Referendum decisions. To do,- To monitor the regular functioning of the government,- To give necessary suggestions and instructions to the government,- To approve international treaty agreements.
6. What kind of examination is there to select the candidates for the vacancies in the Nepali Army? The Military Service Regulations, 2069 provide for the following examinations to be taken for the selection of candidates for vacant posts in the Nepalese Army: (1) Examinations to be taken for filling the posts of Assistant Soldiers: (a) Wearing Examination, (b) Preliminary Health Examination, (c) Physical Examination , (d) Intelligence Test (IQ), (e) Written Test (English, Nepali, Mathematics and General Knowledge) (f) Qualitative Test (Technical Officer, Group Testing Officer, Interviewing Officer and Board Conference), (g) Health Test , (h) Board Interview, (2) Examinations to be taken for constable posts: (a) Physical Test, (b) Written Test (General knowledge and general knowledge of Nepali, English, Mathematics), (c) Health Test, (d) Interview , (3) Examination to be taken for filling the posts of followers: (a) Physical examination,
7. What are the ways to increase citizen participation in public service delivery? write Citizen participation in public service delivery should be increased to make the services provided by public agencies transparent, economical, citizen-friendly, easy and accessible. For this, the following measures should be adopted: - Keeping the civil charter in the office and clarifying the details of all types of services, costs, procedures, time, and responsible officers, - Establishing a mechanism to address all complaints related to the implementation of the civil charter, including the office, - Service delivery in the office spontaneously. and building a structure and system for information flow, arranging an information officer and spokesperson, - arranging a suggestion box to receive customer opinions, suggestions, complaints, - customer support room, customer waiting room, breastfeeding room, adequate space for the elderly and children, drinking water,
1. When was Haitian President Jovenel Moise assassinated? July 7, 2021.- An armed group attacked and killed the presidential residence in Port-au-Prince.- The 53-year-old Jovenel, who came to power in February 2017, had been ruling Haiti by using the president's privilege after the legislative elections in 2018 were delayed. 
2. How many districts of the country have been declared literate by June 2078? 54 (June 23, 2078). (Achham is the 54th district to be declared literate.)
3. Since when has the online system been implemented in the post offices across the country? Bikram Samvat 2078 Asar 23.- The land record information management system which started 6 years ago (July 25, 2072) from the land registry office Kalanki was implemented in all the 126 land registry offices from Asar 23. According to the Department of Land Management and Records, the online system was implemented in the remaining 18 offices that day, while it had already started in 180 offices. - The land management office, which was running on a paper process, went online, bringing the land administration into the digital age. - You can see the details of the land (area, boundary withholding, revenue, etc.) in the mobile app.- The service of this office will now be fast, efficient, transparent and reliable through the online service system implemented in the land office all over the country.
4. Which is the partnership forest group that will be awarded with the best partnership forest award in 2078? Saviya Partnership Forest Management Group (PARSA), Prize money: Rs. 54 thousand. 
5. Nepal Government has decided to celebrate which day as National Women's Rights Day? May 16 
6. Which mountain of Nepal is known as 'Matterhorn of Himalayas'? fish tail 
7. Who is the creator of the song called 'Rato Aar Chandra Surya...'? Gopal Prasad Rimal. 
8. Where has it been decided to place the secretariat of the South Asian Olympic Council? Nepal. 
9. Where was the fifth world conference on nutrition held? Kathmandu (November 2019). 
10. What is the full form of 'MFN' related to business? Most Favored Nation.
11. Who won the Copa America football title held in Brazil in June 2021? Argentina (Runner-up: Brazil 
) When will the Gandaki state government release a white paper regarding the state's current economic situation? 2078 June 27. (The Chief Minister of Gandaki Province, Krishna Chandra Nepali Pokharel, who also held the charge of Finance Minister, issued a white paper.)
13. When was the agreement that Nepali Railways can provide train services from Birgunj and Biratnagar to Kolkata-Hardia for transportation? 2078 June 25. (According to the revised railway service agreement between Nepal and India, Indian private sector railway services can also be used for trade with third countries from Nepal. Previously, there was a mandatory situation to use only railway services operated by certain companies for transportation, but now many options are open.)
14. When will the Supreme Court decide to annul the dissolution of the House of Representatives for the second time according to the current constitution? 2078 June 28.- Chief Justice Cholendra Shamsher Jabara and Judges Deepak Kumar Karki, Meera Khadka, Kishore Prasad Khatiwada and Dr. Anand Mohan Bhattarai's constitutional bench said that the process of appointing the Prime Minister is not over, the provisions of Article 76 (5) remain. Canceled the dissolution on the grounds that the condition of obtaining a vote of confidence remained. The bench also mentioned that the decision of the dissolution case which was previously held on February 11, 2077 was unfavorable.- Along with the cancellation of the dissolution, the court issued a mandate to appoint Nepali Congress Chairman Sher Bahadur Deuba as Prime Minister within two days. - On the recommendation of the Council of Ministers, the House of Representatives was dissolved on May 8, 2078. It is mentioned in the judgment that since the signatures of 149 members from Deuba's side were found in the President's office, it should be taken as a basis for a vote of confidence. It is stated in the judgment that the signature of the majority of members is the basis for obtaining a vote of confidence. In case of doubt, it is natural to test such signature. - Invalidating the dissolution of the House of Representatives for the second time on the recommendation of Prime Minister KP Sharma Oli, the Supreme Court will restore the House of Representatives and convene a meeting within seven days.
15. Who won the title of the Eurocup football tournament held in June, July 2021? Italy.- Italy defeated England 3-2 in the penalty shootout in the final match. - Italy's goalkeeper Gianluigi Donaro was declared the best player of the tournament. - Portugal's captain Cristiano Ronaldo won the Golden Boot. 
16. The meeting of the South Asian Olympic Council on July 12, 2021 has decided when to hold the 14th Green Games? March 2023. (The 14th SAG was decided to be held in five cities of Pakistan, Lahore, Faisalabad, Gujranwala, Islamabad and Silakot).
17. To whom will the National Talent Award (in 2078) given by the government every year be awarded? Famous comic actor Madan Krishna Shrestha. .) 
18. According to the 2068 census, what is the literacy percentage of Nepal? 65.9 percent. (Male literacy rate: 75.1 percent and female literacy rate: 57.4 percent.) 
19. In which article of the current constitution is there a provision related to the right of every citizen to get compulsory and free education from the state up to the basic level and free education up to the secondary level? Article 31 (2).
20. Which caste has the highest percentage of literacy in the tribal community? Tired 
21. According to the World Innovation Index 2020, which country is successful in being in the first place? Switzerland. - In the World Innovation Index 2020 published by the World Intellectual Property Organization, Nepal is ranked 95th. - In the list, India is 48th, Sri Lanka is 101st, Pakistan is 107th and Bangladesh is 106th. - The list is prepared on the basis of innovation as well as scientific articles and materials published in international journals.
22. According to the Rule of Law Index 2020 published by the World Justice Project, which country has been ranked first in the country with good rule of law? Denmark.- Nepal is ranked 61st (out of 128 countries) in that list. - Among the SAARC countries, Sri Lanka is 66th, India 69th, Bangladesh 115th, Pakistan 120th and Afghanistan 122nd. - Venezuela is at the last place in the list. 
23. Who won the title of Best Singer at the 62nd Grammy Awards 2020? Lizzo.- Lizzo, whose real name is Melissa Viviena Jefferson, won the title for singing the song 'Kuch I Love You'/Truth Hearts'. - This award is given to artists who achieve excellence in the field of song, music and singing.
24. Who is the mountaineer who has climbed Mount Everest for the 25th time and set the record for climbing the highest number of Mount Everest? Kamirita Sherpa 
. Who is the woman appointed as the first female deputy governor in the National Bank? Neelam Timsina Stone. - The cabinet meeting on February 25, 2077 decided to appoint Neelam Timsina Dhungana and Bam Bahadur Mishra as deputy governors in Rashtra Bank. - There is an arrangement to have two deputy governors in the National Bank. 
26. How many years has the Ministry of Physical Infrastructure and Transport prepared a strategic plan for the development of road and rail transport? five years 
27. Zika virus is transmitted by the bite of which species of mosquito? Aedes aegypti.
28. South Asian Association for Regional Cooperation (SAARC) signed the first agreement with which international organization? 'United Nations Conference on Education and Development'. 
29. When was Export Day celebrated for the first time in Nepal? Year 2073 Pus 22. (The day was celebrated on the basis of the date of establishment of the Nepal Export Council by the Nepal Export Council on the initiative of the private sector.) 
30. Since when Birendra Sainik Hospital located in the cantonment of Nepalese army was opened for general public? February 15, 2073. 
Fiscal federalism
1. What is financial federalism? What kind of arrangement is there in Nepal? Discuss. The arrangement in which the government of the federal system can freely exercise its economic rights is called fiscal federalism. In this, the federal unit uses financial rights, takes responsibility, and bears responsibility. It holds that the nearest government is more efficient in service delivery and should be given resources, power and responsibility. This is the most important aspect of the federal system. All the governments of the federal system are free to use the economic and financial rights according to the constitution and the law and these bodies can also share resources, responsibilities and administration among themselves. Within fiscal federalism, especially expenditure responsibility, revenue authority, intergovernmental financial transfer, internal debt, Topics include the mobilization of natural resources. In the federal system of Nepal, the constitution and laws have organized these issues. Arrangements related to financial federalism in Nepal- Nepal has a federal system of three levels namely union, state and local level. In this government, financial federalism is not being implemented by organizing work responsibilities, revenue rights, implementation mechanisms. To manage financial federalism in Nepal, there is the following system: - Legal system: - Constitution of Nepal - Intergovernmental Finance Management Act - 2074 - National Natural Resources and Finance Commission Act - 2074 Although financial federalism is basically managed by the above law, the following laws also support it: - Union , State and Local Level (Coordination and Interconnection) Act, 2077- Local Government Operation Act-2074- Economic Procedures and Financial Accountability Act-2076 Institutional Arrangements - Union, - Intergovernmental financial transfer includes allocation of revenue sources and grants. which has the following arrangements: - Distribution of revenue sources - 70 percent of the amount of excise duty received from value added tax and domestic production will be distributed to the Government of Nepal, 15 percent to the provinces and 15 percent to the local levels, - Grant distribution The Government of Nepal will distribute the following grants to the provinces and local levels: - Financial Equalization Grant - Conditional Grant, - Complementary Grant - Special Grant - Internal Loan - Government of Nepal, provinces and local levels can take internal loans within the limits recommended by the National Natural Resources and Finance Commission, but the provinces and local levels must obtain the consent of the Government of Nepal before taking internal loans. - Utilization of natural resources - Royalties received from natural resources (electricity, forest, mining, mountain climbing, water and others) Government of Nepal 50 percent, 25 percent of the respective province and 25 percent of the respective local level will be distributed. 2. What are the measures to make the promotion system of Nepal's civil service predictable? write Promotion is an increase in position, salary, prestige and responsibility of an employee. This is an important basis of employee motivation. The Civil Service Act-2049 and Regulations, 2050 have been implemented to organize the promotion system in Nepal's civil service. A promotion committee has been formed under the chairmanship of the chairman of the Public Service Commission or a member of the Public Service Commission appointed by him. The Ministry of Federal Affairs and General Administration also has an important role in the promotion work and still the promotion system of Nepal's civil service has not been predictable, for this the following measures should be adopted: - Applying the seniority system, through which senior employees will be promoted first, - Adopting the promotion system do,
3. What are the policy provisions related to the basic needs of citizens in Nepal's constitution? Mention. In Article 51 (h) of the Constitution of Nepal, there is a policy arrangement related to the basic needs of citizens, which can be mentioned as follows: Education - scientific, technical, professional, skill-based, employment-oriented and people-oriented education, - capable, competitive, ethical and dedicated manpower prepared for the national interest, - Increasing the state's investment in the education sector, regulating and managing the private sector's investment in it and making it serviceable, - Higher education is easy, quality and accessible, free of charge, - Community information center establishment and promotion, - Library establishment and promotion, Health - State investment in the health sector Increase, regulate and manage private sector investment in it to make it serviceable, - Increase investment in public health sector, - Quality in health services, - Ease of everyone,
4. In Nepal, the departmental minister/state minister has to bear financial responsibility for what matters? Mention. Financial responsibility is the act of being responsible, answering, reporting and bringing transparency in the income and expenditure, budget, project management, financial transactions, etc. that fall under government finance management. In order to bear this financial responsibility, Section 50 of the Economic Procedures and Financial Responsibility Act-2076 provides that departmental ministers/state ministers must bear financial responsibility in the following matters: - Proposing the budget, - Getting the budget submitted, - Choosing the plan, - Planning and To monitor the program, - to prepare the medium-term expenditure structure, - to ensure the protection and management of government assets, - likewise,
1. When was the much awaited national pride Upper Tamakosi hydropower project inaugurated? Vikram Samvat 2078 June 21.- Prime Minister KP Sharma Oli inaugurated the project by virtually 'switching on' the turbine from Pramanivasa Baluwatar. - Production of 76 MW electricity from the first turbine of the project with a total capacity of 456 MW started on June 21. - There are no 6 turbines of 76 megawatt capacity of that project . The remaining turbines will be operated sequentially, the company said. - The project was expected to be ready in 6 years with 35 billion rupees construction cost and 12 billion rupees interest cost for the construction period. However, due to various reasons, the construction cost of the project reached 52 billion rupees and the interest during the construction period reached 32 billion rupees, and the total investment exceeded 84 billion rupees.
2. According to the 2020 report of the United Nations Development Program, what is the human development index of Nepal? 0.602 (previous year: 0.579) 
3. According to the Economic Survey 2077/078, what is the percentage of the population that has reached basic drinking water facilities by February 2077? 91.5 percent. (23.0 percent of the population reached high and medium level drinking water facilities. By February of the financial year 077/78, an additional 155,808 people benefited from basic drinking water facilities. The construction of the long-awaited Melamchi Water Supply Project tunnel has been completed and water is available in Kathmandu. Distribution started.) 
4. What is the contribution of the agricultural sector in the total value addition in the financial year 077/78? 25.8 percent.
5. Who is the king known as 'ideal ruler' in the history of Nepal? Anshuvarma. 
6. Which is the biggest and longest river in Europe? Volga. 
7. Which is the world's largest hydroelectric project? Three Gorges (China). (This hydroelectric power plant built on the Yangtze River in China has an electricity production capacity of 22,500 MW. The world's second largest hydroelectric power project is the Itaypi Hydro Electric Power Plant (14,000 m. or .) Yes.) 
8. What is the standard quantity (standard quality) made for measuring a physical quantity? Unit. (The unit of physical quantity is divided into two parts, basic unit and theoretical unit.) 
9. What is the time taken by the Sun to go around the center of the constellation of Akasha Ganga once? Universe year (Kammik year).
10. Who is the first Prime Minister of Nepal to address the United Nations General Assembly as the head of government? BP Koirala. 
11. Who took power after the French Revolution? Napoleon Bonaparte. 
12. Who is the first female writer of Nepal to receive Madan Award? Parijat. 
13. Who said that “Reinforcement is a stimulus, the presentation of which increases the likelihood of a response”? Thorndike. 14. When did the cabinet meeting decide to celebrate the day of the promulgation of the Constitution of Nepal on October 3rd as a national day? Year 2073 Baisakh 7.
15. Mariana Trench is the deepest place in Pacific Ocean and which is the deepest place in Andhra Ocean? Puerto Rico Trench 16. Which climate is considered as cold desert and polar climate? 
Tundra climate . (The climate found in the highlands above 5000 meters) The last Malla king of Kantipur is Jayaprakash Malla, who is the last Malla king of Bhaktapur? Ranjit Mall. 
18. After India, which country has the most languages ​​in South Asia? Nepal. 
19. Henry Duna is the founder of which organization? Red Cross. 
20. How long has Nepal celebrated the first week of the new year as 'Wildlife Week'? Year 2053. (The 21st Wildlife Week was celebrated on the first week of April 2073 with the slogan 'The future of wildlife is in our hands'.)
21. Who is the first Nepali to receive the Magsaysay Prize, known as the Nobel Prize of Asia? Mahesh Chandra Regmi. 
22. Newari language belongs to which language family? Vote Burmese.
23. Which award was announced in April 2016 to promote innovative solutions to climate change adaptation? Adaptation Widespread Promotion Award (with the financial support of the British Department for International Development (DFID) and the management collaboration of IMC Worldwide, the award was announced by an organization called Ideas to Impact. There are two separate awards under this award. The amount of the first phase of the incentive award is 150,000 pounds. Sterling and the amount of the second stage implementation award is three lakh 25 thousand pounds sterling. To be selected for this award, the organization has to prove itself eligible in two stages.)
24. When was the traffic mobile app launched with the aim of making traffic management effective by increasing the use of smart technology? December 2073 Baisakh 20. - Various traffic related information is provided in the app. By using it, you can know about the traffic activity, information, accidents, etc. happening at that time in the form of notifications on your mobile. - Emergency phone numbers of hospital, police, ambulance etc. are also available in the app. - The details of the fare charged while traveling to different places across Nepal will also be available. - The app has traffic signals. - The app also has the facility to send confidential information to the police. - Public awareness videos, songs and other activities related to traffic, documentaries and photos are also available. 
25. Where did the ancient Olympic Games begin? Greece's Olympia.
26. Where did Buddha give his first sermon after attaining enlightenment? Sarnath. 
27. Who is the founder of psychology? Sigmund Freud. 
28. According to the financial year 2077-78, what is the number of public institutions that are profitable? 24. (24 are operating at a profit and 18 at a loss, while the turnover of the two companies is zero.) 
29. Which are the five countries that will receive the most tourists in 2020? India 17.5 percent, Myanmar 9.1 percent, Thailand 9.0 percent, China 8.4 percent and America 7.7 percent respectively. 
30. Who is the politician who will be the first woman speaker in Cyprus? Annita Dimitrio. 
31. Which is the smallest country in the world? Vatican City (0.4 km)
Cyber ​​crime and the legal system
1. What is cybercrime? What kind of system is there in Nepal for cyber crime control? Mention. Illegal activities done using computers, computer networks and devices are called cyber crime. This is an electronic crime committed through electronic media. It is especially used on devices such as computers (laptops or desktops) and mobiles (smartphones or tablets) connected to the Internet. This crime, which developed with the development of information technology, is currently being used more through social networks. In social networks such as Facebook, Messenger, Tik Tok, YouTube etc., there is an act of misusing videos, photos, human voices etc. against someone's will in the form of fake or imitation, which affects the dignity, dignity, reputation and honor of a person. System in Nepal for cyber crime control: There is a legal and institutional system in Nepal for cyber crime control. Which can be mentioned as follows: a. Legal system - Electronic Transactions Act - 2063 - Electronic Transactions Regulations - 2064 - Information Technology Judiciary Regulations - 2064 - Misuse of social media Facebook, Messenger, TikTok, YouTube etc. for criminal acts such as: morality, hatred, malice, spoiling social harmony, teasing women , insulting, similar unlimited acts Rs. The Electronic Transactions Act-2063 provides for a fine of up to one lakh, imprisonment for up to five years or both. b. Institutional Arrangements - Establishment of Central Cyber ​​Bureau in Nepal Police to investigate and investigate cybercrime-related offences, - Establishment of Information Technology Tribunal to initiate and resolve cases of electronic transaction-related offences, Information Technology Appellate Tribunal to hear appeals on its orders or decisions. Legal system - Electronic Transactions Act - 2063 - Electronic Transactions Regulations - 2064 - Information Technology Judiciary Regulations - 2064 - Misuse of social media Facebook, Messenger, TikTok, YouTube etc. for criminal acts such as: morality, hatred, malice, spoiling social harmony, teasing women , insulting, similar unlimited acts Rs. The Electronic Transactions Act-2063 provides for a fine of up to one lakh, imprisonment for up to five years or both. b. Institutional Arrangements - Establishment of Central Cyber ​​Bureau in Nepal Police to investigate and investigate cybercrime-related offences, - Establishment of Information Technology Tribunal to initiate and resolve cases of electronic transaction-related offences, Information Technology Appellate Tribunal to hear appeals on its orders or decisions. Legal system - Electronic Transactions Act - 2063 - Electronic Transactions Regulations - 2064 - Information Technology Judiciary Regulations - 2064 - Misuse of social media Facebook, Messenger, TikTok, YouTube etc. for criminal acts such as: morality, hatred, malice, spoiling social harmony, teasing women , insulting, similar unlimited acts Rs. The Electronic Transactions Act-2063 provides for a fine of up to one lakh, imprisonment for up to five years or both. b. Institutional Arrangements - Establishment of Central Cyber ​​Bureau in Nepal Police to investigate and investigate cybercrime-related offences, - Establishment of Information Technology Tribunal to initiate and resolve cases of electronic transaction-related offences, Information Technology Appellate Tribunal to hear appeals on its orders or decisions. By misusing YouTube etc. for criminal acts such as: morality, hatred, malice, spoiling social harmony, teasing women, insulting, etc. unlimited Rs. The Electronic Transactions Act-2063 provides for a fine of up to one lakh, imprisonment for up to five years or both. b. Institutional Arrangements - Establishment of Central Cyber ​​Bureau in Nepal Police to investigate and investigate cybercrime-related offences, - Establishment of Information Technology Tribunal to initiate and resolve cases of electronic transaction-related offences, Information Technology Appellate Tribunal to hear appeals on its orders or decisions. By misusing YouTube etc. for criminal acts such as: morality, hatred, malice, spoiling social harmony, teasing women, insulting, etc. unlimited Rs. The Electronic Transactions Act-2063 provides for a fine of up to one lakh, imprisonment for up to five years or both. b. Institutional Arrangements - Establishment of Central Cyber ​​Bureau in Nepal Police to investigate and investigate cybercrime-related offences, - Establishment of Information Technology Tribunal to initiate and resolve cases of electronic transaction-related offences, Information Technology Appellate Tribunal to hear appeals on its orders or decisions.
2. Write about the formation, work, duties and powers of the National Resource Estimation Committee. The Economic Procedures and Financial Responsibility Act-2076 and Regulations-2077, which are designed to make the country's federal financial management system responsible, transparent, effective and accountable by organizing economic activities such as budget formulation, disbursement, expenditure, accounting, reporting, internal control, audit etc. Provisions have been made regarding the establishment of the estimation committee, work, duties and rights, which can be mentioned as follows: Formation of the National Resource Estimation Committee: a. National Planning Commission Vice-Coordinator b. Member of the National Planning Commission looking at the macroeconomic sector - Member c. Governor of Nepal Rastra Bank - Member d. Secretary of the Ministry of Finance - Member. Controller General of Accounts – Member.
3. What are the principles of human resource management? Mention. Human resource is a living tool that mobilizes all resources. The economic and social transformation of the country is done by people and because such changes are done for people, human resources are both means and means of development. Human resource management is done at two levels, at the national level and at the organization level. This is a continuous process. Human resource management includes acquisition, development, utilization and maintenance of people. Since it will get completeness from this, these are its principles, which can be mentioned as follows: a. Acquiring human resources: Acquiring human resources is the task of fulfilling human resource needs in the organization. It includes the work of pre-recruitment of human resources in the organization, from formulating the human resource plan to the placement of employees, socialization, etc. Which are as follows:- Human Resource Plan: In order to obtain human resources in the organization, the supply of human resources is first estimated. Human resource plan is prepared on the basis of staff requirement and supply. - Recruitment: The recruitment process is started by calling for applications to fill the required staff in the organization. - Selection of candidates: Suitable qualified persons are selected from among the applications received for filling the staff. The task of selecting the necessary employees in the organization is completed. - Placement: According to the knowledge, skills, experience, and ability of the selected employees, the appropriate person is appointed to the appropriate position. This is the task of assigning and assigning responsibility to employees. - Socialization: Employees are informed about the working nature of the organization, culture, etc. b. Human resource development: Human resource development is the capacity development of employees. This includes the following: - Training: Training is provided to employees based on their needs. Training increases a person's knowledge, teaches skills and brings positive changes in perception. - Research and Development: Development of human resources is a continuous process. Therefore, continuous research and development should be done to improve this area. It has helped a lot in the moral development of the employees. c. Utilization of human resources: This is the act of mobilizing human resources. It includes activities such as motivating employees, working in groups, and taking reward and punishment policies. Which are as follows: - Motivation: Motivation is the act of bringing out the potential in employees. Financial and non-financial services-facilities awaken the potential of employees. It includes economic aspects such as salaries and allowances, insurance, employee provident fund, gratuity, pensions and other non-economic aspects such as holidays and awards. – Group work: By creating groups in the organization and working through the group, coordination, communication, ability and morale will increase, resulting in qualitative and numerical improvement in performance. Therefore, group work is important in the organization. - Reward and punishment system:- If the reward and punishment system can be applied based on the performance, the effectiveness of the organization will increase. By institutionalizing a system where good work is rewarded and bad work is punished, employee motivation can be awakened. This system is important in all government and private organizations. d. Management of human resources:- There should be sustainability of human resources in the organization. A rapid change in human resources hinders the achievement of the organization's goals. Therefore, the current challenge is to retain competent human resources in the organization. For this, maintaining a good relationship between employees and management, addressing employee complaints, improving work environment, Actions should be taken to keep the employees disciplined by acting in the interests of the employees. This helps in retaining the competent employees in the organization.
4. What are the ways to promote tourism? write Tourism, which is the backbone of the national economy, is a means of increasing international contacts. It is a major source of employment and a source of foreign exchange. Therefore, it should be promoted, for this the following measures should be adopted: - Emphasis on quantitative and qualitative tourism by guaranteeing tourist safety, - Identifying new tourist spots in different places of the country, - Making the air service of the country reliable, regular and safe, its area at home and abroad Expanding, - Expanding and strengthening tourism service centers, - Sufficiently increasing the number of hotel restaurants, regularly monitoring it to increase the quality of hotel services, - Developing physical infrastructure such as roads, communication, entertainment centers, streams, rivers, lakes, ponds, - Adventure tourism, sports tourism, religious tourism, trekking and climbing,
5. The constitution of Nepal has established the relationship between the three levels of government based on what principles? Mention. Article 232 of the Constitution of Nepal stipulates that the relationship between the three levels of government will be established based on the following principles: - the principle of cooperation, - the principle of coexistence, - the principle of coordination. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma 
 
1. Who is the Nepali doctor who will be awarded with the sixth Kobasai Foundation Award-2020 from Japan? Dr. Sudeep Shrestha - Japan's Kobasai Foundation said Dr. Awarded to Shrestha. - Dr. from Thailand. Aruni Dechafunkul and Prof. Dr. of Hong Kong. Tony Mok was also honored with the award.- The amount of the award is five hundred thousand Japanese yen.
2. Who is the talent who won the first place in the National Poetry Festival held on June 9, Bikram Samvat 2078? Kavita Rai (Bhojpur), (Poetry: Map of the Country)- Rai's poem entitled 'Map of the Country' won the first place in the poetry festival organized by Nepal Prajna Pratishthan. )'s poem 'Ama ma aayen ab', Niranjanakumari Chand's poem 'Yugeen Pratdhwani' and Prakash Silwal's (Nuwakot) poem 'Vodhisattva Ko Khop' came third. 30/30 thousand rupees in cash, Awarded medals and certificates. In the competition, 764 poets from nine countries including Nepal received poems, 41 of them were selected for poetry reading.- Since 2022, Nepal Pragya Pratishthan has been organizing the National Poetry Festival on June 9 every year on the occasion of its anniversary. .
3. When was it decided to reopen the national and international flights that were stopped due to the second wave of the Covid-19 epidemic? International flight: June 10, 2078 and domestic flight: June 17, 2078. 
4. When is International Yoga Day celebrated? June 21. (This day has been celebrated since 2015.) 
5. Where is the smallest bone in the human body? Ear. (longest bone: thigh) 
6. How many types of deer are there in Nepal? 32.
7. Who is the designer of the Eiffel Tower? Alexander Gustaf Eiffel. 8. What is known as the agreement regarding the arrangement that a person who does business in more than one country in the same income year can be taxed only in the country where he does business or in the country where he is a resident? Double tax exemption agreement. There is an arrangement such as getting or writing off such tax expenses. In order to free the taxpayers from double taxation, there is a global practice of making a double taxation exemption agreement between two countries by making a legal provision in the Domestic Income Tax Act.) 
9. Where is the elephant breeding center located? Meghauli, Chitwan.
10. Which Vedas fall under the four Vedas? 
Rigveda, Yajurveda, Samaveda and Atharvaveda . (Four Upavedas: Dhanurveda, Ayurveda, Gandharvaveda and Sthapatyaveda) Which is the first ASEAN country to establish diplomatic relations? Malaysia (January 1, 1960) 
12. When was Penn International established? Year 1921.- The complete form of the pen is Eyabhatak, Bhakkabatashkatak Balam Lyakbhashkitak. - Catherine Amy Dowson Scott and John Gyalsworthy who contributed to the establishment of this organization. - Its headquarters are in London.
13. When was Lonely Planet founded? 1972.- The founders of this organization related to the tourism sector were Tony Wheeler and Maureen Wheeler. - This organization, which publishes a list of tourist areas every year, produces and sells tourism-related books, guide books and audio-visual materials. - Its headquarters are in Melbourne, Australia (branch offices: London, Beijing and New Delhi). 
14. Where is the Olympic Museum in Nepal? Tripureshwar (Kathmandu). 
15. How many landlocked countries are in South America? 2. (Bolivia and Paraguay). 
16. When was the printing press started in Nepal? 1908.- Rana Prime Minister Janga Bahadur brought this press when he returned from Britain.- It was called Gidhe Press because of the image of a vulture on the head of the press.- This press was established in Thapathali Palace.
17. Robert Peary (USA) discovered the North Pole and who discovered the South Pole? Roald Amundsen, Norway. 
18. What is the maximum number of wards in the rural municipality? 21. 
19. Which is the metropolitan city with the highest number of wards? Pokhara Metropolitan City (33 wards). 
20. When was 'Rana Tharu' listed in the tribal list? May 5, 2077 (published in the Gazette).- Along with this, the number of tribal tribes has reached 60. 
21. Which body of Nepal working in the health sector has received international quality recognition (ISO: 15819: 2012)? National Public Health Laboratory, Teku.
22. How many landlocked countries are there in SAARC? 3 (Nepal, Bhutan and Afghanistan). 
23. Since when has the new Shresta system been implemented in Nepal? April 2, 2018
24. When was Motihari-Amlekhganj petroleum pipeline inaugurated? 24 August 2076. - The Motihari-Amlekhganj Petroleum Pipeline project, which has been in the news for almost two decades, has taken shape. The pipeline, which is the first cross-border petroleum pipeline in South Asia, was jointly inaugurated by Prime Minister KP Sharma Oli and Indian counterpart Narendra Modi. The pipeline project was inaugurated by Prime Minister Oli from the 'Action Room' in the office of the Prime Minister and Council of Ministers at Singha Durbar and by the Prime Minister of India Narendra Modi from Hyderabad Bhavan in New Delhi by pressing the switch using 'high-tech' technology.- Through the pipeline, 200 kiloliters of fuel per hour can be dropped to the Amlekhganj depot.- Motihari to Raxaul, Nepal- 32.80 km to the Indian border and 36 from the border to the depot at Amlekhganj. Pipeline has been laid at a distance of 28 km. The pipeline from Patna in Bharat Vihar to Amlekhganj is 268 km long.- 70 percent of the diesel consumed in Nepal is supplied from Amlekhganj. The responsibility of security of 36.28 km has been given to the Nepali Army.
25. What is 'Earth Watch'? A non-governmental organization that has been providing support in environmental research in various countries of the world.
26. In which museum of Nepal are moon rocks collected? National Museum in Cantonment.- Some pieces of lunar rock brought by American astronauts who reached the moon for the first time on July 20, 1969 were also brought to Nepal and those pieces were collected in the National Museum.- Three American astronauts Neil Armstrong, Edwin Aldrin and Michael Collins on July 16, 1969 They left for the moon through Apollo 11 and reached the lunar surface on July 20.- Armstrong and Aldrin were the first to set foot on the surface of the moon from the spacecraft. After that, a piece of rock brought by NASA's Apollo 17 has also been exhibited in the National Museum.
27. If there are 12 zodiac signs, how many constellations are there? 27. 
28. Which is the mammal that lays eggs? Platypus. 
29. When is the longest day? 21 June. (Shortest day: December 22). 
30. Which planet is known as 'King of the Planets'? Jupiter.Presented by: Tank KC 
Savita Sharma
June 16th. The Public Service Commission is going to conduct all the exams that were stopped due to the Corona (Covid-19) epidemic and lack of officials from 15th July. After appointing officials in the commission, all the postponed examinations will be conducted. According to the previous notice, the examination which was postponed was decided to be held from July 15 to October 25 at the meeting of the commission held on Monday. There was a disruption in the conduct of the examination from the buyer to the joint secretary. Some of the exams were postponed even after the notification of the exam was published. It will be easy after the appointment of officials. The commission made all the advertisements of the current financial year regularly according to the annual schedule. Despite the advertisement, the entire exam was postponed. Even in the last financial year 2076/77, the advertisement of the buyer was published and the examination was yet to be conducted. Public Service Commission Spokesperson Toynarayan Subedi said health standards and transitional special In this case, he informed that the examination will be conducted by following the norms related to examination (operation and management), 2077. The Commission has already published the schedule for the examination, interview and publication of the results, which were stopped due to various reasons in 11 advertisements. It will take three to four months for the commission to conduct the suspended examinations regularly. Spokesperson Subedi also informed that there is a preparation to check the exams in two to three shifts to speed up the exams. He clarified that the public service commission's advertised examination of organized organizations will also be conducted simultaneously. The schedule for publication of results has already been published. It will take three to four months for the commission to conduct the suspended examinations regularly. Spokesperson Subedi also informed that there is a preparation to check the exams in two to three shifts to speed up the exams. He clarified that the public service commission's advertised examination of organized organizations will also be conducted simultaneously. The schedule for publication of results has already been published. It will take three to four months for the commission to conduct the suspended examinations regularly. Spokesperson Subedi also informed that there is a preparation to check the exams in two to three shifts to speed up the exams. He clarified that the public service commission's advertised examination of organized organizations will also be conducted simultaneously.
 
National Security System
1. What are the components of Nepal's national security management? write In order to manage various aspects of the country's sovereignty, integrity, economic, social, physical and human security in Nepal, the law has provided various parts of national security management, which can be mentioned as follows:- To formulate policies related to overall national interest, security and defense of Nepal and Nepali Formation of the National Security Council under the chairmanship of the Prime Minister to make recommendations to the Government of Nepal and the Council of Ministers for the mobilization and control of the army, - The Ministry of Defense to formulate, implement and regulate the policies, laws, standards and plans related to the country's national security, - The policies, laws and regulations related to the internal security and peace and order of the country, Ministry of Home Affairs to formulate, implement and regulate standards and plans, - District Administration Office under the Ministry of Home Affairs in all districts of the country, - Formation of District Security Committee under the chairmanship of the Chief District Officer, formation and deployment of the following security agencies: a. Establishment of the Nepali Army to protect the independence, sovereignty, geographical integrity, independence and national unity of Nepal, b. Formation of Nepal Police to investigate and control the internal peace and security of the country, c. Formation of armed police force to protect life, wealth and freedom of the people by maintaining peace and order in Nepal, d. Formation of National Investigation Department to act as an intelligence agency. Formation of Nepal Police to investigate and control crime, c. Formation of armed police force to protect life, wealth and freedom of the people by maintaining peace and order in Nepal, d. Formation of National Investigation Department to act as an intelligence agency. Formation of Nepal Police to investigate and control crime, c. Formation of armed police force to protect life, wealth and freedom of the people by maintaining peace and order in Nepal, d. Formation of National Investigation Department to act as an intelligence agency.
2. What are the governance system measurement indicators? Discuss. The governance system is the structure established in the country to carry out the overall work of the public interest, including the defense of the country, development, expansion of foreign relations, supply of goods and services. Such a structure is both political and administrative. The political structure is led by the political person and the administrative structure is led by the administrative person. This kind of governance system is used to measure the good or bad governance in the country based on various indicators. Some international organizations including the World Bank have developed various indicators. As a whole, the following indicators are used to measure the governance system: Political stability:- Since politics is the basic policy of all policies, when politics is unstable, all policies and structures of the country are unstable, thereby weakening service delivery. Therefore, the governance system is strong, Political stability is needed to be able and effective. It is also taken as a major indicator of governance system measurement. Rule of Law:- The rule of law is a system where everyone is equal in the eyes of the law, there is no discrimination in compliance with the law, all state agencies are established on the basis of the law and operate in accordance with the law. If the amount of its guarantee increases, the indicator of the success of the government will be higher. Corruption control:- Corruption is the act of misusing public positions and structures for personal gain. In order to prevent such corruption, strict legal and institutional arrangements are made in the country to prevent corruption and if it is found, the progress of taking action according to the law reveals the strength of the governance system. In the world, it has been found that the governance of countries that have adopted a zero-tolerance strategy in corruption prevention has been excellent. Public Responsibilities: - Citizens of any country are sovereign. The sovereignty and political power of the country is in the hands of the citizens. The state of responsibility and accountability towards those citizens shows the effectiveness of the government. Transparency - All the work done for the country and the people should be public. Decisions made by persons holding public office, Citizens should have easy access to policy and public information. Transparency removes irregularities and corruption just as sunlight removes darkness. Therefore, transparency has become a strong indicator of governance effectiveness today. Participation - Participation is the active and meaningful presence of stakeholders in every function of the governance system. This further strengthens both the citizen's loyalty and legitimacy towards the government. Inclusion is currently taken in the broadest sense of participation. Inclusive development is a hot topic these days. Since the strength of the government is attached to its strength, it is currently being developed as an indicator of the government. State of service delivery - The main function of the governance system is service delivery. From protecting the life, wealth and freedom of citizens to the country's economic, social, cultural, It is the government's responsibility to develop everything, including physical. The overall service delivery should be automated by establishing a structure and system where service delivery is spontaneous. This shows the effectiveness of the governance system. Regulating capacity of the governance system - In the traditional stage of governance, the government agency was a single character in the delivery of goods and services. Governance was based on control and direction. However, in recent times, there has been a development of multiple actors in the delivery of goods and services, such as the private sector, cooperative organizations, non-governmental organizations, civil society, etc. Now the role of the government agency has become to facilitate, coordinate and cooperate in the work of all these characters to efficiently regulate all such work. Therefore, the regulatory capacity of the government shows its governmental effectiveness. That's why the regulation capacity of the government has been kept as an indicator of governance. Finally,
3. In Nepal, what are the arrangements related to the audit of federal, provincial and local levels? Make it clear. Auditing is the act of examining, evaluating and reporting government income and expenditure. There are three tiers of government in Nepal namely the federal, provincial and local levels and the income and expenditure of the three tiers of government are separate. In order to audit the income and expenditure of these three levels of government, Article 240 of the Constitution of Nepal establishes the Auditor General and Article 241 provides for the duties, duties and powers of the Auditor General. Audit Act-2075, Economic Procedures and Financial Responsibility Act-2076 and Regulations-2077, Local Government Operation Act-2074 have been formulated and implemented to manage the government audit. Since there are two types of government audit, internal audit and final audit, the above laws have provided for both audits. According to the above laws, the Federation of Nepal, There is a provision regarding the audit of the province and local level as follows: a. Audit of federal government and agencies under: a. Internal audit:- The Office of the Comptroller General of Accounts and the Office of the Controller of Funds and Accounts under it will do. Final audit:- To be done by the Auditor General's office, b. Audit of provincial government and agencies under: a. Internal Audit:- State Controller of Accounts Office will do. Final Audit:- To be done by the Office of the Auditor General, a. Local level audit: a. Internal Audit:- Local level internal audit will be done by the branch. Final Audit:- To be done by the Office of the Auditor General, - To be done by the Office of the Auditor General, b. Audit of provincial government and agencies under: a. Internal Audit:- State Controller of Accounts Office will do. Final Audit:- To be done by the Office of the Auditor General, a. Local level audit: a. Internal Audit:- Local level internal audit will be done by the branch. Final Audit:- To be done by the Office of the Auditor General, - To be done by the Office of the Auditor General, b. Audit of provincial government and agencies under: a. Internal Audit:- State Controller of Accounts Office will do. Final Audit:- To be done by the Office of the Auditor General, a. Local level audit: a. Internal Audit:- Local level internal audit will be done by the branch. Final Audit:- To be done by the Office of the Auditor General,
4. Mention the importance of foreign trade in Nepal. Nepal is a landlocked, It is an underdeveloped and agricultural country. This country is slowly moving towards industrialization. Despite being rich in various natural resources, it has not been able to be self-sufficient for all consumer goods due to its geographical location and economic situation. For example, it does not have its own sea and oil fields. Essential commodities like salt and oil have to be imported from other countries. According to the theory of modern trade, a country tries to earn profit by achieving specialization in the production of a limited number of goods without producing all the goods. International trade is mandatory for the export of raw materials and agricultural products found in Nepal and the import of other daily consumables and luxury goods. Currently, Nepal's trade deficit is high. It is also necessary to expand foreign trade in order to bring the balance of trade in one's favor. The current state of the world market and Nepal's entry into the World Trade Organization Foreign trade has become a mandatory requirement. The importance of foreign trade in Nepal can be pointed out as follows:- Helping the economic development of the country through import and export,- Getting rid of economic crisis,- Ending monopoly in trade,- Easy supply of goods that cannot be produced in their own country, such as: salt, gold, petroleum products. etc. - Improvement in production technology, - Import of foreign capital, technology, - Assistance in preparing a favorable environment for investment, - Enhancement in international relations development, - Affiliation with the world economy.
5. What kind of policy arrangements are there in the constitution of Nepal regarding social and cultural transformation? Mention. In Article 51 (c) of the Constitution of Nepal, there is a policy arrangement related to social and cultural transformation, which can be mentioned as follows: - Building a society based on social harmony by developing a healthy and civilized culture, - Studying for the protection, promotion and development of historical, archaeological and cultural heritage. , carrying out research, excavation and dissemination of information, - community development by promoting and mobilizing the creativity of the local community in social, cultural and service activities, - emphasizing the development of art, literature and music as national heritage, - existing religion in the society, To put an end to all kinds of discrimination, inequality, exploitation and injustice in the name of customs, traditions, customs and traditions,
6. In Nepal, what kind of women is referred to as a single woman? write According to the Single Women's Protection Fund (Operation) Regulations-2070, single women in Nepal refers to the following economically disadvantaged women:- Women who have divorced their husbands,- Widowed women,- Unmarried women who have completed thirty-five years of age,- Women who have lost their husbands for more than five years. Or a woman who has disappeared, - a woman who has separated from her husband after partition or separation. 
7. What is the purpose of filing? The main purpose of filing is to preserve documents in a file so that they can be found immediately when searching for them in the future. Other purposes of filing are as follows:- Gathering documents as evidence when needed,- Preventing duplication of work,- Helping to compare with each other,- Providing information and reports to the office easily,- Helping in monitoring and evaluation work.
 
1. There is a constitutional provision on which date the state government should present the budget for the next financial year? June 1.- According to this provision, budgets for the year 2078/079 were presented by all the seven provincial governments to the respective provincial assemblies on June 1, 2078. A budget has been arranged for the vaccination system.- Due to the contraction in the sources of expenditure, the size of the budget has also decreased in some provinces. 32 billion 46 million 92 million – Province 2: Rs. 33 billion 79 billion 14 lakhs – Bagmati Province: Rs. 57 billion 72 billion 9 lakh - Gandaki Province: Rs. 30 billion 394 million - Lumbini Province: Rs. 40 billion 95 million 97 million - Karnali Province: Rs. 36 billion 54 crore 66 lakh - Far Western Province: Rs.
2. When was the Nepal Citizenship (First Amendment) Ordinance issued? Year 2078 June 9 
3. What is the arrangement regarding registration of proposal for studying/researching medical education? can be registered in Nepal.- The international meeting held in Malaysia on November 27, 2019 decided to designate the Nepal Health Research Council as the official body to register research proposals. . 
4. When is International Nursing Day celebrated? May 12 - The slogan of this year (year 2021) is 'Nurse: A Voice to Lead: A Vision for Future Health Care'.- This day is celebrated every year on the occasion of her birthday in memory of the humanist priest Florence Nightingale.
5. Who is the first foreign president to come to Nepal? Dr. Rajendra Prasad (India). 
6. When was the formation of the National Information Commission? 2065 May 22.
7. What is the share of Bagmati Province in the national economy according to the details of the public provincial economy on 2078 Baisakh 31 by the Central Statistics Department? 37.7 percent (Rs. 16 trillion seven billion).- In the year 2077/078, the department estimates that Bagmati Province will have the largest share in the national economy (annual gross domestic product). Estimated to be 1 percent (one trillion and 72 billion).- Just like in the year 2076/77, in the year 2077/78, after Bagmati Province, Province 1, Lumbini Province, Province 2, Gandaki Province and Sudurpaschim Province have the highest share in GDP. 
8. When was the abolition of the Raj Parishad? May 4, 2063. 
9. When and where was the game of elephant polo played with the help of a long stick mounted on an elephant started? 1982 Nepal.
10. When was the first time in the history of Nepali coins that both English and Nepali languages ​​were issued? Year 2063 July (one rupee coin). 
11. Which province is expected to have the highest economic growth rate in the year 2077/78? Bagmati Province (4.7 percent). The economic growth rate of seven provinces (year 2077/78, estimated) - Province 1: 3.6 percent - Province 2: 3.5 percent - Bagmati Province: 4.7 percent - Gandaki Province: 3 .6 percent - Lumbini Province: 3.9 percent - Karnali Province: 3.6 percent - Sudurpaschim Province: 3.4 percent 
12. Who won the title of Nepal Super League (NSL), Nepal's first franchise football tournament held in May 2078? Kathmandu Razors (Runner-up: Dhangadhi FC) (Kathmandu Razors received 3.5 million rupees and runner-up Dhangadhi FC received 1.5 million rupees along with the title.)
13. Which is the first municipality to be declared a bicycle city in Nepal? Dharan sub-metropolitan city. 
14. When was Nepal Samvat given national recognition by Nepal government? November 8, 2065. 
15. Since when the new target seal of Nepal has been implemented? December 15, 2063. 
16. Since when was the practice of announcing the name of the best in SLC stopped? Year 2062. 
17. In which article of the Constitution of Nepal is there a provision regarding the formation of a judicial committee at the local level? Article 217. (In Article 217 of the Constitution, there is a provision for the rural municipality to establish a three-member judicial committee under the coordination of the village council vice president and the municipality deputy head of the municipality to determine the disputes within their jurisdiction according to the law, and there is a provision that the committee will consist of two members elected from among themselves by the village assembly or the municipal assembly.)
18. Nepal is located in which hemisphere of the earth? Northern Hemisphere. 
19. Which is the first national park of Nepal? Chitwan National Park 
20. When and where was the wildlife museum established in Nepal? Year 2063 June 13, Institute of Forestry Studies, Hetauda. 
21. When was the NATO Convention on Access to Genetic Resources and the Transparent and Equitable Sharing of Benefits Derived from Their Use signed? October 29, 2010 (Nayoga, Japan). - The Convention of Nayo came into effect on October 12, 2014. - This treaty was approved by Nepal on September 4, 2017. Nepal became the 101st country to ratify the treaty. 
22. What was called the Dastur given to the employees during the Rana period? Panful.
23. When did rafting start in Nepal? Year 2027. (Began to operate commercially since Year 2032.) 
24. When was the 'Iron Silk Road' agreement to connect Asian countries signed? November 10, 2006. 
25. What is the law to end caste-based untouchability? Civil Act-2020. 
26. Where is Nepal's largest apple garden established? Jumla (2078 Baisakh).- A well-equipped apple orchard with infrastructure was built on 150,000 square meters of land. One and a half hundred to two and a half hundred workers were employed in the garden in one day.- A campaign was started to plant about 30,000 apple plants in the garden at once.
27. What is 'Proxima b'? Recently discovered by scientists, a planet similar to the Earth and thought to be suitable for life (the planet orbiting the star Proxima Centauri is similar to the Earth to a large extent. This planet is about 4.2 light years away from the Earth, i.e. about 41 billion kilometers.) 
28. Who built the palace of Hanumandho? Pratap Malla. 
29. When was the agreement signed between India and China to resolve the dispute over the Doklam incident? August 2017.
30. Who has been elected as the president of Iran? Ibrahim Raisi (June 2021) - The former chief justice of Islamic fundamentalist ideology, Raisi was elected as the president of Iran. - Raisi, supported by Iran's supreme leader, Imam Ali Khamenei, won the majority of votes. . 
1. How many countries are participating in 'Eurocup 2020'? 24.- UEFA decided to increase the number of participating countries from 16 to 24 four years ago.- Eurocup 2020 was held in 11 cities in 11 countries.
2. Who is the beauty who won the title of Miss Universe-2020? Andrea Meza (Mexico).- Andrea, a 26-year-old software engineer, won the title after surpassing the beauties from 73 countries participating in the 69th edition of the Miss Universe competition.- Julia Gama from Brazil and Janique Masseta from Peru were the second runners-up in the competition that was held on May 16, 2021.
Which film was declared the best film in the 93rd edition of the prestigious Oscar Academy Awards in the world of cinema? Nomadland .- Best Other Genre/Artist - Best Actor: Anthony Hawkins (The Father) - Best Actress: Frances McDormand (Nomadland) - Best Director: Lo Zhao (Nomadland) - Best Supporting Actor: Damiel Kaluuya (Judas and the Black Messiah) ) - Best Supporting Actress: Yoon Yoo Jung (Minari) - Best Song: 'Fight for You' Lyrics (Judas and the Black Messiah) - Best International Feature Film Award: Another Round - Best Animated Feature Film: Soul - Best Animated Short Film : If Anything Happen I Love You – Best Live Action Art Film : Two Distant Strangers – Best Documentary Short Subject : Colette – Best Documentary Feature Film : My Octopus Teacher –
4. Who is the politician who became the first woman speaker in Cyprus? Annita Demetriou.- Demetriou was elected to the second most powerful position in Cyprus, which became independent in 1960.- In the 61 years after the liberation from the British colony, although many women members have obtained political positions, this position that Demetriou has received is the highest. 
5. Who was awarded Pulitzer Prize 2021, which is considered to be America's most respected in the field of journalism? Megharajagopalan (journalist of Indian origin), Alison Killung and Christo Baschek (Pulitzer Board announced the award on June 11 for the international news writing category for the year 2021.)
6. When was the international level convention center built in Lalitpur Godavari inaugurated? Bikram Samvat 2078 Baisakh 31.- Prime Minister KP Sharma Oli inaugurated the conference center virtually by pressing a switch from the official residence Baluwatar.- It is said that this conference center is the largest conference center in the country where three thousand people can sit in one hall at the same time.
7. Who has been appointed as the Chief Minister of Gandaki Province? Krishnachandra Nepali Pokharel (2078 June 29).- Pokharel was appointed Chief Minister by Gandaki Province Chief Sita Kumari Paudel in accordance with Article 168 (5) of the Constitution. After failing to do so, the state chief Paudel called on him to claim the position of chief minister with the basis of getting a majority. On behalf of the opposition alliance, Pokharel's claim for the position of Chief Minister was made. 
8. When was Advertising Day celebrated by Nepal Advertising Association? June 30. (Nepal Advertising Association (AN) started celebrating June 30 as Ad-Day on the occasion of the foundation day of the association.) 
9. Who was the first person to take the title of 'Shamsher'? Birshamsher.
10. After which treaty the border of Nepal was established from East Mechi to West Mahakali? Sugauli Treaty. 
11. If Gautama Buddha's charioteer is named Chanak, what is the name of the horse? Kanthak. 
12. When did the institutionalization of foreign aid in Nepal begin? 1951. 13. What is meant by inflation? The process or condition of continuously increasing prices.
14. According to the report on foreign direct investment published by Rashtra Bank on Bikram Samvat 2078 Baisakh 8, how much is the total foreign investment in Nepal? One trillion 82 billion 91 million 96 million. - Of the total foreign investment, paid-up capital is 88 billion (48.2 percent), 78 billion (42.8 percent) as reserves and 16 billion (9 percent) as loans. - India has the largest share (30 percent) in foreign direct investment. After India, China's share is 15 percent. St. Kitts and Nevis is the third largest tax haven for foreign investment in the country. So far, the country's investment in Nepal is 24.93 billion (13.6 percent of the total foreign investment). After that, the major countries to invest in Nepal are Ireland, Singapore, Australia, UAE, Bangladesh, South Korea, America and others. but,
15. When was Nepal Securities Board established as a capital market regulatory body? May 25, 2050. 
16. What is the name of the report submitted by Brutland Commission in 1987? Our common future. 
17. When did Nepal become a member of the International Union for Conservation of Nature (IUCN)? Year 1973. 
18. Watermen invented the fountain pen, but who invented the airplane? Orville Wright and Wilver Wright.
19. When did the Titanic crash? April 14, 1912. (On April 10, 1912, the ship departed from Southampton, England, for New York. More than 1,500 passengers died when it hit a large iceberg and sank on April 14 after a four-day journey. Titanic is said to be the most comfortable and luxurious of the ocean liners at that time. The same world-famous ship is now in China. A replica of 'Titanic' has been started.) 
20. When was the statue of Rama, Sita, Lakshmana and Hanuman installed in Ayodhyapuri in Chitwan's Madi? Year 2078 Baisakh 8.- The idol was enshrined on Baisakh 8 on the day of Rama Navami.- A temple was built and placed in Ganeshgunj, Madi Municipality-9, which is about 45 km south-west from Bharatpur.
21. Where will the 2022 Winter Olympic Games be held? Beijing, China. 
22. How many kilometers is the earth from the sun? 14 million 88 million km. 
23. Where is the highest waterfall in the world called Angel? Venezuela in South America. 
24. Which is the deepest ocean in the world? Caribbean Sea. 
25. Which film won the national feature film award at the Nepal International Film Festival (NIF) held in Baisakh in the year 2078? Amakhando. (Award amount: Rs. 1 lakh).- Similarly, Indian Film Dictionary won Gautam Buddha Award with 1500 dollars. 
26. Which country is known as the 'diamond of the desert'? Libya. 
27. The custom of wearing a tie started from which country? France. 
28. Which body does the work of formulating the policy of SAARC? Council of Ministers.
29. Which is the first country in the world to practice the right to information? Sweden - Sweden made provisions for access to information in the constitution in 1766. - Resolution 59 (1) passed by the United Nations in 1946 in the second year of its establishment contains provisions on the right to information. - The United States enacted the right to information law in 1966. - In the 1980s, the European Union directed member states to their public institutions on the right to information.
30. Which film won the title of best documentary in the ninth Nepal Africa Film Festival 2021 held in the capital? Assistant Husband (Ko Husband).- Documentary based on polygamy, directed by Ganesh Pandey and produced by Sarada Gair, Assistant Husband was declared the best.- Aama (directed by Himal Upreti and produced by Bhupen Kumar Khadka) was declared the best for the narrative film. The film is based on the story of keeping elderly parents in an old age home.Presented by: Tank KC 
Conceptual aspects of governance
1. What is meant by organized crime? Briefly discuss the efforts made to tackle organized crime in Nepal. Organized crime is a crime committed by a group of people involved in illegal activities. It is a group of people who commit criminal acts, who, together with each other, commit criminal acts such as theft, fraud, robbery, kidnapping for ransom, corruption, money laundering, financial investment in terrorist activities, etc. It is also a subversive act done by three or more people through mutual coordination. It also includes activities such as vandalizing and damaging the lives of citizens and public and private property using weapons or explosives. Efforts to prevent such crimes - In order to prevent organized crime in Nepal, various efforts have been made including legal and institutional arrangements. Which can be mentioned as follows: a. Legal system: - Organized Crime Prevention Act - 2070 - Corruption Prevention Act - 2059 - Money Laundering Prevention Act - 2064 and Regulations - 2073b. Institutional arrangements: - Authority Abuse Investigation Commission for investigation and investigation of corruption, - Asset Laundering Investigation Department for investigation and investigation of money laundering and financial investment in terrorist activities, - Other than corruption, money laundering and financial investment in terrorist activities Nepal Police and the District Police Office under it to investigate and investigate other organized crimes, - Special Court to process and resolve cases of corruption, money laundering and financial investment in terrorist activities and District Court to process and resolve cases of other organized crimes, c.
2. Discuss the conceptual aspects of governance. Also, make an analytical comment on the current governance system of Nepal, keeping in view the basic aspects of governance. A political and administrative system is needed in the country to carry out public welfare activities including defense, development, expansion of foreign relations, supply of goods and services. The concept of governance was developed for this purpose. It runs the government and manages the administration for economic and social transformation in the country. In the past, government agencies were only a single character in state management, governance was conducted under direction and control, and the state system was of a non-comprehensive nature. Presently, the presence of Bahupatra and his role in governance is evident. The government has done the work of regulation, facilitation and coordination. The private sector has done the work of providing goods and services, job creation, etc. and the government, There is collaboration with other actors including the private sector and the governmental state structure is inclusive and it can also be understood as a new concept of governance. Governance is a dynamic concept. It will be conducted on the basis of certain methods, procedures and universally accepted standards. Accountability, transparency and meaningful participation of stakeholders are fundamental aspects of governance. The current governance system of Nepal - the basic aspects of governance include the country's political system, rule of law, independent judiciary, child suffrage, freedom of the press, inclusion, etc., especially leading the administration. Considering these aspects, an analytical comment can be made on the current governance system of Nepal as follows: Federal governance system - Nepal is multi-ethnic, multi-religious, multilingual, It is a multicultural and geographically diverse country. A federal democratic republican governance system has been adopted in Nepal to bring about pioneering changes in the country by ending all the differences in the country and maintaining unity among diversity. The constitution of Nepal envisages an executive prime minister by providing for a constitutional president and a vice president. By transforming the country into a federal state, there are three levels of government in operation: federal, state and local levels. Inclusiveness – Nepal's governance is inclusive. There is inclusiveness at the political, diplomatic and administrative levels. The Civil Service Act-2049 has made Nepal's civil service inclusive by providing for reservation. Multi-stakeholder engagement – ​​Strengthening the economy through the participation and independent development of the public, private and cooperative sectors in Nepal. The constitutional policy, including making the investment and role of national and international non-governmental organizations accountable and transparent, has ensured the involvement of multiple actors in the state system. Investments in all sectors are accepted for development. The private sector and the cooperative sector have now become partners in development. Separation of Powers and Balance - The Constitution of Nepal has provided for separation of the functions of the Executive, Legislature and Judiciary to work in mutual independence, coordination and balance. Separation and balance of power is considered as the basis of state management. Rule of Law - All citizens are equal in the eyes of the law, the right to equality and non-discrimination in the application of the law, the provision of fundamental rights including the right to freedom, compliance with prevailing laws, provision of services in accordance with the law, etc., have been adopted in Nepal. Fundamental rights and human rights - The constitution of Nepal provides political, economic, 31 fundamental rights including employment, education, health, communication, food etc. have been arranged covering all aspects such as social and cultural rights. Human rights have been respected and protected by the constitutional arrangement of the National Human Rights Commission. Periodic Elections - Every five years elections are held at the federal, state and local levels. There is a provision of Election Commission in the Constitution for clean and fair elections. At the age of 18, there is a system of adult suffrage that allows them to vote to elect their representatives. Complete freedom of the press – The media of Nepal is completely free. There is a constitutional provision that prior bans are not imposed on publishing and broadcasting of news, media are not blocked, closed and confiscated. Constitutional Right to Information, Complete freedom of the press has been guaranteed in Nepal through legal and institutional arrangements. Public Accountability - In Nepal, there is a legal system in which people in charge of public positions should be accountable for their decisions and actions. The provision of accountability in governance has helped in increasing the effectiveness of service delivery. Transparency - In Nepal, the Good Governance Act, regulations, public hearings, publication of progress reports, websites, citizens' charters, addressing public complaints, etc., have increased citizens' access to the government. There has been improvement in aspects such as delays and irregularities in service delivery. - Even though there are positive provisions in the current governance system of Nepal, there are many more issues that need to be improved. Especially political stability, development of political and administrative good manners, good governance, morality, job creation, poverty alleviation,
3. How does transparency strengthen the state system? Transparency is openness. It ensures easy access and involvement of stakeholders in all decisions and actions taken in the office. This helps to prevent corruption and irregularities. When there is openness in all the activities of the public bodies, then the trust in the citizens increases. When citizens trust the state, then citizens are ready to help the state. Transparency strengthens the state system by assisting in the following ways: - By increasing citizen monitoring of distortions, delays, irregularities and corruption that may occur from public administration, - By allowing citizens to participate in development work, - By addressing the problems seen in all the political, economic, administrative, and social sectors of the country, the state and by developing good relations among citizens, - by increasing active and meaningful participation in public hearings,
4. How many types of passports are there in Nepal? The Passport Act-2076 and Regulation-2077, designed to organize and regulate the passports issued to Nepalese citizens traveling abroad, provide for the following four types of passports in Nepal: If there is a decision or recommendation from the agency or the secretariat, the passport department will issue a diplomatic passport. This passport, which is valid for a maximum of 10 years, is of a dark red color. Special Passport - Nominated by the Government of Nepal, State Government or any government body, to travel abroad for government work, study, study tour or training. There is a provision that the passport department will issue special passports to the specified officers and employees if they receive a written decision from the relevant agency. This passport will be valid for a maximum of 10 years. Service Passport - The passport department will issue service passports to private assistants and non-ranking employees accompanying the ambassadors, permanent representatives, special representatives, consuls general and gazetted level employees who are posted in missions abroad. There is an arrangement to do. This passport, which is valid for a maximum of five years, is orange in color. Ordinary Passport - The passport department issues an ordinary passport to Nepali citizens. This passport, which is valid for 10 years, is chocolate brown in color. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma There is a provision that the passport department will issue service passports to permanent representatives, special representatives, consuls general and gazetted level employees accompanying private assistants and unranked employees if they receive a written request from the ministry. This passport, which is valid for a maximum of five years, is orange in color. Ordinary Passport - The passport department issues an ordinary passport to Nepali citizens. This passport, which is valid for 10 years, is chocolate brown in color. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma There is a provision that the passport department will issue service passports to permanent representatives, special representatives, consuls general and gazetted level employees accompanying private assistants and unranked employees if they receive a written request from the ministry. This passport, which is valid for a maximum of five years, is orange in color. Ordinary Passport - The passport department issues an ordinary passport to Nepali citizens. This passport, which is valid for 10 years, is chocolate brown in color. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma There is a provision that the passport department will issue service passports to private assistants and non-ranking employees accompanying the consul general and gazetted level employees if they receive a written request from the ministry. This passport, which is valid for a maximum of five years, is orange in color. Ordinary Passport - The passport department issues an ordinary passport to Nepali citizens. This passport, which is valid for 10 years, is chocolate brown in color. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma There is a provision that the passport department will issue service passports to private assistants and non-ranking employees accompanying the consul general and gazetted level employees if they receive a written request from the ministry. This passport, which is valid for a maximum of five years, is orange in color. Ordinary Passport - The passport department issues an ordinary passport to Nepali citizens. This passport, which is valid for 10 years, is chocolate brown in color. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
Savita Sharma
Kathmandu, June 1st. The Public Service Commission is making internal preparations so that all the suspended examinations can be conducted before Dussehra. Although officials have been recommended to the commission, they have not been appointed and due to the Corona (Covid-19) epidemic, only internal preparations have been made for the public service examination. The commission has made internal preparations on how to conduct all the exams of the current financial year postponed due to the corona epidemic and how to proceed according to the regular schedule. Due to the lack of officers in the commission and the corona virus, there has been a disruption in the conduct of the examination from the buyer to the joint secretary. Public Service Commission Secretary Mahendra Prasad Guragai said that although the officers of the commission have been recommended, they have not been appointed, so the work has only been done internally. He informed that some of the advertised posts are yet to be tested due to Corona. he said, "We have planned to proceed with the exam that was stopped due to Covid-19. We have prepared to start the examination at an appropriate time after the covid infection subsides. He made it clear that as soon as the officials are appointed to fill the posts for the current financial year, more work will proceed. He said, "The ban should be stopped and a notice should be issued giving students at least one month to study." He said that it will depend on the situation of the covid infection, while informing that the notification of the examination is ready to be issued in July. Secretary Guragain said, "If the government gives permission to conduct the exam and there is no risk, we have made a plan that it can be done from now on, and it can be done after July." Toynarayan Subedi, the spokesperson of the Commission, informed that the original exam was stopped due to the entrance exam for the post of buyer of the previous financial year.
"All the advertisements of the current financial year are being conducted regularly according to the annual schedule of the advertisement commission, but no exam has been conducted for any post. He also informed that the exams that were stopped due to Corona in the last financial year have been completed this year. He said that in the first two months, the examination from Joint Secretary to Purchaser was stopped due to a court case regarding some advertisements. He clarified that since Chait 10th, the commission has been without an officer and the work has stopped. The Public Service Commission was established on June 1, 2008. With the establishment of democracy in the country in 2007, the commission was established with the aim of appointing civil servants through a separate and independent agency. The commission has been performing accordingly. The latest constitution has given more responsibility to the commission. In Article 242 of the Constitution of Nepal issued in 2072, Public Service Commission has been provided with responsibility. Under that, in Article 243 It is the duty of the Public Service Commission to conduct examinations to select suitable candidates for appointment to civil service posts. Similarly, the role of the commission has been expanded beyond the posts of the civil service. Accordingly, there is a constitutional provision that the Public Service Commission conducts the written examination for the posts of the Nepali Army, Nepal Police, Nepalese Police Force, other federal government services and organized organizations.
 
1. According to the budget of the financial year 2078-79 What is the target of economic growth in 2078/79? 6.5 percent 
2. How long has the government announced that it will replace vehicles that run on petroleum products? V.No. 2088 (within the next 10 years, through the budget of FY 2078/79) 
3. When is World Environment Day celebrated? June 5 - International slogan: restoration of ecological system. - National slogan: new thinking and creation, restoration of natural system. 
4. Which period has been designated as the 'Decade of Ecosystem Restoration' by the United Nations? Year 2021-2030 
5. When was the Environment Protection Council formed in Nepal? V.No. 2049 October 15 
6. Since when was the vehicle pollution check started in Kathmandu Valley? V.No. 2051 Baisakh 1
7. Who has been elected as the president of Israel? Isaac Herzog 
- Elected as the 11th president of the country, Herzog received 87 votes from the 120-member Israeli parliament. - Herzog defeated another presidential candidate, Meriam Peres. The term of the current President Reuven Rivlin will end next month. 
8. When is the day for the abolition of caste discrimination and untouchability celebrated? 21st of May (Year 2063, commemorating the day when the country was declared a nation free of ethnic untouchability, this day is celebrated on 21st of May every year.)
9. How much has the International Cricket Council increased the number of teams participating in the One Day World Cup? 14 (on June 1, 2021) - 14 nations will participate in the One Day World Cup in 2027. At present, ten nations are participating in the one-day World Cup cricket. Similarly, 20 teams will be allowed to participate in the T-20 World Cup. Currently, 16 nations are participating.- 20 teams will participate in the T-20 World Cup in 2024.- The ICC has also decided to hold the T-20 World Cup every two years after the 2024 World Cup.- Likewise, the Champions Trophy will be held again. There has been no Champions Trophy since 2017. The Champions Trophy will be played by 8 countries. The One Day Cricket World Cup and the Chamiens Trophy will be held at intervals of four years.
10. When is World Food Hygiene Day celebrated? June 7 - The Third World Food Hygiene Day and the Thirteenth National Food Hygiene Day are celebrated with the slogan 'Today's Clean Food, Tomorrow's Healthy Life' (Kbabha Ayyam Layad Ayach Ba Jabhabatijath Tayamyachchayadh).- United Nations General Assembly on December 20, 2018, every year. According to the decision to celebrate the World Food Hygiene Day on June 7, this day has been celebrated globally since 2019.- With the aim of increasing public awareness about food hygiene and quality among the general consumers in Nepal. Food Hygiene Day has been celebrated since 2065. 
11. Albert Einstein is the exponent of 'theory of relativity' (relativism) and who is the exponent of the theory of relative density? 
 Archimedes 
12. Which is the most abundant gas in nature? Nitrogen
13. William Harvey discovered the blood circulation process of the human body, who discovered the theory of heredity? Gregor Mendel14. What is the health problem caused by lack of balanced food called? malnutrition
15. When did the World Health Organization name the variants of Covid-19 based on the Greek alphabet? May 31, 2021 - Controversy increased when variants of Covid-19 were named based on the name of the country where the variant was identified for the first time. To reconcile such controversy, the World Health Organization named the new variant of the Covid virus on May 31.- WHO named the variant found in the UK as 'Alpha', the variant found in Brazil as 'Gamma', the variant found in South Africa as 'Vita', the variant found in India (B-1.617 .2) named delta. Another variant found in India (B-1.617. 1) Named 'Kappa'. - These variants, which are highly contagious, have been listed by WHO as 'Variants of Concern' i.e. deadly viruses. - Naming by the 'International Committee on Taxonomy of Viruses (ICTV)' based on the conclusions drawn by a group of virologists and scientists.
16. Mucormycosis is an infection seen in patients with which disease? Covid-19- Patients with Covid-19 may have an infection called mucormycosis. - This infection is rarely seen, but if the infection is serious, it can be fatal, so you should be aware of this infection in time. Initial symptoms - pain around the face, mouth, nose, eyes, - redness of the eyes, - thick nasal discharge, - fever, - Swelling and drooping of the eyelids, blurred vision. Preventive measures - use clean and dry masks, do not reuse disposable masks, - regularly wash hands orUse of tizers, - Use of disposable gloves if working outdoors or in dirt, - Do not go to very dusty and damp places, - Clean the nose with salt water, - Rinse the throat and mouth with liquid containing povidone iodine, - Random steroids and antibiotics. Do not use, - Patients with diabetes should keep their sugar under control, - Take medicine only on the advice of health workers, - Pay attention to personal hygiene. 
17. Which period has been declared by the government as the decade of public education? V.No. 2076-2085 
18. When was the establishment of the Global Center for Cyber ​​Security? January 26, 2018 – This organization was established by the World Economic Forum with the aim of providing a safe cyber space by discouraging cyber crime related activities. - Its headquarters is in Geneva, Switzerland.
19. How many years has the government come up with a strategy for the development of the statistical system according to the preparation of policy making based on the facts? Five years (year 2075 Chaitra) (The strategy will determine the statistical units from the center to the local level and the work to be done according to the federal structure. During the implementation period of the strategy, the Central Statistics Department will be upgraded and transformed into the National Statistics Office.) 
20. Which country submits the budget twice a year? France 
21. Where is the headquarters of the International Olympic Committee? Lausanne , Switzerland 
22. What is it called when you move your lips to sing a song sung by others? Lip singing
23. Who is the youngest civil servant to scale the summit of Mount Everest? Yuvraj Dhital - Dhital B.S. Successfully climbed Mount Everest at the age of 23 on June 17, 2078 (May 31, 2021).- Dhital from West Rukum is currently working as a surveying technician at Lamhi branch under surveying office Dang. 
24. Who is the scientist who invented oxygen? J. Priest 
25. What does the period of a planet go around the sun mean for that planet? A period of one year (the period of a planet's rotation on its axis refers to the period of 1 day of that planet.) 
26. When was SAARC Japan Special Fund (SJSF) established? 1993 September 27 
27. Where is UNICEF's regional office for South Asia located? Nepal
28. When did the European Economic Community (EEC) become the European Union (EU)? 1 November 1993 
29. From which periodical plan has Nepal started receiving foreign aid? First Five Year Plan 
30. Since when has the financial sector reform program been implemented in Nepal? V.No. 2057 NovemberPresented by: Tank K.C. 
Inclusive Development
1. What is inclusive development? Discuss. Development means positive change. This situation has improved today compared to yesterday. This improvement and positive change is inclusive development in all classes, regions and communities. It means everyone's participation and adoption in development. Nepal is an ethnically, linguistically, religiously, culturally and geographically diverse country. Development, protection and promotion of all these diversity is inclusive development. Social justice, gender equality, the end of caste and regional differences, equality, equality, freedom are the products of inclusive development. Inclusive development is actually unity among diversity. The Constitution of Nepal, which is ahead in terms of inclusion, has made many provisions related to inclusive development. The preamble of the constitution itself is broad, in Article 3 a very fine definition of the nation has been made. By transforming the country into a federal state, There is a three-level system of government by state and local levels. There is an inclusive government at the center from the union to the state and local ward levels. This is the essence of inclusive development. Similarly, there are 31 fundamental rights in the Constitution of Nepal, the guiding principles and policies of the state are clarified, the President and Vice President of the country are of different genders or communities, the Council of Ministers is formed according to inclusive principles, at least one-third of the members of the Federal Parliament should be women, the Speaker and Deputy Speaker of the House of Representatives. The Constitution of Nepal has multi-faceted provisions related to inclusive development such as one of them should be a woman and both should represent different parties, adoption of inclusive principles while appointing constitutional bodies of the state, ambassadors and special representatives. The Civil Service Act, 2049 made Nepal's civil service inclusive by providing for reservation, international development aid mobilization policy, 2076 has taken a strategy to mobilize development aid paying attention to the balanced development of all classes, communities and regions. Although these and other similar laws and policies have made adequate arrangements for inclusive development in Nepal, inclusive development has not yet been achieved in the real sense. There are still many tasks left to be done such as poverty alleviation, unemployment problem solution, geographical and regional balance, upliftment of backward classes and communities. For this, it is necessary to identify the target groups and set programs according to their demands and needs, increase income and employment, commercialize agriculture, develop industry, empower the weaker sections, and bring relief and upliftment programs in real inclusive development. A strategy has been taken to mobilize development assistance by paying attention to the balanced development of the community and the region. Although these and other similar laws and policies have made adequate arrangements for inclusive development in Nepal, inclusive development has not yet been achieved in the real sense. There are still many tasks left to be done such as poverty alleviation, unemployment problem solution, geographical and regional balance, upliftment of backward classes and communities. For this, it is necessary to identify the target groups and set programs according to their demands and needs, increase income and employment, commercialize agriculture, develop industry, empower the weaker sections, and bring relief and upliftment programs in real inclusive development. A strategy has been taken to mobilize development assistance by paying attention to the balanced development of the community and the region. Although these and other similar laws and policies have made adequate arrangements for inclusive development in Nepal, inclusive development has not yet been achieved in the real sense. There are still many tasks left to be done such as poverty alleviation, unemployment problem solution, geographical and regional balance, upliftment of backward classes and communities. For this, it is necessary to identify the target groups and set programs according to their demands and needs, increase income and employment, commercialize agriculture, develop industry, empower the weaker sections, and bring relief and upliftment programs in real inclusive development. There is still a lot of work to be done, including the upliftment of backward classes and communities. For this, it is necessary to identify the target groups and set programs according to their demands and needs, increase income and employment, commercialize agriculture, develop industry, empower the weaker sections, and bring relief and upliftment programs in real inclusive development. There is still a lot of work to be done, including the upliftment of backward classes and communities. For this, it is necessary to identify the target groups and set programs according to their demands and needs, increase income and employment, commercialize agriculture, develop industry, empower the weaker sections, and bring relief and upliftment programs in real inclusive development.
2. Mention the features of the Foreign Investment and Technology Transfer Act, 2075. The features of the Foreign Investment and Technology Transfer Act, 2075 designed to manage foreign investment can be mentioned as follows: a. A clear objective has been taken.- Foreign capital in infrastructure development, production of goods and services, - Attracting technology and investment, - Creating an investment-friendly environment, - Achieving sustainable economic growth through industrialization. b. The form of foreign investment has been determined. The above Act does not specify the maximum limit of foreign investment and provides that foreign investment can be made in the following forms: - Single or joint, - Purchase of industrial property or shares, - Lease investment, - Technology transfer, - Branch establishment, - Capital investment fund can be set up, - Securities transactions, - able to issue securities and take loans, obtain foreign currency, - able to take loans from foreign financial institutions. c. The approval and withdrawal of foreign investment has been made clear as follows: - The approval of up to six billion will be done by the Department of Industry, - The approval of more than six billion will be done by the office of the Investment Board, - The right to withdraw the investment and the accumulated amount, to apply to the investment approval body, if satisfied with the said decision If you do not understand, you can apply to the Ministry of Industry, Commerce and Supply, and the Ministry must make a decision within thirty working days. d. Foreign investment promotion, facilitation and regulation has been arranged as follows: - Industry and Investment Promotion Board to promote foreign investment, - Single Point Service Center to facilitate foreign investment, - Industry Department to facilitate, monitor, inspect and regulate foreign investment, e. The following exemptions, facilities and concessions have been given to foreign investors: (1) Facilities to be received by industry: This Act, (2) able to open an account in foreign currency, (3) able to use foreign currency for salary, principal, interest payment, (4) technical and managerial staff in the industry cannot be filled by Nepali citizens If necessary, foreign nationals can be hired, (5) guarantee that Nepali industries will be treated nationally, industrial protection will be given and the industry will not be nationalized, (6) Arrangements related to land: to make arrangements for purchase or by other means, to be facilitated by the investment approval agency, (7) Industry Arrangements for not changing the conditions of service facilities received at the time of establishment, (8) Arrangements for identification cards for foreign investors, (9) Visa facilities: a. Non-tourist visa: up to 6 months visa for study, research, survey and employees and workers. Professional Visa: Visa for investors/representatives and family members to stay in Nepal for as long as the investment lasts, etc. Residential Visa: A visa that allows foreign investors/representatives and family members to live in Nepal who invest one million US dollars or more at one time, f. Grievance management: (1) Department of Industry: If there is any complaint regarding the work of an employee who is responsible for registration, monitoring, and regulation of industry, provision can be made to the Department of Industry for hearing. You can apply to the ministry regarding the actions taken, the ministry will address it, Ch. Dispute resolution: - In case of any dispute between Nepali and foreign investors, the Department of Industry can facilitate the settlement through mutual discussion or negotiation. Residential Visa: A visa that allows foreign investors/representatives and family members to live in Nepal who invest one million US dollars or more at one time, f. Grievance management: (1) Department of Industry: If there is any complaint regarding the work of an employee who is responsible for registration, monitoring, and regulation of industry, provision can be made to the Department of Industry for hearing. You can apply to the ministry regarding the actions taken, the ministry will address it, Ch. Dispute resolution: - In case of any dispute between Nepali and foreign investors, the Department of Industry can facilitate the settlement through mutual discussion or negotiation. Residential Visa: A visa that allows foreign investors/representatives and family members to live in Nepal who invest one million US dollars or more at one time, f. Grievance management: (1) Department of Industry: If there is any complaint regarding the work of an employee who is responsible for registration, monitoring, and regulation of industry, provision can be made to the Department of Industry for hearing. You can apply to the ministry regarding the actions taken, the ministry will address it, Ch. Dispute resolution: - In case of any dispute between Nepali and foreign investors, the Department of Industry can facilitate the settlement through mutual discussion or negotiation. If there is any complaint about the work of any regulating employee, he can apply to the Department of Industry for a hearing. Dispute resolution: - In case of any dispute between Nepali and foreign investors, the Department of Industry can facilitate the settlement through mutual discussion or negotiation. If there is any complaint about the work of any regulating employee, he can apply to the Department of Industry for a hearing. Dispute resolution: - In case of any dispute between Nepali and foreign investors, the Department of Industry can facilitate the settlement through mutual discussion or negotiation.
3. The ratio of revenue to gross domestic product in Nepal is still low, what are the reasons for this? describe. Gross domestic product is the value of goods and services produced within the country in a year. Revenue mobilization in proportion to GDP in Nepal. In 2063/64, it was 12.1 percent and now it is 24 percent. In the financial year 2077/78, the gross domestic product of Nepal is 42 trillion 76 billion. In the next fiscal year 2078/79, the government has set a target of collecting 10 trillion 24 billion revenue. Which is 24 percent of the current gross domestic product. The current Fifteenth Plan expects the ratio of revenue collection to reach 32.2 percent of the country's gross domestic product by the fiscal year 2080/81. In developed countries, its ratio is more than 30 percent. Although the neighboring country India is somewhat less than this, China, Belgium, In countries like Denmark, the ratio of revenue collection is high. Nepal's economy is small compared to developed countries. Not all transactions of economic activity have come within the government net. Adequate production, employment, import and export, tourism and physical infrastructure are yet to be developed. Due to the open border between Nepal and India, a large amount of revenue has been leaking for years. There is also a lack of recognition among taxpayers that they should pay taxes voluntarily. Due to these and similar reasons, the revenue mobilization in proportion to the gross domestic product in Nepal is still low. Other reasons for this are as follows: - Not being able to bring all the informal economy under the government, - Not being able to reduce and increase the tax rate, - Exemption facilities in value added tax and customs being high, - Not being able to assess the customs based on the actual transaction value,
4. What are the areas of international development aid mobilization? write The International Development Aid Mobilization Policy, 2076, designed to realize the national aspirations of a prosperous Nepal and a happy Nepali, has taken a policy to mobilize international development aid in eight areas of national needs and priorities, which are as follows: a. Construction of physical infrastructure, b. Education, health, drinking water, sanitation, c. Increase in national production and productivity, d. Job creation and poverty alleviation, e. Development and transfer of science and technology, Ch. Environmental protection and climate change, ch. Disaster management, h. The suitable area determined by the government of Nepal among the areas where the capacity of public, private, cooperative and community sectors is not reached.
5. Mention the causes of deforestation in Nepal and discuss its effects. Deforestation is the loss of trees, plants and vegetation. Deforestation in Nepal is mainly due to natural and human causes. Forest encroachment, illegal deforestation, river erosion, soil erosion, forest fires, uncontrolled grazing, uncontrolled sand collection and extraction, lack of public awareness, etc. are causing forest destruction in Nepal. Other causes of forest destruction in Nepal are as follows:- Use of wood and firewood as energy in rural areas,- Use of forest area for physical infrastructure development,- Ineffectiveness of protective, conservation and promotional activities to prevent forest destruction,- Planting more trees and forests. Not being able to strengthen the reconstruction work, - Not being able to organize forest protection programs, - Not being able to actively participate in the overall development of the forest, - Removal of old trees in the forest and planting of new plants is not effective, - Increase in theft and smuggling of wood in Terai and other areas. Effects of forest destruction- Forests are the source of clean air and water which is needed by all living creatures on this earth. The forest is the source of all the things that people eat, from what they digest to when they get sick. When there is loss and damage in the forest, all these things obtained from the forest will be affected. Deforestation has multifaceted effects, which can be mentioned as follows:- Climate change, increase in temperature, increase in snow melting in mountains, abnormal changes in weather,- Loss of valuable herbs,- Impediment in wildlife conservation,- Problems in forest study and research,- Tourism development. Constraints, - Loss of biological diversity, - Problem in plant-based medicine industry due to indiscriminate deforestation, - Imbalance in ecosystem, - Disaster of land degradation. - Finally, forest is the common property of all. It is everyone's duty to build it. By increasing public awareness about the importance of forests, forests should be protected by removing old trees, cutting them and planting new ones. More emphasis should be placed on forest regulation. Green forest is the wealth of Nepal, everyone should understand it. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
1. When was the Partnership for Green Development and Global Goals 2030 (PFORG) Seoul Summit held? May 30-31, 2021.- In the virtual summit on green recovery for carbon neutrality held in the Republic of Korea, the heads of state and government of more than 40 countries, leaders of 21 international organizations, representatives of the education sector, civil society, and business community participated. It is said that the foundation will be prepared for the COP-26 conference to be held in Britain to speed up the global collective action on climate change.- At the conference on May 30, President Bidya Devi Bhandari said that Nepal has moved forward with the goal of becoming a carbon neutral country by 2050.
2. When was the policy of allowing a couple to have up to three children in China? May 31, 2021.- Changing the previous policy of allowing up to two children, the government has now introduced a policy that allows a couple to have up to three children. The government of the leadership introduced a new policy to increase the population.- Only 12 million children were born in China last year. In 2016, one crore eight million children were born. This year's birth rate is said to be the lowest since 1960. - In China, from 1980 to 2015, a couple had a policy of giving birth to only one child. In 2016, the policy of having up to two children was implemented.
3. When is Film Journalism Day celebrated? June 7.- Film Journalists Association of Nepal celebrated the 22nd foundation day of the association and the 19th Film Journalism Day on June 7, 2078.- This day has been celebrated on June 7 every year based on the day the association was registered. 
4. What is the name of the shrine related to the Bishnumati river estuary? dream shrine 
5. When is National Women's Rights Day celebrated in Nepal? May 16 
6. On what basis will this year's Secondary Education Examination (SEE) be conducted? From the internal evaluation of the school.- (Due to the covid-19 epidemic, the SEE exam was conducted through the internal evaluation of the school. Due to the covid-19 epidemic, the last year's SEE exam was also conducted through the internal evaluation of the school.)
7. When was Gautam Buddha International Peace Prize established? Vikram Samvat 2062.- (The Gautama Buddha International Peace Prize awarded every five years was awarded for the first time on the Buddha Purnima day in 2065) 
. 8. Which is the district where telephone was first operated by satellite? Mustang. 
9. When was the Nepal Aid Group formed? Year 1976. 
10. What is the name of the newspaper published regularly by the SAARC secretariat? Pigeon. 
11. Since when was traffic control started in Nepal through electrical signals? Year 2023. 
12. When and where was the first Consulate General of India opened in Nepal? 2061 January 4, Birganj.
13. When is Republic Day celebrated in Nepal? June 15.- (Republic Day is celebrated every year in commemoration of the day when the first meeting of the Constituent Assembly declared Nepal a federal democratic republic on June 15, 2065.) 
14. When was the state visit to Bangladesh by President Bidya Devi Bhandari? 2077 Chait 9-10 (year 2021 March 22-23). 
15. Who will be appointed as the Chief Executive Officer (CEO) of the Covid-19 Crisis Management Center (CCMC) by the meeting of the Council of Ministers on 10th June 2078? Balananda Sharma (Nepalese army veteran). 16. To whom will the Ministry of Youth and Sports award Sports Journalism Award-2077? Sports journalist Kamal Khatri (prize Rs. 50 thousand). 
17. Which national park has the most tigers in Nepal? Chitwan National Park.
18. What is the position of Nepal in the new rankings released by FIFA, the highest body of world football, on May 27, 2021? 171st.- Nepal is in the third place in the ranking of South Asian countries. 
19. Who is known as the first martyr of Nepali literature? Subba Krishnalal Adhikari. 
20. Under which ministry does the Central Registration (personal incident registration) department fall? Ministry of Federal Affairs and Local Development 
21. Where is the head office of BRICS Bank? Shanghai (China). 
22. When did the appointment of Chief District Officer start in Nepal? December 1, 2022. 
23. Since when is there a provision to keep government office signboards in Nepali? 2018 May 9. 
24. Which country is the first to implement value added tax? France (since 1954).
25. What is the other name of Arun river that flows from the highest place in Nepal? Fungchu 
26. Who is the originator of psychological medicine system? Sigmund Freud. 
27. In India, Mahatma Gandhi is known as Bapu, but who is known as Netaji? Subash Chandra Bose. 
28. Where is the main residence of Hayu caste in Nepal? Ramechhap and Sindhuli. 
29. Which is the first SAARC country to ratify the Paris Agreement on climate change? Maldives.- (Nepal approved this agreement on October 24, 2016.) 
30. Which is the reinsurance company that has recently received operating permission from the insurance committee? Himalayan Re-Insurance Company. 
Presenter: Tank Casey
Current budget 1. Mention the main features of the budget for the financial year 2078/079. According to Article 119 of the Constitution of Nepal, the Minister of Finance of the Government of Nepal has to submit the budget (annual estimate of revenue and expenditure) to the Federal Parliament on the 15th of June of every financial year. Currently, due to the dissolution of the House of Representatives, this year's budget has been brought through an ordinance. This budget, which will be implemented from the 1st of July, aims to protect the lives of citizens from the epidemic of Covid-19, speed up development, build a strong public welfare state, mobilize the public, private and cooperative sectors and build a sustainable economy. This budget, which is estimated to have an economic growth rate of 6.5 percent, has emphasized on relief, concessions and economic revival in every sector. This is the basic feature of the budget. Other features of the budget can be mentioned as follows: - The size of the budget has been increased, in which the total budget is Rs. Current expenditure out of 16 trillion 47 billion 57 crores is Rs. 6 trillion 78 billion 61 crore (41.2 percent), capital expenditure Rs. Three trillion 74 billion 26 crores (22.7 percent), towards financial arrangements Rs. Two billion seven billion 97 crores (12.6 percent), financial transfers to state and local levels Rs. Three trillion 86 billion 71 crores (23.5 percent). Among the sources to bear this expenditure, Rs. 10 trillion 24 billion 90 crores, from foreign grants Rs. 63 billion 37 crores, from foreign loans Rs. Three billion nine billion 29 crores and from internal loans Rs. Two trillion 50 billion. - Discounts on electricity tariffs throughout the prohibition period, all discounts for those who consume up to 20 units per month, 50% discount for those who consume up to 150 units per month, 30% discount for those who consume up to 250 units per month, discount on electricity demand charges for manufacturing industries, hotels and film industries, - Laptops for students Buy Rs. Loan up to 80 thousand, One SIM card free to all students above 16 years of age, with a mortgage of graduation or above educational certificate at five percent interest of Rs. Concessional loan up to 25 lakhs, - The Nepal government will bear the contribution amount of June and June 2078 to be deposited by workers and employers belonging to the social security fund, - Provision of tourism work with an amount equal to ten days' wages to the employees of civil, public institutions and establishments to promote domestic tourism, - Foreigners visiting Nepal One-month free tourist visa for tourists, - guaranteed minimum 100 days employment for unemployed people, allocation of 12 billion to create 200,000 jobs from the Prime Minister's Employment Program next year, allocation of 400 million to provide business-related skill development training to an additional 100,000 people, - 33 billion in social security allowance The monthly allowance of senior citizens has been increased by a percentage of Rs. four thousand,
2. In Nepal, the cooperative sector is recognized as an important driver of economic development. In this context, while discussing the contribution made by the cooperative sector in the economic development of the country in recent years, also mention the challenges that have appeared in the development of the cooperative sector. A cooperative is an organized group of common people established for the purpose of earning income. In Nepal, cooperatives are considered as the third pillar of the economy. In Article 51 (d) of the Constitution of Nepal, there is a constitutional policy to strengthen the national economy through the participation and independent development of the public, private and cooperative sectors, and to mobilize the cooperative sector in national development. Cooperatives are included in the common list of rights of the federation, state and local levels. Cooperative Act-2074 and Cooperative Regulations-2075 are ongoing. Registration and regulation of cooperatives has been done by the cooperative department. Promotion of cooperatives, For training and effective regulation, basic data from local level to national level, internet based Cooperative and Poverty Management Information System (COPOMIS) software has been put into operation by Cooperative Department. - The belief that all for one and one for all is established. It is said that there are currently 29 thousand 886 cooperatives active throughout the country. There are 125, six thousand two and 23 thousand 759 cooperative societies under the federal, provincial and local governments respectively. The total number of members in cooperatives is more than 7.3 million, which is 28 percent of the total population. There are 41 lakh (56 percent) females and 32 lakh (44 percent) males. The economic and social contribution of the cooperative sector, which directly employs more than 88,000 people, is exemplary. The contribution of the cooperative sector to the economic development of the country can be discussed as follows: - Contribution to large capital formation from small amounts that are scattered, - Increase in income, There is a legal and institutional system and yet this sector has not been organized yet. There are many challenges under this. The three levels of government are responsible for the work of the cooperative sector. - It is a challenge for these governments to coordinate and make the regulation of cooperatives more effective within their respective areas. The challenges seen in this area can be mentioned as follows: - Providing financial access to remote areas, underprivileged groups and communities that are unable to reach the government sector and do not want to reach the private sector. To increase the credibility of the poor people, - to strengthen the internal control system of the cooperative organizations scattered throughout the country, to enhance the institutional governance, to ensure financial accountability, - Qualitative development of cooperatives rather than numerical growth and making them community-based and member-centered, eliminating middlemen by mobilizing cooperatives in agricultural produce production and marketing, - Developing cooperatives as a means of providing economic security to poor communities, - Increasing the reach of cooperatives to women and marginalized communities in poverty Remedy, - Maintaining coordination between representative associations of the cooperative movement and agencies involved in promotion and regulation, - Strengthening self-regulation in cooperatives, - Ending indebtedness in the cooperative sector, - Increasing national production by concentrating capital circulated through cooperatives in productive sectors. - Cooperatives are voluntary. It is a participation group. freedom in it, There is autonomy. Every member has an active and meaningful participation. Based on this principle, it is now necessary to improve the quality rather than the number of active cooperatives towards the community. For this, the three levels of government should advance their respective roles in a coordinated manner.
3. Write about the formation and functions, duties and powers of the National Council for Disaster Risk Reduction and Management. Disaster Risk Reduction and Management Act-2074 has established a Disaster Risk Reduction and Management National Council under the chairmanship of the Prime Minister to carry out disaster management activities effectively, which is as follows: (a) Prime Minister – Chairman (b) Ministers of the Government of Nepal – Members (c) ) Leader of the Opposition in the House of Representatives - Member (d) Chief Ministers of all provinces - Member (e) Vice Chairman of the National Planning Commission - Member (f) Chief Secretary of the Government of Nepal - Member (g) Chief of Army Staff,
4. What are the objectives of financial policy and the instruments used to achieve those objectives? write Financial policy is the policy that affects the country's economy as needed through taxes, government spending and loans. It is a part of macroeconomic policy. Its objectives are as follows:- a. Increase the economy, - b. To stabilize the economy, - c. Maintaining social justice. Tools of financial policy - a. Tax, – b. Government expenditure, – c. Government debt.
5. Briefly discuss any three principles of good governance. Good governance is the act of strengthening the state system and making overall service delivery people-oriented. It believes that the governance system of the state should be free from corruption and procrastination and should be good and liked by all the citizens. It is a multi-faceted subject, so there are many aspects of it, any three of them can be discussed as follows: a. Transparency:- Citizens concerned should have easy access to all parts of the government and all its activities. Citizens should be able to get information about it easily. All the work of the office and its progress report should be made public and stakeholders should be able to comment on it. This increases the transparency and the confidence of the citizens towards the state. b. Accountability: - Officials who administer the government must first be responsible for the decisions and work they have done and answer to the stakeholders. You should get a clean evaluation of your work done by others. Performance should be done in such a way as to respond to stakeholders. c. Participation:- Concerned citizens should participate in every part of the state system. Participation should be promoted at every stage of policy formulation, implementation, monitoring and evaluation. It increases legitimacy and legitimacy in governance. This awakens the belief in the citizens that the country is ours and we all should develop together. Participation should be promoted at every stage of monitoring and evaluation. It increases legitimacy and legitimacy in governance. This awakens the belief in the citizens that the country is ours and we all should develop together. Participation should be promoted at every stage of monitoring and evaluation. It increases legitimacy and legitimacy in governance. This awakens the belief in the citizens that the country is ours and we all should develop together.
Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma 
level tourism
1. Discuss the contribution of the tourism sector in the macroeconomic development of Nepal. In order to bring the tourism sector to international standards, which areas need to be paid attention to? Mention. The tourism sector is a sector with high potential in the overall economic development of Nepal. Due to Nepal's natural and cultural heritage and diversity, tourism is a field of comparative advantage of Nepal. The Constitution of Nepal has adopted a policy of developing the tourism sector as an important basis of the national economy. The National Tourism Strategy Plan (2016-2026) is being implemented. The contribution of the tourism sector as the main driver of Nepal's economy is as follows: assistance in earning foreign currency, creation of employment opportunities, poverty alleviation, improvement in people's living standards, development of natural and cultural heritage, development in local art-skills and skills, increase in international contacts, increase in public awareness,
Areas that should be paid attention to reach international standards: a. Encouragement of the private sector: The private sector is not only the leader of the economy, it is also a job creator. Therefore, the government should facilitate, support and encourage it. Tax rates and laws that are friendly to the private sector, ease in import and export, concessions in investment and cooperation. It seems that the government should play a major role in the development of the private sector as not only tourism but every sector will flourish in the promotion of the private sector. b. Infrastructure Development: Adequate physical infrastructure development including road transport, cable car, communication development, bridge and airport construction has multifaceted importance in tourism development. The government should develop it with the involvement of the private sector as well. c. Safe and reliable air service; regular maintenance, development, expansion of the airport, arrangement of regular and safe flights in hilly and mountainous areas, Rapid development and expansion of international airports should provide safe and reliable air services in both national and international areas. For this too, cooperation with the private sector should be taken and given. d. Strong Economic Diplomacy: Developing the capacity of Nepali diplomatic missions abroad to promote all tourist areas of Nepal, increasing coordination and cooperation with non-resident Nepalis, attracting foreign investment in tourism infrastructure, Nepali diplomatic missions abroad playing an active and meaningful role in this work, Ministry of Foreign Affairs in this work , Ministry of Tourism and Civil Aviation, Department of Tourism, Nepal Tourism Board and other agencies should increase operational coordination. Search, development and promotion of new destinations: There are many attractive new destination areas in the mountains, hills and plains of Nepal, identification, development, Propaganda should be spread. The promotion of old destinations also seems to be necessary. f. Protection of heritage: Nepal has a lot of religious, cultural, historical and natural heritage. Such assets should be developed. Biodiversity should be protected and used. is. Construction of high-class hotels: In order to bring Nepal's tourism to international standards, international-level hotels and resorts should be opened. Such quality infrastructure should be built in all potential tourist areas of Nepal. The current homestay services in rural areas should be improved. In order to attract domestic and foreign investment in the construction of high-class hotels and resorts, an environment of facilitation should be created in all areas by improving policies, laws, procedures, methods, conduct and behavior. Open and free recreation: About 65 percent of the total tourists who come to Nepal come for entertainment. If tourists are entertained, other tourists will come. Therefore, a civilized manner should be able to provide entertainment in an open, free and interference-free environment to provide all services according to the wishes and desires of the tourists. Therefore, all the tourist areas of Nepal should be made full of entertainment. It seems that infrastructure and manpower should be developed accordingly. J. Facilitation in hiking and climbing: Nepal has great tourist potential in mountaineering and hiking. It seems that it needs to be further developed by charging less fees, expanding adequate facilities on the road, developing communication links, preparing rescue and relief teams. J. A strong monitoring and evaluation system; to increase operational coordination between regulatory agencies such as the Ministry of Tourism and Civil Aviation, the Department of Tourism, the Nepal Tourism Board, It seems that further improvements should be made by evaluating the overall tourism program while conducting regular monitoring and facilitation. Finally, tourism is the backbone of Nepal's economy. So it should be developed. For this, coordination and cooperation with the private sector should be done while developing tourism infrastructure. Domestic and foreign investment should be increased. Only then can it be expected that Nepal's tourism sector will be based on international standards.
2. In Nepal, there is a system of parliamentary hearing before the appointment to which posts? Mention. According to Article 292 of the Constitution of Nepal, there is a provision for a parliamentary hearing before the appointment of the following positions to be appointed on the recommendation of the Constitutional Council in Nepal: a. The post of Chief Justice, b. Position of Supreme Court Judge, c. The position of a member of the Council of Justice, d. The position of the head and office bearer of the constitutional body, e. There is a provision that a 15-member joint committee will be formed for the post of ambassador and parliamentary hearings, consisting of members of both houses of the federal parliament.
3. In Nepal, under what circumstances can a husband and wife divorce? Mention. The Civil Civil (Code) Act-2074, which came into effect on 1st August 2075, provides for the conditions under which a husband and wife can divorce, which can be mentioned as follows: Husband can divorce: Husband can divorce even if the wife does not consent in any of the following situations :( ) If the wife lives separately for three consecutive years or more without taking the husband's consent, (b) If the wife does not allow the husband to eat or is kicked out of the house, (c) If the wife causes the husband to be disabled or any other major (d) If the wife is found to be having sexual relations with another man. The wife can divorce:
4. How is the appointment of the Chief of Staff of the Nepali Army in Nepal? The appointment of the Commander-in-Chief, who will be the head of the Nepali Army, is made by the President on the recommendation of the Council of Ministers, and the President administers an oath to him and confers a badge of honor. In the event that the Chief of Army Staff is on leave or for any other reason, the position becomes vacant, there is a provision to take over the duties of the Chief of Army Staff permanently and a senior officer of the Nepalese Army appointed by the President on the recommendation of the Council of Ministers. The term of office of the Commander-in-Chief is three years and he will remain in office until he reaches the age of 61. but, If the Government of Nepal deems it necessary, there is a provision that the President can retire the Chief of Army Staff on the recommendation of the Council of Ministers before the completion of that period. The Commander-in-Chief is accountable to the Government of Nepal and it is the duty and duty of the Commander-in-Chief to manage the Nepali Army under the instructions given by the Government of Nepal and the prevailing laws. According to the Military Act-2063, the Commander-in-Chief shall submit an annual report on the management of the Nepali Army to the Government of Nepal within the month of Baisakh each year, and the Government of Nepal shall present the report to the Legislature Parliament and discuss it in the State Arrangements Committee.
5. The Labor Act-2074 stipulates what duties of the employer towards the workers? In relation to occupational safety and health, the Labor Act-2074 stipulates the following duties of the employer towards the workers: (a) Creating a safe working environment by making proper arrangements for safety and health at the workplace, (b) Using and operating chemical, physical, biological substances and equipment at the workplace. , making arrangements that do not adversely affect safety and health during storage and transportation, (c) Providing necessary information, information and training related to safety and health to workers as needed, (d) Necessary regarding the use and operation of chemical, physical, and biological substances related to equipment and work to workers Provide training and information in appropriate language, (e) Make proper arrangements for safe entry and exit from the workplace, (f) Provide workers with personal protective equipment as needed,
6. What are the work, duties and rights of Nepal Police? Mention. The work, duties and rights of the Nepal Police are as follows:- To maintain peace and security in the country,- To behave politely with the general public,- To treat women and children with full respect and humility,- To promote and ensure the protection of human rights,- To disrupt social harmony, adverse security, Controlling illegal and serious criminal activities, - Complying with the orders and instructions of the Government of Nepal, - Collecting information affecting peace and order and informing the higher authorities,
1. When did senior singer and musician Premadhwaj Pradhan pass away? Vikram Samvat 2078 Baisakh 23. Pradhan, who was born in 1994 in Chautara, Sindhupalchok, is also known as 'Golden Voice' in the Nepali music field. This Nepali head of Pradhan, who passed the vocal test at Radio Nepal at the age of 16, raised his head, par layjau flowers, ghumti ma naau hai, goreto that village. , Dozens of songs like Teke Achel Kahan Veteon etc. are famous.
2. When was the leader of the CPN UML parliamentary party KP Sharma Oli elected as the Prime Minister for the third time? 2078 Baisakh 30. After the failed attempt to form a coalition government in accordance with Article 76 (2) of the Constitution, he was again appointed as the Prime Minister as the leader of the parliamentary party of the largest party in the House of Representatives (according to Article 76 (3) of the Constitution). UML President Oli, who was automatically relieved of his post on 27th Baisakh 27, 2078, after failing to receive a vote of confidence, was re-elected as Prime Minister on the third day. He took the oath of office and secrecy on May 31. He was elected the Prime Minister for the first time after the promulgation of the Constitution of Nepal and for the second time after the election of the Federal Parliament.
3. What is meant by 'Economic Early Warning System'? The system started by the National Planning Commission with the aim of protecting the country from possible financial crisis by forecasting the risks that may come in the financial sector (this system under the National Planning Commission will monitor the fluctuations in the indicators of the macro economy and the short-term and long-term effects it may have on Nepal and recommend measures to be adopted to the government.)
4. When was the first National Journalism Day celebrated in Nepal? Year 2073 Baisakh 24. Commemorating the historic day of publication of Gorkhapatra, Nepal Government started celebrating 'National Journalism Day' from Year 2073. The weekly publication of 'Gorkhapatra' started on 24th Baisakh 1958. Initially published as a weekly newspaper, twice a week, It has been published three times since February 7, 2017. Gorkhapatra is also the initiator of photojournalism in Nepal. On 13 May 1984, Gorkhapatra was printed for the first time in Gorkhapatra. Gorkhapatra started printing in color from 10th June 2059. From 1st August 2064, the publication of the nations (mother tongues) spoken in Nepal under the title of 'New Nepal' was started and currently publishing news content in 38 languages. After the announcement of the National Journalism Day, the Gorkhapatra Institute established the Gorkhapatra National Journalism Award for the first time in 2073 with an amount of 55 thousand 555 rupees.
5. When did World War I end? November 11, 1918. (The First World War, which wreaked havoc around the world challenging human civilization, started on July 28, 1914.) 
6. Sweet cream, coated red, anti guava orange, discovery yellow are the types of flowers? Centipede 
7. If the old name of Amlekhganj is Bichkhakhori, then what is the old name of Valmiki Nagar? Bhaisalotan. 
8. What is the process of the earth rotating on its axis called? Rotation. (Earth rotates once on its axis in 23 hours 56 minutes 4.09 seconds.) 
9. How high in the atmosphere is the ozone layer? 25-40 km. 
10. Who is known as Kautilya of western politics? Machiabelli. 
11. What is the lake called when the river is blocked by the snow (stones, soil, sand, weeds etc.) brought by the glacier? Himodha lake.
12. The fourth summit of BIMSTEC held in Kathmandu has decided how many areas of cooperation will be established? 16 
. Which body does the work of formulating the policy of SAARC? Council of Ministers. 
14. Who is the exponent of need theory of motivation? Abraham Maslow.
15. What is the stored energy in an object due to change in its position or position? Potential energy. (Stretched rubber power, water power in a dam, power stored in a spring when a spring is pressed or stretched, etc. are examples of potential power.) 16. Since when was the world's biggest Nobel Prize awarded? Year 1901. - The Nobel Prize for economics has been given since 1968. - The Nobel Peace Prize is given in Oslo, the capital of Norway, while other awards are given in Stockholm, the capital of Sweden. - Up to three people can get this award jointly. 
17. Who is the oldest Nobel Prize recipient? Leoning Harwicz (year 2007, economics).
18. What is the production capacity of Dordikhola hydropower project? 27 megawatts (Lamjung) 
. What is the period of the national strategy draft of nature conservation for public sustainable development in the month of January 2073? Year 2072-2087. 
20. Since when was the euro currency introduced? V. No. 2002 January 1. 
21. What is meant by kinetic energy? The power generated due to the movement of an object, i.e., the stored power in an object in motion (Movement power is contained in a bullet from a gun, flowing water, a moving motor, a flying bird, etc.).
22. Which caste has the custom of giving chiuri plant as dowry to the daughter? Chepang. (Besides the seeds of chiuri are used for fishing, ghee can also be extracted by grinding the seeds, so that after marriage, the daughter will be able to eat the ghee and fish and meat of chiuri.) 
23. Where is the residence of the Netuwa race? On the purification of Kapilvastu.- According to the national census of the year 2068, there are around three hundred people living in Kapilvastu.- The people of this caste have been demanding the government to put them in the minority caste list. 
24. Which station did the work of the current civil library first? Commandery Library. 
25. Which region is referred to as Adiprayag? Devghat. 
26. What is called the wet land that is always soaked with water along the banks of the sea, mud, pond, river for the habitat of different kinds of animals, birds and insects? Wetlands.
27. Since when did Nepal Rastra Bank issue the first notes written by the Government of Nepal? October 6, 2063 (note of Rs. 5). 
28. Since when has the Nepali government distributed the new format Nepali citizenship certificate using English language as well? 1st of November 2066. (Before this citizenship was given only in Nepali language.) 
29. Which country was the first BIPPA agreement signed by Nepal? France (May 2, 1983). 
30. Which is the only Arab country without a desert? Lebanon.
1. When was Prime Minister KP Sharma Oli appointed as Prime Minister for the third time by President Bidya Devi Bhandari? Vikram Samvat 2078 Baisakh 30.- President Bidya Devi Bhandari administered the oath of office and secrecy to Prime Minister Oli on 31st of Baisakh. - On May 27th, Oli was appointed Prime Minister according to Article 76 (3) of the Constitution after he did not receive a vote of confidence from Parliament.
2. What is the name of the anti-coronavirus drug developed by India's Drug Defense Research Development Organization (DRDO) in collaboration with Dr. Reddy's Laboratory? Two-DG (two-deoxy-d-glucose) - Indian Defense Minister Rajnath Singh and Health Minister Dr. Harsh Bardhan released 'Two-DG' (Two-Deoxy-D-Glucose) medicine on May 17, 2021.- The medicine that comes in the form of a powder packet is produced in a way that it can be dissolved in water and consumed. It is said that the drug will stop the growth of the virus and increase its strength by reaching the cells of the body. - It is claimed that this medicine will cure corona patients quickly and reduce the dependence on oxygen. - After the drug was confirmed to be effective against Covid in the test conducted in April 2020, the second phase clinical trial was conducted from May to October. likewise,
3. Since when was the health insurance program started by the government of Nepal? Year 2072 Chait 25 
4. What is the length of the post highway under construction from Bhadrapur in Jhapa to Dodhara in Kanchanpur? One thousand 663 kilometers. 
5. Which is the first hydropower project of Nepal completed with private sector investment? Khimti Hydroelectric Project (60 MW). 
6. Since when has the civil charter with compensation been implemented in Nepal? Year 2070 Baisakh 2.7. Who is the first woman appointed as an ambassador by the government of Saudi Arabia? Princess Rima Vint Vandar.
8. When did senior writer Rajendra Subedi pass away? June 3, 2078.- Subedi, who was born in Panchthar on 19 July 2002, published three dozen books including poems, essays, management criticism, etc.- Subedi, who taught Nepali subjects at Tribhuvan University for 37 years, was the former head of the Central Nepali Department, former president and general manager of the Gorkhapatra Institute. 
9. Where is the headquarters of Transparency International? Berlin (Germany). 
10. What is the process of separating the rays of different seven colors from sunlight using a prism? Discontinuity of light.
11. What is 'hippocamp'? A celestial body. - It is claimed that this celestial body discovered recently by the SETI Institute of California is the moon of the planet Varuna. - Astronomers estimate that the extremely cold body 'Hippocamp' may have been formed by breaking up from Proteus, the second largest moon of Varuna. - Hippocamp is a hundred times smaller than the Earth's moon. 
12. Which is the famous book written during the Rana period mentioning the details of 99 important herbs of Nepal? Chandranighantu. 
13. Which country is considered to have invented football in the world? China. - Football, which is the number one competition in the world, is believed to have been invented in China around 476 BC. - Football games were covered on TV for the first time in 1937. - Football players run an average of 9.65 kilometers in every football game.
14. According to a recent report published by the United Nations Educational, Scientific and Cultural Organization (UNESCO), how much more likely are people with higher education to migrate than those who are illiterate? Almost four times. 15. When was the Citizen Investment Fund established? April 4, 2047.- Pursuant to the Citizen Investment Fund Act-2047, the fund was established with the main objective of encouraging common people to save for the economic development of the nation, as well as increasing investment opportunities and bringing dynamics to the development of the capital market. Attaching to the program.- Conducting additional programs related to social security.- Priority sectors (hydropower sector, infrastructure development, productive sector, tourism and export promotion, Investing in capital market instruments). - Investing funds in low-risk areas.- Market maker and wholesale buying and selling of shares (stock dealer).
16. When was the clock tower in Kathmandu built in 1951 (during the reign of Bir Shamsher). 
17. When is 'Health Service Day' celebrated in Nepal? February 15 - (This day has been celebrated on the 15th of February every year for the past 6 years in Nepal.) 
18. Who is the first woman Deputy Prime Minister of Nepal? Shailaja Acharya. 
19. When did Saudi Arabia announce the entry permit for tourists for the first time? September 27, 2019. 
20. Vishkhela festival is a popular festival in which caste? Satar.- (Vishkhela Parv Chaor or around the playground, groups of 10 to 15 who have learned the mantra try to draw the poisoned person towards them with the help of the mantra. In this way, the one who can pull the poison towards them, becomes the winner of that group or groups. The original tradition of Satar and This festival, which is a ritual, is particularly popular in Jhapa district.)
21. Who is the beauty who will win the title of Miss Universe 2021? Andrea Meza - 26-year-old Andrea from Mexico won the Miss Universe pageant in Florida, USA. Andrea became the 69th Miss Universe by defeating more than 70 participants from around the world. He is a software engineer by profession.- Miss Universe 2020 was canceled for the first time due to the Corona virus epidemic. 
22. Which health institution of Nepal has been recognized by the World Health Organization as its collaborating center? Tilganga Eye Foundation (2076 July 6). 
23. Which bird is known as wife bird? Rajdhanesh. 
24. Where is the information technology park in Nepal? Banepa (Kavre).
25. When was the Double Taxation Agreement signed between Nepal and Bangladesh? February 21, 2075. 
26. When did internet service start in Nepal? 1994. 
27. When is World Hemophilia Day celebrated? April 11. 
28. The Earth Hour (Our Earth) campaign was started from which country? Australia (since 2007). 
29. Which place of Nepal is known as Kanchi Nepal? Doti's Silgarhi. (Silgadi is also known as "Little Nepal" due to its climate similar to that of Kathmandu.) 
Presenter: Tank KC
Features of bureaucracy 1. Mention the characteristics of bureaucracy described by Max Weber and account for its relevance in modern public management. Bureaucracy is a professional group of employees who join the organizational structure and achieve the set goals by judicious use of legal rights. Although many scholars have written about bureaucracy, German sociologist Max Weber has mentioned it closely. He has clarified the subject from the characteristics of bureaucracy. The characteristics of bureaucracy described by Max Weber can be mentioned as follows: a. Hierarchy-based:- The positions of the organization are in a hierarchical series, according to the hierarchical arrangement, the employees are given orders, control, coordination, etc., the employees must follow the rules of the hierarchical arrangement while doing the work of the organization, b. Adoption of Qualification System:- Written, Selection of employees will be done through oral and practical examination, appropriate responsibilities will be given based on qualifications, abilities, knowledge, skills, experience, c. Based on laws and regulations:- fully complying with laws, acting according to laws and regulations, d. Impersonal service:- serving by an organization rather than an individual, making decisions based on the law, maintaining fairness, all being equal before the law, e.g. Fairness and neutrality:- Being politically neutral and providing impartial services, not biasing requests based on political beliefs, acting impartially, staying away from all political parties from the ruling party and the opposition, f. Continuity:- Remaining in service up to the specified age and service period, as long-term continuous service, it will also be considered as a permanent government. Vocational development:- Taking the work of serving the country and the people as a profession and ensuring one's future in it, appointment, transfer, promotion, service facilities, All aspects of career development, including retirement, will be specified by law, h. Competence:- The maximum utilization of the employee's capacity will be done by dividing the work among themselves, ie. Written record:- Keeping a written record of all decisions and actions made by employees, maintaining institutional memory, j. Adherence to discipline:- Being disciplined in the office, behaving decently, following the prescribed conduct, - The relevance of bureaucracy in modern public management - Modern public management is basically result-oriented, transparent, thrifty, participatory, It has characteristics such as sense of responsibility. In such a situation, since the bureaucratic system of process-oriented legal work tends to slow down, there are currently various questions about its relevance. In modern public management, its relevance can be further increased by following the good qualities of the bureaucracy and improving the perceived weaknesses. Due to the following qualities, its relevance can be seen even in modern times:- fair performance,- implementation of laws and regulations, equal treatment,- serving as a representative of the government and being close to the people,- being politically neutral and maintaining fairness in service delivery,- maintaining conduct and discipline. ,- Protection of qualifications, continuous service to the country and people,- Guaranteeing permanent government, reforming the weak side, - Acting quickly by adopting a short legal process, - Enhancing efficiency in service delivery by adopting active and meaningful participation of stakeholders, - Increasing transparency, frugality, agility, simplicity and quality by using modern technology in the work system, - Maintaining good governance by controlling irregularities, - Emphasizing results by improving decision-making processes. ,- To make the aspect of employee moral development predictable and transparent,- To end the tendency of not making decisions on time and to avoid responsibilities,- To follow the good aspects of the private sector,- To increase the participation of everyone including the private sector, civil society, and the network world in the state system,- It is seen to be continuously improving. Eliminating deficiencies, - Finally, bureaucracy is an organizational form, which enforces the law. Bureaucracy, which is linked to the existence and responsibility of the state, is sustainable in itself. However, the slow, opaque,
2. Discuss the role of financial statements in a business organization. A financial statement is a statement prepared to show the performance results of a commercial organization during a certain period and the actual financial situation at the end of that period. This is the progress report of the professional organization. Through this, the performance of the professional organization can be evaluated. It provides necessary information to shareholders, investors, managers, creditors, employees, employee trade unions, government and other stakeholders. Financial statement of commercial organization :- a. Profit and Loss Account/Income Statement – ​​b. Vasalat – c. Cash Flow Statement – ​​Reviewing the past and present situation of the business organization and formulating policies and plans for the future, Financial statements play a multifaceted role in overall matters including how to operate at present. Its role can be discussed as follows: - helping to evaluate the good and bad aspects of a commercial organization, - identifying the internal control situation of a commercial organization and helping to further improve it, - helping to determine the revenue received by the government, - maximizing the available resources Providing information to further strengthen the control system by ascertaining whether it is operational, - Assisting in addressing the demands and needs of employees and employee unions and establishing good relations between management and employee unions, - Providing financial information necessary for creditors and creditors to make decisions about commercial organizations. , - To assist in comparing the performance of professional organizations doing business of the same nature,
3. Write about the importance of discipline in civil service. Discipline is behavior and conduct performed according to the law. This is a person's self-control. Non-compliance will result in legal action. Civil service is a mechanism of nation building. It is also a vehicle for social change. It basically does regular work, emergency work and developmental work. From providing services to people's doorsteps, revenue collection, expenditure, foreign relations etc. have to be done. Doing all these tasks requires discipline. Therefore, the importance of discipline in civil service is very important. Which can be mentioned from the following points - to collectively orient all the employees in achieving the goals of the civil service, - to increase the efficiency and effectiveness among the employees, - to make the employees responsible and accountable, - to prevent the creation of conflict in the civil service,
4. What is permanent account number? Give a short introduction. The permanent identification number of the taxpayer is called 'PAN'. Even if the taxpayer changes the place of business, nature of business or other details, once it is taken, it remains for the taxpayer forever, that is why it is called a permanent account number. The full form of PAN (PAN) is 'Permanent Account Number'. It is also a number that identifies business, employment and investment. For individuals, it is used for tax purposes. Tax is used for storing personal information. This signal created by the computer system has nine digits. It can also be obtained through an electronic system (Internet), which is called e-PAN. For this, you can go to the website of the Internal Revenue Department at dhaddh.shcham.nayakh.lau and complete the online form available there to get personal and professional e-pan. industry, trade, profession, PAN must be mentioned in all the tax related details including business, employment, business, banking transactions with the bank, bills issued by them, account books, documents, income statement etc. As this number gives a unique identification to the tax payer with a unique symbol, it is easy to do your business and file the revenue related to it after taking this PAN.
5. What are the rights of Nepal Electricity Authority? write The powers of Nepal Electricity Authority, which was established to supply electricity in an efficient, reliable and accessible manner for electricity generation, transmission and distribution, are as follows:- To collect electricity tariffs and service charges from customers,- To sell electricity to foreign countries,- To purchase electricity from foreign countries,- Electricity Authority To invest funds in the fund, - To control illegal consumption of electricity, - To purchase electricity produced from the private sector, - To take loans from domestic institutions, banks or individuals, - To take loans from foreign governments or foreign organizations and international organizations, - To fulfill one's duties and responsibilities To do all the work that is indispensable and necessary
6. What is the code of conduct that teachers and students should follow in school? Mention. A school is a school that teaches and teaches. Both students and teachers should be disciplined in this. Therefore, the school has a code of conduct to be followed by teachers and students. Records of compliance with such codes of conduct should be kept by the principal in the case of teachers and by the school management committee in the case of principals. If the code of conduct is not followed, the details should be sent to the concerned district education office. The code of conduct to be observed by teachers and students in the school is as follows: Code of conduct to be observed by the teacher: Studying and teaching should be considered as the main goal with the aim of making the student a worthy citizen, - Obedience, discipline, goodwill, cooperation, virtue, sympathy, patience and honesty should be encouraged, - Any language,
Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma 
Foreign investment in Nepal
1. What are the reasons why foreign investment has not been able to enter Nepal relatively? write Foreign investment is a means of attracting foreign capital, technology, managerial skills, technical skills and successful experience. Foreign investment is an important basis for mobilization of resources in the country and its sustainability. In order to attract it in Nepal, many arrangements including legal, institutional and procedural have been made and yet foreign investment has not been able to enter Nepal relatively. There are many reasons for this, which can be mentioned as follows:- Landlocked countries do not have easy access to the sea, which causes complications in the country's foreign trade, import, export and internal supply systems. Generally, due to these reasons: foreign investors are not attracted to invest in landlocked countries, Nepal is also caught in this trap.
2. Introduce about customs declaration. The form to be filled by the importer to declare all the details of the goods while exporting or importing goods and determining the customs duty on the goods is called the customs declaration form. According to the Customs Act-2064 in Nepal, the customs value of the goods to be exported and imported is based on the transaction value and the exporter himself or his representative customs agent must declare the transaction value of the goods to the customs officer by attaching the details and documents proving the value of the goods through a notification letter. If the transaction value declared by the exporter is reasonable according to the law, the customs officer will pass the inspection of the goods based on the same transaction value. The affidavit should be registered in the computer server, For the purpose of passing the customs inspection, the registered declarations are divided into red route to pass inspection after physical examination, yellow route to pass inspection after only checking documents, blue route to pass inspection after inspection and green route to pass inspection based on the declaration without following any of these procedures. Similarly, when a person imports goods for personal use or when a passenger imports goods that are allowed to be brought under private gunta, jhiti, heavy order, he must submit a form with brief details to the passenger branch of the customs office, this form is called a brief notification letter. According to this notification, goods worth up to five thousand can be imported for private use. There is a provision to divide the examination into blue route for passing the examination and green route for passing the examination based on the announcement without following any of these procedures. Similarly, when a person imports goods for personal use or when a passenger imports goods that are allowed to be brought under private gunta, jhiti, heavy order, he must submit a form with brief details to the passenger branch of the customs office, this form is called a brief notification letter. According to this notification, goods worth up to five thousand can be imported for private use. There is a provision to divide the examination into blue route for passing the examination and green route for passing the examination based on the announcement without following any of these procedures. Similarly, when a person imports goods for personal use or when a passenger imports goods that are allowed to be brought under private gunta, jhiti, heavy order, he must submit a form with brief details to the passenger branch of the customs office, this form is called a brief notification letter. According to this notification, goods worth up to five thousand can be imported for private use. This form is called a brief notification. According to this notification, goods worth up to five thousand can be imported for private use. This form is called a brief notification. According to this notification, goods worth up to five thousand can be imported for private use.
3. What are the policy provisions related to labor and employment in Nepal's constitution? Mention. Under Article 51 of the Constitution of Nepal, there is a policy system related to labor and employment under the state policy. Which can be mentioned as follows: - To ensure that everyone can work, - To make the labor force, which is the main socio-economic force of the country, skilled and professional, - To increase employment in the country itself, - To guarantee social security by ensuring the basic rights of all workers according to the concept of decent labor. ,- Ending all forms of labor exploitation including child labor, - Establishing good relations between workers and businessmen, - Encouraging workers' participation in management, - Regulating and managing this sector to make foreign employment free from exploitation, safe and organized and to guarantee workers' employment and rights, - Capital acquired through foreign employment, skills,
4. What should be done to cancel or continue the currently implemented reservation in the civil service of Nepal? Express your opinion. Reservation is a way of inclusion. It is a quota arrangement to make the target class participate in the state system. With the aim of making Nepal's civil service inclusive, the Civil Service Act-2049 was amended for the second time from 2064, and 45% of the posts to be filled through open competition were separated and 100% women were considered to be 33%, tribals/tribals 27%, Madhesi 22%, Dalits 9%, disabled. 5 percent and backward areasArrangements have been made to fill up the posts by distributing 4 percent and making competition only among the same candidates. The proposed Federal Civil Service Act has further amended it and brought forward provisions to make it more manageable. In Nepal, this system of reservation has been applied to civil service as well as teachers, public institutions, Nepal Army, Nepal Police, Armed Police and other public services. From the time reservation was implemented until now, there have been debates about whether this system should be abolished and whether it should be continued. Which can be presented as follows: Arguments that reservation should be abolished - Reservation has narrowed open competition, - By weakening competition, it has led to the situation of getting government jobs even with less competition, - It has discouraged competent people who are not in reservation from entering government services, - It has helped in talent flight, - Competition emotionally stunted, - The compensation for the benefits that the neglected classes should have received from the state in the past has not yet been completed. It should be canceled after reaching the specified target and time. It seems that the reservation implemented in Nepal should be continued for some time after setting a fair and acceptable standard. The real target group should be identified. After getting reservation in one post once in the working life, it should be arranged that this facility will not be available again in another post. Priority should be given according to the condition of the disabled. It should be clear what kind of disability will get priority in the job. Even in some accessible districts of Nepal, there are remote places and areas. Therefore, backward areas should be reviewed. Since it is the duty of the state to distribute services on the basis of social justice, social justice should be maintained through reservation. Reservation should be implemented not on the basis of gender, caste and region, but on the basis of economic condition and poverty. Special programs should be implemented in areas such as education and health to emphasize the empowerment of the weaker sections. Only then the real poor and backward people can get benefits from this and the reservation will be more organized.
5. What are the problems seen in Nepal's public procurement? Mention. Public procurement is the act of acquiring goods and services and constructing a building using government funds. In Nepal, legal and institutional arrangements have been made to make public procurement open, transparent, competitive and clean. Public Procurement Act-2063 and Regulations-2064 are applicable as umbrella laws for public procurement. A public procurement monitoring office has been established at the center to independently regulate the overall procurement of the country. Every office has a procurement branch system and yet the public procurement system linked to the development and prosperity of the country is not found to be effective. In Nepal's public procurement work, there are three parties, namely public bodies, bidders/builders and public procurement monitoring office, and the problem is also around them, which can be mentioned as follows: a. Poor decision making: - Lack of decision-making ability among officials of public bodies, not making decisions on time, making decisions under influence and pressure, not wanting to take risks, b. Ad hoc procurement work:- Ad hoc procurement in cases where public bodies have to prepare a procurement master plan and an annual procurement plan, c. Lack of cleanliness and competition:- Lack of adherence to general principles of procurement including competition, cleanliness, honesty, transparency, accountability, frugality, efficiency, value for money in public procurement, d. Low-quality purchase:- Having a tendency to indulge in the purchase of low quality and low price to fulfill immediate needs rather than long-term durability and quality work, e. Lack of compliance with the law:- Non-establishment of procurement department/branch/unit in all public bodies according to the scope and nature of work to systematically record the public procurement work and to make the working staff responsible. Directly purchasing by public bodies by showing special circumstances by circumventing the methods and procedures set by the Public Procurement Act, some large bodies make separate procedures for procurement, call for tenders by breaking large-scale works into pieces, and limiting competition. f. Irresponsible consultants:- Using more consultants in public bodies but not making them responsible. Excessive collusion:- Being dominated by collusion in bidding, contracts, purchase agreements, construction, etc., lack of balance and control between employees who purchase, approve and pay for purchase, and keep accounts, j. Lack of professionalism among builders:- Builders occupying more work than their capacity, tendency to not work on time due to pessimism, lack of development of professionalism, etc. Weak Public Procurement Monitoring Office: - Lack of adequate resources, technical staff and experts in the Public Procurement Monitoring Office, the responsible body for enforcing and monitoring the Public Procurement Act, the research and development situation is weak, j. Weak infrastructure:- Inability to make the electronic procurement system simple, effective and accessible, lack of electricity, internet, skilled manpower, guidelines and regulations not prepared in accordance with the spirit of the Public Procurement Act, inability to maintain uniformity in the procurement process according to the federal structure, t. Violation of conduct:- Officials of public bodies, bidders, consultants and suppliers do not follow the rules of conduct effectively. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma Not being able to make it effective and accessible, expansion of electricity, internet, lack of skilled manpower, not preparing guidelines and regulations in accordance with the spirit of the Public Procurement Act, not being able to maintain uniformity in the procurement process according to the federal structure, t. Violation of conduct:- Officials of public bodies, bidders, consultants and suppliers do not follow the rules of conduct effectively. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma Not being able to make it effective and accessible, expansion of electricity, internet, lack of skilled manpower, not preparing guidelines and regulations in accordance with the spirit of the Public Procurement Act, not being able to maintain uniformity in the procurement process according to the federal structure, t. Violation of conduct:- Officials of public bodies, bidders, consultants and suppliers do not follow the rules of conduct effectively. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
1. The cabinet meeting on 30th March 2077 decided to build how many smart cities in all the seven provinces? 12. New Smart Cities:- Province 1: Dhankuta and Gauriganj- Province 2: Moulapur and Chandrapur in Rautahat- Wagmati Province: Kavrevyali in Kavre and Gundu in Bhaktapur- Gandaki Province: Waling- Lumbini Province: Lumbini and Tulsipur- Karnali Province: Dullu- Far West Province: Bhimdatta and Amargadhi.- As the government has already decided to build 13 cities as smart cities, eight out of the previous 13 and four new ones have been added by the decision of the Cabinet on March 30. According to the Ministry of Urban Development, only eight out of 13 have been selected by the decision of the current cabinet, but the remaining five have not been canceled and have been given second priority.
2. Where is the Tenzing-Hillary Memorial Park built in memory of Tenzing Norgay Sherpa and Edmund Hillary, the first climbers to reach the peak of Mount Everest? Jiri (Dolakha) (2078). 
3. When is International Dance Day celebrated? April 29.- This time (year 2021) the International Dance Day was celebrated virtually due to Covid-19.- The International Dance Committee of the International Theater Institute, which cooperated with the United Nations Educational, Scientific and Cultural Organization UNESCO, started celebrating this day since 1982. 
4. When is National Information and Communication Technology Day (National ICT Day) celebrated? May 2. (Slogan of the 4th National Information and Communication Technology Day-2078 - The basis of prosperous Nepal is the expansion of information and communication technology.)
Since when did Nepal start purchasing electricity from the Indian energy market at a competitive rate? Vikram Samvat 2078 Baisakh 19.- Nepal Electricity Authority has started purchasing electricity directly from Indian energy market at competitive rates according to the day ahead method for purchasing electricity from India based on the price determined on the basis of the contract. be the market - On the first day, on the 18th of Baisakh at 12:00 PM, the authority purchased 200 to 250 MW of electricity through the Indian Energy Exchange and imported it through the Dhalkebar-Muzaffarpur international transmission line. With the membership, Nepal has become the first country in South Asia to enter the Indian Energy Exchange market for electricity trading. It is expected that this system will be effective for the electricity trade between the two countries as both import and export can be done by purchasing electricity at the competitive rate determined by the market without interference. In addition, since Nepal has gained access to the Indian energy exchange market, it is said that it can facilitate the trade of electricity through India to Bangladesh. can be In such a situation, it is not always possible to buy cheaply and sell expensively. It is said that since Nepal has gained access to the Indian energy exchange market, it can also facilitate the trade of electricity through India to Bangladesh.- Since Nepal can pay more than the price given by others and take it away, in some cases it may have to pay more or be unable to get electricity as per the demand. . In such a situation, it is not always possible to buy cheaply and sell expensively. It is said that since Nepal has gained access to the Indian energy exchange market, it can also facilitate the trade of electricity through India to Bangladesh.- Since Nepal can pay more than the price given by others and take it away, in some cases it may have to pay more or be unable to get electricity as per the demand. . In such a situation, it is not always possible to buy cheaply and sell expensively.
6. When was the Trans-Pacific Partnership Agreement (TPPA) signed? February 4, 2016. (The 30-point charter was issued at the signing ceremony in Auckland, the capital of New Zealand.) 
7. Which are the main four dhams related to Buddhism? Lumbini, Bodhgaya, Sarnath and Kushinagar (place of birth/attainment of Buddhahood/first discourse/attainment of nirvana respectively). 
8. Since when has the government arranged for a 'smart card' in driver's license? November 14, 2072. 
9. Since when telex and Akashvani service has been stopped by Nepal Telecom? December 17, 2065. 
10. When did the government take the decision to remove the hoarding boards, posters and other materials placed to make the city ugly? December 10, 2076.
11. Where does Kumbh Mela, the world's largest human gathering, take place? Theism of India. 
(This fair is considered as the largest human gathering in the world. Hindus believe that bathing at the confluence of the Ganga and Yamuna rivers will lead to salvation.) 
12. When did the government announce the celebration of Employment Day on February 1 every year? February 1, 2075. 
13. When was the Asia Cooperation Dialogue (ACD) established? June 18, 2002. (Nepal became a member of ACD on March 10, 2016. Currently, there are 34 countries in ACD including Nepal.)   
14. Which SAARC countries are members of the Non-Aligned Movement (NAM)? All eight nations. 
15. What was the information given to the people by the Rana government called? Istihar 
16. If Thailand is known as the country of white elephants, which country is known as the country of thousands of elephants? Laos.
17. Which is the first country in the world to give women the right to vote? New Zealand.- New Zealand made arrangements for this in 1893.- Saudi Arabia (in 2011) is the latest country to provide voting rights for women. 
18. When was Tinjure-Milke-Jaljale declared as the capital of Laliguras? Year 2055. 
19. When was the start of the ATM machine? 1967.- ATM machine was invented by John Sephard Barron. - This machine was put into use for the first time in 1967 in a bank in London, UK. - Initially known as Hole in the Wall, a 4-digit pin number was in vogue in this machine. - Himalayan Bank introduced ATM for the first time in Nepal. 
20. Who is the originator of children's haiku 'Chanchal'? Bhakta Karki (Pulachaur, Myagdi).
21. According to the statistics published by the Central Statistics Department in May 2078, what is the economic growth rate of Nepal in the financial year 2077/078? 4.01 percent.- According to the data related to the economic sector up to 9 months of the current year, the department has estimated that the growth rate will be the same. During the period taken to prepare this projection, the effect of Corona was decreasing, but the projection should be revised when the effect of Corona is increasing. According to the department, after the growth rate, the size of Nepal's economy will reach 42 trillion 66 billion 320 million rupees. The revised size of Nepal's economy last year was 39 trillion 14 billion 700 million rupees at current prices, the department mentioned. Similarly, the department has revised the growth rate of last year and mentioned that it was 2.12 percent negative. Earlier, the department 1. Only 19 percent estimated that the economic growth rate will be negative.- The World Bank has estimated that Nepal's growth rate will be 2.7 percent in the current year. - According to the Asian Development Outlook report published by the Asian Development Bank (ADB) in April 2021, the economic growth rate of Nepal is projected to be 3.1 percent in 2021. 819 to Rs. Last year, the per capita income of Nepalese was 130 thousand 957 rupees. The forecast to reach 1 percent has been announced recently (April 2021).- According to the Asian Development Outlook report published by the Asian Development Bank (ADB) in April 2021, the economic growth rate of Nepal is projected to be 3.1 percent in 2021.- According to the statistics of the Department of Nepali Per capita income will increase by 10,000 rupees in the current year and reach 1,40,819 rupees. Last year, the per capita income of Nepalese was 130 thousand 957 rupees. The forecast to reach 1 percent has been announced recently (April 2021).- According to the Asian Development Outlook report published by the Asian Development Bank (ADB) in April 2021, the economic growth rate of Nepal is projected to be 3.1 percent in 2021.- According to the statistics of the Department of Nepali Per capita income will increase by 10,000 rupees in the current year and reach 1,40,819 rupees. Last year, the per capita income of Nepalese was 130 thousand 957 rupees.
22. What was the name of the ancient sea that is currently in Nepal and other areas? Tethys Sea. 
23. Which caste has the characteristic of migrating after the death of its members? the route 
24. What is called the system that controls and coordinates all the activities of our body? Nervous system. 
25. In which ecological system is the pyramid of organisms vertical? Terrestrial ecosystem. 
26. When was the National Nature Conservation Fund established? November 3, 2039. 
27. When did the publication of Gorkhapatra start? 1958 Baisakh 24th.
28. Which is the first movie produced by Nepal Film Institute? Manko Bangh. (The first Nepali movie with background music.) 
29. Who is the first woman head of the International Monetary Fund (IMF)? Christine Lagarde (French Finance Minister). 
30. What is the time taken by the Sun to go around the center of the constellation of Akasha Ganga once? Cosmic year. Presenter: Tank Casey
1. Identify the strengths and weaknesses of Nepal's existing planning practice and present implementable suggestions to strengthen the country's planning system. The plan is a means of economic and social transformation of the country. Planned development has been practiced in Nepal since the year 2013 of Bikram Samvat and till now 14 plans have been implemented. Another fifteenth plan is being implemented. At this time of the planning period, some progress has been made in infrastructure sectors like transport, electricity, communication, irrigation. Significant work has been done in the field of social, administrative and legal reforms. Poverty has dropped to 18.7 percent from 49 percent in 2049, the beginning of the Eighth Plan. In this period of the planning period, a new constitution with federalism has been issued in the country, the republic has been institutionalized, inclusive principles, proportional representation, reservation for backward areas, classes, Community participation has been increased. This is the strength of planned practice. Although some progress has been made in the economic, social and infrastructure sectors of the country in this campaign of planned development, poverty, illiteracy, backwardness, unbalanced development and inequality have not been eliminated in the country. This is the weak point of planned development. As a whole, the strengths and weaknesses of Nepal's existing planning practice can be identified as follows: Strengths of planning practice - Planning is focused on achieving sustainable peace, good governance, development and prosperity, - Investments from all sectors are accepted, - Emphasis is placed on partnership between public, private and cooperative sectors. Three-pillar economic policy has been adopted, - public sector, private sector, cooperative sector, non-governmental organizations, civil society, community sector have established roles, - poverty alleviation has been emphasized, - the goal of high, sustainable and broad economic growth has been taken. - Arranging incentives from the state for the modernization and commercialization of agriculture, agricultural skill development training, loans for investment, fertilizer and seed concessions, land distribution, modern agricultural tools and equipment, etc. to make agriculture truly modern, professional and productive by simplifying and facilitating it, - Industry To develop the industry as a cornerstone of the country's development by providing more facilities, concessions, and facilitation from the state to meet the needs of the industrialists in management, - Tourism is a possibility for the multifaceted development of Nepal. Therefore, emphasis on tourism development through tourism infrastructure development, investment, encouragement, facilitation, coordination, cooperation, publicity, etc. no weakness, -Strengthening the implementation capacity of the administration, which acts as a facilitator of development, emphasizing on the development of the capacity of employees, -Guaranteeing good governance in all public, private and cooperative sectors by ensuring transparency, accountability and participation, - Establishing functional coordination between the agencies that formulate and implement development plans. Increasing effectiveness in management, - Regular monitoring on the basis of indicators, - Assessing the impact of whether the objectives and goals of the project have been achieved, - Finally, the detailed plan is the future program to be done. As this is a means of economic and social transformation of the country, it should be implemented effectively. For this purpose, from the formulation of the plan to the implementation, monitoring and evaluation of the plan, active and meaningful participation of the stakeholders should be implemented. Emphasis on employee capacity development, - Guaranteeing good governance in all public, private and cooperative sectors by ensuring transparency, accountability and participation. ,- To evaluate the impact of whether the objectives and goals of the project have been achieved. As this is a means of economic and social transformation of the country, it should be implemented effectively. For this purpose, from the formulation of the plan to the implementation, monitoring and evaluation of the plan, active and meaningful participation of the stakeholders should be implemented. Emphasis on employee capacity development, - Guaranteeing good governance in all public, private and cooperative sectors by ensuring transparency, accountability and participation. ,- To evaluate the impact of whether the objectives and goals of the project have been achieved. As this is a means of economic and social transformation of the country, it should be implemented effectively. For this purpose, from the formulation of the plan to the implementation, monitoring and evaluation of the plan, active and meaningful participation of the stakeholders should be implemented. To ensure good governance in all private and cooperative sectors, - To formulate development plans and to enhance efficiency in project management by establishing operational coordination between the implementing agencies, - To monitor regularly based on indicators, - To evaluate the impact of whether the objectives and goals of the project have been achieved, - At the end , is a detailed plan of the future program to be done. As this is a means of economic and social transformation of the country, it should be implemented effectively. For this purpose, from the formulation of the plan to the implementation, monitoring and evaluation of the plan, active and meaningful participation of the stakeholders should be implemented. To ensure good governance in all private and cooperative sectors, - To formulate development plans and to enhance efficiency in project management by establishing operational coordination between the implementing agencies, - To monitor regularly based on indicators, - To evaluate the impact of whether the objectives and goals of the project have been achieved, - At the end , is a detailed plan of the future program to be done. As this is a means of economic and social transformation of the country, it should be implemented effectively. For this purpose, from the formulation of the plan to the implementation, monitoring and evaluation of the plan, active and meaningful participation of the stakeholders should be implemented. - Evaluating the impact of whether the objectives and goals of the project have been achieved. As this is a means of economic and social transformation of the country, it should be implemented effectively. For this purpose, from the formulation of the plan to the implementation, monitoring and evaluation of the plan, active and meaningful participation of the stakeholders should be implemented. - Evaluating the impact of whether the objectives and goals of the project have been achieved. As this is a means of economic and social transformation of the country, it should be implemented effectively. For this purpose, from the formulation of the plan to the implementation, monitoring and evaluation of the plan, active and meaningful participation of the stakeholders should be implemented.
2. What is the system for goods inspection at the customs office of Nepal? Discuss. In Nepal, the Customs Act-2064 and the Customs Regulations-2064 have made various procedural provisions related to goods inspection at the customs office, which can be mentioned as follows: a. Details of goods to be submitted:- The driver of the goods vehicle must submit the details of the goods in the vehicle to the customs office before the vehicle enters the customs office. b. Application form to be submitted: - The person exporting the goods or his customs representative (customs agent) should attach the documents related to the goods and submit a self-declaration to the customs officer. Such documents and customs declarations can be submitted to the customs officer in physical form or in electronic form through Ashikuda Worldmart, a computer system used in customs. Documents to be attached with notification letter: When importing goods from India: - Invoice (invoice), - Packing list, - Any recommendation, license or certificate from the relevant body as per prevailing law, related documents if required, - Import under Inbond (process of importing from India by paying foreign currency exchange) Nepal invoice (inbond form), BBNI form, banking documents related to payment process and documents as mentioned therein, when importing goods from third countries; - Banking documents related to the payment process, - Invoice, - Packing list, - Bill of lading or airway bill, - Certificate of origin, - Foreign exchange control (BBNI) form, - Customs transit documents in case of goods to be imported in transit through India, - In case of importation by air, the delivery order of the relevant airlines, - If there is a terminal operator in the customs office, the delivery order issued by such terminal operator, - If any recommendation, license or certificate from the relevant body is required according to the prevailing law, the related documents, upon withdrawal: - Invoice, - Packing list , - Certificate of origin, - Banking documents related to the payment process for exports to third countries, - Documents related to any recommendation, license or certificate from the relevant body in accordance with prevailing laws. c. Inspection of Declaration and Consignment: - After submitting the declaration, the customs officer must first check whether the goods declared in the declaration are goods that can be exported or imported according to the law. If it appears that the goods can be exported and imported during such inspection, the customs officer may open and inspect any weight or bulk of any goods to be exported, one by one or scattered at intervals or only a few percent, or he may order any employee under him to open and inspect in such a manner. is d. Sample collection and testing of goods:- Quality testing of food, beverages and any other goods imported into Nepal, customs pricing, classification, If it is deemed necessary to examine the sample or to have it examined by a related expert or to have it tested by a laboratory from the point of view of the possible impact on public health and the environment, the customs officer shall take the sample to the owner of the said goods or his customs agent for examination by the relevant expert himself or to the laboratory of the customs department or customs office or other official government. There is a provision to get the test done by the agency's laboratory. e. Customs valuation of goods :- After checking both the goods and the documents, the customs officer should carry out the customs valuation of the goods to be exported and imported. According to which the customs value of the goods to be imported will be based on the transaction value first. If the customs value cannot be determined in this way, then the customs value shall be calculated (according to the computed value method) by calculating the cost of producing or manufacturing such goods and the profit that the seller has taken or can take while selling the goods to the importer. Otherwise, there is a provision to determine the customs value of the goods on a reasonable basis. Similarly, there is a provision to determine the customs value of goods exported from Nepal based on the invoice value declared by the exporter. f. Classification of goods and determination of customs duty: - After determining the customs value, the customs officer should check whether the declared goods have been classified according to the subheadings of the prevailing Economic Act. If the classification of the goods is found to be correct, the customs officer should determine the customs duty on the goods to be exported and imported. is. Passing the gate pass after checking the goods :- The customs officer should pass the goods check only after taking the duty levied according to the law on the goods to be exported and imported. Revenue vouchers, customs declarations, other documents related to goods and customs gate pass should be kept in the customs records and the vehicle with goods should be taken out of the customs gate with a gate pass. After the vehicle with cargo leaves the customs gate, the cargo inspection process is completed at the customs. - The customs officer should pass the inspection of the goods only by collecting the duty levied according to the law on the goods to be exported and imported. Revenue vouchers, customs declarations, other documents related to goods and customs gate pass should be kept in the customs records and the vehicle with goods should be taken out of the customs gate with a gate pass. After the vehicle with cargo leaves the customs gate, the cargo inspection process is completed at the customs. - The customs officer should pass the inspection of the goods only by collecting the duty levied according to the law on the goods to be exported and imported. Revenue vouchers, customs declarations, other documents related to goods and customs gate pass should be kept in the customs records and the vehicle with goods should be taken out of the customs gate with a gate pass. After the vehicle with cargo leaves the customs gate, the cargo inspection process is completed at the customs.
3. What is a balance test? What are its objectives? write The initial records of financial transactions after posting the amount of Goshwara vouchers to the respective accounts, the statement prepared by including the debit and credit amounts of all accounts with the aim of checking the mathematical accuracy of the entire record and improving it is called a balance test. If the total amount of both its debit side and credit side is equal, it is considered that there is no error. Although there is no legal obligation to make this statement, which is prepared by adopting the principle of double-entry accounting system, it provides the basis for the final account preparation. Objectives of balance test - to identify possible mathematical errors in accounting, - to inform about the profit and loss status of the business, - to summarize the subject accounts, - to assist in preparing financial statements, - to provide information about the state of the accounts, - to correct deficiencies in initial records and subsequent accounts Presented by:
1. When was the official launch of NRN Development Fund Limited with the aim of investing in the various infrastructure sectors of Nepal? Bikram Samvat 2078 Baisakh 6.- Nepal government has a 5 percent share in the fund with an initial investment of 10 billion.
2. When was the inauguration of the tower destroyed by the 2072 earthquake after the reconstruction? 2078 Baisakh 11.- It looks the same as the previous Dharahara, but the Dharahara has been rebuilt/newly constructed with new technology.- There were only stairs inside the Dharahara, but now it has been built to house a museum structure inside. Stairs as well as elevators have been installed to climb the tower. - Keeping the historical importance of the tower, the modern and systematically built tower looks like 11 floors from the outside, but inside it has 22 floors and a height of 72 meters and a base of 48 feet. - On February 4, 2072, by Prime Minister KP Sharma Oli, 'My Dharahara, "I will build" campaign was announced.- Prime Minister Oli inaugurated the newly constructed Dharahara, which was laid the foundation stone by Prime Minister Oli on 5th January 2075. The contract was signed.- The tower built by Bhimsen Thapa in 1882 is 61.88 meters high. After it was damaged due to the earthquake in 1990, the tower was rebuilt by the then Rana Prime Minister Juddhashamsher. Before the earthquake of 1990, the tower had 11 floors, but only 9 floors were built during the reconstruction. 88 meters high. After it was damaged due to the earthquake in 1990, the tower was rebuilt by the then Rana Prime Minister Juddhashamsher. Before the earthquake of 1990, the tower had 11 floors, but only 9 floors were built during the reconstruction. 88 meters high. After it was damaged due to the earthquake in 1990, the tower was rebuilt by the then Rana Prime Minister Juddhashamsher. Before the earthquake of 1990, the tower had 11 floors, but only 9 floors were built during the reconstruction.
3. When is World Malaria Day celebrated? 4 
. Who was honored this year (in 2078) with the National Talent Award given by the government every year? Comedian Madankrishna Shrestha. 
5. According to the report published by Nepal Rastra Bank on May 8, 2078, which country has the highest share in foreign direct investment? India (30 percent). 
6. When was the National Inclusion Commission formed? December 29, 2065. 
7. Which festival is also called Biska or Vispati festival? Vishu festival. 
8. Who is considered the first poet of Nepali language? Suwananda Das. 
9. Which is the work written by the father and completed by the son? Kadambari.
10. When was Nepal Civil Aviation Authority established? December 16, 2055. (Established with the aim of making Nepal's civil aviation development and expansion, air flight, air communication, air navigation and air transportation services safe, regular, standard and efficient for national and international air communication. .) 
11. Since when did agriculture census start in Nepal? 2018 (to be held every 10/10 years). 
12. When did Nepal participate in the one-day international cricket tournament for the first time? 2075 July 16 (August 1, 2018).
13. Which is the first country to have Double Taxation Avoidance Agreement (DTAA) with Nepal? India (January 18, 1987).
14. Who won the tri-national T-20 series title in Baisakh 2078? Nepal.- Nepal won the title by defeating the Netherlands by a wide margin of 142 runs in the final of the tri-nation T-20 series on 11th Baisakh. - Nepal won the International Cricket Council (ICC) World Cricket League Division Five title in 2010 for the first time at home. The tournament was of 50 over format. - This is the first time that Nepal has won a T-20 series in which more than two teams are participating. like this, The total of 238 runs is also the biggest total made by Nepal against any opponent. Earlier, Nepal made a total of 236 runs in the match against Bhutan under the 13th South Asian Games (SAG). Bhutan was defeated by 141 runs in that match. The total and margin of victory of this match against the Netherlands is behind it.- Nepal's opening batsman Kushal Bhurtel, who scored four fifties including three in a row in his debut match, was selected as the best player of the tri-nation T-20 series.- Malaysia and the Netherlands participated in this experiment.
15. Since when was the euro currency introduced? January 1, 2002. 
16. When was SAARC Japan Special Fund (SSF) established? September 27, 1993. 
17. What is a United Nations peacekeeper known as? Blue helmets. 
18. Biovillage model program was first conducted in which district? Tanahun.
19. Who is the first Nepalese woman to climb the 8091 meter high Annapurna mountain peak? Purnima Shrestha (Gorkha).- On 3rd of Baisakh, 2078, she successfully climbed that peak. Along with Purnima, Dawa Yangjum Sherpa, Pasanglhamu Sherpa, Maya Sherpa, Sarmila Syangtan and Dabuti Sherpa made the climb a success. - In terms of climbing, two records were set on Annapurna, the oldest mountain, on 3 Baisakh. For the first time, 6 Nepali women climbed the mountain on the same day, setting a record for the highest number of climbers. 
20. Who will be awarded with 'Recognition Honor' by the Recognition Fund? Khagendra Sangraula (in 2078).
21. Which day is celebrated as hearing day with the aim of reducing deafness caused by increasing noise pollution? March 3. (Even though this day is being celebrated on March 3 at the call of the World Health Organization, it is going to be celebrated in Nepal from this year.) 
22. Since when was the mobile app named 'Parliament of Nepal' launched? 2074 July 12. (Through this app made with the help of UNDP, the parliamentary activities, i.e. the meeting of the Parliament, can be watched and heard directly.) 
23. Where is the famous religious place Badikedar? Dottie. 
24. If ancient fort is in Mahottari district then where is Dugunagadhi? Sindhupalchok.
25. Who is the personality to be honored with Nai Chandradhan Award-2077? Prof. Dr. Dilgraj Ghimire.- Likewise, Kamal Thapa from the new Kirtinidi award, Prof. Dr. from the new Bhupaldurga award. Rajendra Bimal, Nii Derunikh Sukirti Award was awarded to Neer Shah, and Ishwar Ballab Award to Vasant Kumar Chaudhary. - The prize money is one lakh rupees. 
26. What is the full form of EPG? Eminent Persons Group. 
27. Where is the country's oldest 'National Museum' located? Cantonment, Kathmandu. (This museum has a collection of more than 18,000 important and rare art and objects of the world and was opened to the general public for a fee from February 1, 1995.) 
28. What is the full form of CERID? Research Center for Educational Innovation and Development 
29. Which is the biggest lake in SAARC region? Chilka Lake, India.
30. Which country is the first to start planned economic development in the world? Russia.Presented by: Tank KC 
Strengths and Weaknesses of Civil Service
1. Pointing out the strengths and weaknesses of the existing civil service in Nepal, what are the ways to make the civil service people-oriented? write The civil service is a professional group of employees with special knowledge, skills and permanent nature who get salary benefits from the government funds. Civil service is government service. Its basic purpose is to serve the country and the people by bringing the policies and programs of the government to the people. The civil service is neutral towards politics and committed to the policies and programs of the government. Although the civil service is a group of national service employees who work in all areas of state administration, the services of soldiers, police, teachers and public institutions are excluded from the civil service in Nepal. Civil Service Act-2049 and Regulations-2050 have been implemented to organize the civil service of Nepal. Ministry of Federal Affairs and General Administration, There is an arrangement of ministries related to service groups. According to the three-level federal system, there is a network of civil service up to the federal, provincial and local levels. This legal and institutional arrangement in civil service in Nepal is a strong point in itself. The strengths and weaknesses of the existing civil service in Nepal can be pointed out as follows: Strengths:- The selection of employees based on merit is done by the Public Service Commission, an independent agency,- The age limit of employees is set at 58 years,- The service period of the secretary is five years and that of the chief secretary is fixed for three years,- Service security Legal guarantee, - professional development appointment, posting, transfer, promotion, etc. are fixed by law, - kept separate and neutral from politics, committed to the policies and programs of the government, - based on appointment, - serving the country and the people even in a political vacuum, - decisions are written. - Federation, State, - To prevent political interference in the civil service, to clearly divide the duties of the secretary and the minister, not to transfer the secretary and joint secretary for at least one year, - To arrange training and incentives to improve the conduct and behavior of each employee, - To maintain functional coordination between the government offices that provide services, - The performance agreement Conducting regular monitoring, awarding and punishing on the basis of performance, public-oriented civil service is actually a service that is accountable to the public. For this, the citizen's participation is necessary somewhere in the independent evaluation of aspects such as rewards, punishments, punishments, moral development of employees, decision-making ability of employees, service delivery, conduct, behavior towards customers. Only then can civil service be people-oriented. For this, the existing legal and institutional system should be modernized and the civil service should be developed as a part of maintaining good governance. In the independent evaluation of aspects such as behavior towards service users, the participation of citizens is necessary. Only then can civil service be people-oriented. For this, the existing legal and institutional system should be modernized and the civil service should be developed as a part of maintaining good governance.
2. Give a brief introduction to the following terms used in customs inspection passes. (a) FOB (b) CIF (c) CIP (d) C&F. (e) CTD. (a) FOB – The full form of FOB is Free on Board which is mostly used in customs clearance of goods. It refers to the value of the goods up to the border of the exporting country. It does not include rent, insurance. (b) CIF – Its full form is Cost, Insurance and Freight. This customs is mostly used for goods importation. This includes the price of the goods, freight and insurance. (c) CIP – Its full form is Carriage and Insurance Paid, which is used for customs clearance of goods. It includes the cost of goods, freight and insurance. (d) C&F – Its full form is Cost and Freight. This includes the cost of goods and freight, Insurance is not included. It is used in the Customs for the entry of goods. (e) CTD – Its full form is Custom Transit Declaration. This is a form, which, as mentioned in the bilateral trade and transit agreement between Nepal and India, must be filled when bringing goods to the specified customs point of Nepal and transporting them to the nearest port for goods imported from a third country to Nepal via land through India and exported from Nepal to a third country. Its purpose is to prevent diversion of goods on Indian soil. This type of form is issued from the relevant customs point of Nepal in case of exported goods and in case of imported goods from Kolkata, Haldia or Phulbari port in India. As mentioned in the bilateral trade and transit agreement between Nepal and India, it has to be filled when bringing goods to the specified customs point of Nepal and transporting them to the nearest port for goods imported from third countries to Nepal via land route through India and exported from Nepal to third countries. Its purpose is to prevent diversion of goods on Indian soil. This type of form is issued from the relevant customs point of Nepal in case of exported goods and in case of imported goods from Kolkata, Haldia or Phulbari port in India. As mentioned in the bilateral trade and transit agreement between Nepal and India, it has to be filled when bringing goods to the specified customs point of Nepal and transporting them to the nearest port for goods imported from third countries to Nepal via land route through India and exported from Nepal to third countries. Its purpose is to prevent diversion of goods on Indian soil. This type of form is issued from the relevant customs point of Nepal in case of exported goods and in case of imported goods from Kolkata, Haldia or Phulbari port in India.
3. What kind of rights are there in the constitution of Nepal as fundamental rights against untouchability and discrimination? Mention. Article 24 of the Constitution of Nepal provides the following rights against untouchability and discrimination as fundamental rights:- No person shall be subjected to any kind of untouchability or discrimination in any private or public place on the basis of his origin, caste, caste, community, profession, business or physical condition,- When producing or distributing any item, service or facility, such item, service or facility is prohibited from being purchased or received by a person of a particular race, or such item, service or facility is not sold or provided to a person of a particular caste, origin, caste or physical Denigrating a person or a community based on circumstances,
4. What is cash flow statement? Write its purpose. A statement prepared to give information on cash receipts and payments of an organization or business during a certain period is called a cash flow statement. It is a financial statement that provides information on the cash flow of an organization or business. It is needed for information about the sources of cash received in the organization or business and where it was used. This statement is a summary of cash transactions prepared by adopting the profit accounting system. It provides a basis for making decisions regarding cash. Objectives:- To depict the actual situation of cash receipt and payment of the organization,- To provide a basis for making future plans regarding cash,- To assist in cash control,- To assist in the decision to grant loans to banks and financial institutions, lenders and creditors,- The organization's debt Assist in solvency analysis,
5. What should be the role of National Vigilance Center and Commission for Investigation of Abuse of Authority in corruption control work in Nepal? write Corruption is the act of using public property for personal gain. It is both economic and non-economic crime. In Nepal, all the organs of the state are active to control it, and the main responsibility for controlling it is the National Vigilance Center and the Commission for Investigation of Abuse of Authority. In Nepal, the roles of these two agencies in corruption control work should be as follows: Role of National Vigilance Center - Identifying corrupt activities and alerting the relevant offices, - Identifying agencies where corruption is high and increasing monitoring and surveillance, - Systematically reforming the work of public agencies and creating an environment where corruption does not occur. - To find ways to simplify the public service process,
1. According to the rhino count in March 2077, how many rhinos are there in Nepal? 752.- According to the results of the rhino count published on 28 Chait 2077, 694 rhinos were found in Chitwan National Park, 38 in Bardia National Park, 17 in Shuklaphanta National Park and three in Parsa National Park. Rhino count was conducted from 9th to 28th Chait 2077.- Among the total number of rhinos there are 520 adults, 96 mid-adults and 136 children.- In the rhino count conducted 6 years ago i.e. in 2015, there were a total of 645 rhinos in Nepal.
2. Which institution of Nepal has been initiated to become a deemed university? Nepal Agricultural Research Council (NARC). - Efforts have been going on for a long time to make NARC a recognized university. The three-year interim plan of NARC (2064-2067) also mentions this.
3. Which organization supports the construction of charging stations for electric vehicles? Asian Development Bank (ADB).- The government will build charging stations for electric vehicles in 50 different places in seven provinces.- Charging stations will be placed on main highways, bus parks and big cities. - Each charging station will be equipped with a 142 kW charger, a 50 kVA transformer for power supply, and an online billing system. All 50 stations will be controlled from Kadmadau.
4. Since when has Nepal Oil Corporation decided to implement Enterprise Resource Planning (ERP) software for the purpose of controlling fuel leakage? Bikram Samvat 2078 Baisakh 2.- A team has been mobilized from the central office under the leadership of high-level employees to implement ERP in all depots across the country. The amount of oil being transported on the road, the amount of oil given by the Indian Oil Corporation (IOC) and all other data can be easily obtained through the software.- Since the pump businessmen demand oil through the software, they can easily see where the oil has gone too much or too little to coordinate the supply and demand. Expiration.- Businessmen can demand oil and pay money while sitting at home. likewise,
5. With the aim of making personal incident registration more effective, the government has started celebrating which period as personal incident registration week? Baisakh 1 to 7 (since 2078). - Government of Nepal has expressed its commitment to increase birth and death registration to 100 percent by 2024. - At present, the registration of personal events in the country is only 65 percent. 
6. When is my kita system launched? Year 2078 Baisakh 2.- This system is going to be put into operation so that services such as map, plot registrar, field drawing application etc. can be obtained online. It is said that this system is also related to aspects such as agriculture, production and productivity.- This system was launched by Prime Minister KP Sharma Oli.
7. Judsheetal festival is popular in which area? Terai - In the Tharu, Maithili and Madhesi communities of Terai-Madhes, this festival is celebrated in the process of saying goodbye to the old year and celebrating the new year. There is a custom.- In this festival, it is customary to take blessings from senior members of the family and respectable people for the happiness, peace and prosperity of the family.
8. Siruva festival is popular in which area? Eastern Terai.- Along with the new year starting on 1st Baisakh, this festival is in vogue in the tribal communities of Eastern Terai, especially Rajwanshi, Tajpuria, Gangai, Majhi, Tharu etc.- In this festival, wearing new clothes, eating sweet food, family, village, society and the peace of the nation. And for prosperity, it is celebrated by performing puja in village and Maharajthan and Kulpuja at home. Fairs are held in Thanas during this festival. 
9. Which country has started gender responsive budgeting? Australia (1984). 
10. Where is Falgunanda Sukilumba Airport located? Elam. - Preparations are being made for the landing of flights at this airport with the new year 2078.- The foundation stone of the airport built on an area of ​​328 ropani was laid on 13 Chait 2067 (by then Prime Minister Jhalnath Khanal).
11. When was the health insurance program started in Nepal? 2072 Chait 25.- This program was started from Kailali district with the original slogan of your health, our commitment.- Fifth Health Insurance Day was celebrated on 25 Chait 25, 2077.)12. According to the report published in 2020 by CEO World, an American financial newspaper, which country is on the first place in the list of the most expensive countries in the world? Switzerland.- The second place in the list of expensive countries is Norway and the third place is Iceland.- Nepal is in the 122nd place in the list of the most expensive countries.- Pakistan is in the first place in the list of the cheapest countries in the world.- Nepal is in the 11th place in the list of the cheapest countries. , clothes, taxi fare, internet prices and other topics, the list has been prepared. The survey was conducted in the capitals of 132 countries.
13. The cabinet meeting on January 20, 2076 decided to declare how many places in the country as industrial villages? 5. (It has been decided to declare Zorayal Rural Municipality-2 in Doti, Diyanot Rural Municipality-6 in Bajhang, Molung Rural Municipality-6 in Okhaldhunga, Chapakot Municipality-9 in Syangja and Galyang Municipality-1 in Syangja.) 
14. Since when has the tradition of announcing the name of the best in SLC (currently SEE) been stopped? Year 2062. 
15. Which is the only hunting reserve in Nepal? Dhorpatan Hunting Reserve. 
16. Who is the thinker who said that 'the best of all capital is the capital invested in the human race'? Alfred Marshall. 
17. What is the reason for the balance of payments in trade between Nepal and India? Nepal imports more than exports. 
18. Since when has the provision of postal stamps been removed for newspapers? May 12, 2063.
19. What is meant by red apple? Golbhenda 
20. Nepal is located in which hemisphere of the earth? Northern Hemisphere. 
21. Who is the first person to make Nepali subjects mandatory in the education system of Nepal? Mahakavi Lakshmi Prasad Devkota.
22. 'Visu festival' celebrated on 1st Baisakh is a popular festival in which place? far west - Visu festival is also called Visu Sankranti. This festival is celebrated by preparing and eating sweet and savory dishes, playing with sticks and sprinkling water on Sisnu.- There is a popular belief that when Sisnu is applied on the day of Bisuka, the wounds on the skin will be cured and skin diseases will be eradicated. - On the day of Visu festival, it is customary for women to dance puppets and for men to make Visu tigers and run. 6.- On this day, there is a tradition of going to Haridwar in India from various places in Nepal and India to bathe in the Ganges.
23. When was the 'Iron Silk Road' agreement signed to connect Asian countries? November 10, 2006. 
24. What is the name of the 5,890 meter high snow peak in Lamtang area of ​​Rasuwa district? Baden Powell Scout Pick. 
25. Since when was the public housing program started by the government of Nepal? Year 2066/067.- The government has started public housing program in Sirha, Saptari and Kapilvastu districts through the budget and program of year 2066/067. - The government has started Janata Awas program with the aim of providing healthy and safe housing to the citizens below the poverty line. 
26. Virtual currency started from which country? Japan.
27. When was the first edition of the book 'Nighantu' published about the properties of herbs and their utility in diseases? Year 2025.- This book has been published 25 years after the publication of the first edition, the second edition has been published (by Nepal Prajna Pratishthan). Names of those words are given as much as possible in Latin language. 
28. Who is the first woman president of the world? Isabel Peron, Argentina. 
29. Pellagra disease is caused by lack of vitamin 'B' and scurvy disease is caused by lack of which vitamin? Vitamin 'C'. 
30. What was the name of the atomic bomb that was exploded on August 6, 1945 in Hiroshima, Japan? Little Boy.Presented by: Tank Casey
What is gender management? 1. What is gender management? Highlight its importance in the public administration of Nepal. The overall work of making a purchase plan for office supplies, to purchasing, recording, using, maintaining, reporting the actual physical condition, etc. is called office management. This is the task of organizing and managing material resources in the office. It depicts the actual situation of income, expenditure and balance of goods. In Nepal, legal and institutional arrangements have been made to manage gender management. There are public procurement law rules, economic procedure law rules, public procurement monitoring office, customs clearance form, and yet the customs management work in Nepal has not yet been managed. There is also a situation of abuse. Therefore, in order to make proper use of the government investment in goods, the importance of goods management in the public administration of Nepal can be mentioned as follows:- To formulate a purchase plan and to carry out purchases accordingly,- To protect goods,- To prevent unnecessary purchases of goods,- In government offices To conduct regular operations, - to maintain frugality and transparency in the use of foreign goods, to prevent misuse, - to show the real condition of foreign goods, - to identify old, broken and unusable goods and sell them at auction, to remove them, to destroy them.
2. What are the arrangements for the promotion of the Chief Secretary and Secretary in Nepal's civil service? Mention. The arrangements for the promotion of the Chief Secretary and Secretary in the Civil Service of Nepal are made in the Civil Service Act-2049 and Regulations-2050, which can be mentioned as follows: (a) Promotion to the post of Chief Secretary:- Based on seniority and efficiency, the Government of Nepal will select and promote from among the existing secretaries. , (b) Promotion arrangement for the post of secretary:- (1) In 20 percent of the vacant posts, the potential candidates who have obtained an average score of 95 percent or more in the performance evaluation and who have the longest service period in the post of joint secretary of the respective service shall be promoted by the Government of Nepal on the recommendation of the promotion committee.
3. What is the government budget? clarify Estimated statement of government income and expenditure is called government budget. This is the annual policy and program of the government to be prepared for the next financial year after analyzing the actual economic situation of the past and present. This is also a public commitment made by the government to the people. Budget is usually prepared for one financial year. There are two parts in the budget, income and expenditure. The government budget helps to maintain economic growth, economic stability and social justice. The government budget is prepared by the executive, approved by the legislature and then implemented by the executive. Nepal has constitutional, legal and institutional arrangements to manage the government budget system. There is a constitutional provision that the federal budget must be submitted to the Parliament on the 15th of May every year. Ministry of Finance, National Planning Commission, The ministry and all government agencies under the ministry are active in it. - Financial Procedures and Financial Responsibility Act, Rules, Public Procurement Act and Rules. There is an arrangement for internal audit by the Office of Treasury and Accounts Control on a monthly and quarterly basis and final audit of government income and expenditure by the Auditor General's office after the financial year. For this, it seems that the capacity of the budget implementation mechanism should be developed and the budget should be formulated on the same basis. There are provisions in the Public Procurement Act. There is an arrangement for internal audit by the Office of Treasury and Accounts Control on a monthly and quarterly basis and final audit of government income and expenditure by the Auditor General's office after the financial year. For this, it seems that the capacity of the budget implementation mechanism should be developed and the budget should be formulated on the same basis. There are provisions in the Public Procurement Act. There is an arrangement for internal audit by the Office of Treasury and Accounts Control on a monthly and quarterly basis and final audit of government income and expenditure by the Auditor General's office after the financial year. For this, it seems that the capacity of the budget implementation mechanism should be developed and the budget should be formulated on the same basis.
4. What is balance sheet? Mentioning its purpose, what aspects are included in the balance sheet? write A financial statement prepared to provide accurate information about the overall financial status of an organization or business, including assets, liabilities, capital, is called a balance sheet. It is a legally recognized statement made after preparing the profit and loss account at the end of each year. It is also a business or organization progress report. Through this, the performance of the organization or business can be evaluated. It provides necessary information to shareholders, investors, managers, creditors, employees, employee trade unions, government and other stakeholders. - This statement is an important document for tax purposes, Therefore, the eyes of the tax officer of the tax office first fall on the balance sheet of the business. Assets should be shown on the right side and liabilities on the left side of this statement prepared on the last day of the financial year. These two sides are equal. It is not an account, being a statement of financial position, it does not have a debit or credit side. Objectives of the balance sheet - Since the balance sheet is the financial statement of a business or organization, it is used by many people or organizations, so it has multifaceted purposes, which can be mentioned as follows: - To inform the status, nature and condition of the assets of the business or organization, - To clearly disclose the state of the liabilities of the business or organization. ,- To show the real state of capital, investment, profit and loss of a business or organization,- To check the liquidity of a business or organization,- To provide a basis for evaluating the future of a business or organization,- To inform the status of creditors and employees,- To liquidate a business or organization, Providing the necessary information for sale or continuation, - Helping to make investment decisions in organizations or businesses, Aspects included in the balance sheet - This statement, which is prepared on the last day of the financial year after making the profit and loss account at the end of each year, basically has two aspects. One is the asset side and the other is the liability side. Assets should be shown on the right side of the balance sheet and liabilities should be shown on the left side. These two sides should be equal. The points included in both these aspects can be presented as follows: The points included in the liability side: - Bills to be paid, - Bank overdraft, - Creditors, - Loans, - Safe fund: This includes pension fund, deduction fund, etc. - Capital: If there is a net profit in the profit and loss account, it should be added and if there is a net loss, it should be subtracted from it. Items included in the asset side: - Cash balance, - Bank balance, - Bills payable, - Employees, - Furniture, vehicles, - Investments, - Land and buildings, - Intangible assets such as reputation of the organization, trademarks, patent rights etc. - Final balance.- In order for the balance sheet to be complete, there are some transactions that need to be adjusted, which should be included in the balance sheet. Some of the transactions that need to be adjusted are as follows: a. Final Balance: If there is a difference between the cost price and the market price, the shortfall should be included in the asset side of the balance sheet and should be kept in the credit side of the profit and loss account. b. Payable Expenses: It should be shown on the asset side of the balance sheet and deducted from the relevant head in the profit and loss account. c. Payable expenses: This should be shown in the liability side of the balance sheet and in the profit and loss account under the relevant heading. d. Depreciation Expense: It should be reduced to the related asset in the balance sheet and kept as an expense in the debit of the profit and loss account. Patent rights etc. - Final balance.- In order for the balance sheet to be complete, there are some transactions that need to be adjusted, which should be included in the balance sheet. Some of the transactions that need to be adjusted are as follows: a. Final Balance: If there is a difference between the cost price and the market price, the shortfall should be included in the asset side of the balance sheet and should be kept in the credit side of the profit and loss account. b. Payable Expenses: It should be shown on the asset side of the balance sheet and deducted from the relevant head in the profit and loss account. c. Payable expenses: This should be shown in the liability side of the balance sheet and in the profit and loss account under the relevant heading. d. Depreciation Expense: It should be reduced to the related asset in the balance sheet and kept as an expense in the debit of the profit and loss account. Patent rights etc. - Final balance.- In order for the balance sheet to be complete, there are some transactions that need to be adjusted, which should be included in the balance sheet. Some of the transactions that need to be adjusted are as follows: a. Final Balance: If there is a difference between the cost price and the market price, the shortfall should be included in the asset side of the balance sheet and should be kept in the credit side of the profit and loss account. b. Payable Expenses: It should be shown on the asset side of the balance sheet and deducted from the relevant head in the profit and loss account. c. Payable expenses: This should be shown in the liability side of the balance sheet and in the profit and loss account under the relevant heading. d. Depreciation Expense: It should be reduced to the related asset in the balance sheet and kept as an expense in the debit of the profit and loss account. Some of those adjusted transactions are as follows: a. Final Balance: If there is a difference between the cost price and the market price, the shortfall should be included in the asset side of the balance sheet and should be kept in the credit side of the profit and loss account. b. Payable Expenses: It should be shown on the asset side of the balance sheet and deducted from the relevant head in the profit and loss account. c. Payable expenses: This should be shown in the liability side of the balance sheet and in the profit and loss account under the relevant heading. d. Depreciation Expense: It should be reduced to the related asset in the balance sheet and kept as an expense in the debit of the profit and loss account. Some of those adjusted transactions are as follows: a. Final Balance: If there is a difference between the cost price and the market price, the shortfall should be included in the asset side of the balance sheet and should be kept in the credit side of the profit and loss account. b. Payable Expenses: It should be shown on the asset side of the balance sheet and deducted from the relevant head in the profit and loss account. c. Payable expenses: This should be shown in the liability side of the balance sheet and in the profit and loss account under the relevant heading. d. Depreciation Expense: It should be reduced to the related asset in the balance sheet and kept as an expense in the debit of the profit and loss account. Payable expenses: This should be shown in the liability side of the balance sheet and in the profit and loss account under the relevant heading. d. Depreciation Expense: It should be reduced to the related asset in the balance sheet and kept as an expense in the debit of the profit and loss account. Payable expenses: This should be shown in the liability side of the balance sheet and in the profit and loss account under the relevant heading. d. Depreciation Expense: It should be reduced to the related asset in the balance sheet and kept as an expense in the debit of the profit and loss account.
5. What is meant by public sector and private sector? write Production, pricing and distribution of goods and services with government investment is called public sector. Since the government has ownership and control over economic activities and activities, it is also called the government sector. It is the function of capital formation, policy formulation, management and operation of the public sector. Since the government invests in such commercial companies run in the public sector to produce goods and services, their main objective is to promote the welfare of the people rather than making a profit. Due to government subsidies, such businesses are run even in difficult and adverse conditions. - Such businesses get full government protection and support. Under the public sector, government-invested public institutions such as Nepal Air Service Corporation, Nepal Telecom, Nepal Television and other organizations are included. Although decisions regarding the management and operation of such commercial companies are made autonomously by the company, its policies and objectives are formulated by the government. Such companies are also audited by the Auditor General like government agencies. - Likewise, all types of free market economies that are not owned and controlled by the government are called the private sector. It is a market run by individuals or groups in the private sector. In open market and economic liberalization, the private sector is considered as the engine of development. It is a business run with the objective of earning profit. Although the private sector is not a government-controlled business, it must operate under the economic plans and laws formulated by the government. The private sector includes businesses such as sole proprietorship, partnership, private limited ownership and public limited ownership.
6. Give a brief introduction to Civil Services. The civil service is a professional group of permanent employees with special knowledge and skills who receive salary benefits from government funds. Civil service is government service. It is neutral towards politics and committed to the policies and programs of the government. It is a permanent mechanism of the government to continuously serve the country and the people by bringing the policies and programs of the government to the people. It continuously provides services to the people even in political vacuum. In Nepal, legal and institutional arrangements have been made to organize the civil service, but the civil service of the country is not organized, transparent, modern, responsible and accountable according to public expectations. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
1. When did the government publish a 10-year strategic plan with the aim of making public administration agile and efficient? Vikram Samvat 2077 Chait 25.- In the strategic plan brought with the thinking of strong federalism, competent, strong and responsive public administration, the aim is to bring excellence in public service delivery by strengthening the local level, strengthening inter-level relationships and developing a professional, ethical and motivated bureaucracy. - For the first time such a strategic plan has been formulated for the improvement of public administration. Taken as a challenge.
2. To whom did the Nepal Fine Arts Foundation award 'National Arani Award 2077? Senior artists Vatsagopal Vaidya and Praveen Kumar Shrestha. - (Prize amount: one lakh). 
3. When was Ghumti Muktak Nepal founded with the aim of enriching the genre of muktak and expanding it to the masses? Year 2077 Chait 27 
4. According to the list of the world's richest people on April 7, 2021 by the famous American magazine Forbes, who is the first rich person? Jeff Bezos - Top 10 Richest Billionaires According to Forbes - Most billionaires (724 people) are from America. After this, the second place belongs to China (698 people).- 140 people from the South Asian country India managed to make it to the list of billionaires. 

5. Since when did Radio Nepal start child news? Year 2064 Baisakh 1.
6. According to the statistics published by the Ministry of Home Affairs, how many drug addicts are there in the country? One lakh 30 thousand 424.- According to the statistics, most of the addicts are in the age group of 15 to 24 years. 
7. Which period in the history of Nepal is considered to be the first documented reign? Lichchavikal. 
8. Who has been elected as the president of Vietnam? Nuen Xuan Phuc.- ​​Phuc was formally sworn in on April 5, 2021. 
9. What is the full form of intel used in computers? Integrated Electronics. 
10. Who has been selected as the president of Nepal Chamber of Commerce? Rajendra Malla (2077 Chait 26). 
11. When did Prince Philip (Duke of Edinburgh), husband of Queen Elizabeth II of the United Kingdom (UK), die? April 9, 2021.
12. In the first eight months of the fiscal year 2077-078, what percentage of Nepal's public debt has reached GDP? 38.51 percent.- By the end of February 2077, the total debt to be paid by the government has reached 15 trillion 18 billion 92 billion. By the end of the year, the total internal debt of Nepal has reached 7 trillion 18 billion 30 million rupees. likewise, The total public foreign debt has reached 8 trillion 890 million rupees.- The department has revised the GDP by changing the base year of national accounting calculations. Earlier, the department was calculating the national accounts by considering the year 2000-01 as the base year, but now it has been replaced by the year 2010-11 as a new base year.- After the change in the calculation year, the size of the economy has increased by 1 trillion 76 billion 700 million rupees.- As before Based on the base year, the current size of Nepal's economy will be 37 trillion 67 billion rupees, and if the previous GDP is taken as a base, the size of Nepal's public debt will be equal to 40.32 percent.
13. According to the World Health Organization, what should be the air quality index (AQI) in terms of environmental cleanliness? Below 50 AQI.- (The World Health Organization considers the situation below 50 AQI as level. The Nepal government has determined it as below 100, that is, the situation of AQI up to 100 is considered normal.) 
14. ISO-900 is related to product quality and ISO 1400 is related to what? Environmental management. 
15. 'Dadani practice' is a common business practice among whom? 16. Between cardamom producing farmers and buying traders 
. What is the full form of HSU, the unit that measures the amount of vehicle smoke? Heritage Smoke Unit. 
17. What did the Chinese call the artist Araniko? Anik. 
18. Red ribbon is used as a symbol of public awareness of which disease? HIV AIDS.
19. Who built Nagarjuna Palace? Juddhashamsher. 
20. Which is the temple with the most carrots in Nepal? Krishna Mandir of Patan (21 Gajur). 
21. Where has the construction of a three-way suspension bridge been started to connect three districts? Rididham (to connect Syangja, Gulmi and Palpa districts).- The government has started to build the bridge to facilitate the traffic as well as to be important from the religious and tourist point of view. The government has named this bridge as a specialized bridge.- It is said that the bridge is planned to be built within the year 2077-078.
22. The Confederation of Nepal Industry and Commerce has released the Vision Paper-2030 with the goal of bringing Nepal's economy to 100 billion dollars by which period? 10 years.- One hundred plans are included in the vision paper with the idea of ​​creating 400,000 jobs annually.- Similarly, in the vision paper, the country's economy will grow by double digits, the country's economy will reach one hundred billion dollars within the next 10 years and additional 22 through sustainable high economic growth. The goal of creating 10,000,000 jobs has been taken.- The vision paper was released on the occasion of the 55th Annual General Assembly of the Federation and Industry-Commercial Day 2077. 
23. Who won the title of Aha-Rara Gold Cup held in Pokhara in March 2077? Sankata Club of Kathmandu.
24. When was 'Nepal Tourism Year' celebrated with the slogan 'Together for Tourism'? Year 2011.- (Previously 1998 was celebrated as 'Visit Nepal Year' and 2002-2003 as 'Destination Nepal Year') 
25. Nepal is divided into how many parts based on the river system? In three parts. 26. Who are the writers known as Trimurti in Nepali literature? Lakshmi Prasad Devkota, Lekhnath Paudyal and Balakrishna Sam. 
27. How is the appointment of the Attorney General? From the President on the recommendation of the Prime Minister. 
28. What is the huge group of celestial bodies and dust and gaseous matter like stars, planets, satellites, asteroids, meteors, comets called? Tarapunj.- (The star cluster in the solar system is called Akash Ganga Tarapunj, which is arch-shaped).
29. What is the process of passing from one lineage to another lineage? Hereditary tendency. 
30. When was Veer Hospital, which is known as the oldest hospital in Nepal, established? 1946 July 12. Presenter: Tank KC 
Importance of Financial Statements 
1. What is a financial statement? What is included in this? Briefly discuss and write about the importance of financial statements. The performance results of an organization or business during a specific period and the actual financial position at the end of that periodThe statement prepared to be shown is called financial statement. This is the business or organization's progress report. Through this, the performance of the organization or business can be evaluated. It provides necessary information to shareholders, investors, managers, creditors, employees, employee trade unions, government and other stakeholders. Aspects under the financial statement: - The financial statement of any organization or business includes the following aspects: a. Profit and Loss Account - Income Statement: - An account prepared to find out the net profit or net loss made by an organization or business in a certain period is a profit and loss account. It is also called income statement as it shows the overall situation of income and expenditure for a certain period. This account is closed by transferring the net profit or net loss from this account to the balance sheet, which will be prepared according to the rules of debit and credit. b. Balance Sheet: - The financial position of an organization or business (assets, liabilities, A financial statement prepared to give accurate information about capital) is a balance sheet. It is a legally recognized statement made after preparing the profit and loss account at the end of each year. Assets should be shown on the right side and liabilities on the left side of this statement prepared on the last day of the financial year. These two sides are equal. Since it is not an account but a statement of financial position, it does not have a debit or credit side. c. Cash flow statement:- Cash flow statement is a statement prepared to give information about cash receipts and payments of an organization or business during a certain period. It is a financial statement that provides information on the cash flow of an organization or business. It is needed for information about the sources of cash received in the organization or business and where it was used. This statement is a summary of cash transactions prepared by adopting the profit accounting system. It provides a basis for making decisions regarding cash. Importance of financial statements - Financial statements have a multifaceted importance in the overall work including planning for the future while reviewing the past and present situation of the organization or business, which can be mentioned as follows: - It presents the real financial situation to the stakeholders. - Provides investors with a basis for making investment decisions. - Profit and loss of organization or business, It depicts the real situation of assets and liabilities. - It helps to increase the trust of all stakeholders towards the organization or business. - Provides information to evaluate the overall performance of the organization or business. - It helps to analyze the profitability of an organization or business. - Provides a basis for determining the cash flow situation in an organization or business. Analyzing the details of the past and present, it provides data to prepare future strategies and programs.
2. Write about the role of customs agent in customs office. Customs Act-2064 and Regulations-2064 provide for the provision of customs agent license by selecting the appropriate person from among the applicants for the license of customs agent through written examination and interview by publishing public notices from time to time. . An exporter or importer can appoint a customs agent from among the customs agents licensed by the customs department to pass the inspection of the goods at the customs and to perform the work related to the customs office. The customs agent appointed in this way acts legally in the customs as if he were the owner of the goods. A customs agent acting as a representative of an exporter or importer has a multi-faceted role in a customs office,
3. Analyzing the positive and negative aspects of the existing transfer system in Nepal's civil administration, present feasible suggestions to make the transfer system suitable for the benefit of both the organization and the employees. Transfer is the method of making the employees working in the civil administration do the same job by changing the place. There is no significant change in the salary, facilities, work and responsibilities of the employees. Only the location of the office changes. Transfers are made according to the nature of the organization, nature of work and geographical location. This is a regular function of civil administration. Civil Service Act-2049 and Regulations-2050 have been implemented to manage the existing transfer system in Nepal's civil administration. Ministry of Federal Affairs and General Administration, The ministry related to the service group has been doing the transfer work. This legal and institutional arrangement in the transfer itself is a strong point. The positive and negative aspects of the existing transfer system in Nepal's civil administration can be analyzed as follows: Positive aspects: - Transfers are organized to provide experience in different geographical areas of the country, - Transfer time-table, transfer bases and transfer officials are clearly defined, inter-ministerial/department/office transfers Arrangements to be made by the Ministry of Federal Affairs and General Administration, - The transfer of accounting group will be done by the office of the Comptroller General of Accounts, - Arrangements will be made by the Government of Nepal on the recommendation of the committee chaired by the Minister of General Administration for the transfer or posting of the secretary, - Transfer time of other employees except for the transfer of the secretary and joint secretary - Transfer period once a year in the transfer letter according to the schedule Provisions to be transferred, - To make the transfer system as transparent and reliable as possible so that the demands of the related employees and the needs of the organization are matched, to end the mentality that no transfer will be given to the requested place, - The transfer list will be posted on the website of the relevant ministry and made public, let it mature for a week, complaints or Arrange for immediate handling of complaints, - It is not only the job of sending transfer employees, it is also the job of selecting qualified employees to carry out the performance of the organization, therefore, only if qualified and capable people get the right position at the right time, the objectives of the organization and the demands of the employees will be fulfilled. - Therefore, it seems that the transfer should be done with the understanding of human sensitivity. Only this can be expected to fulfill the purpose of transfer. - Posting the transfer list on the website of the relevant ministry and making it public, allowing it to mature for a week, making arrangements to address any complaints or grievances immediately, - Transferring is not only the job of sending employees, it is also the job of selecting qualified employees to carry out the organization's performance, so Only if qualified and competent people get the right position at the right time, the objectives of the organization and the demands of the employees will be fulfilled. - Therefore, it seems that the transfer should be done with the understanding of human sensitivity. Only this can be expected to fulfill the purpose of transfer. - Posting the transfer list on the website of the relevant ministry and making it public, allowing it to mature for a week, making arrangements to address any complaints or grievances immediately, - Transferring is not only the job of sending employees, it is also the job of selecting qualified employees to carry out the organization's performance, so Only if qualified and competent people get the right position at the right time, the objectives of the organization and the demands of the employees will be fulfilled. - Therefore, it seems that the transfer should be done with the understanding of human sensitivity. Only this can be expected to fulfill the purpose of transfer. Therefore, only if qualified and competent people get the right position at the right time, the objectives of the organization and the demands of the employees will be fulfilled. - Therefore, it seems that the transfer should be done with the understanding of human sensitivity. Only this can be expected to fulfill the purpose of transfer. Therefore, only if qualified and competent people get the right position at the right time, the objectives of the organization and the demands of the employees will be fulfilled. - Therefore, it seems that the transfer should be done with the understanding of human sensitivity. Only this can be expected to fulfill the purpose of transfer.
4. What kind of tourism related policies are there in Nepal's constitution? Mention. Article 51 (l) of the Constitution of Nepal has a policy system related to tourism, which can be mentioned as follows: - Identifying, protecting, promoting and promoting Nepal's historical, cultural, religious, archaeological and natural heritage, - Eco-friendly tourism as an important basis of the national economy. Developing the industry, creating the necessary environment and policies for the development of tourism culture, - Giving priority to the local people in the distribution of the benefits of the tourism industry. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
When did the Nepal Telecommunication Authority make a decision regarding foreign airline companies being allowed to use telecommunication services while flying in Nepalese skies? Vikram Samvat 2077 Chait 9.- With the decision of the Nepal Telecommunication Authority to provide this service in coordination with the Nepal Civil Aviation Authority, foreign airlines will be able to use the Internet and mobile phones in the Nepali sky. - Airlines licensed by the International Civil Aviation Organization (ICAO) will get this facility. - Domestic air service providers of Nepal will not be allowed to provide such facilities. - According to telecommunication technology, airlines can use the Internet within the borders of Nepal when they enter Nepali airspace and exit through Nepali airspace. . When the plane is in the preparation stage for takeoff and landing at an altitude of less than 10,000 feet, and when internet is provided below that altitude, the local telecommunication service provider
2. How much money has the government announced for the implementation of the Presidential Educational Reform Program? Five billion 6 million. - In the report submitted by the Ministry of Education, Science and Technology to Prime Minister KP Sharma Oli on Chait 19, 2077, it was announced that the Presidential Educational Reform Program would be implemented. According to the report, 4,250 community schools can get 650,000 to 1 crore rupees.
3. What is the purpose of the National Crime Information Center? Keeping integrated statistics of all crimes across the country - For the first time in Nepal, a National Crime Information Center will be established by the Nepal Police as part of a plan to systematize the records of crimes committed by all agencies. Such a center is going to be established under the Action and Crime Investigation Department. - It is believed that it will facilitate the exchange of information of persons involved in crime. - According to the police, integrated data will also be kept on people who have been sued by agencies such as the Revenue Investigation Department, the Asset Laundering Investigation Department, the Forest Office, the Commission for the Investigation of Abuse of Authority, and the Immigration Department. It is said that it will be easier for the investigating agency because the person being searched by one agency may be under investigation by another agency.
4. The cabinet meeting on Chait 20, 2077 will decide who will be appointed as the chairman of the advertisement board? Lakshman Humagari. 
5. When did the mining of iron from the iron mine discovered in Sigas of Baitadi start? Year 2077 Chait 8.
6. According to the report published by the World Bank on the economy of South Asia on Chait 18, 2077, what is the estimated economic growth rate of Nepal in the financial year 2077-078? 2.7 percent. - Revising its previous forecast, the World Bank said that the economic growth rate of Nepal will reach 2.7 percent in the year 2077-078. - Earlier in January, the bank predicted that the growth rate would be limited to only 2.1 percent. The bank mentioned that in the last fiscal year, the growth rate of Nepal has become negative by 1.9 percent.- According to the report, India's economic growth rate is expected to be the highest (10 percent) among the South Asian countries in the fiscal year 2021-22.- The overall growth rate of South Asia in 2020 is minus 5.4 Mentioning that, in 2021, the growth rate of this region is projected to be maintained at 7.2 percent.
7. National Planning Commission has approved how many industrial areas to proceed as multi-year projects? 3 (Kanchanpur's Daiji-Chhela, Banke's Naubasta and Makwanpur's Mayurdhap) - In the meeting of the Commission on Chait 9, 2077, it was also decided to request the consent of the Ministry of Finance to ensure the resources while giving approval to advance those industrial areas as a multi-year project. - These are also included in the project bank of the Industrial Area Commission. - The Commission has approved the development of these industrial areas as multi-year projects according to the norms related to multi-year contracts - 2077. It is mentioned in the criteria to be carried out as a project.
8. Which is the constitutional body that recommends the amount of financial transfer received by the state and local level? National Natural Resources and Finance Commission. 
9. According to the law, who is the coordinator of the judicial committee formed in the rural municipality for the purpose of resolving disputes within their jurisdiction? The vice president of the rural municipality (the deputy chief coordinator will be in the municipality.) 
10. According to the Global Terrorism Index-2020 published by the Institute for Economics and Peace, what is the position of Nepal? 27th. 
11. What was the name of Standard Chartered Bank Nepal Limited earlier? Nepal Grindledge Bank Limited. 
12. How many articles are there in the UNO charter? 111. 
13. Who was the king who started the practice of having Bhatta Pujari in Pashupati? Yaksha Malla.
14. Who was the king who introduced copper money? Ratna Malla. 
15. Velvet Revolution is associated with which country? Czechoslovakia (1989).- (Also, Orange Revolution: Ukraine, Lotus Revolution: Egypt, Bulldozer Revolution: Serbia, Pink Revolution: Kyrgyzstan) 
16. What is known as goldmine? Profitable industry. 
17. The headquarters of the Arab League is in Cairo, Egypt, and where is the headquarters of the Organization of African Unity (OAU)? Addis Awawa (Ethiopia).
18. When and from which country was Bitcoin started? January 2009, Japan.- Bitcoin is a kind of virtual currency, it is not a coin or a note.- It is also called online currency and cryptocurrency.- This immaterial currency based on open source software must be bought by paying real money.- Download the application from the Internet and mobile or Bitcoin is installed on the computer and kept in it.- It is used for online shopping, non-bank transactions and illegal transactions etc.
19. When was the water distribution program of the much awaited Melamchi Water Supply Project officially launched by President Bidya Devi Bhandari? Year 2077 Chait 20. - 6 days after distribution in Kathmandu, Melamchi drinking water was formally inaugurated by President Bidya Devi Bhandari by opening the water tap of Melamchi in the Dhungedhara of Bhrikutimandap. 
20. When was the referendum held in Greece regarding whether or not to take foreign loans? June 5, 2015.- Likewise, a referendum was held in the UK on June 23, 2016 on whether to remain in the EU or to leave.- A referendum was held on December 4, 2016 in Italy regarding constitutional reform. A referendum was held in Turkey on April 16, 2017 regarding the rights of the president.
21. Who is the discoverer of chlorine gas? Karl-Wilhelm Seeley (year 1774).- (This gas mixed with green and yellow color is used in the industrial sector and is also used to make poisonous gas weapons.) 
22. When was the inauguration of the Republic Memorial built in Narayanhiti Darbar Museum complex? May 15, 2076. 
23. How many years must be completed to obtain a national identity card? 16 years. 
24. When was the first meeting of the Intergovernmental Finance Council held? 24 May 2075. 
25. Which country uses the veto most often? Russia.- (U.S. is the second and UK is the third to use the veto.) 
26. When was the first election day celebrated in Nepal? February 7, 2074.
27. Where is the famous Gokarneshwar Mahadev temple located? Kathmandu. - (Gokarneshwar Mahadev Temple, also famous as Pitritirtha, is located about 10 kilometers north-east of Kathmandu on the banks of the Bagmati River.) 
28. Who publishes the list of endangered species? IUCN. 
29. When and in which country was scrub typhus first identified? 1930, Japan. - (This disease was identified in Nepal for the first time in 2004.) Presenter: Tank K.C. 
Financial transaction system
1. Briefly review the reporting system of government financial transactions. What should be done to make it effective? Give suggestions. The reporting system of government financial transactions is the method of presenting the work progress statement of government income and expenditure from the lower body to the higher body. In Nepal, laws such as Economic Procedures and Financial Responsibility Act-2076 and Regulations-2077, Intergovernmental Finance Management Act-2074, Public Procurement Act-2063 and Regulations-2064 have organized the reporting system of government financial transactions. According to which, monthly, quarterly, quarterly and yearly reports of financial transactions should be prepared and submitted to the taluk body through the computer system, and publicized through the office notice board and website. Monthly records and reports of financial transactions, There is a provision to publish the details of the internal audit on a quarterly basis and the final audit after the end of the financial year. The reporting system of government financial transactions is as follows: - Federation, state and local levels must audit the income and expenditure and publish the details within 15 days, - All three levels must annually review the budget implementation and publish the details, - Quarterly statement of income and expenditure and its presentation: The local level should submit this statement to the Ministry of Finance and the province, the province should submit this statement to the federal ministry of finance, if this statement is not submitted by the state and local level, the government of Nepal can withhold the grant, - integrated financial statement and its presentation: the statement of income and expenditure by the local level to the province To be submitted to the Office of the Controller of Accounts (Pralenica) and the Office of the Controller of Finance and Accounts (Colenica), - Mandatory arrangements for public hearings and public examination by local citizens on the progress of income and expenditure at the local level, - Finally, the reporting system of government financial transactions is a description of the progress of government income and expenditure, so it should be agile, accurate, frugal and transparent. For this, attention should be paid to hygiene, integrity and morality in financial transactions in compliance with prevailing laws.
2. According to the constitution of Nepal, the relationship between the federal, provincial and local levels is based on which principle? describe. Nepal has joined the federal state system and is governed by three levels of government namely the federal, provincial and local levels. The constitution of Nepal has made clear the arrangement of single rights and common rights to be done by all these three levels of government. All three levels of government are independent and autonomous in their field of work. There is a provision to formulate and implement laws in mutual coordination regarding common rights. Article 232 (1) of the Constitution of Nepal stipulates that the relationship between the federation, state and local level shall be based on the following principles: a. Co-operation:- Co-operation is working with mutual consent between the three levels of government. This is collaboration. There is a provision to act by mutual agreement on matters such as law-making, distribution of resources. b. Coexistence:- Out of the three levels of government, the government of one level is not subordinate to the government of the other level, all the governments are independent and autonomous, the government of one level absorbs the existence of the government of the other level and increases the relationship. c. Coordination: If there is any dispute or problem between the three levels of government, coordination is the task of solving the problem through mutual dialogue and understanding.
3. Discuss the importance of cultural heritage of Nepal. Cultural heritage is the property that can give the original identity of the country. Cultural assets are basically historical, religious and archeological, they are specific. Such heritages help the country to be recognized in the world. For example: Lumbini, Changunarayan, Pashupatinath, Patan Palace, Bhaktapur Palace, Swayambhunath etc. are cultural heritages that help to maintain the dignity of Nepal in the world. The importance of Nepal's cultural heritage can be discussed as follows: - Assistance in the country's distinct identity in the world, - Earning foreign currency by promoting tourism, - Assistance in job creation, - Instilling social values, - Religious identity and protection.
4. What role does the computer system play in making public service delivery effective? write A computer system is a technology that records, processes and obtains qualitative and numerical results of information and data. Computer system plays a big role in modernizing every work-action of public service delivery and making public service quality. The computer system plays the following role to make the public service delivery effective:- To provide public service quickly with quality, such as: past and present citizenship, land owner Lalpurja etc., in the past there was no technology like now, now there is service through the computer system, the quality is good and also fast. is - To maintain frugality in public service delivery, - To make the service provider responsible and accountable to the customer, - To keep records of the work done in a modern way,
5. Write about the social evil caused by witchcraft and dowry system in Nepal. Witchcraft and dowry are also common social evils in Nepal. Both of which are related to discrimination against women. They have brought various distortions in the Nepali society, which can be written as follows: - Social distortions caused by the practice of witches: - Inhumane activities such as cutting women's hair as witches, feeding them feces and urine, expelling them from the family and village, society, - Beating women in the name of curing witches from Dhamijankri. Doing things like heating iron on fire, piercing any part of the body, - Femicide in the society, increased violence. - Social distortions caused by dowry system - There was a difference in the marriage of rich and poor daughters, - Beating, torturing, killing the bride for not bringing much dowry. Incidents such as being forced to commit suicide have occurred.
6. Mention the provisions related to the rights of children in the Constitution of Nepal. In the Constitution of Nepal, the rights of children are provided as fundamental rights in Article 39, which can be mentioned as follows:- Every child has the right to be named and registered with his identity,- Every child is entitled to education, health, upbringing, proper care, sports, recreation and education from the family and the state. All-round personality development - Every child has the right to early childhood development and child participation - Every child has the right to child-friendly justice - Helpless, orphaned, disabled, conflict-affected, displaced and at-risk children have the right to receive special protection and facilities from the state ,- Children shall not be employed in factories, mines or other such hazardous work, child marriage, illegal trafficking and kidnapping and holding hostages, children shall not be employed in the military,
7. Write about the accounting system adopted by government agencies of Nepal and its strengths and weaknesses. The accounting system adopted for the systematic recording of income and expenditure of the government agencies of Nepal and its accurate reporting is the new Sresta system. This policy was implemented from 2019 onwards and was gradually implemented throughout Nepal until the financial year 2024-2025. In this accounting system applied at both the central level and operational level, accounts are kept in cash, it does not account for the remaining transactions. This accounting is based on double accounting system. The following are the strengths and weaknesses of this accounting system, where separate accounts are kept for allocation, revenue, bond, revenue and projects. - Strong side - Because it is based on double accounting, there is no error and fraud, if there is one, it can be easily detected, - It is simple because the account is kept in cash, - A certain form is prescribed to keep the account, - Budget control system, - Internal control system,
Since when was Nepal's national one-door system started to involve all agencies related to customs procedures to simplify international trade? Bikram Samvat 2077 Magh 13.- More than three dozen agencies of the government and private sector will be involved in this system, which aims to simplify the customs process by making it paperless. Traders will be able to submit their related documents online through the web portal that will be built under this system. The documents submitted in that way and the related details can also be obtained by the related agencies. Along with this, it is said that traders will be freed from the obligation to submit documents to different agencies. This system will also be helpful in making the data and reporting system related to international trade more standard and in developing the electronic payment system. There is still the situation of having to go separately. Nepal is going to implement the national one-door system so that all the work can be completed through digital system by removing the obligation to go to all these agencies with paper.
2. Famous painter/sculptor Pablo Picasso was born in which country? Spain. (Guernica is his famous painting. He started cubism in art.) 
3. Which commercial bank of Nepal received the Excellence in Employee Experience Award? Nabil Bank. Nabil Bank received the first award included under the HR Meet by Growth Cellar, a company that consults in human resources. The company said that the award was given because of its excellent working culture, service facilities and motivation.
4. Who was awarded the title of Mahamurkha by the Mithila Natyakala Parishad this year (2077)? Famous comedians Madankrishna Shrestha and Harivansh Acharya. (Every year on the eve of Holi festival, the Council has been holding Mahamurkha conference and awarding the title of Mahamurkha to those who have earned reputation in various fields of society.) 
5. Which animal has both male and female parts in the same animal? earthworm 
6. Chemotherapy/radium therapy is the method used in the treatment of cancer, which is the method used in the treatment of leprosy? Multidrug therapy. 
7. Which Veda is considered to be the origin of musicology? Samaveda.- There are 1824 mantras in Samaveda. - The main part of all Vedas is in it. It has three branches and 75 richas.- In this Veda, Agni and Indra deities are given primacy.
8. How many satellites did the Indian space launch set a record by launching simultaneously? 104.- ISA has launched 104 satellites including India, America, Israel, Netherlands, Switzerland, Kazakhstan and UAE. - Those satellites were launched on February 15, 2017. - Earlier in 2014, Russia launched 37 satellites at once. 
9. When was the Truth and Reconciliation Commission formed? Year 2071 Magh 27.
10. Ramhari Adhikari and Bhojraj Joshi are the people who opened the corn festival poll (year 1977) and who is the person who opened the library festival poll (year 1987)? Ramchandra Adhikari.- A person who opens the pole in other events?- Bhandarkhal festival (November 12, 1903): Vijayraj Pandit- 38 year festival (1938): Uttardhwaj Khawas.- Prachanda Gorkha festival (1988): Lakshmana Raj.- Praja Parishad scandal (Year 1993): Ramji Joshi and Muralidhar Pandit. 
11. Where is Yari Bhanjyang in Humla district and where is Namja Bhanjyang? mung bean 
12. What is the period from Aunsi to Purnima called? Shukla Paksha (The period from full moon to Aunsi is called Krishna Paksha. In Shukla Paksha, the bright part of the moon gradually increases, while in Krishna Paksha, the bright part of the moon gradually decreases.)
13. Where is the smallest red rose flower in the world? Near Raratal in Mugu district. 14. Who is the first graduate civil engineer of Nepal? Dillijung Thapa. Done.) 
15. When is World Poetry Day celebrated? March 21. 
16. Who is the author of the epic novel 'La Miserable'? French writer Victor Hugo.
17. When did Melamchi water supply project distribution start in Kathmandu Valley? 2077 Chait 15.- The water of the Melamchi drinking water project, built after twenty-two years, has been distributed for the first time in Kathmandu Valley.
18. Who is the author of two famous epics named Iliad and Odyssey? Homer (great poet and historian of Greek civilization). 
19. When is the National Day for Eradication of Caste Discrimination and Untouchability celebrated in Nepal? May 21. 
20. 'Deep unity for peace and prosperity' is the slogan of which SAARC summit? 18th. 
21. What is Sister Robert? Robert who helps patients infected with diseases (especially those in isolation) and helps to keep health workers safe from those patients.- It was built by Nepal Engineers Association in the activity of Bagmati Province. With the help of control, it can be reached to the patient. 
22. When was the National Project Bank launched? January 26, 2076.
23. When is World Tuberculosis Day celebrated? March 24. (In 2021, the slogan of this day is 'sign of the time, end of tuberculosis'). 
24. When did Nepali Congress leader and former minister Navindraraj Joshi pass away? Year 2077 Chait 13.25. What is the amount of matter in an object called? Mass. (The mass of an object is measured by physical scales. The mass of a cover made of platinum iridium metal kept in the International Weights and Measures Department is considered to be one kilogram.) 
26. Since when has the National Human Rights Commission been established as a constitutional body? January 1, 2063 (with the Interim Constitution of Nepal-2063). 
27. The famous Olko festival is popular in which place in Nepal? far west
28. Since when was Sripech viewing opened for public at Narayanhiti Durbar Museum? November 4, 2075. (With the inspection by Prime Minister KP Sharma Oli on October 29, 2075, viewing of Sripech was opened for the general public from November 4 under the new arrangement.) 
29. Which bird is found only in Nepal? Spiny Vulture. (A bird that can imitate all birds.) 
30. Where is the residence of the Netuwa tribe? Purification of Kapilvastu.- According to the national census of 2068, there are about 300 Netuva caste residents in Kapilvastu.- The people of this caste have been demanding the government to put them in the minority caste list. Presenter: Tank K.C.
 Internal Working Procedure: Question Paper Preparation and Answer Book Examination Public Service Commission is an independent and autonomous constitutional body. It collects demand for vacancies, advertises, collects applications, conducts investigations, conducts examinations, publishes results, conducts interviews, makes recommendations to select suitable employees required for civil service. The Public Service Commission performs these tasks in accordance with the Constitution of Nepal, Public Service Commission Act-2066, Public Service Commission Regulations-2067, Public Service Commission (Operation) Guidelines 2067 and the Code of Conduct for Public Service Commission Officers, Experts and Employees-2069. The latest constitution of Nepal has added responsibility to the Public Service Commission to conduct the written examination for filling the posts of security agencies and organized organizations/public institutions. According to this arrangement, Nepal Army, Nepal Police, Armed Police, The Public Service Commission has been conducting examinations in security agencies such as the National Investigation Department and public institutions such as Nepal Telecom, Electricity Authority, and Air Services Corporation. civil service, It has been continuously supplying the necessary manpower for security agencies and organized organizations/public institutions. It makes an annual schedule to organize its work and works accordingly. He has been bringing the information of his daily work to the public through the weekly bulletin that he publishes every Wednesday and the same information through Gorkhapatra every Wednesday. All the work done by the Public Service Commission is done in a very fair manner. Due to this, the attraction and trust of common people towards public service is increased. The preparation of question papers and the examination of answer sheets are among the activities performed by the public service. These works are carried out by the Public Service Commission in a highly confidential manner from the experts of the relevant subject. It can be expected that such work done by the Public Service Commission and the principles to be adopted will be a guide for the Provincial Public Service Commission as well. Public Service Commission does such internal
 Preparation of Question Papers There is a provision to prepare the question papers for the exams conducted by the Public Service by experts in the relevant subject. While preparing the question paper, usually five sets of questions of one subject have to be prepared by five experts. Public service asks objective questions and subject questions in the written exam. Objective questions include proper separation questions, matching questions, and fill-in-the-blank questions. Descriptive questions in which the candidates can express their original ideas in an explanatory manner, comparative questions in which the candidate has to present an answer by comparing two opinions, questions in which the candidate has to express his opinion in favor or against something and give reasons and proof, in response to the question, the candidate presents his personal opinion. Questions that should be given an opportunity to express independent opinions, To confirm an event and reality, there are questions that state cause and effect, short answer questions to test the candidate's understanding and ability to use, and problem solving questions. Public service has arranged the things that should be taken into consideration while preparing thematic questions. According to which, while constructing thematic questions, questions should be constructed to check the achievements of knowledge, comprehension, application, analysis, synthesis and evaluation levels according to the cognitive level, controversial, ambiguous and ambiguous questions should not be asked, the supplementary questions that come with the question should be completely related to each other, the candidate's creative talent, It should contain questions that can be answered within the prescribed time based on the syllabus and objectives of the specified service group for originality testing, questions should be constructed from all sections of the syllabus,
 There is a provision to revise the question paper by one or more experts as per the requirement. While revising the question paper, it should be included from all the texts and the candidates should be able to write the answers within the specified time. While revising the questions, attention should be paid to not putting controversial and ambiguous questions, not putting questions outside the syllabus, keeping questions that match the level of the relevant post, preparing questions so that questions do not repeat within one set of questions, and preparing three sets of questions for one subject. There is a provision to delete such questions if it is found inappropriate to use them while modifying the questions.
 STORAGE OF QUESTION PAPERS There is a question paper store in the Public Service Commission to store modified question papers. Under the supervision and control of the Secretary of the Commission, the concerned Division Chief is in charge of the Joint Secretary. The question papers in the question paper store can be modified from time to time and reused. 
 Selection and Printing of Question Papers One set of question papers to be used in the written examination is selected by the chairman of the commission from among the three sets of question papers of the same level of the same subject. There is a provision that the printing of the question papers selected by the chairman should be done by the staff appointed by the secretary at the central office of the commission and the head of the relevant office at the regional and zonal offices of the commission in the name of the representative of the central office of the commission. 
 After the selection and printing of the written exam question papers, the Public Service Commission conducts the written exam to select the candidates.
 Placing the first mark (code) in the answer book After the completion of the written examination, there is an arrangement to collect the answer books from all the examination centers and cross all the answer books from bottom to top and put the first code. The first code in the answer book is to be kept by the Joint Secretary of the concerned Division Head in the Central Office and in other offices by the Head of the concerned Office in the name of the representative of the Central Office of the Commission.
 Putting the second mark (code) in the answer book There is an arrangement to put the second code by the authorized staff appointed by the secretary of the Commission after crossing the answer book with the first code from bottom to top. There is a provision to use black ink when entering the first code in the answer book and red ink when entering the second code. The sealing of the first half of the code placed in the answer book is under the responsibility of the Secretary of the Commission or the staff appointed by him, and the sealing of the second code is under the responsibility of the Chairman of the Commission or the staff appointed by him.
 There is a provision to examine the answer sheets of the examination conducted by the Public Service Commission by an expert in the relevant subject. There is a provision to give a candidate 20 days to check the answer sheet and if the answer sheet is checked and sent within the specified time, 20 percent will be added to the salary. When sending the question paper, answer sheet form of the respective subject to the respective subject expert for checking the answer sheet, There is a provision to attach the conditions to be followed by the expert and the guidelines for gazetted posts and submit them confidentially. After checking the answer sheet, the examiner should send the marks obtained in the answer sheet form in numbers and letters. The Public Service Commission has arranged that the examiner should pay attention while examining the answer sheets of the subject questions. While examining the answer sheet of thematic questions, the examiner has to determine the level of the answer sheet in order to objectively test the answer sheet and test it according to the answer sheet examination base schedule. Answer book grading is as follows: inappropriate below 40%, average level 40% or above up to 45%, medium level from 45% to above 50%, high level from 50% to above 60%, very high level from 60% above.
 Answer Book Examination Basis The basis to be adopted while examining the subject answer book is (a) factual and logical expression of subject knowledge, (b) originality, (c) criticism and criticism, (d) presentation, (e) accuracy and cleanliness, its mark distribution is arranged with examples as follows :
In the subject paper, if it is seen that a candidate will get very high marks, the reason should be explained. If there are multiple questions in the same question, marks should be given according to the marking scheme for each separate question. The examiner should re-examine 10 percent of the answer sheets that scored high marks while examining the answer sheets. If a relative of the examinee has given the exam, the answer sheet must be returned in a sealed form without examination. While examining the subject answer sheet, factual and logical expression of subject knowledge, originality, criticism and critical power, presentation, It should be tested with attention to purity and cleanliness. While examining the answer sheet, the examination should be done according to the mark scheme provided by the Public Service. The points expected to be answered should be listed before the test and their weightage should be ensured. Determine in advance how many answer sheets are to be tested in one sitting and while testing the answer sheets, marks should be provided on the left edge of the entire answer sheet using red ink.
 There is a provision to keep the answer sheets which have been tested by the experts who have received the answer sheet and submitted to the commission. While receiving the answer book, it is necessary to pay attention to the points such as whether all the answers written by the candidate have been tested and given marks, whether all the marks given by the examiner have been correctly added. 
 The public service that examines the answer sheets, if deemed necessary, may conduct examination of all or some of the answer sheets received after examination by experts in the relevant subject. 
 Re-examination of the answer book If during the examination of the answer book it is found that the expert does not comply with the conditions to be followed, such answer book can be re-examined by the Public Service. However, after the publication of the results of the written examination, there is a provision that the Public Service will not re-examine the answer sheet.
 Publish the results of the written examination After examination of the answer sheets, verification and re-examination as per requirement, Public Service will publish the results of the written examination according to the alphabetical order of the candidates. 
 After the publication of the written exam results, a candidate can apply to the concerned office of the Public Service Commission within seven days from the date of publication of the results of the written exam to re-use any or all of the papers of his/her written exam by paying half of the exam fee specified in the written exam. If there is an application for reappropriation in this way, the Public Service Commission will reapply and inform the applicant of the result through a public notice. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
1. Who was given the Lifetime Award at the 10th NEFTA Film Awards held in Bikram Samvat February 2077? Pradeep Kumar Upadhyay (Sound Engineer) and Narayan Timilsina (Lighting Manager). 
2. Who is the first female journalist to successfully climb Mount Everest? Kalpana Maharjan (Lalitpur). 
(Kalpana succeeded in writing her name in the World Book of Records along with the introduction of the world's first female journalist climbing Mount Everest. She was awarded a certificate of world record by former President Dr. Ramvaran Yadav and Lalitpur Metropolitan Municipality Chief Chiribabu Maharjan on 4th Chait 2077.) 
3. When did the state visit to Bangladesh by President Bidya Devi Bhandari end? 2077 Chait 9 and 10. 
4. Who was appointed as the Attorney General of the Government of Nepal (2077 Chait 6)? Ramesh Badal.
5. Who is the successful politician who was elected as the first woman president in Tanzania? Samia Suluh Hassan (year 2021 March 
) Who is the Nepalese woman elected as a member of the United Nations Committee on the Elimination of Discrimination against Women (SID)? Vandana Rana (November 9, 2020).- Rana, who is currently the vice-chairman of the committee, was elected for the second time in the said committee.- Rana was elected for the term of 2021-2024. - This committee is under the United Nations High Commission on Human Rights. 
7. Africa is the second largest continent in terms of area and which is the third largest continent? North America.
8. Since when India's Visakhapatnam port has been officially opened for Nepal? Visakhapatnam port in India has been officially opened for Nepal since June 10, 2073. Even though it was officially opened on June 10, it is said that it will take some time to regularize it. Visakhapatnam port is the second Indian port for Nepal. Earlier, Kolkata- Haldia port is being used by Nepal. Although Visakhapatnam is far from Kolkata in terms of distance, business people say that this port in South India is convenient.) 
9. What is Kuwer's garden called? Chaitrarath. 
10. Which language is also called Tajpuri language? Dynasty. 
11. Budhanilkanth is located at the foot of which hill? Shivpuri.
12. Instead of the king's photo and Sripech printed on Nepali notes in the past, what is being printed now? Everest. 13. East Rapti River originating from Makwanpur merges into which river? Narayani. 14. Which is the highest peak of Mahabharata mountain? Salong (Dolakha). 
15. What type of climate is found in Terai, Bhawar, Dun, Inner Madhes Tar etc. of Nepal? Hot monsoon climate. 
16. What is the other name of the second phase of the Russian Revolution? Bolshevik Revolution - October Revolution. 
17. If the people of the Netherlands are called Dutch, what are the people of Switzerland called? swiss 
18. Who is the king who started the practice of worshiping the girls of Shakya dynasty as virgins? Gunakam Dev. 
19. Who is the king who reigned for the longest time in Shah dynasty history? King Tribhuvan.
20. Rajmata Vasantavati made a treaty by flowing a stream of milk on the bank of which river? Chependi. 
21. Which civilization is known as Vedic civilization? Aryan civilization. 
22. Who is the thinker who said, "If you listen to a badass person, remember that badasi started from here"? Confucius. 
23. What is the language spoken by the Chepang people? Khamchi 
24. What was Janakpur, the beginning of civilization in the eastern part of Nepal, known as in ancient times? Videh 
25. When did FM radio service start in Nepal? Year 2052. 
26. Which is the largest country in the continent of Africa? Algeria. (Previously it was Sudan.) 
27. A female pig is called a sow and what is a male pig called? Bucho
28. Famous sportsman Muhammad Ali is associated with which sport? Boxing. (Ali, who was able to identify the greatest boxing player in the world, died on June 4, 2016 at the age of 74.) 
29. If Ganga-Jamuna Kund is in Dhading district, where is Gosainkund? Rasuwa 
Presenter: Tank K.C. 
Importance of political divisions
1. Briefly discuss the significance of the current political division of Nepal. Political division is the act of dividing the territory of the country into different administrative units. The Constitution of Nepal has transformed Nepal into a federal state and created a three-tiered structure of federal, provincial and local levels. The country has been divided into 7 provinces and districts have been arranged accordingly. In Nepal, there is a federal government, 7 provincial governments, 77 district coordination committees and 753 local levels. There is a system of federal government at the center, provincial government at the state level and local government at the local level. The importance of the current political division of Nepal can be discussed as follows:- To bring the people's rights and resources to the people's homes and to adopt a decentralized and participatory governance system to transform the country economically and socially,- To simplify the administrative complexity and provide effective public services at the local level.
2. Write the types of climate found in Nepal. There are five types of climate in Nepal, which are as follows: á a) Subtropical Monsoon Climate:- This climate is found in Terai, Bhawar, Doon, Inner Madhes, Tar etc. at an altitude of about 1200 meters above sea level. b) Warm temperate climate:- This climate is found at an altitude of 1200 meters to 2100 meters above sea level in the upper part of Chure mountain in the Mahabharata area. d) Lekali Climate:- This climate is found below the snow line and in the inner Himalayas above 3300 meters and below 5000 meters. e) Himalayan Climate:- This climate is covered with snow throughout the year and is found above 5000 meters.
3. What are the work, duties and rights of Industry and Investment Promotion Board? Mention. The Industrial Business Act, 2076 established the Industry and Investment Promotion Board with the participation of the private sector under the chairmanship of the Minister of Industry, Commerce and Supply or the Minister of State to make necessary policy decisions with facilitation and coordination with the aim of accelerating the speed of industrialization by promoting, establishing, increasing investment, protecting and expanding industries in Nepal. Work, duties and rights have been arranged, which can be mentioned as follows: - Formulating policies related to industrial promotion, investment protection, growth and industrialization and making recommendations to the Government of Nepal to make policy decisions, - Policy, legal, institutional and procedural structure related to the overall industrialization of the country. And to regularly review the working system and recommend to the Government of Nepal for necessary improvements in it, To carry out the necessary actions to build a competitive industrial environment in coordinated and harmonious cooperation, - To provide policy guidance on matters that need to be coordinated between the provincial and local levels for the development and expansion of industrial business, and to arrange the necessary arrangements for coordination, - In case of any obstacles, deadlocks or ambiguities in the implementation of laws related to industry. To facilitate for its solution, - to coordinate or facilitate the operation of single point service center, - to perform other tasks as specified. 4. What are the problems of infrastructure development in Nepal? write All aspects of transportation, including road, air, rail, water, electricity, communication, information technology, urban and rural development, housing and settlement development, building, science and technology, reconstruction and other aspects are infrastructure development. These aspects of infrastructure development in Nepal are weak. It has various problems,
5. What should be the role of the service provider to make the service delivery effective at the local level? Mention. Nepal's constitution defines village councils, municipalities and district assemblies as local levels. The local level is the closest government elected by the people to provide services to the local people. Who has to do almost all the work of a person from birth to death. Basic and secondary education, basic health, drinking water, sanitation, local roads, irrigation, local level development projects, agriculture, animal husbandry, small hydroelectricity etc. are carried out by the local level. - The role of the service provider working in the local government with such responsibility should be multifaceted. Which can be mentioned as follows: - Acting as a representative of the local government and bringing service facilities to the doorsteps of the people in an easy, accessible and simple way, - Maintaining fairness and transparency in service delivery, Mention the reasons why corruption is increasing. Corruption is the misuse of public resources, assets, rights and opportunities for personal gain. Constitutional, legal and institutional arrangements have been made to reduce corruption in Nepal and corruption is also found to be increasing. The increase in corruption is due to individual's personal greed, greed and lack of love for the nation. The country's economic, social, political, administrative environment plays an important role in this. Social and family conditions also affect it. Even when technology is poorly used, corruption is rampant. In this way, various reasons are responsible for the increase in corruption, which can be mentioned as follows: - Increasing political instability, - Lack of strong will in the leadership at the highest level,
7. Forest Act, 2076 has made what kind of arrangement regarding Nepal's national forest management and utilization? Mention. The Forest Act, 2076 has emphasized on the development, protection and utilization of forests by managing the forests in the following manner in relation to the management and utilization of the national forests of Nepal:-á 1. National Forest - The National Forest has been arranged as follows:-- a. Government managed forests, – b. Forest protection area, - c. Community forest, - d. Partnership forest, - e. Confession Forest – Ch. Religious forest,á 2. Private forest á 3. Public forest, á 4. urban forest,
8. What are the problems seen in relation to the filling of posts in the civil service of Nepal? write Vacant positions in the civil service are filled by hiring new employees and promoting old employees. There are two types of recruitment, internal and external recruitment.- Legal and institutional arrangements have been made to organize recruitment in Nepal's civil service. Civil Service Act, 2049 and Rules, 2050 are applicable. Ministry of Federal Affairs and General Administration, ministries related to service groups, Public Service Commission are active in this and still the job filling in the civil service of Nepal has not been problem-free, the problems seen in the job filling can be mentioned as follows: Lack of effectiveness in the operation of service groups at the state and local levels, - total number of posts at the union, state and local levels,
1. When was the decision taken by the Election Commission to cancel the merger between CPN-UML and Maoist Center? V.No. February 25, 2077 - The meeting held on February 25 regarding the implementation of the Supreme Court's decision on February 23, 2077 decided to cancel the party unification of the CPN. - With the cancellation of the CPN formed from unification, the Commission informed UML President KP Oli and Maoist Center President Pushpa Kamal Dahal Prachanda that the former party was still in existence.
2. When did Nepal make an agreement on reducing carbon emissions while protecting forests? V.No. February 2077 - Nepal has implemented carbon reduction program while protecting forests. - Nepal is the fifth country in the Pacific Asia region to benefit from the carbon agreement. Nepal is the 12th country in the world.- When the industrialized countries of the world emit more carbon, the countries that emit less and do not emit have to suffer the loss of pollution equally. In order to reduce that imbalance, the concept has been developed that industrialized countries should pay compensation or reward money to countries like Nepal that emit less carbon and contribute to forest and environment protection. Accordingly, Nepal will receive more than five billion rupees through the World Bank.
3. When was Nepal selected as a member of the Commission on Narcotic Drugs under the United Nations Economic and Social Council? May 7, 2019 (Nepal was elected for the first time) - Nepal was elected to the committee for the period from 2020 to 2023. - Along with Nepal, China, Japan, Thailand, Bahrain, Kazakhstan, Turkmenistan and Pakistan were selected from the Asia Pacific region as members of the delegation. - Applied The drug treaty was signed by Nepal in 2003 and ratified in 2011. - Currently, 186 countries have joined this treaty. 
4. When is International Forest Day celebrated? March 21- (The United Nations decided to celebrate this day on March 21 every year on December 21, 2012.) 
5. Sour honey is found in which country? Brazil
6. According to the World Digital Competitiveness Index 2020, which are the successful countries in the first five positions? America, Singapore, Denmark, Sweden and Hong Kong respectively 
7. What is the Boston Tea Party related to? American War of Independence 
8. Which province is spread only in Terai province? State no. 2
9. Who is the inventor of audio cassette? Low Ottens (Dutch engineer) - Due to his invention, there was a major change in the lifestyle of the world's music listeners. - However, over time, even the era of the CD ended and the music on pen drives could be easily carried around, so the trend of the cassette wheel slowed down. 10. Which is the most backward district in the local level? Bajhang - The number of municipalities in the backward area is 8 and the number of rural municipalities is 49.- The government included 57 different local levels in the backward area on 25th of 2074 Ashwin. 
11. Who is known as the father of history? Herodotus (ancient Greek philosopher) 
12. When did the Italian explorer Christopher Columbus find the way to America from Europe? Year 1492
13. Which ruler of the world is also known as war time prime minister? Sir Winston Churchill (British Prime Minister) 
14. Where is the head office of the World Bank located? Washington DC (USA) 
15. When did the publication of Gorkhapatra start? V.No. 1958 Baisakh 24- Its publication started from the time of the then Rana Prime Minister Devshamsher.- In the beginning Gorkhapatra was published weekly. On May 13, 1984, the photo was printed for the first time in Gorkhapatra. It started to be published 3 times a week from Paush 8, 2003. It started to be published daily from February 7, 2017. - V. No. Publication of Saturday supplements started from June 2019. - V.No. From June 1, 2059 Gorkhapatra has been printed in color. It started to be published in multilingual form from Ashwin 1, 2064.
16. Which mountain is known as the roof of Africa? Kilimanjaro - This mountain located in Tanzania on the African continent is also an attractive tourist destination there. - It is the highest mountain in Africa. - Climbing this mountain does not require special preparation and special equipment, but you may experience "altitude sickness" due to the height. . 
17. Where will the first female entrepreneur green industrial village be established? Panchkhal (Kavre) 
18. What is 'Lolufera Abhiyan' related to? Walking 
19. Where has the education of Kusunda language been formally started for the first time in Nepal? Lamhi (Dang) 
20. In which place of Nepal has it been decided to establish 'Himchituwa Research Center'? Kanchenjunga Conservation Area in Taplejung
21. Since when was Taekwondo officially included in the Olympics? 
22 since the 2000 Sydney Olympics . Which is the first Asian country to be declared land mine free? Nepal 
23. How long is there a plan to make Nepal a zero hunger country? Year 2025 
24. According to the latest forest resource survey, how much forest has been destroyed in Terai every year? 0.44 percent - Similarly, forests are being destroyed at a rate of 0.18 percent every year in Chure area.- According to Forest Resources Survey 2016, the area covered by forests in Nepal is 44.74 percent. - The average number of trees per hectare in Nepal is 430. - According to the Forest Resources Survey of 1990, the forest area in Nepal is 39.6 percent.
25. Who is the planner of Gaganpur (proposed) space settlement? Sushant Khadka 
26. Global Positioning System (GPS) was started from which country? America - This technology was first used in 1973 in the US Department of Defense. This technology has been in use since 1995 with full capacity.- Badford Parkinson, Roger L. Aston and Evan A. Getting contributed to the development of this technology, which can be obtained from pictures taken from the sky.- This is a space-based satellite navigation system. 
27. What is the full form of BMQ used in the field of information technology? Bkthmmbhatchasha mnshtab kigdakchashdbhach yishlabh 
28. Which is the oldest service of information and communication? Postal Service
29. When and where was the establishment of 'Nepal Eye Bank'? 1994, Tilganga (Kathmandu) - It was established with the aim of providing facilities for transplanting eyeballs. - This bank was established with the technical support and assistance of the International Association of Eye Banks, Baltimore (USA). The thin membrane i.e. cornea will be kept safely in this bank and transplanted to another person. 
30. What is the program called Rawalpindi Resolution related to? Abolition of Child Labor Presenter: Tank K.C. 
Areas of Inclusion
1. What are the areas of inclusion? Discuss briefly. Inclusion is the act of making everyone's identity, representation and easy access to the state system. Its main field is politics. Inclusion can be done in the political party's party positions, elected positions and ministerial positions. Apart from these, other areas of inclusion are as follows: Administrative sector:- Inclusion in administrative posts can be done for a certain period of time. This can be done by arranging reservation, positive discrimination etc. This is the current arrangement in Nepal. b. Economic sector: Inclusion can be done by arranging tax exemptions, credit facilities, fair distribution of land, social security etc. c. Social sector:- Inclusion can be achieved by ending social security, employment, social discrimination and violence. d. Educational Sector:- Inclusion can be increased through provision of free education, distribution of clothes and books etc.
2. Unequal distribution of land is the obstacle to the proper development of agriculture. Confirm. Appropriate distribution of available arable land is necessary for increasing agricultural productivity. For this, a democratic and fair land distribution system is necessary. Real farmers do not have land and non-farmers have unlimited land as an important obstacle to the proper development of the agricultural sector. Currently, there is a similar situation in Nepal. 20% of the people own 80% of the land, similarly 80% of the people own 20% of the land, 23 percent of farmers are landless. The national agricultural production has decreased significantly due to the fact that a large part of the land occupied by non-farmers has become barren. In addition to this, due to the lack of alternative income-earning opportunities, there has been excessive fragmentation of land along with shareholdings. Due to this, it becomes difficult to do farming and the land is wasted in Sandh-Killa. Therefore, scientific and fair land distribution is necessary for the proper development of agriculture.
3. What is environmental pollution? How many types is it? Briefly discuss. Environmental pollution is the process of directly and indirectly changing the interactions and interrelationships between all the biological and inorganic components in the environment, causing damage to the environment, causing damage to the beneficial and useful purposes of the environment, is called environmental pollution. Conducting human activities without considering the environmental aspects, emphasis on development rather than environmental protection, and not emphasizing on protecting the environmental balance are the main causes of environmental imbalance or pollution. Environmental pollution is the state of imbalance between various components in the environment. Types of environmental pollution a. Air pollution: - Carbon dioxide, chlorofluorocarbons, nitrogen oxides generated from various means of transport, industries, factories etc. Sulfur dioxide, carbon monoxide etc. gas mixed in the air is pollution. b. Water pollution:- Water pollution is the pollution of rivers, lakes, ponds, seas, etc. due to sewage, industrial chemicals, floods, acid rain, etc. c. Noise pollution: - Pollution caused by the sound emitted by factories, motor vehicles, airplanes, artillery, bomb blasts etc. is noise pollution. d. Land Pollution: Land pollution is the pollution caused by floods, landslides, nuclear use, use of pesticides and chemical fertilizers etc. e. Food pollution:- The use of different drugs in food, adulteration of food, contamination caused by old rotten and low quality food is food pollution. Radiation - Radioactive) Pollution: - Pollution caused by the production of radioactive goods, nuclear testing, destruction of the ozone layer, etc. is radiation pollution. is. Industrial pollution: - Smoke from various industries, Pollution caused by garbage etc. is industrial pollution. Therefore, land, water, air pollution will cause many problems.
4. Why has poverty not been reduced relatively in Nepal? Give a short reason. Due to the following reasons, poverty has not been reduced relatively in Nepal: - Inability to modernize and commercialize the agricultural system to the required extent, - Inability to develop and expand industries, factories, - Ineffective implementation of the targeted programs of the economic plan, - Education, health, transportation, communication, Not being able to build development infrastructure such as electricity, - During the conflict, industry and development infrastructure were damaged, political instability, unrest, insecurity, etc. did not create an investment-friendly environment.
5. What kind of development policies are there in Nepal's constitution? Mention. Article 51 (f) of the Constitution of Nepal has the following policies related to development: - Formulating strategies and programs for sustainable social and economic development under the regional development plan for inclusive economic development with regional balance and implementing them in a coordinated manner, - Giving priority to backward areas in terms of development, balanced, environmentally friendly , to develop physical infrastructure in a quality and sustainable manner, - to increase local people's participation in the process of development, - to increase investment in scientific studies, research and innovation, upgrading and development of science and technology and to protect scientific, technical, intellectual and special talents, - according to national needs Developing and expanding information technology to ensure easy and simple access to it by the general public,
6. Mention the administrative inter-relationship between federal, state and local levels in Nepal. In Nepal, the administrative relationship between the federal, provincial and local levels is as follows: - Development and expansion of harmonious and cooperative relations by sharing responsibility, resources, means and administration between the federal unit, Article 51 (b) (6) - Federal civil servant from the civil service position of a province. To consult the Public Service Commission regarding the suitability of a candidate for a service post or from a federal civil service post to a state civil service post, Article 243 - The formation, functions, duties and powers of the State Public Service Commission shall be in accordance with the laws of the state. Determining, Article 244- Union, state and local levels can establish and operate government services according to law, Article 285, according to this provision, the union shall administer the federal civil service, the state shall administer the state civil service,
7. What are the ways to manage information technology friendly office? write Information technology-friendly office management is to make the office completely paperless by using electronic devices such as the Internet, computers, printers, etc. in the office. Since the area of ​​usefulness of information technology is multi-faceted, it can be used based on the nature of the work and scope of the office. It organizes the information of people, goods, land, buildings, vehicles etc. by performing input, process and output functions. Therefore, by using it in this way, the office can be managed as an IT-friendly office. By adopting the following measures, the office can be managed as an IT-friendly office: - By creating an office website, - By making regular arrangements for electricity supply, - By providing services by making full use of computer systems, by using CCTV, - by using electronic tools such as telephone, fax, scanner, mobile, radio, television, etc., - by providing online services through the Internet, by providing net to net services instead of face to face, - By using social media such as Facebook, Twitter, Skype, Viber, Instagram, IMO, - By arranging IT-friendly skilled staff, - By ensuring complete security and privacy of IT, - The present age is the era of IT. Since it can be used in the entire world from the individual's personal life to the household, office, society, and nation, today the information network has expanded and developed in this way. Therefore, the office can be modernized by maintaining quality, speed and discipline in the work by making full use of the methods mentioned in the office. By using CCTV, - by using electronic tools such as telephone, fax, scanner, mobile, radio, television, etc., - by providing online service through the Internet, by providing net to net service instead of face to face, - Facebook, Twitter, Skype, Viber, Instagram, By using social networks like IMO, - by arranging information technology-friendly skilled staff, - by ensuring complete security and privacy of information technology, - the current era is the age of information technology. Since it can be used in the entire world from the individual's personal life to the household, office, society, and nation, today the information network has expanded and developed in this way. Therefore, the office can be modernized by maintaining quality, speed and discipline in the work by making full use of the methods mentioned in the office. By using CCTV, - by using electronic tools such as telephone, fax, scanner, mobile, radio, television, etc., - by providing online service through the Internet, by providing net to net service instead of face to face, - Facebook, Twitter, Skype, Viber, Instagram, By using social networks like IMO, - by arranging information technology-friendly skilled staff, - by ensuring complete security and privacy of information technology, - the current era is the age of information technology. Since it can be used in the entire world from the individual's personal life to the household, office, society, and nation, today the information network has expanded and developed in this way. Therefore, the office can be modernized by maintaining quality, speed and discipline in the work by making full use of the methods mentioned in the office. - By providing online services through the Internet, by providing net to net services instead of face to face, - by using social networks such as Facebook, Twitter, Skype, Viber, Instagram, IMO, - by arranging information technology-friendly skilled staff, - complete security and privacy of information technology By making sure,- the present age is the age of information technology. Since it can be used in the entire world from the individual's personal life to the household, office, society, and nation, today the information network has expanded and developed in this way. Therefore, the office can be modernized by maintaining quality, speed and discipline in the work by making full use of the methods mentioned in the office. - By providing online services through the Internet, by providing net to net services instead of face to face, - by using social networks such as Facebook, Twitter, Skype, Viber, Instagram, IMO, - by arranging information technology-friendly skilled staff, - complete security and privacy of information technology By making sure,- the present age is the age of information technology. Since it can be used in the entire world from the individual's personal life to the household, office, society, and nation, today the information network has expanded and developed in this way. Therefore, the office can be modernized by maintaining quality, speed and discipline in the work by making full use of the methods mentioned in the office. - By ensuring complete security and privacy of information technology, - The present age is the age of information technology. Since it can be used in the entire world from the individual's personal life to the household, office, society, and nation, today the information network has expanded and developed in this way. Therefore, the office can be modernized by maintaining quality, speed and discipline in the work by making full use of the methods mentioned in the office. - By ensuring complete security and privacy of information technology, - The present age is the age of information technology. Since it can be used in the entire world from the individual's personal life to the household, office, society, and nation, today the information network has expanded and developed in this way. Therefore, the office can be modernized by maintaining quality, speed and discipline in the work by making full use of the methods mentioned in the office.
8. What is Value Added Tax? Mention its characteristics. The tax levied on the increase in the price of goods and services is called value added tax. This is a tax levied on the difference between the purchase price and the sale price of goods and services. It is an improved form of sales tax. In Nepal, this tax is considered as the main source of revenue. This tax is applicable in Nepal from 1st November 2054. Since the year 2069, November 1 has been celebrated as the National Tax Day since the date of implementation of Value Added Tax. Currently, the value added tax rate is 13 percent. Value Added Tax Act-2052 and Value Added Tax Regulations-2053 have been implemented to manage this tax in Nepal. Features of value added tax - Value added tax is based on self-assessment system. According to which the taxpayer shall keep his own records of his business, determine his own tax, collect his own tax, They do the same thing as self-filing tax returns at the tax office. It has guaranteed economic democracy to taxpayers. This is its main feature. Its other features are as follows: - Tax on goods and services, - Broad scope, tax to prevent tax leakage, - Tax deduction and tax refund system, - Accounting based tax, - Indirect tax, tax to prevent inflation, modern tax.
9. What are the arrangements for personal incident registration in Nepal? write Registering personal events such as birth, death, migration, marriage, divorce, etc. of a citizen and issuing a certificate is the registration of personal events. It is also the work of preparing family income. It provides information about the real situation of the population and helps in the formulation of economic and social policies. In Nepal, there are the following arrangements in this regard: - Birth, Death and Other Personal Events (Registration) Act - 2033 and Regulations - 2034 were issued, - National Identity Card Arrangement and Registration Department was established under the Ministry of Home Affairs, - There is a local registrar in each ward of rural municipality and municipality. ,- The provision of reporting to the office of the local registrar in the prescribed form within 35 days of the occurrence of the incident,- The provision of giving a certificate of personal incident registration, - Arrangements to register the following events under the personal event registration: birth, death, marriage, divorce and migration. 10. What is communication in the office? Write its meaning. The act of exchanging information between one office and another office is called office communication. It is a process by which one person, group or office understands another person, group or office, and gets to know their thoughts, opinions, and values. The sender, receiver, information, media are involved in communication. Communication is a continuous process. Principles of Communication a. Sender – The person who sends the content and information to the recipient is the sender. b. Recipient - The recipient is the person who receives the content and information sent by the sender. c. Content and Information – Content and information are the details sent by the sender to communicate to the receiver. d. Medium - The medium is the medium used by the sender to send content and information to the receiver. For example: If there is a conversation between two parties by telephone, the telephone is the medium. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
1. The United Nations Committee on Development Policy (CDP) has given Nepal how much time to prepare and recommended for promotion in developing countries? 5 years (year 2026).- The United Nations Development Policy Committee (CDP) has recommended Nepal for upgrading to a developing country. Nepal is now going to be upgraded from a very less developed country to a developing country. However, the time for that has moved somewhat. Nepal has got a concessional time of five years.- During the quarterly review of the CDP which lasted from February 22 to 26, 2021, it was found that Nepal is fulfilling the criteria for upgrading from a less developed country to a developing country, so it was clarified that this recommendation was given for five years for preparation.- Developing from an underdeveloped country United Nations income to upgrade the country, Although three criteria related to economic risk and human assets have been set and the indicators have to be met, there is a provision that the level can be upgraded if only two criteria are met. Nepal was eligible for upgrading from underdeveloped country to developing country in 2015 due to maintaining the minimum score (threshold) specified in the economic risk and human assets index, but such upgrading was postponed at Nepal's request. Even now, Nepal has not met the minimum limit (score) in per capita income, an important indicator of upgrading. According to the latest human development index, the per capita income should be 1,230 US dollars (annually) for upgradation. Since the total national income per capita of Nepal is only 1,027 US dollars, the responsibility and challenge of increasing it to the minimum point is in front of Nepal. Time to prepare for the year There is a provision to get. Nepal has to meet all the three criteria for upgrading by 2024, but due to the global abnormal situation caused by the Covid-19, Nepal has been given the facility to extend these indicators by two years until 2026 according to the special request made by Nepal. There is also a challenge.
3. Who is the Nepalese girl who received the International Courageous Women Award given by the American government? Muskaan Khatun.- Khatun, who was attacked by Tejav, started a campaign to end the Tejav attack. He was given this honor by highly evaluating the same work. Faced with threats and social pressure, Muskan has been campaigning for stricter laws and punishments against Tejav attacks. 
3. When was the foundation stone of Motipur industrial area in Butwal? February 21, 2077. 
4. When was the verdict of three years imprisonment for the former president of France Nicolas Sarkozy accused of trying to bribe a judge? March 1, 2021.- (Sarkozy is the second president in the history of France to go to prison for corruption. Earlier, Marcel Philippe was also sent to prison by the court.)
5. What is the slogan of the 111th International Women's Day celebrated on March 8, 2021? Women in Leadership: Achieving an Equal Future in a Covid-19 World.- (National Slogan: Women's Safety, Respect and Employment: The Foundation of a Prosperous Nepal) 
6. Since when was the social health security (health insurance) program started by the government of Nepal? Year 2072 Chait 25.- (This program was conducted with the aim of providing easy access to treatment for the general public by managing the burden of health care expenses in advance.) 
7. When was the first infrastructure conference organized in Nepal? November 25-26, 2071, Kathmandu.
8. When did the national campaign for farmer registration in Nepal start? February 22, 2077. - The campaign was launched by launching the farmer inventory management system prepared by the Ministry of Agriculture and Livestock Development. - It is believed that real farmers will get the services and facilities available from the government after the listing campaign. - Farmer listing management system program was conducted with the support of European Union
9. Who was awarded the National Arani Award-2077? Artists Shankarnath Rimal and Santkumar Shakya (Prize amount: 1 lakh).- Nepal Fine Arts Pragya Pratishthan has given National Fine Arts Award in seven different categories, Milan Sherchan (Handicrafts), Suresh Lovet (Traditional Sculpture), Bhushan Duwal (Modern Sculpture), Ganesh Joshi (modern painting), Krishnaram Ghemesu (traditional painting), Lakshman Mandal (folk art) and Pramila Lama (architecture and other creative arts). The amount of the award is 60 thousand rupees. Similarly, the artist Keshav Khanal was given the Fine Arts National Journalism Award-2077 and Lay Mainali was awarded the Fine Arts National Writing Award-2077. 
10. What is Euro-3 related to? Driving standards. 
11. What is Inwar related to? Bamboo and cane.
12. When was the establishment of Amnesty International? Year 1961. - This organization was established with the aim of helping those imprisoned due to ideological beliefs and political and religious differences. This organization, also known as Kshamadan Sanghatan, was established by the activism of British jurist Peter Venison. Its head office is located in London, UK. 
13. Who is the first Nepali to be declared a CNN hero? Anuradha Koirala (second Nepali: Pushpa Basnet).
14. When was the three-point peace agreement signed between the government of Nepal and the Communist Party of Nepal led by Netra Vikram Chand (Biplav)? February 21, 2077.- (In the presence of Prime Minister KP Sharma Oli and CPN General Secretary Biplav, a three-point agreement was signed on February 21 by Home Minister and head of government negotiation team Ram Bahadur Thapa 'Badal' and CPN spokesperson and head of negotiation team Khadga Bahadur Bishwakarma 'Prakand'. Government and Biplav group A three-point agreement was reached between the negotiating team on 20th.The cabinet meeting held on 20th of February passed the agreement and decided to lift the ban imposed on Biplava group.)15. What is blood money? The exchange of money for the benefit of both parties by the side of the person who has been sentenced to death by giving compensation to the victim and saving the accused side.
16. What is the resolution passed by the United Nations Human Rights Commission regarding technical assistance and consultancy services related to Nepal known as? Item 19. 
17. A respiratory disease called MERS appeared in which country in 2015? South Korea. 
18. Which is the first mountain of Nepal opened for mountaineering? Annapurna.
The Central Statistics Department has changed the base year of gross domestic product (GDP) calculation and established the new base year? The year 2010-11.- The base year of the current national accounting statistics was replaced by the year 2000-01 and a new base year was established. - The size of the country's economy has increased after the new base year. According to the department, the size of the economy was 37 trillion 67 billion in 2000/01 compared to the base year. Considering the new base year 2010-11, the size of the economy has increased to 39 trillion 43 billion 700 million rupees. - According to the department, the new base year has been changed according to international standards and principles in the economy. Like other countries, Nepal also changed the base year in 10 years. - Some developed countries have been changing the base year in three to five years. This is the fifth base year in the history of Nepal. - National Planning Commission in the program organized by the department on February 20, 2077 Vice President Prof. Dr. Pushparaj Kandel said that the base rate and last year's revised GDP have been presented. Presenter: Tank Casey
Work performed by the department under the Ministry of Finance 1. Briefly write about the work done by the department under the Ministry of Finance. The Ministry of Finance is the central agency of the country's revenue and budget administration, which prepares the country's budget, formulates the revenue policy, implements it, and controls the economy. This Ministry, which takes the approach of increasing the capacity of the overall economy by achieving sustainable, broad and high economic growth through strong financial and economic management, currently includes the Comptroller General's Office and the Public Debt Management Office as central offices. Internal Revenue Department, Customs Department and Public Finance Management Training Center are as departments. The work done by these bodies can be mentioned as follows: a. Tasks to be performed by the Office of the Comptroller General of Accounts: - To prepare and report the central account of income and expenditure of the Union, State and local levels. - Preparing central statement by collecting the details of the outstanding amount of payment, - Designing, implementing and supervising the accounting system, - Conducting internal audit, - Keeping records, auditing, reporting and reporting, - Operating the accounting group, b. Tasks to be performed by the Public Debt Management Office: - Projecting the need for public debt that can be raised every year and submitting suggestions to the Ministry of Finance, - Preparing short-term, mid-term and long-term policy proposals related to public debt management and submitting them to the Ministry of Finance, - State and local level public debt limits and Giving suggestions regarding operational areas, - Paying principal, interest and other charges of foreign loans according to the foreign loan agreement, reconciling accounts, - Working on share and loan investment on behalf of the Government of Nepal. - Projecting a three-year budget for internal and external debt payments and submitting it to the Ministry of Finance and the National Planning Commission, c. Tasks performed by the Internal Revenue Department: - Collecting value added tax, income tax and excise revenue, monitoring revenue collection, - reviewing tax assessment details, - supervising the tax office, - assisting in formulating tax policy, implementing declared tax policy, - To assist in formulating and revising tax related laws and regulations, - to provide services to taxpayers, - to ensure taxpayer-friendly tax administration by making tax administration systematic and transparent, d. Tasks performed by the Customs Department:- Collecting customs revenue,- Facilitating trade by making customs administration systematic and transparent,- Controlling unauthorized trade,- Assisting in maintaining social security,- Assisting the Ministry of Finance in formulating customs tariff policy, e.
2. Introduce the Terai region of Nepal and briefly discuss its contribution to the country's economic development. The plain land extending east-west from the hilly part of Nepal to the border of India in the south is called Terai Province. It is also called Madhes. Its width is from 25 km to 30 km. It is at a height of 60 to 600 meters above sea level. Siran of Terai is Bhavar and Chure. Going from north to south is a characteristic of Terai. This region is a tropical region. The land here is mostly flat. The Terai region can be divided into three categories namely Terai, Bhawar region and Inner Madhes. - Terai Province's contribution to economic development - very suitable places from a tourist point of view, support in tourism promotion, such as: Chitwan National Park, Bardia National Park, etc. , Ramjanaki Mandir etc., - Transportation facility, increase in development infrastructure, basis for job creation, - Cities with big industrial and commercial centers. Such as: Birgunj, Biratnagar, Bhairahawa, Nepalgunj etc., - contribution to revenue collection,
3. What is meant by map? Write about its significance. A picture drawn on paper or other similar material to represent the surface of the earth or a certain part of it is called a map. Creating a standard and official map is a complex and sensitive task. In the past, people used to prepare a map of their limited space based on the information they saw from the surface of the earth. but, In modern times, the images taken from satellites can be converted into maps by means of computers, so reliable and high-quality maps can be prepared more easily. Generally, when preparing a map, the north direction is raised. Things that should be shown on the map are shown using symbols due to space limitations. The meaning of those symbols is mentioned in the list somewhere above or below the map. A level map always uses a scale. The scale shows the ratio between the size of the map and the actual size of the land. Importance of the map - Many things can be learned from the map. The purposes of maps are also different. A map prepared for a specific purpose is an informative map. What to show on the map depends on its purpose. Maps have a great importance in the modern era. The government's resources available in the country, population distribution, It is necessary to take the help of maps for development, construction and expansion and operation of services and facilities. Tourists use maps to get information about the geographical conditions, roads, services-facilities etc. of the place they are visiting. Likewise, the practice of using maps as a very necessary and effective visual material for teaching and learning has increased. Through maps, the curious can gain important information about the world without traveling. Therefore, the map can be considered as an important material.
4. What is development infrastructure? Briefly explain any three reasons why development infrastructure is not developed in Nepal. All kinds of physical, human, natural and economic resources that are necessary to provide services and facilities for the people and conduct the economic and social development of the nation are called development infrastructure. In the absence of infrastructure, the economic and social development of any place cannot progress. In this way, basic services and facilities provided for development are called development infrastructure. Reasons for non-development of development infrastructure in Nepal- There are many reasons behind the non-development of development infrastructure in Nepal. Among them, three reasons are as follows: (a) Inconvenient geological conditions:- The geological conditions of Nepal are mostly rugged. It is difficult to do development works in places like uphill and downhill, Bhirpakha, Valley, Galchi. Slow and expensive. (b) Lack of capital:- Since Nepal is a poor country, it has not been able to collect the necessary capital for infrastructure development. (c) Lack of skilled manpower:- Majority of Nepalese people are uneducated and unskilled. Development and construction work cannot be effective in the absence of necessary skilled manpower.
5. What are the characteristics of human resource development? write Human resource development is the task of increasing the knowledge of the manpower working in the organization, teaching skills and bringing positive changes in perception. This is an action to increase the capacity of the employees. In this, related training can be given to executive level employees and management development training to managerial level managers. Human resource management functions such as: acquisition, development of human resources, Human resource development is an important task in utilization and maintenance. Some of its characteristics can also be understood from this meaning of human resource development. Other characteristics are as follows: - Human resource development is the work done to achieve the organization's goals. - This is a continuous process. Human resource development continues as long as the organization exists, as employees must be empowered in a competitive environment. - This is a human-centered work. All activities such as training and management development are done keeping human at the center. - This is a function of maintaining good relations between management and employees. - Human resource development is a systematic process, which includes inputs, processes and outputs. This is the work of the management. It is necessary for both the organization and the employees. – It increases employee knowledge, teaches skills and changes attitudes, This increases the motivation of the employees. - This is also the basis of moral development of employees. It includes training, orientation, socialization, home country, foreign study and tour, transfer, promotion.
6. What are the provisions regarding Dalit rights as fundamental rights in Nepal's constitution? Mention. Article 40 of the Constitution of Nepal has the following provisions regarding the rights of Dalits as fundamental rights: - Dalits will have the right to participate in all state bodies based on the principle of proportional inclusion, - Special provision will be made according to law for the empowerment, representation and participation of the Dalit community in public service and other employment sectors, - Dalit students Free education with scholarships will be provided according to law from primary to higher education,- Special provision will be made for Dalits in technical and vocational higher education according to law,- Special provision will be made according to law to provide health and social security to Dalit community,- Dalit community will use their traditional profession, knowledge, skills and technology. , to have the right to protect and develop,
7. Why is education considered as the backbone of all-round development among the infrastructure of development? Education removes the ignorance in people and makes them alert, aware, productive and creative. Education is very important in every step of life. It also reflects development and civilization. It is said that education breaks the root of development. For development, any country needs various skilled manpower such as doctors, engineers, teachers, administrators, etc. All these are the creation of education. There is an inevitable need for education for the development of other sectors of the country such as: health, transport, communication, industry, trade etc. Therefore, the development of other areas is not possible without the development of education. It is a natural truth that the educational status of a country is strong, other areas of that country are also developed. It is for this reason that education is considered the most important infrastructure for development. therefore,
8. What are the causes of non-communicable diseases? Mention. Non-communicable diseases cannot be transmitted from one person to another. For example: cancer, heart disease, asthma, diabetes etc. are non-communicable diseases. Anyone can get a non-communicable disease. Factors that cause non-communicable diseases are as follows: (a) Factors that can be changed, prevented and controlled: - Tobacco and tobacco products - Excessive alcohol consumption - Unhealthy food - Physical inactivity - Obesity - High blood pressure - Blood sugar and fat Excess amount. (B) Factors that cannot be changed, prevented and controlled: - Age - Sex - Hereditary qualities, presented by: Hemchandra Sharma
1. When was the foundation stone of Mayurdhap Industrial Area laid in Hetauda Sub-Metropolitan City-13 and 14? Vikram Samvat 2077 February 13.- The construction cost of the industrial area with an area of ​​199 kgha and 17 kathas is 7 crores 23.4 million rupees.- There will be 62 plots in the industrial area. Infrastructure will be built for pump and Dharmakanta bridge area, customs, large truck parking area, armed base camp, waste water treatment center, road network, forest and recreation area.
2. When was the Supreme Court's decision to restore the House of Representatives? February 11, 2077.- The Constitutional Bench headed by Chief Justice Cholendra Shamsher Jabara has decided to cancel the government's decision of 5th February 2077 to dissolve the House of Representatives. The decision was made by the Constitutional Bench of Chief Justice Cholendra Shamsher Jabara and Justices Vishwambhar Prasad Shrestha, Anil Kumar Sinha, Sapna Pradhan Malla and Tej Bahadur KC. Similarly, the bench also mandated the convening of the session within 13 days.- The court explained that Article 76 of the Constitution envisages dissolution only if there is a situation where the appointment of the Prime Minister is not possible or there is no basis for obtaining a vote of confidence.
3. When was the foundation stone laid for Nepal-China Friendly Industrial Park in Jhapa? February 16, 2077. 
4. Where has Mahasiddha World Peace Center been started? Lumbini. 
5. To whom will the Ministry of Youth and Sports award Sports Journalism Award-2077? Sports journalist Kamal Khatri (award amount: 50 thousand). 
6. Since when was the cleanliness week celebrated in Nepal? Year 2056.
7. After determining the four forts of Fewatal, how much has its area been fixed? 5.726 Wakimi (11,255 ropani 11 annas a paisa).- Gandaki province published the report of the committee through a press conference on February 16, 2077. Similarly, the perimeter of the boundary line is determined to be 18 km. - Four forts were established on the basis of the report of the 'Four Forts Determination, Demarcation and Mapping Committee' formed by the Gandaki Provincial Government after there was a problem in removing the increasing encroachment due to the inability to maintain the four forts of the lake. Based on the recommendations of the committee, four forts were determined by the cabinet.- The committee interacted with the people's representatives, locals and senior citizens around the lake, the location and size of the river that flows into Fewa lake, the height of Fewa dam and the area covered by water during rains. According to the Gandaki provincial government, the area has been established through the analysis of the study report of Fewatal and through remote sensing and geo-physical study. Damside is in the east of the lake, Morebagar in the west, Damkilo between Kharpaindi-Chankhpur in the north and Chisapani Ranivan area in the south. Past studies - The area of ​​Fewatal was determined based on various study reports. - Earlier, according to the study conducted by the commission formed under the coordination of the former chairman of Pokhara Valley City Development Committee, Vishwaprakash Lamichhane, the area of ​​Fewatal was determined to be 6.54 square kilometers (12,874 ropani). . - It is said that the area of ​​the lake is 10 square kilometers in 2018. There is Damkilo between Kharpaindi-Chankhpur in the north and Chisapani Ranivan area in the south. Past studies - The area of ​​Phewatal was determined based on various study reports. - Earlier, according to the study conducted by the commission formed under the coordination of the former chairman of Pokhara Valley City Development Committee, Vishwaprakash Lamichhane, the area of ​​Fewatal was determined to be 6.54 square kilometers (12,874 ropani). . - It is said that the area of ​​the lake is 10 square kilometers in 2018. There is Damkilo between Kharpaindi-Chankhpur in the north and Chisapani Ranivan area in the south. Past studies - The area of ​​Phewatal was determined based on various study reports. - Earlier, according to the study conducted by the commission formed under the coordination of the former chairman of Pokhara Valley City Development Committee, Vishwaprakash Lamichhane, the area of ​​Fewatal was determined to be 6.54 square kilometers (12,874 ropani). . - It is said that the area of ​​the lake is 10 square kilometers in 2018. 400 ropani) was fixed. - It is said that the area of ​​the lake is 10 square kilometers in 2018. 400 ropani) was fixed. - It is said that the area of ​​the lake is 10 square kilometers in 2018.
8. Which national park has the most tigers in Nepal? Chitwan National Park. 
9. Which is the administrative capital of Sri Lanka? Sri Jayawardenepura (Colombo is the administrative and judicial capital.) 
10. Which is the first SAARC country to ratify the Paris Agreement on climate change? Maldives.- (Nepal approved this agreement on October 24, 2016.) 
11. Dots plus treatment is related to which disease? Tuberculosis. 
12. What is the real name of Kautilya also known as Chanakya? Vishnu Gupta.
13. Where is the important Barjutal in terms of religious, touristic and biological diversity? Sunsari. 14. When was the arrangement made mandatory by the customs department for export import signal number (EXIM code)? 2074 July 1.15. When is International Mother Language Day celebrated? February 21.- (Since 2000, February 21 has been celebrated as Mother Language Day all over the world.) 
16. What is the duration of the second multi-sectoral nutrition plan in Nepal to solve the problem of malnutrition? Year 2018-2022. – (First multi-sectoral nutrition plan period: 2013-2018).
17. Who was honored with Mahendra Narayan Nidhi National Award and Premsagari Devi Nidhi Award on February 14, 2077? Homanath Dahal (Senior Journalist), Dr. Ramdayal Rakesh (writer), Kashidevi Jha and Girirajkumari Prasai.- Prize amount: one lakh rupees each. Rakesh is a senior writer in Nepali, Hindi and English languages. - Kashidevi Jha is the wife of Durganand Jha, who was hanged in 2020 for the charge of throwing a bomb on former MP and the then King Mahendra. - Likewise, 90-year-old Prasain Congress leader is the wife of the late Bharat Babu (CK) Prasar. He has been actively working to end discrimination, untouchability and stigma.
18. Where has a bird of a strange nature with half male and half female form been found? America.- In February 2021, ornithologist Jamie Hill found a bird that is half male and half female. - A bird with both male and female coloration in the same body including both ovary and ovary is considered rare in the world. - According to Hill, the color of the male cardinal of both sexes of the northern cardinal bird is bright red and the color of the female is pale brown.
19. What is the campaign started by the Confederation of Nepal Industry (CNI), the umbrella organization of industrialists, with the aim of establishing 1,000 new industries and creating 1.5 million jobs every year? 'Make in Nepal-Swadeshi' campaign.- (On February 12, 2077, a press release with detailed information about the campaign was published and a target was set to increase the annual export to about five billion in the next five years. At present, the annual export from Nepal is about one billion.) 
20 . What disease is the risk of football players heading the ball? stroke 
21. In which hospital has the molecular laboratory (molecular lab) that can identify complex diseases been put into operation? Civil Hospital at Meen Bhavan.
22. When was the foundation stone of Lumbini cable car laid in Butwal? Year 2077 February 1.- (Similarly, the foundation stone of the second cable car 'Siddharth Cable Car' in Butwal was laid on February 9, 2077) 
23. When was the foundation stone laid for Daiji-Chhela Industrial Zone in Kanchanpur? February 10, 2077. - Out of the 15 new industrial areas proposed by the government, the construction of 6 areas has been advanced to be completed in the next five years. - The government has allocated a budget to establish at least one industrial zone in all provinces in the policy and budget of the financial year 2077-078. - The government had decided in Chait 2077 for the construction of Daiji-Chhela in Kanchanpur, Nauvasta in Banke, Motipur in Rupandehi, Mayurdhap in Shaktikhor Makwanpur in Chitwan and Damak in Jhapa. 
24. When is International Single Women's Day celebrated? June 23.
25. Who is the first Nepali woman climber to climb the highest peak of all the seven continents? Sushmita Maske. 
26. Where is the head office of BRICS Bank located? Shanghai (China). 
27. Under which ministry does the Central Registration (personal incident registration body) department fall? Ministry of Federal Affairs and Local Development. 
28. Walker Cup/Ryder Cup is related to which sport? Golf. 
29. When was the first Women's World Cup organized? 1991. 
30. If the breathalyzer shows more than how many points, it is considered to be 'measured'? 0.13.Presented by: Tank KC
Work performed by the department under the Ministry of Finance 1. Briefly write about the work done by the department under the Ministry of Finance. The Ministry of Finance is the central agency of the country's revenue and budget administration, which prepares the country's budget, formulates the revenue policy, implements it, and controls the economy. This Ministry, which takes the approach of increasing the capacity of the overall economy by achieving sustainable, broad and high economic growth through strong financial and economic management, currently includes the Comptroller General's Office and the Public Debt Management Office as central offices. Internal Revenue Department, Customs Department and Public Finance Management Training Center are as departments. The work done by these bodies can be mentioned as follows: a. Tasks to be performed by the Office of the Comptroller General of Accounts: - To prepare and report the central account of income and expenditure of the Union, State and local levels. - Preparing central statement by collecting the details of the outstanding amount of payment, - Designing, implementing and supervising the accounting system, - Conducting internal audit, - Keeping records, auditing, reporting and reporting, - Operating the accounting group, b. Tasks to be performed by the Public Debt Management Office: - Projecting the need for public debt that can be raised every year and submitting suggestions to the Ministry of Finance, - Preparing short-term, mid-term and long-term policy proposals related to public debt management and submitting them to the Ministry of Finance, - State and local level public debt limits and Giving suggestions regarding operational areas, - Paying principal, interest and other charges of foreign loans according to the foreign loan agreement, reconciling accounts, - Working on share and loan investment on behalf of the Government of Nepal. - Projecting a three-year budget for internal and external debt payments and submitting it to the Ministry of Finance and the National Planning Commission, c. Tasks performed by the Internal Revenue Department: - Collecting value added tax, income tax and excise revenue, monitoring revenue collection, - reviewing tax assessment details, - supervising the tax office, - assisting in formulating tax policy, implementing declared tax policy, - To assist in formulating and revising tax related laws and regulations, - to provide services to taxpayers, - to ensure taxpayer-friendly tax administration by making tax administration systematic and transparent, d. Tasks performed by the Customs Department:- Collecting customs revenue,- Facilitating trade by making customs administration systematic and transparent,- Controlling unauthorized trade,- Assisting in maintaining social security,- Assisting the Ministry of Finance in formulating customs tariff policy, e.
2. Introduce the Terai region of Nepal and briefly discuss its contribution to the country's economic development. The plain land extending east-west from the hilly part of Nepal to the border of India in the south is called Terai Province. It is also called Madhes. Its width is from 25 km to 30 km. It is at a height of 60 to 600 meters above sea level. Siran of Terai is Bhavar and Chure. Going from north to south is a characteristic of Terai. This region is a tropical region. The land here is mostly flat. The Terai region can be divided into three categories namely Terai, Bhawar region and Inner Madhes. - Terai Province's contribution to economic development - very suitable places from a tourist point of view, support in tourism promotion, such as: Chitwan National Park, Bardia National Park, etc. , Ramjanaki Mandir etc., - Transportation facility, increase in development infrastructure, basis for job creation, - Cities with big industrial and commercial centers. Such as: Birgunj, Biratnagar, Bhairahawa, Nepalgunj etc., - contribution to revenue collection,
3. What is meant by map? Write about its significance. A picture drawn on paper or other similar material to represent the surface of the earth or a certain part of it is called a map. Creating a standard and official map is a complex and sensitive task. In the past, people used to prepare a map of their limited space based on the information they saw from the surface of the earth. but, In modern times, the images taken from satellites can be converted into maps by means of computers, so reliable and high-quality maps can be prepared more easily. Generally, when preparing a map, the north direction is raised. Things that should be shown on the map are shown using symbols due to space limitations. The meaning of those symbols is mentioned in the list somewhere above or below the map. A level map always uses a scale. The scale shows the ratio between the size of the map and the actual size of the land. Importance of the map - Many things can be learned from the map. The purposes of maps are also different. A map prepared for a specific purpose is an informative map. What to show on the map depends on its purpose. Maps have a great importance in the modern era. The government's resources available in the country, population distribution, It is necessary to take the help of maps for development, construction and expansion and operation of services and facilities. Tourists use maps to get information about the geographical conditions, roads, services-facilities etc. of the place they are visiting. Likewise, the practice of using maps as a very necessary and effective visual material for teaching and learning has increased. Through maps, the curious can gain important information about the world without traveling. Therefore, the map can be considered as an important material.
4. What is development infrastructure? Briefly explain any three reasons why development infrastructure is not developed in Nepal. All kinds of physical, human, natural and economic resources that are necessary to provide services and facilities for the people and conduct the economic and social development of the nation are called development infrastructure. In the absence of infrastructure, the economic and social development of any place cannot progress. In this way, basic services and facilities provided for development are called development infrastructure. Reasons for non-development of development infrastructure in Nepal- There are many reasons behind the non-development of development infrastructure in Nepal. Among them, three reasons are as follows: (a) Inconvenient geological conditions:- The geological conditions of Nepal are mostly rugged. It is difficult to do development works in places like uphill and downhill, Bhirpakha, Valley, Galchi. Slow and expensive. (b) Lack of capital:- Since Nepal is a poor country, it has not been able to collect the necessary capital for infrastructure development. (c) Lack of skilled manpower:- Majority of Nepalese people are uneducated and unskilled. Development and construction work cannot be effective in the absence of necessary skilled manpower.
5. What are the characteristics of human resource development? write Human resource development is the task of increasing the knowledge of the manpower working in the organization, teaching skills and bringing positive changes in perception. This is an action to increase the capacity of the employees. In this, related training can be given to executive level employees and management development training to managerial level managers. Human resource management functions such as: acquisition, development of human resources, Human resource development is an important task in utilization and maintenance. Some of its characteristics can also be understood from this meaning of human resource development. Other characteristics are as follows: - Human resource development is the work done to achieve the organization's goals. - This is a continuous process. Human resource development continues as long as the organization exists, as employees must be empowered in a competitive environment. - This is a human-centered work. All activities such as training and management development are done keeping human at the center. - This is a function of maintaining good relations between management and employees. - Human resource development is a systematic process, which includes inputs, processes and outputs. This is the work of the management. It is necessary for both the organization and the employees. – It increases employee knowledge, teaches skills and changes attitudes, This increases the motivation of the employees. - This is also the basis of moral development of employees. It includes training, orientation, socialization, home country, foreign study and tour, transfer, promotion.
6. What are the provisions regarding Dalit rights as fundamental rights in Nepal's constitution? Mention. Article 40 of the Constitution of Nepal has the following provisions regarding the rights of Dalits as fundamental rights: - Dalits will have the right to participate in all state bodies based on the principle of proportional inclusion, - Special provision will be made according to law for the empowerment, representation and participation of the Dalit community in public service and other employment sectors, - Dalit students Free education with scholarships will be provided according to law from primary to higher education,- Special provision will be made for Dalits in technical and vocational higher education according to law,- Special provision will be made according to law to provide health and social security to Dalit community,- Dalit community will use their traditional profession, knowledge, skills and technology. , to have the right to protect and develop,
7. Why is education considered as the backbone of all-round development among the infrastructure of development? Education removes the ignorance in people and makes them alert, aware, productive and creative. Education is very important in every step of life. It also reflects development and civilization. It is said that education breaks the root of development. For development, any country needs various skilled manpower such as doctors, engineers, teachers, administrators, etc. All these are the creation of education. There is an inevitable need for education for the development of other sectors of the country such as: health, transport, communication, industry, trade etc. Therefore, the development of other areas is not possible without the development of education. It is a natural truth that the educational status of a country is strong, other areas of that country are also developed. It is for this reason that education is considered the most important infrastructure for development. therefore,
8. What are the causes of non-communicable diseases? Mention. Non-communicable diseases cannot be transmitted from one person to another. For example: cancer, heart disease, asthma, diabetes etc. are non-communicable diseases. Anyone can get a non-communicable disease. Factors that cause non-communicable diseases are as follows: (a) Factors that can be changed, prevented and controlled: - Tobacco and tobacco products - Excessive alcohol consumption - Unhealthy food - Physical inactivity - Obesity - High blood pressure - Blood sugar and fat Excess amount. (B) Factors that cannot be changed, prevented and controlled: - Age - Sex - Hereditary qualities, presented by: Hemchandra Sharma
Multidimensional effects of migration 1. What are the multifaceted effects of rapid migration from hilly rural settlements in Nepal? Also discuss the measures to reduce the negative impact of this. Migration is the movement of people from their place of origin to their destination. The place of origin is the place of origin and the place of migration is the place of destination. From the hilly rural settlements of Nepal, especially to the cities, markets, capital, Terai of Nepal, some have migrated to foreign countries. Due to this, the country has a multifaceted impact, including economic, social, political, and environmental. Which can be discussed as follows: Positive effect- a. Positive effect on hilly rural settlements - when there are fewer people, employment will increase for the rest, wages will increase - forests will be protected - it will be easier to manage - there will be harmony between population and infrastructure - a. Positive impact on the city market and Terai - Increase in active population - Maximum utilization of resources - Development of competition and quality - Diversity in the community - New ideas and awareness will increase - New talents will be obtained - New businesses will be developed and employment will increase. . Negative effects- a. Negative effects in hilly rural settlements - reduction in economic activity - increase in the number of disabled and women - migration of talents - destruction of the original way of life of tribal tribes - shortage of workers in the mountains - reduction in the number of voters. - Come on. - Implementing self-employment programs in the mountains and hills, - Commercial production of crops, fruits and herbs in the mountains, - Maintaining a balance in development between the mountains, hills and plains, - Finally, migration is a continuous process and cannot be stopped by putting a full stop. Only irregular migration can be stopped. For this, migration should be managed through proper management of population by maintaining a balance in development between villages, cities, mountains, hills and plains.
2. Social media has not only had a positive but also a negative impact on the community. Confirm it. A social network is a medium used to share ideas, digital photos or videos that you have received or created through internet technology on a computer or mobile. This website is a means of direct communication and information exchange through the Internet. Examples of this are Facebook, YouTube, Viber, Twitter, TikTok etc. The scope of its use at the community level has become very wide. Even in government offices, it is being used to bring more efficiency in service delivery. Since it is a simple and easy technology that can be used by every person in every field, it has now become like a life partner of people. With this, information can be exchanged quickly, direct contact can be established at home, domestically and abroad, important documents, Photos and videos can be shared immediately, an event or a special topic can be broadcast live, you can buy and sell your favorite goods at home, it is easy to keep and expand your thoughts, feelings, it will help to bring the whole world together, study , helping in research and writing, because it can be used by individuals, families, communities, offices, businesses, etc. in every work, usually every person spends 35 percent of their time on it. Although there are so many benefits of social media, it has some negative effects on the society. Taking and uploading obscene videos and photos by misusing it, sharing, spending more time on social media, making negative comments towards others, sharing, sharing more content that harms society, teasing strangers, There is a situation where some people have become victims of the trend of misusing other people's photos and videos, using social media as a tool for entertainment rather than a tool for study and research, and spreading false news. In this way, social media has not only had a positive but also a negative impact on the community. As much freedom is needed in its use, strict punishment is necessary for its abuse. Therefore, the negative effects of social media can be controlled and its use can be expanded further by providing punishment in the legal system. That's why it is necessary to provide strict punishment for its misuse. Therefore, the negative effects of social media can be controlled and its use can be expanded further by providing punishment in the legal system. That's why it is necessary to provide strict punishment for its misuse. Therefore, the negative effects of social media can be controlled and its use can be expanded further by providing punishment in the legal system.
3. What kind of arrangements are there to maintain financial discipline in the financial federalism of Nepal? Mention. Financial federalism is the transfer of financial resources. Basically, it includes topics like revenue rights, revenue distribution, subsidy distribution. According to Article 56 of the Constitution of Nepal, the basic structure of Nepal is three-tiered, which is the federal, state and local levels. To manage this, the Constitution of Nepal, Intergovernmental Finance Management Act-2074, National Natural Resources and Finance Commission Act-2074, Economic Procedures and Financial Responsibility Act-2076 and Regulations-2077 have been implemented. Through this legal arrangement, financial discipline has been established in the financial federalism of Nepal, which can be mentioned as follows: - All three levels of the union, state and local should deposit all the income they receive in their accumulated fund. - Budgets should be spent at all three levels only after they have been approved by the respective legislatures, according to which the federal budget of the Nepal government should be presented on June 15th, the budget of the provincial government should be presented by June 1st and the budget of the local level should be presented by June 10th. - Grant amount must be used for the purpose for which it was received, - Capital expenditure amount cannot be transferred to current expenditure, - All three levels must audit income and expenditure and publish the details within 15 days, - All three levels must review the budget implementation annually. Details to be made public, quarterly statement of income and expenditure and its presentation: - - a. The local level should submit the quarterly statement of income and expenditure to the Ministry of Finance and the province, - b. The province should submit the quarterly statement of income and expenditure to the Ministry of Finance, - c. Grants can be withheld: - If the quarterly statement of income and expenditure is not submitted from the state and local level, the government of Nepal can withhold the grant, integrated financial statement and its presentation: - - a. The local level should submit its statement of income and expenditure to the Provincial Accounts Controller's Office (Pralenica) and the Treasury and Accounts Controller's Office (Kolenica), - b. Kolenica should submit the statement of income and expenditure of all offices and all local levels to Pralenica and the Comptroller General's Office (Malenica), - c. Pralenica should submit the statement of income and expenditure of the provincial government and all local levels within the province to the Auditor General and Malenica, - d. Malenika should submit the statement of income and expenditure of the federal, provincial and local levels to the Auditor General and the Ministry of Finance. The local level should submit its statement of income and expenditure to the Provincial Accounts Controller's Office (Pralenica) and the Treasury and Accounts Controller's Office (Kolenica), - b. Kolenica should submit the statement of income and expenditure of all offices and all local levels to Pralenica and the Comptroller General's Office (Malenica), - c. Pralenica should submit the statement of income and expenditure of the provincial government and all local levels within the province to the Auditor General and Malenica, - d. Malenika should submit the statement of income and expenditure of the federal, provincial and local levels to the Auditor General and the Ministry of Finance. The local level should submit its statement of income and expenditure to the Provincial Accounts Controller's Office (Pralenica) and the Treasury and Accounts Controller's Office (Kolenica), - b. Kolenica should submit the statement of income and expenditure of all offices and all local levels to Pralenica and the Comptroller General's Office (Malenica), - c. Pralenica should submit the statement of income and expenditure of the provincial government and all local levels within the province to the Auditor General and Malenica, - d. Malenika should submit the statement of income and expenditure of the federal, provincial and local levels to the Auditor General and the Ministry of Finance.
4. Under what conditions is there a provision that civil servants can be removed from government service in the future? write According to the Civil Service Act-2049, civil servants can be removed from service in any of the following cases so that they are not disqualified for government service in the future:- a) If the civil servant is unable to fulfill the duties or responsibilities of his position due to disqualification,- b) If he violates the conduct related matters,- c ) If he consumes alcohol while in office, - d) If he does undisciplined work, - e) If he participates in politics, - f) If he neglects the responsibilities of his position, - g) If he is absent from his office for 90 consecutive days without accepting leave.
5. What is local executive? What are its functions? The local executive is an organization that maintains peace and security in its area, organizes city police, mobilizes revenue, performs regular, emergency and developmental work at the local level, including basic education, health, drinking water, and sanitation. It presents tax rates to local legislatures, formulates local budgets, drafts local laws and implements approved budgets and laws. The constitution of Nepal has provided village executive and city executive as local executive. - Tasks performed by the local executive - proposing local tax rates, - drafting local laws, - maintaining peace and security within their area, - providing basic services, - formulating local budgets, - implementing local laws,
6. In a democracy, even if the decision of the majority is valid, the minority should also be properly valued. Justify this statement with suitable arguments. Democracy is a multi-party system of government and the parties are divided into government and opposition parties. In such an arrangement, the importance and benefits of the government being the party and the opposition at the same time are emphasized. The government can be protected from being autocratic due to the arrangement of the opposition. People's representatives, who are in the minority, point out the mistakes and weaknesses of the government and help to make its activities more people-oriented. Even though they are in the minority in the electoral arithmetic, the parties and representatives who are in the minority also represent the public sentiment and public opinion. It is necessary to give proper value to the minority as it gives constructive support to the government and also gives suggestions to remove the shortcomings of the government. Therefore, even though democracy is a system of majority rule, by developing the culture of appreciating the minority, through it, development, good governance, Prosperity and stability should be maintained. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
1. According to the statistics of Nepal Telecommunication Authority, what is the percentage of the population that has access to the Internet till November of the financial year 2077/78? 81 percent.- According to statistics, fixed broadband access is 21 percent and mobile broadband access is 59.67 percent. In the same period last year, fixed broadband access was 15.53 percent and mobile broadband access was 56.42 percent.- 45 million voice telephone lines were distributed by December 2077-78.- According to Nepal Telecommunication Authority data, 735,691 Fixed telephone service has been distributed. likewise, 3 crore 81 lakh 17 thousand 735 mobile lines were distributed.- According to statistics, 3 crore 64 lakh 27 thousand 539 GSM lines were distributed. 16 lakh 90 thousand 196 CDMA lines have been distributed. - 4G users in Nepal have reached 66 lakh 22 thousand 316. Nepal Telecom's 4G users reached 22 lakh 57 thousand 772 and Ncell's 4G users reached 41 lakh 53 thousand 190. Similarly, there are 211,354 4G users of Smart Telecom.
2. When was Dhulikhel municipality declared a child-friendly municipality? 2077 February 5 - (On the occasion of the 35th foundation day of the city, the first child-friendly municipality in the district was declared.) 
3. Who was appointed as the Executive Director of Nepal Electricity Authority? Hitendradev Shakya.- Shakya was appointed as the Executive Director by the meeting of the Cabinet of Ministers of Nepal on January 26, 2077.- Shakya assumed office as the 17th Executive Director of the Authority on February 2, 2077. - Shakya has announced that per capita energy consumption will reach 500 units within four years. Currently, Nepal's per capita electricity consumption rate is 267 units.
4. Which municipality has been declared the best municipality in terms of project implementation and management by the Urban Development Fund (February 2077)? Lalbandi Municipality of Sarlahi. - (This was announced by the City Development Fund, which has been investing in various plans and development constructions of municipalities across the country.) 5. Who is the first woman to be appointed as the head of World Trade Organization (WTO)? Ngozi Okonjo-Ibela (Former Minister of Finance,
6. Investigative Journalism Award (2020) established by the International Network of Nepali Journalists (INJA) was awarded to whom? Tapendra Karki (Nagarik Dainik) and Sushil Pant (Lokantar.com). - (The prize of one lakh rupees was jointly awarded to journalists Karki and Pant.)
7. National and International Players Association (NNIPA) will announce the best player of the year? Gaurika Singh of swimming and Mandekaji Shrestha of karate.- At the 15th NNIPA Sports Awards held on February 8, 2077, Gaurika was declared the best player for women and Mandekaji for men. Subas Tamang of golf for men and Sangeeta Dhami of wrestling for women were selected in the category of The Year Award. Similarly, Sujal Shrestha of football for men and Ayesha Shakya of Taekwondo for women received the talented player award. Karate coach Akwar Shah was honored with the 'Gajraj Adarsh ​​Player' award established after Nepal's first international runner Gajraj Joshi.- Similarly, The Para Athletic Award was won by Keshav Thapa of Table Tennis. Annapurna Post's Roshansingh Raut was honored with the NNIPA Journalism Award.
8. Who are the four healthcare workers from Nepal who have been included in the list of 100 best nurses and midwives in the world? Nurse Durga Sapkota, Sushma Yonjan and midwife Prachshita Budha Lama and Rukmini Tripathi.- (On the occasion of the International Year of Nurses and Midwives 2020, the list was jointly published by the World Health Organization, UNFPA and the International Association of Midwives.) 
9. Who was appointed as the head of Province 2 by the President Bidya Devi Bhandari on the recommendation of the Council of Ministers (2077 February 7? Dr. Rajesh Jha (Ahiraj). 
10. Who was awarded the Booker International Award 2020? Marik Lucas Rijneveld. 
11. Where is the head office of UNESCO located? Paris ( France). 
12. If the world's first talking robot is Kirovo, which is the first robot to get citizenship? Sophia.
13. What is Nepal's position in the world happiness index 2020? 92nd (score 5.137).- According to the list published by the Sustainable Solutions Network, Finland (7.08 points) is the happiest country in the world. The nations are respectively Finland, Denmark, Switzerland, Iceland and Norway.- The last five least happy nations are Central African Republic (148th), Rwanda (149th), Zimbabwe (150th), South Sudan (151st), Afghanistan (152nd).- Among the SAARC countries, Pakistan is ranked 66th, Maldives 87th, Nepal 92nd, Bangladesh 107th, Sri Lanka 130th, India 144th and Afghanistan 135th. Bhutan was not included in that study. 
14. What does misophonia mean? Discomfort caused by hearing different types of sounds (special difficulty caused by noise).
15. When was the declaration of freedom from sexual harassment in Nepal? 2070 July 3, 2070.- (Kamaiya free declaration was made on 2057 July 2 and Haliyapratha free declaration was made on 21 August 2065.) 
16. Who is the Malla King who introduced the Charkune Mudra? Pratap Malla. 
17. When was the Zero Hunger Challenge officially started in Nepal? December 2071 December 4. 
18. When did the National Insurance Institute start commercial business? 2024 February 11, 2024.- (The National Insurance Institute, which was established five decades ago and has been playing a leading role in the development of the insurance sector, entered its 54th year from 2077 February 11, 2077.) 
19. What is the period of interregional connectivity decade announced by SAARC? Year 2010-2020. 
20. Who is known as Dadichi in the field of education? Shankardeva Pant. 
21. Associated with an environment called Silent SpinWho is the author of Ndhit book? Rachel Carson. 
22. Which martyr of Nepal is known as 'Martyr Maila'? Dashrath Chand. 
23. When was the 'Global Center for Cyber ​​Security' established by the World Economic Forum? January 26, 2018.- This organization was established with the aim of providing a safe cyber space by discouraging cyber attacks.
24. When was 'Robot Service' inaugurated at Tribhuvan International Airport to serve passengers through technology? Year 2076 February 8.25. Where is the famous religious and tourist place Namobuddha located? Kavre.- Located at a distance of 13 km from the district headquarters Dhulikhel and 43 km from the capital, Namobuddha is considered a holy place of pilgrimage for Buddhists.- There is a religious legend that Gautama Buddha was born in Namobuddha. Pilgrims also gather in Aunsi. 
26. Which is the first Asian sports competition organized in two cities in the history of Asiad? 18th Asiad (2018) (Jakarta and Palembang, Indonesia) Presenter: Tank KC 
What is separation of powers?
1. What is separation of powers, balance of power and control? What kind of provision is there in the constitution of Nepal? Mention. The power of the executive, legislature and judiciary is the power of the state. When all these powers/authorities are given to one person/unit, no matter how democratic the ruler is, autocracy is created, arbitrariness increases, and the freedom of citizens ends. Therefore, the principle of separation of powers is the belief that state power should be divided into different units. This is the division of functions of the three parts of the government. Its purpose is to protect the rights of the citizens while ending arbitrariness in the government. The French philosopher Montesquieu, the modern interpreter of the separation of powers, clarified this principle in the following three ways in 1747: a. The same person should not be involved in more than one organ. For example: Ministers should not be members of Parliament. b. One part should not interfere with another part. For example: Judiciary should be independent and autonomous from other organs. c. One organ should not do the work of another organ. For example: The minister should not make laws.- In general, the independence and autonomy of the organs of the government is the separation of powers. Similarly, power balance and control means that if one organ exceeds the limits of its sphere of activity, the other organ stops it. Legislature is the highest body that makes the laws of the state, while the Council of Ministers with the ministers who implement the laws of the state is the executive. Similarly, the judiciary is the official body that interprets the constitution and laws. The work done by these three parts of the state are separate, they are independent and autonomous in their field of work. but, If one of these violates its limits, the other will stop it. This power is balance and control. Arrangements in the Constitution of Nepal:- Since the federal system is implemented in Nepal, there are three levels of government in the country, the federal, provincial and local levels. Accordingly, the arrangement in the constitution of Nepal regarding the separation of powers and the balance of power and control between the executive, legislature and judiciary can be mentioned as follows: Remains vested in the Council of Ministers, Article 75 (1) - A motion of no confidence cannot be submitted for the first two years after the appointment of the Prime Minister, Article 100 (4) - The executive power of the province remains in the Council of Ministers, - The executive power of the local level remains in the village/city executive, Legislature - Federal Parliament. A bill can be introduced in either house, Article 110, Passing of a bill, Article 111, Withdrawal of a bill, Article 105 Power balance and control between the executive and the legislature - a. The Executive has control over the Legislature - Although the Legislature has full authority over the Bill, the Finance Bill and the Bill related to the security agencies (army, police) will be presented by the Government as Government Bills only. Article 110 (2) - Although the Legislature has the power to make laws, the Ordinance is approved as law by the President on the recommendation of the Council of Ministers. Can issue, Article 114- b. Legislature controls the executive - the Prime Minister and ministers are collectively responsible to the Federal Parliament, Article 76 (10), the House of Representatives will vote confidence and no confidence in the Prime Minister, one-fourth of the members can submit a no-confidence motion, if the no-confidence motion is passed by a majority, the Prime Minister will be dismissed. Article 100 - Ordinances shall be issued by the government only when the session of the Federal Parliament is in session, and if not accepted by both Houses of Parliament after the issuance, such ordinances shall automatically become inoperative. Article 114 - Policies and programs of the government, budget must be passed by Parliament. - Balance of power between the executive and the judiciary and control . The Executive has control over the Judiciary - the Prime Minister will be the Chairman and the Minister of Law and Justice will be a member of the Constitutional Council that recommends the appointment of the Chief Justice, Article 284 Similarly, the Minister of Law and Justice will be a member on behalf of the government in the Judicial Council that recommends and advises on issues such as the appointment, transfer, action, dismissal, and administration of justice. and having a jurist member appointed by the President on the recommendation of the Prime Minister, Article 153 Similarly, appointment, transfer, promotion to gazetted posts in the judicial service, Article 154, b. Judiciary control over the executive – The supreme court has the final authority to interpret the constitution and laws, the interpretation of laws, legal principles, orders and judgments made by the supreme court must be followed by all government agencies, disobedience will be punished for contempt, Article 128 – balance of power between the legislature and the judiciary and the controller. Legislature's control over the Judiciary - Provision for the Speaker and Deputy Speaker of the House of Representatives and the Chairman of the National Assembly to be members of the Constitutional Council recommending the appointment of the Chief Justice, Article 284 - Provision for parliamentary hearings of the Chief Justice, Supreme Court Judges and members of the Judicial Council, Article 292 - The annual report of the Supreme Court will be discussed in the Federal Parliament. Parliament can make suggestions, Article 138B.
2. Mention the appointment, work, duties and powers of the Auditor General. Also, briefly describe the subject that the Auditor General will examine on the basis of propriety. The Constitution of Nepal has provided for the appointment, work, duties and powers of the Auditor General. According to which, there will be an Auditor General in Nepal, whose appointment will be done by the President on the recommendation of the Constitutional Council, his term of office will be six years from the date of appointment and he will not be reappointed. Duties, duties and powers of the Auditor General:- To conduct the accounting of all federal, provincial and local level government offices in accordance with the law, considering regularity, frugality, efficiency, effectiveness and propriety. The Auditor General shall be consulted while appointing an auditor for the audit;
3. What is financial responsibility? In Nepal, who has to bear financial responsibility for what matters? Mention. Being responsible, answering, reporting, bringing transparency in government income expenditure, economic transactions, financial management etc. is called financial responsibility. This is an act of economic discipline. It emphasizes results over process, making work rewarding. It is also an act of bringing frugality, efficiency and effectiveness in economic activities. It is also financial governance. Officials and Subjects Who Should Bear Financial Responsibility in Nepal: - The Financial Procedures and Financial Responsibility Act-2076, which was designed to regulate and organize the economic procedures of the federal, state and local levels in Nepal, provides that the following officials should bear financial responsibility in the following matters: - Departmental Minister/Minister of State , The financial responsibilities to be borne by the head of the constitutional body - choosing a plan, - preparing a medium-term expenditure structure, - proposing a budget, - protecting and managing government assets, - making the budget surrender, - monitoring plans and programs. - Financial responsibilities to be borne by Accountable Officer/Secretary - Keeping accounts, - Expenditure, - Allowing unnecessary expenditure, - Financial responsibilities to be borne by Head of Office - Revenue expenditure and keeping accounts, reconciliation of accounts, - Preparing financial statements, - Auditing to make Monitoring arrangement regarding whether financial responsibility has been borne or not: - Monitoring by the Prime Minister regarding whether financial responsibility has been borne or not by departmental ministers/state ministers.
1. The study task force on the alphabetization system in Nepal's school education system formed by the Ministry of Education, Science and Technology has graded 'D' i.e. GPA 1. 6. What has been recommended regarding those who have not achieved it? Not providing the original certificate. - The working group has recommended to mention 'non graded' in the certificate without evaluating the grade or GPA of those who get less than 35 percent. It is recommended that those who get 'non-graded' should not be provided with the original certificate but only the grade sheet should be provided.- As the quality of learning and teaching has started to deteriorate due to the letter-marking system, it is recommended to provide the same to those who have not achieved a minimum of 35 percent in subjects. All those who have participated in the examination have received the original certificate as 'Completed'. In the current practice, if 30 to 40 percent is obtained in the exam subject-wise, it is graded as 'D' plus and if 20 to 30 percent is obtained, it is graded as 'D'.
2. When did the government make arrangements not to serve junk food in public schools across the country? Bikram Samvat 2077 February 3.- Education and Human Resource Development Center Sanothimi published the 'School Lunch Management Support Book' (February 3, 2077) and it is forbidden to give junk food to the students of public schools from early childhood development to class 5.- Priority should be given to locally produced food. 60 different types of 'menu' have been prepared and the booklet has been published.- The government has provided 7 billion 72 crore 93 lakh 30 thousand schools for students. Under this, 29 lakh 40 thousand 789 students across the country will be provided free daily lunch in schools. The government will provide daily lunch at the rate of 20 rupees per student in Karnali and 15 rupees per day in other areas.
3. When did China publicize its national defense plan to make its national army modern and high-tech? July 24, 2019.- The defense plan was released for the first time since 2012.- China, which has the largest number of soldiers in the world, ranks second in the list of countries that spend the most on defense. America is on the first place in this list. 
4. Which article of the current constitution has provisions related to the High Court? Article 139.- (There shall be a High Court in each province. The High Court may punish anyone who obstructs the administration of justice by itself and its subordinate courts or judicial bodies, or disobeys orders or orders, and punishes them for contempt in accordance with federal laws. - In addition to the Chief Justice in each High Court The number of judges will be as provided in the federal law.)
5. Since when has the fourth strategic plan of the Judiciary been implemented with the main goal of ensuring justice for all? 2076 July 1. - The fourth five-year strategic plan was implemented as part of the planned court reform campaign that started in 2061. The scheme was announced by Chief Justice Cholendra Shamsher Jabara on June 31, 2076. The plan will be implemented till the end of June 2081.
6. In which museum of Nepal are moon rocks collected? National Museum in Cantonment.- Some pieces of lunar rock brought by the American astronaut who reached the moon for the first time on July 20, 1969 were also brought to Nepal and those pieces were collected in the National Museum.- Three American astronauts Neil Armstrong, Edwin Aldrin and Michael Collins on July 16, 1969 They left for the moon through Apollo 11 and reached the lunar surface on July 20.- Armstrong and Aldrin were the first to set foot on the surface of the moon from the spacecraft. After that, a piece of rock brought by NASA's Apollo 17 is also exhibited in the National Museum.
7. The currency of Bangladesh is called taka and what is the currency of Bhutan called? Negultrum. 
8. Who is the Rana Prime Minister who stopped the Charkha Prachar campaign conducted by the famous social worker Tulsi Mehr with the aim of raising public awareness? Bhimshamsher. 
9. When was the famous Oscar Award, which is regarded as the Nobel Prize in the field of film, awarded for the first time? Year 1929. - (Established in 1929, this award was first given to the movie 'Wings' in 1929.) 
10. When was the first postage stamp published in Nepal? Year 1938. 
11. What is the slogan of the first 'National Information and Communication Technology Day' celebrated in 2075? The expansion of information and communication technology, the basis of good governance and prosperity.
12. Since when has the free helpline service 'Khabar Garo 1145' been operated by the National Commission for Women? December 25, 2074. 
13. How many Prime Ministers were there during Rana period in Nepal? 10 people. 
14. Since when did the Nepal Electricity Authority make arrangements to pay the electricity tariff through the online system? August 5, 2074. 
15. When did the Internal Revenue Department start the central tax system? November 1, 2074. 
16. When was the Quick Action Team formed to control air pollution in Kathmandu Valley? November 1, 2074. 
17. Since when has Patan's Sundrich Chowk been opened to the public? November 12, 2074.
18. Since when has the rule that financial institutions cannot accept awards or honors from foreign bodies without the permission of the National Bank come into effect? December 2074 December 11.19. What are the ten incarnations of Vishnu? Matsya, Kurma, Varaha, Narasimha, Vamana, Parashurama, Rama, Krishna, Buddha and Balki 
20. Who is the thinker who said "Good health is the best gift and contentment is the best wealth"? Gautama Buddha. 
21. Administrative Reorganization Planning Commission-2013 is the commission formed under the chairmanship of? Tank Prasad Acharya. 
22. Which is the local level that decides one ward and one tarred road project? Fungling Municipality, Taplejung. 
23. What is 'Highway of Spatial Program' related to? One village one product. 
24. Mahahunt operation is related to what? Conservation of rare wild animals and plants.
25. When was the second multilateral nutrition project (year 2018-2022) announced by the National Planning Commission? 2074 November 28.- (First Multilateral Nutrition Plan: 2013-2017)- According to the nutrition plan, the goal is to reduce malnutrition to 24 percent by 2022, to reduce stunting under five years from 3 percent to 20 percent, and to reduce the proportion of underweight children from 27 percent to 12 percent. .- That plan will be implemented all over the country.
26. Where is the fascinating strange cave? Gulmi.- The cave is about 185 meters long.- After reaching about 150 meters from the main entrance of the cave, there is a place that can accommodate up to 500 people, which is named the hall. Similarly, there are Shivalaya, symbols of Rama and Krishna, figures of various snakes, figures of Gopikrishna, Jatayu etc. in the cave. Locals said that this cave, which is four kos away from Gulmi headquarters, Tamghas, was discovered in 2045 during excavation. Presenter: Tank Casey
Financial federalism in Nepal1. How has financial federalism been assimilated in Nepal? Discuss. In Nepal, the financial federalism of Nepal has been assimilated by making the following arrangements in accordance with the Constitution of Nepal, the Inter-Governmental Finance Management Act-2074 and the National Natural Resources and Finance Commission Act-2074: a. Use of economic rights: - Union, state and local levels make policies and laws regarding their economic rights, make decisions, make annual budgets, make plans and implement them, - Union, state and local levels make their respective budgets, - Union , provinces and local levels can levy taxes on matters within their economic jurisdiction and collect revenue from those sources, - the union can make necessary policies, standards and laws applicable to the provinces on matters of the common list and other areas of economic authority, b. Distribution of revenue sources: - a. 70 percent of the value added tax and excise from domestic production will be distributed to the Government of Nepal, 15 percent to the provinces and 15 percent to the local level. Royalties from natural resources (electricity, forest, mining, mountain climbing, water and others) will be shared by the Government of Nepal 50 percent, the respective provinces 25 percent and the respective local levels 25 percent, c. Financial transfer:- Government of Nepal will distribute financial equalization grants, conditional grants, supplementary grants and special grants to provinces and local levels, d. Foreign aid and loans: - The government of Nepal shall have the right to take foreign aid and loans, such aid and loans should be taken in such a way as to ensure overall economic stability of the country, e. Internal debt: - Government of Nepal, provinces and local levels can take internal loans within the limits recommended by the National Natural Resources and Finance Commission, but the provinces and local levels must obtain the consent of the Government of Nepal before taking internal loans, f.
2. What is policy making? What are the issues to be considered for effective policy making? Explain in brief. Policy making is the act of choosing what the government should do, how to do it, when to do it, what not to do, and why not to do it. Policy making is the act of formulating policies, which includes the process of identifying problems, finding different options for solving problems, developing, analyzing, selecting, accepting, implementing, monitoring, evaluating, and maintaining. This is policy making. Depending on the country, period, situation, need, time-reference, etc., policy making is done in different ways. Preparation of policy concept paper, preparation of policy draft, policy modification, approval of related agencies, and policy approval are also included in policy making. Legislature Parliament, Executive, Judiciary, Constitutional bodies, Agencies such as the National Planning Commission formulate policies. - Matters to be paid attention to for effective policy making - Policy making is not absolute, it is relative, so attention should be paid to various issues in policy making. Since policies are made to achieve specific objectives and goals, to solve problems, various issues need to be analyzed before and after policy making. It is necessary to do a detailed analysis of the resources available in the country, political, economic, social environment, environment, international situation, policy implementation situation, stakeholder participation situation, administrative and institutional mechanisms, etc. In order to create an effective policy overall, attention should be paid to the following issues: - The policy should be compatible with the country's constitution and laws such as the constitution, laws, rules, etc. What kind of rights related to education has been provided by the Constitution of Nepal as a fundamental right? Mention. Article 31 of the Constitution of Nepal provides for the following rights related to education as fundamental rights: - Every citizen has the right to have access to basic education, - Every citizen has the right to get compulsory and free education from the state up to the basic level and free education up to the secondary level, - The disabled and the economically disadvantaged Citizens have the right to get free higher education according to the law, - Blind citizens have the right to get free education through braille and deaf and vocal or speech disabled citizens have the right to get free education according to the law through sign language, - Every Nepali community living in Nepal has the right to get education in their mother tongue according to the law and for that, schools and educational To have the right to open and operate an organization,
4. What are the essentials of a legal state? write Constitution and supremacy of law, - Equal application of law, - Independent, impartial and competent judiciary, - Democratic governance system, - Fair implementation of law, - Government and citizens exercise their rights and obligations according to law, - Civil liberties, - Child suffrage, - Periodic elections. , - Protection of human rights, - Provision of fundamental rights, - Full press freedom, - End of arbitrariness and absolutism.
5. What is relative poverty? write Economic and social backwardness, the condition of not being able to meet the minimum basic needs and the condition of not having enough food are absolute poverty. If this is real poverty, it is relative poverty when comparing income and inequality. This is comparative poverty. The level of poverty may vary from country to country. For example: a rich person in Nepal can be poor in America. Relative poverty is a condition where basic needs are met. Absolute poverty can be eliminated by setting economic and social programs, but relative poverty cannot be eliminated because it is comparative poverty.
6. How is Nepal's standard time taken? Mention. Standard time is based on the 0 degree longitude line at Greenwich, UK. Also known as International Time, some call it Greenwich Time. Every country determines its time according to the east or west longitude from Greenwich, UK. It is considered the authentic time of that country. Authentic time is also taken in this way in Nepal. The standard time for places 15 degrees east of Greenwich is 1 hour ahead of Greenwich and 1 hour west of Greenwich. Standard time of Nepal is 5 hours 45 minutes ahead of Greenwich time. 12 o'clock in the Greenwich time is 5:45 pm in Nepal.
7. Mention the characteristics of filling posts in civil service of Nepal. Supplying employees to vacant civil service posts is filling the posts. There are two ways of filling up the posts, internal filling and external filling. This method has been adopted in the civil service of Nepal. With the aim of making the civil service inclusive, provision has been made for reservation under external recruitment. This is the most important feature of civil service recruitment in Nepal. Other features of filling posts in Nepal's civil service can be mentioned as follows:- Employees within the service participate in filling internal posts. has been separated. - Considering the 45 percent of reservation posts as 100 percent women, tribal tribes, Madhesi, Dalit, There are 33 percent, 27 percent, 22 percent, 9 percent, 5 percent and 4 percent in handicapped and backward areas respectively.- There are 9 districts under backward areas namely Dolpa, Humla, Jumla, Mugu, Kalikot, Bajhang, Bajura, Jajarkot and Acham. .- Legal and institutional arrangements have been made to manage the filling of posts. - According to the Civil Service Act regulations, the Public Service Commission collects demand for vacancies for filling positions, determines the percentage, - advertises, collects applications, recruits, conducts examinations, recommends employees based on written results and interviews. - Public Service Commission has a fair role in both internal recruitment and external recruitment, which seems to help increase competition, trust and attractiveness in the civil service. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma There is an arrangement of 5 percent and 4 percent.- Under backward areas, there are 9 districts namely Dolpa, Humla, Jumla, Mugu, Kalikot, Bajhang, Bajura, Jajarkot and Acham. - According to the Civil Service Act regulations, the Public Service Commission collects demand for vacancies for filling positions, determines the percentage, - advertises, collects applications, recruits, conducts examinations, recommends employees based on written results and interviews. - Public Service Commission has a fair role in both internal recruitment and external recruitment, which seems to help increase competition, trust and attractiveness in the civil service. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma There is an arrangement of 5 percent and 4 percent.- Under backward areas, there are 9 districts namely Dolpa, Humla, Jumla, Mugu, Kalikot, Bajhang, Bajura, Jajarkot and Acham. - According to the Civil Service Act regulations, the Public Service Commission collects demand for vacancies for filling positions, determines the percentage, - advertises, collects applications, recruits, conducts examinations, recommends employees based on written results and interviews. - Public Service Commission has a fair role in both internal recruitment and external recruitment, which seems to help increase competition, trust and attractiveness in the civil service. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma There are 9 districts including Jajarkot and Achham.- Legal and institutional arrangements have been made to manage the filling of posts. - According to the Civil Service Act regulations, the Public Service Commission collects demand for vacancies for filling positions, determines the percentage, - advertises, collects applications, recruits, conducts examinations, recommends employees based on written results and interviews. - Public Service Commission has a fair role in both internal recruitment and external recruitment, which seems to help increase competition, trust and attractiveness in the civil service. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma There are 9 districts including Jajarkot and Achham.- Legal and institutional arrangements have been made to manage the filling of posts. - According to the Civil Service Act regulations, the Public Service Commission collects demand for vacancies for filling positions, determines the percentage, - advertises, collects applications, recruits, conducts examinations, recommends employees based on written results and interviews. - Public Service Commission has a fair role in both internal recruitment and external recruitment, which seems to help increase competition, trust and attractiveness in the civil service. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma There is a system for conducting examinations, writing results and interviewing and recommending employees. - Public Service Commission has a fair role in both internal recruitment and external recruitment, which seems to help increase competition, trust and attractiveness in the civil service. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma There is a system for conducting examinations, writing results and interviewing and recommending employees. - Public Service Commission has a fair role in both internal recruitment and external recruitment, which seems to help increase competition, trust and attractiveness in the civil service. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
1. Vikram 1. According to the first national economic calculation by the Central Statistics Department, what is the average monthly salary of the employees working as employees across the country? Rs. 20,543.- According to the report, 17 lakh 9 thousand people are involved in various organizations in the country to get salary. Similarly, it was found that employees working in small organizations earn an average of 16,768 rupees per month. The monthly salary of employees working in small organizations is 16,100 rupees.- The difference between the monthly salaries of employees working in large organizations and small-scale organizations is more than 10,500 rupees. Small organizations used to spend 1 trillion 10 billion and 96.45 billion for annual salary. - Based on the data collected by classifying 21 different sectors in the study, it was found that the registered and operating industries distributed salaries of 4 trillion 6 billion rupees annually. Only 4 trillion 21 billion 31 billion rupees were spent annually for salaries. - 219 thousand 300 institutions covered by the report across the country earned 24 trillion 86 billion 11 billion rupees. Out of this, the annual expenses of such organizations including salaries are 17 trillion 83 billion 35 million rupees. The remaining 7 trillion 2 billion 75 crore rupees profit was earned. In this way, the share of salary in the total income earned by those organizations included in the study is very low. According to the data collected, it was found that the registered and operating industries distributed salaries of 4 trillion 6 billion rupees annually.- The industries operating without registration were found to spend 14.84 billion rupees annually. Crores of rupees were spent on salaries.- The 219,300 institutions covered by the report across the country earned 24,86,110 crores. Out of this, the annual expenses of such organizations including salaries are 17 trillion 83 billion 35 million rupees. The remaining 7 trillion 2 billion 75 crore rupees profit was earned. In this way, the share of salary in the total income earned by those organizations included in the study is very low. According to the data collected, it was found that the registered and operating industries distributed salaries of 4 trillion 6 billion rupees annually.- The industries operating without registration were found to spend 14.84 billion rupees annually. Crores of rupees were spent on salaries.- The 219,300 institutions covered by the report across the country earned 24,86,110 crores. Out of this, the annual expenses of such organizations including salaries are 17 trillion 83 billion 35 million rupees. The remaining 7 trillion 2 billion 75 crore rupees profit was earned. In this way, the share of salary in the total income earned by those organizations included in the study is very low. It was seen.- Four trillion 21 billion 31 billion rupees were spent annually on the salary of the total employees included in the study. Out of this, the annual expenses of such organizations including salaries are 17 trillion 83 billion 35 million rupees. The remaining 7 trillion 2 billion 75 crore rupees profit was earned. In this way, the share of salary in the total income earned by those organizations included in the study is very low. It was seen.- Four trillion 21 billion 31 billion rupees were spent annually on the salary of the total employees included in the study. Out of this, the annual expenses of such organizations including salaries are 17 trillion 83 billion 35 million rupees. The remaining 7 trillion 2 billion 75 crore rupees profit was earned. In this way, the share of salary in the total income earned by those organizations included in the study is very low.


District with low salary distribution 

2. Since when have two trains resumed operation on the Janakpur-Jayanagar railway? Vikram Samvat 2077 October 3. 
3. Who is known as the originator of Nepal's modern foreign policy? King Mahendra. 
4. Which country has started the 'Gold Card Visa' scheme for foreign nationals? UAE. 
5. What is the disease in which a woman hears a woman speak but does not hear a man speak? Reverse slope hearing loss (seen in China). 
6. Grammy Award is related to which field? Music. – (This award was given for the first time on May 4, 1954.)
7. Where is the potla palace? Lhasa, China.- The initial construction of this palace in Lhasa, the capital of Tibet, an autonomous region of China, was done by Emperor Srangchang Gampo around the year 637. He was the husband of Princess Bhrikuti of Nepal. This palace later came under the control of Tibetan religious leader Dalai Lama. Potala Palace was included in the World Heritage List in 1994.
8. When was the establishment of the International Renewable Energy Agency (IRENA) with the aim of widespread and sustainable use of renewable energy worldwide? January 29, 2009.- After the Parliament meeting on October 25, 2074 unanimously approved the legislation on this matter, the way for Nepal to become a member of that body became easy. Nepal will formally become a member of the body after sending the document approved by the parliament to the IRENA headquarters in the UAE. In 2009, participating in the founding conference held in Won, Germany, Nepal pledged to become a member by signing the relevant statute, but the formal process could not proceed. - Previously, a total of 152 countries, including all member states of SAARC except Nepal, became members of the delegation. 
9. What is the 'Beijing Five' conference related to? women's development
10. Who is the author of the book called 'Daughter of East'? Benazir Bhutto. 11. There is a provision of how many years there should be a gap in age when a foreign citizen adopts a Nepalese child or adoptive child? 30 years. 
12. Since when India's Visakhapatnam port was officially opened for Nepal? Visakhapatnam port in India has been officially opened for Nepal since June 10, 2073. Even though it was officially opened on June 10, it is said that it will take some time to regularize it. Visakhapatnam port is the second Indian port for Nepal. Before that, Kolkata - Haldia port is being used by Nepal. Although Visakhapatnam is far from Kolkata in terms of distance, businessmen say that this port in South India is convenient.) 
13. When did Nepal become a member of World Trade Organization (WTO)? April 23, 2004.
14. Who is the author of the great novel called 'La Miserable'? French writer Victor Hugo. 
15. Which valley has the highest number of birds in the world? Arun Valley. 
16. Which nation was divided at the end of World War II and united with it at the end of the war? Germany. 
17. When was the establishment of the Money Laundering Investigation Department? Year 2068 July 20. 
18. When was the 'Smart Daughter' campaign launched with the aim of providing digital and financial literacy to ten thousand girls and women? Year 2075 February 11.- (Nepali girls and women in the age group of 15 to 35 years who use smart phones and have access to the Internet can join this campaign.)
19. When was the first paperless cabinet meeting held by Karnali Province? 2075 August 9, 2075.- (Paperless meeting was held for the first time on July 10, 2075 by the Nepal Government Cabinet meeting.) 
20. What is 'hippocamp'? A celestial body. - It is claimed that this celestial body discovered recently by the SETI Institute of California is the moon of the planet Varuna. - Astronomers estimate that the extremely cold body 'Hippocamp' may have been formed by breaking up from Proteus, the second largest moon of Varuna. - The scientist stated that Hippocamp is one hundred times smaller than the Earth's moon. 
21. Who said that "Life is like riding a bicycle, in which it is necessary to keep moving to maintain balance"? Albert Einstein, scientist.
22. Who is the Rana Prime Minister who stopped the Charkha Prachar campaign conducted by the famous social worker Tulsimehar with the aim of raising public awareness? Bhimshamsher. 
23. Where has the laboratory for genetic disease testing been established for the first time in Nepal? Veer Hospital. - (Beer Hospital started the lab on the occasion of its 127 years of establishment.) 
24. If Tilavikram Nemwang (Vairagi Kanila) is known as a poet of dimensions, who is known as a 'modern poet'? Gopal Prasad Rimal. 
25. What is the full form of SARS? Severe acute respiratory syndrome. - From November 2002 to 2003, 774 people died from SARS in 17 countries. - After 2004, SARS infection was not seen.
26. Who built the famous Taj Mahal in Agra, Uttar Pradesh, India? Mughal ruler Shah Jahan.- Built by the Mughal ruler Shah Jahan in memory of his queen Mumtaz. This palace was designed by the Persian Muslim architect Ustad Ahmed Lahouri.- Its construction period was 1632-1648.- The Taj Mahal, one of the seven wonders of the world, was included in the World Heritage List in 1983.- Also known as the Jewel of Muslim Art in India, this Taj Mahal has a More than a million tourists will visit. 
27. Which country announced to leave the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries (OPEC)? Qatar. Presenter: Tank KC 
Prof.Dr. Bhimdev Bhatt
V.No. In accordance with the provisions made in Article 64 of the Interim Government Act of Nepal issued in 2007, V.No. The Public Service Commission was established on June 1, 2008. In this sense, the commission has a proud history of 69 years. In the constitution of Nepal issued at different times, sometimes the scope of this commission was narrowed and sometimes it was expanded. In Article 243 of the Constitution of Nepal (2072), the Commission is empowered to appoint the Nepali Army, Nepal Police, Armed Police Force, except civil service posts. In Nepal as well as other local government services and organized organizations, it has been given the responsibility to conduct examinations for filling up the posts. The Commission has also been entrusted with the responsibility of conducting open and internal competitive examinations while appointing to the gazetted posts of the Judicial Service. The commission is committed to fulfilling the responsibilities set by the constitution. In addition to the above duties and responsibilities, it is mentioned in Article 243 (6) of the Constitution that the commission should be consulted on the following matters: (a) Matters to be followed when promoted to the posts of the Nepali Army, Nepal Police, Armed Police Force, Nepal and other federal government services (b) Organized Laws to be made regarding the service conditions of employees of the organization and matters related to promotion and departmental action in such service positions (c) Laws related to the conditions of federal civil service (d) Matters related to appointment, promotion and departmental punishment in federal civil service or positions, (e) Procedure to be followed when appointed in civil service for more than six months (f) Matters to be followed when changing service. (g) Counseling on departmental punishment to be given to employees working in the federal civil service. In order to carry out the work entrusted to it by the Public Service Commission, in addition to the central office, there are seven gazetted first class leaders in Dhankuta, Kathmandu, Jaleshwar, Pokhara, Butwal, Surkhet and Dipayal and seven gazetted second class leaders in Ilam, Diktel, Hetauda, ​​Baglung, Jumla, It has built an organizational structure of 14 offices, seven of which are located in Dang and Mahendranagar. As the Commission has to complete the recruitment work of five to six thousand employees on an average per year, this work is challenging in itself. According to the advertisement, although the number of employee recruitment varies every year, the number of candidates applying through internal competition and open application is found to be around six to six and a half lakhs. As a result of completing all the examination tasks on time according to the annual schedule, creating a situation where errors are often zero, the coordination and cooperation of all the experts and employees involved in the examination work, the commission has succeeded in establishing its credibility in the public mind. In the past, different numbers of members have been selected at different times to carry out the work assigned to the commission. In recent times (Chait, 2071) has a chairman and six members. Meanwhile, as two members have retired due to age, the chairman and four other members are present at present. Probably because the constitution includes the provision for the formation of the Provincial Public Service Commission, In recent times, Article 242 of the Constitution provides that the Public Service Commission (Federal) shall have a chairman and four other members. Since the service period (six-year term) of all incumbent officials will be completed on Chait 10, 2077, it seems necessary to appoint new leadership and other members in the commission before then. After completing the service period, there is no provision to continue the former office bearer until another arrangement is made. Article 284 of the Constitution provides for the Constitutional Council to recommend the appointment of heads and officers of constitutional bodies. Article 284(3) of the Constitution stipulates that the Constitutional Council should recommend the appointment of a head or office bearer of a constitutional body one month before it becomes vacant. According to this, the selection of new officers of the Public Service Commission should be completed within February 10, 2077. Even if this work is completed in time, the hearing of the members thus selected is the State of Parliament It may take more time as it is arranged to be in the Order and Good Governance Committee. But as the House of Representatives itself has been dissolved, there is no possibility of a hearing in the Parliament. Meanwhile, the situation may be different if the House of Representatives is restored according to the Supreme Court's decision. It can be understood from the above information that the government must complete the selection of new officers of the Public Service Commission within 10 February. If this work is not completed at that time, the Commission will be without an official after Chait 10, 2077 and all the work it will be doing will be affected. Due to covid-19, the commission In 2076-77, he could not complete the recruitment work according to his annual schedule. As a result, only 304 candidates have been recommended for civil service last year, 56 for women and 248 for men. Last year The commission is working to complete all the exams that have been stopped. Although the decision of the Supreme Court on the issue of dissolution of the House of Representatives is in favor of the government, it will also have an adverse effect on the selection process of the Commission's officials. There is a past tradition of banning new appointments when the date of the election has been announced. In such a situation, the selection of new office bearers in the Constitutional Commission is not easy as restrictions are imposed on the transfer of employees and other activities. Considering the various aspects mentioned above, there is no option to immediately advance the selection process of new officials in the commission. In the absence of officials in the commission, the entire work of the commission will be halted. Civil Service including Nepal Army, Nepal Police, Armed Police Force, Admission to Nepal and public institutes will be completely stopped. As soon as the recruitment process is stopped, there will be shortage of staff in the organization and the day-to-day administration will be adversely affected. Due to recruitment, the morale development of the employees will also be adversely affected. From the second point of view, there is a provision that the government must consult the Public Service Commission before taking departmental action against an employee. This work will also be stopped in the absence of the official. In such a situation, there is a possibility of corruption in the administration and it will be difficult to establish good governance in the country. At present, the Federal Civil Service Act is under discussion in the State Order and Good Governance Committee of the Parliament. Before passing such laws related to civil servants, it is necessary to consult the Public Service Commission. Due to reshuffle of ministers in the Ministry of Federal Affairs and General Administration and lack of consensus among members of the Parliamentary Committees, the Federal Civil Service Act has been in effect for a long time. It has become a prisoner of indecision. Due to the fact that this Act has not been passed, there is a delay in creating the Personnel Administration Act at the state level. In such a complicated situation, the absence of Commission officials is sure to create more problems. According to the statistics published by the National Library, there are a total of 135 thousand 157 approved posts under the civil service as of October 1, 2077 at the federal, state and local levels, respectively 52 thousand 416, 17 thousand 316 and 65 thousand 425. 62 thousand 940 of the approved posts in the Union, There are 6 thousand 692 employees in the province and 19 thousand 277 employees at the local level, a total of 89 thousand 277 employees. 35 thousand 880 new employees should be recruited when considering the statistics of approved posts and serving employees. This task itself is complex and challenging. In such a situation, a vacancy in the commission cannot be imagined. Although the Public Service Commission of Bagmati province has started the process of recruiting some of the employees it needs, other provinces have not done this. It is not possible to carry out daily administration and development works in the absence of employees. In this background, it seems necessary for the government to take a decision on appointing officials of the Public Service Commission (Federal) as a matter of priority. Article 242 of the Constitution provides for the members to be appointed in the sub-sections 3 and 7. It is mandatory to select the officials from among the people who are talented and have gained fame in the society. of such persons Through the selection, the prestige and dignity of the organization will be increased and it will help to establish the fame it has earned in the past. (The author is a senior administrative scholar.)
 
civil society
1. What is meant by civil society? Discuss the positive and negative aspects of civil society. An organized group of independent citizens for the rights and opportunities of citizens is called civil society. Civil society is a voluntary organization that helps to make the government responsible and accountable to the people, outside of the government state system. It is non-profit and non-political. A civil society that is independent from external control and free from thoughts, urges and selfishness is citizen-friendly. Civil society has a multifaceted role in empowering the weaker sections in the society and bringing effectiveness in the overall development. Positive aspects of civil society - Since civil society is voluntary and non-governmental, it is a group capable of democratic dialogue. It is always in favor of truth, justice and democracy. Not allowing injustice and oppression in the society, raising voice against doing things against the law, It does things like making the people aware of national issues, helping the government work, boycotting those who commit corruption, making the government aware to do the work of the people. These are its positive aspects. It also has other positive aspects, which are as follows: - Support in establishing the rule of law in the country, - Strengthening democracy, - Emphasis on implementing the concept of an inclusive state, - Making the government responsible and accountable to the people, - Advocating the voice of the backward classes and uplifting them, - To maintain national unity by formulating public opinion on national issues, - To cooperate in ending social discrimination, corruption, corruption, - To conduct pressing programs for collective welfare. Negative aspect - Although civil society is a voluntary organization of independent people, it sometimes seems to be politically dependent. Having different opinions on political beliefs, discussing, These are its negative aspects as there are actions like selfish actions. There are some other negative aspects, which are as follows: - Having multiple organizations, - Lack of transparency in the organization's income-expenditure and activities, - Lack of coordination, uncertainty of objectives, - Lack of democratic practice in leadership selection, - Incompetent leadership, lack of coordination, - The country's economic, Being an independent group that makes both the government and the people responsible and accountable by coordinating, sharing, mediating, struggling, advocating, creating pressure, cooperating, alerting, making people aware and accountable according to the situation and need in matters of social, political, administrative, justice, etc., it is always separate and neutral from politics. should be kept It should not only focus on the city, but should also be rural oriented. We should strengthen the positive aspects while improving the shortcomings and make our role more effective in social empowerment and development. It should also be rural oriented. We should strengthen the positive aspects while improving the shortcomings and make our role more effective in social empowerment and development.
2. What are the basic principles of public service delivery? Goods and services provided by the state to the general public are public services. It has aspects such as goods and services, service providers, service receivers. It is provided according to law. Since service delivery is effective from these and similar topics, these topics are the principles of service delivery, which can be mentioned as follows: - goods and services, - service providers, - service recipients, - constitution, laws, rules, laws, - methods and procedures, - organization and Principles of organization such as: Hierarchy, control, coordination, command, reporting, etc. - Resources - Tools, - Information and communication, - Modern technology.
3. What kind of policy has been authorized by the constitution of Nepal regarding political and governance system? Mention. Article 51 (b) of the Constitution of Nepal has authorized the political and governance policy, which can be mentioned as follows: - Protecting, strengthening and developing political achievements, - Ensuring the best interests and advancement of the people through economic, social and cultural transformation, - To protect and promote human rights, - to maintain the rule of law, - to implement international treaties and agreements to which Nepal is a party, - to make public administration clean, competent, fair, transparent, corruption-free, accountable to the people and participatory, - to provide equal services and facilities to the people from the state. Ensuring good governance by ensuring easy access, - Making necessary arrangements to make mass media clean, healthy, fair, dignified, responsible and professional,
4. Confirm the statement that 'right to information promotes transparency and transparency strengthens the state system'. The right to request and receive information of public importance is the right to information. This is a situation in which citizens have easy access to information on all subjects except those that must be kept confidential according to the law in public bodies. Similarly, transparency is the act of informing the citizens of all the actions taken by public bodies. Right to information is regular flow of information, transparency is openness. When there is ease, simplicity, freedom and regularity in the flow of information, then all the work within the government agencies will come out. The right to information is the right to receive information, it helps to promote transparency in the following way: - By providing citizens with a certified copy of a document in a public body, - By studying and observing the work of a public body, - By visiting and observing the site of development of public importance, - By informing citizens about the decisions of public bodies, - By providing information about the methods, procedures, cost of services, time etc. By publishing monthly and annual reports of public bodies, - by making citizens aware, aware, responsible, accountable and duty-bound towards the state. - Transparency strengthens the state system - Since transparency is openness, it helps to prevent corruption and irregularities. When there is openness in all the activities of the public bodies, then the trust in the citizens increases. When the citizen's trust in the state increases, then the citizen will support the state, take ownership of the development work, build public property, There will be civil discipline. This automatically makes the state stronger. Therefore, transparency strengthens the state system. Transparency strengthens the state system by assisting in the following ways: - By increasing citizen monitoring of distortions, delays, irregularities and corruption that may occur from public administration, - By allowing citizens to participate in development work, - By addressing the problems seen in all the political, economic, administrative, and social sectors of the country, the state and by developing good relations between citizens, - by increasing active and meaningful participation in public hearings, - by effective implementation of the Citizen Charter, - by hearing citizens' complaints on time, - by promoting social testing and social responsibility, - by providing quality public services at low cost, - new - By providing positive support to use new information technology. Increases easy access to resources and opportunities for all concerned people. Through this, the economic and administrative decisions of the government are in line with people's expectations. Citizens are happy because of this, the country is prosperous and strong.
5. What benefits can Nepal get from the development of water resources? Water resources are the natural wealth of Nepal. There are more than six thousand rivers including Kosi, Gandaki, Karnali rivers. There are many underground water sources in Talalaiya, Kathmandu and Terai like Raratal, Phoksundotal, Fewatal, Tilichotal. Nepal can take multifaceted benefits from its development, which can be mentioned as follows: - distribution of clean and clean drinking water, - hydropower generation, distribution, expansion, use throughout Nepal, - increased hydropower export, foreign exchange earnings, - nationwide irrigation, agricultural production Enhancement, - Boating (sailing), swimming, ¥yafting can be done in lakes and rivers. In this, domestic and foreign tourist movement, foreign currency earning, job creation, increase in income generation, more contribution to revenue, more dynamic economy, - use of sand, stone and gravel found on the riverside in infrastructure construction such as roads, sewers, houses, bridges,
6. What are the obligations and duties of an ideal citizen towards the nation and society? An ideal citizen has many responsibilities and duties towards the nation and society, which can be written as follows: - To be loyal to the nation, - To protect the nationality, sovereignty and integrity of the country, - To obey the constitution and laws, - To pay the taxes that are due according to the law, - The state wants Serving time, - Helping to remove the social distortions seen in the society, - Conducting house-toll, cleaning campaign of the society, - Protecting and protecting public property. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
1. When is the International Anti-Corruption Day celebrated? December 9.- This year (year 2020) this day was celebrated with the slogan "Revival with virtue". Passed in .- Nepal signed this Convention in 2003 and it was approved by the Parliament in 2011. - On the call of the United Nations, this day has been celebrated since 2005.- This day has been celebrated in Nepal since 2011.- The Abuse of Authority Investigation Commission has appointed experts from various fields, civil society, A new institutional strategic plan (2076÷077-2080÷081) was formulated and implemented after discussion with the enlightened group including activists active in corruption control. The new institutional strategy with the vision of creating a corruption-free and virtuous society has helped in controlling corruption.
2. Who will the Nepal Pragya Pratishthan award the Nepal Pragya Lankar Award in the year 2077? Chinese Professor Wang Hong Wei.- The 35th Proclamation of the Institute honored Hong Wei with the special award for his contribution to the development of Nepal in the fields of language, literature and diplomacy. Birendra Prasad Mishra and Nepal Pragya Bhasha Award worth two lakhs to Prof. Dr. Awarded to Tejaratna Kansakar.- Similarly, Nepal Pragya Nepali Literary Award worth one lakh was awarded to Harihar Khanal and Raviman Lamjel, Poorna Vaidya, Indra Bahadur Gurung, Chatarbhujlal Das Kevarat and Hansawati Kurmi for the mother tongue literature spoken in Himal, Hills and Terai.- The assembly awarded two each. Bhanu Pragya International Nepali Literary Award worth Rs.1 lakh, Lil Bahadur Chhetri from Assam (India),
3. Who won the fourth edition of the PM Cup cricket title on 17th January 2077? Tribhuvan Army Club.- (Runner-up: Nepal APF Club). 4. According to a public report by Transparency International, what position is Nepal in the list of good governance in 2020? 117th. - Transparency International prepared this list based on a survey conducted by six organizations including the World Bank, World Economic Forum, Global Insight, Bertelsmann Foundation, World Justice Project and Varieties of Democracy Project (VDEM).
- This year Nepal got 33 points. Last year, Nepal was ranked 113th with 34 points.- According to Transparency, among the 180 countries included in this year's index, Denmark and New Zealand are the least corrupt countries with a score of 88 out of 100. South Sudan and Somalia have been listed in the list of the most corrupt countries by getting 12 points. - The position of South Asian countries in governance is the neighboring country China, which has got 42 points and is in 78th place. Both India and China were ranked 80th last year. 
5. When and where was the 37th ASEAN summit held? November 11-15, 2020, Hanoi (Vietnam) - (The 36th conference of this organization was also held in Hanoi. The 38th and 39th conferences will be held in Bandar Seri Begwan, Brunei.)
6. When was the 12th conference of BRICS, a group of countries with emerging economies in the world, completed? November 17, 2020, Russia.- The theme of the conference is sustainable world, safe exchange of interests and research growth. The first summit of BRICS was held in Russia on June 16, 2009. The 13th conference of this organization is scheduled to be held in India in 2021.- BRICS was founded in June 2006. BRICS consists of five countries namely Brazil, Russia, India, China and South Africa. 
7. When did the United States formally withdraw from the Paris Agreement on climate change? November 4, 2020. 
8. Who is the tallest teenager in the world and who is successful in writing his name in the Guinness Book of World Records? Ren Kyu (China).- He celebrated his 14th birthday by writing his name in the Guinness World Records. His height is 7 feet 3.2 inches.
9. According to the report published in 2020, which country has the highest number of internet users? China. 
10. Who made the maps used by geographical explorers Christopher Columbus and Vasco da Gama? Muhammad al-Idris 11. The process of providing farmer ID cards in Nepal has been started from which district? Baglung. 
12. When was the North Atlantic Treaty Organization (NATO) established? April 4, 1949. 
13. Which local level has the most wards in Nepal? Pokhara Metropolitan City (33 wards).- (Kathmandu: 32 wards). 
14. The meeting of the Council of Ministers on January 19, 2077 decided who to appoint as the chairman of the insurance committee? Surya Prasad Silwal (Former Home Secretary).
15. Where is the 33 feet high statue of Manjushree built? Chobhar, Kathmandu.- The statue weighing one hundred tons is the tallest statue in Nepal. - Under the leadership of artist Chandrashyam Dangol from Lalitpur, this statue was prepared by eight artists including him. - This statue is made by connecting 13 stones. An attractive park will also be built on an area of ​​about 37 ropani.
16. How many basic guidelines have been issued by international development partners regarding providing aid in Nepal? 15 points.- Different fourteen international development partners issued 15 points basic guidance for the operation of the program in June 2019, saying that they should provide accountable and fair, transparent and inclusive support based on internationally accepted principles and not on the basis of caste, religion, sect and political party in Nepal. - Basic guidelines issued by the United Nations, European Union, Danida Program Support Unit Nepal, Swiss Agency for Development and Cooperation (SDC), Norwegian Embassy, ​​INGOs (International Non-Governmental Organizations). Released in 2007 with amendments.
17. According to the current constitution of Nepal, what are the rights and residual rights related to the executive, legislature and judiciary of the state? State power. 18. Who is the author of the book 'Shared Earth'? Madankrishna Shrestha (His second work: Mahko I) 
19. When did the Chinese government announce the construction of a sea route 'Polar Silk Road' around the North Pole? January 26, 2018. 
20. Which period has been celebrated by SAARC as Decade of International Connectivity? Year 2010-2020. 
21. Which book is written based on the life of the former president of Cuba, Fidel Castro? Guerrilla of Time. 
22. If the first movie made in Nepali language is 'Satya Harishchandra', which is the first movie made in Nepal? mother
23. Who is the writer who says that literature is an artistic subject created in the interest of the public and an effective thought emanating from the pure heart of the creator? Ghataraj Bhattarai 
24. When was the English version of Nepal's updated map approved? Bikram Samvat 2077 July 30.- With the publication of the English version of the map, the way to send it to the United Nations, diplomatic missions and the entire international world is also open. 
25. How many chambers is there in Nepal's provincial assembly? one 
26. What is meant by 'same day tourist'? A tourist who doesn't stay for one night means that he returns the same day he came. 
27. According to Compulsory and Free Education Act-2075, what is meant by basic education? School education from Class I to Class VIII
28. According to Compulsory and Free Education Act-2075, what is meant by secondary education? Education from class 9 to class 12 or sixteen.- According to the Act, 'early child development and education' means child development and education focused on the overall development of children for a period of one year given to children who have completed four years of age before entering class one. - Similarly, special education means that children who are blind, deaf, have autism (disability) or similar conditions are kept in a separate group and are given a special type of education through certain means. 
29. When was the financial transaction of Nepal Infrastructure Bank established as the first infrastructure development bank of Nepal started? February 22, 2075.- (The bank received a financial transaction license on January 28, 2075.)
30. When was the establishment of the Arab League with the aim of developing economic, political and social relations between the Arab nations? March 22, 1945.- (Its head office is in Cairo, Egypt.) Presenter: Tank KC
Urge to coordinate time 1. What do you understand by the right to information? How does right to information help in maintaining good governance in public administration? The right to request and receive information of public importance is called the right to information. This is a situation in which citizens have easy access to information on all subjects except those that must be kept confidential according to the law in public bodies. It also refers to the right to obtain a certified copy of a document in a public body, to take a certified sample of a material, to study and observe the work of a public body, to visit a place where development and construction work of public importance is being carried out, to observe, etc. The right to information is to maintain good governance in public administration. The right to information helps to maintain good governance in public administration as follows: - By informing the citizens about the daily administrative and financial decisions made by the public administration, - By simplifying the methods and processes of public service delivery and increasing the citizens' easy access to them, - By bringing all the information of public concern to the citizens and making the service providers responsible and accountable to the service users, - By developing good relations between the state and citizens through the exchange of public information, - It can be done by public administration. By increasing citizen monitoring of distortions, delays, irregularities and corruption, - By bringing transparency in the work of development, - By increasing active participation in public hearings, - By ensuring effective implementation of the Citizen Charter, - By addressing citizens' complaints in a timely manner, - By promoting social testing, social responsibility, - Public By increasing the quality of service delivery at a low cost, - By creating pressure to use new technologies.- If public administration is a service delivery body, then the right to information is the delivery of information. Citizens are aware of all the information flow of public administration, Makes aware, responsible, accountable and duty-bound. When the citizens wake up, then agility, frugality, transparency, and accountability will automatically be created in public administration. Finally, corruption ends and good governance is established in the country.
2. What are the basic principles of public service delivery? write In terms of providing goods and services to the common people on behalf of the state, various methods, procedures and standards should be followed, which are the basic principles of public service delivery. which help to organize the delivery of public services, which can be mentioned as follows: - the principle of compliance with prevailing laws, - the principle of organization, - the principle of coordination and communication, - the principle of developing good relations between the state and citizens, - the principle of the state being responsible and accountable, - citizens The principle of satisfaction, - The principle of effectiveness in service delivery, - The principle of simplicity, frugality and transparency in service delivery, - The principle of quality service delivery, - The principle of one-way service delivery, - The principle of reporting, - The principle of good governance.
3. What kind of policies related to economy, industry and commerce has been authorized by the Constitution of Nepal? write Article 51 (d) of the Constitution of Nepal authorizes the following policies related to economy, industry and commerce: - Strengthening the national economy through the participation and development of the public, private and cooperative sectors, - Importance of the role of the private sector in the economy, economic prosperity by maximum utilization of available means and resources. To achieve, - To promote the cooperative sector and mobilize more in national development, - To maintain cleanliness, accountability and competition in all activities of the economic sector, to encourage and mobilize in all-round national development, - To distribute the available means, resources and the returns of economic development in a fair manner, - Identification of areas of comparative advantage, - Development and expansion of industry, - Export promotion, - Diversification and expansion of the market for goods and services, - Black market, monopolies, Providing dynamics to economic development by establishing inter-provincial and inter-province and union coordination regarding foreign investment projects. 4. What do you mean by budget cycle? Presenting the arguments that confirm the statement that the budget system is an important basis of economic discipline, mention the main problems that appear in the implementation of the budget in the public administration of Nepal. Budget cycle: The budget starts from one phase and ends and then starts again and continues continuously, such phase taken by the budget is called the budget cycle. The budget takes various processes from the formulation of the budget to its implementation, i.e. budget release, expenditure and its accounting, audit and evaluation, this is the budget cycle. The budget cycle can be mentioned as follows: a) Budget estimation/budget formulation, b) Budget approval, c) Budget release, d) Expenditure and its accounting, e) Auditing and f) Evaluation. The budget system is an important basis of economic discipline. Due to the following reasons and compliance with the provisions, it can be said that the budget system is an important basis of economic discipline: - The budget prepared by the executive is submitted to the legislature and is widely discussed, controlled, and can be reduced by the parliament. Because it has to be approved, - Because the income and expenditure are formulated, implemented and reported in compliance with the constitution and economic procedure laws, - Because the legislative parliament and the parliamentary committee monitor and give instructions that the budget system is properly implemented, - The budget system is planned annually. Yes, it is an integral part of periodic planning. Since it takes the set economic, social and material goals and is active in achieving them, planned and well-organized work,And due to failure to maintain capacity, failure to maintain efficiency in implementation, - Failure to fully comply with the Economic Procedures and Financial Responsibility Act, Public Procurement Act, rules, economic discipline remains weak, increasing insecurity, - Failure to be agile in the reporting system at all three levels according to the federal system, especially the local Weakness of the financial reporting system at the level.
5. Discuss the role that individuals can play in overcoming health problems. Health problems occur in all animals as well as humans. A person can play a multifaceted role in cleaning all areas where health problems can be seen, including his body, household, society, environment, and raising awareness. The role of individuals is immense in controlling communicable diseases like covid. In order to eliminate health problems as a whole, a person can play the following roles: - washing hands before and after eating food, advising others to do the same, - eating food properly cleaned and cooked and consumed in a balanced way, - regular cleaning of body parts, cleaning others as well - To use the toilet and advise others to use it, - Not to smoke and drink, to advise others not to do it, - To exercise regularly,
Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma 
1. When was the first nuclear medicine service started in Nepal? Bikram Samvat 2077 Pus 6.- This technology will be used to detect cancer, thyroid and bone problems (pain) in particular.- Through this technology, low level radioactive material can be entered into the body through oral and injection to get information about the condition of the body. 
2. Mahakavi Devkota Museum will be built where? Maitidevi, Kathmandu. (Nepal Prajna Pratishthan took ownership of Devkota's house (known as Kavikunj) for building a museum.) 
3. Where is South Asia's first 'Sky Walk Tower' going to be built? Kamaladi, Kathmandu. - The foundation stone of the tower was laid on November 21, 2076. - The height of the tower is 78 meters.
4. The United Nations decided to celebrate which year as 'International Year of Creative Economy for Sustainable Development'? Year 2021. 
5. Who is the woman who has spent the longest time in space? Christina Koch (American engineer).- He spent 328 days in space.- He went to space on March 14, 2019 and landed on Earth on February 6, 2020.- The person who spent the longest time in space is Valery Polyakov of Russia (437 days). 
6. The President's Chure Conservation Program is running in 26 districts, while the Chure Watershed Conservation Program is running in how many districts? 13. 
7. When was the National Project Bank launched? January 26, 2076. (After the implementation of the National Project Bank, only the projects included in it will be included in the budget.)
8. In which district is the proposed Ranitar Airport located? Panchthar 
9. Who is the human rights worker who will be appointed as the prime minister one day? Abha Murto (Finland).- Murto, who plays an active role in the field of climate change and women's rights, was appointed by the Prime Minister of Finland, Sanna Marin, as the Prime Minister for one day. 
10. Who is the person who will be honored with Nast Technology Award 2076 given by Nepal Science and Technology Institute? Kulman Ghising.
11. Currently, which country has started the artificial moon construction project? China.- The artificial moon will be 500 km away from the earth.- The artificial moon will cover an area of ​​10 square kilometers.- Previously, Russia tried to advance this kind of project in the 1990s, but the project was not successful. 
12. Which terrorist group brutally killed more than a hundred people working in the fields in Nigeria? ISIS affiliate Boko Haram. - In a village near the north-eastern city of Maiduguri in Nigeria, the group took control of an innocent citizen, tied his hands and feet, and brutally killed him. - The murder took place on November 28, 2020.
13. What is Sister Robert related to? Support for patients with infectious diseases including covid-19 - This robot, built by the Nepal Engineers Association under the leadership of Bagmati province, can be used to protect health workers from patients who are infected with covid-19 and are in isolation. Can be used.
14. According to the report of the financial year 2076/077 submitted by the Language Commission to the President, which are the two languages ​​added? Marek Yakkha and Nava Sherpa.- According to the report of the year 2075-076, there have been additions. Languages: 1. Rana Tharu (Kailali), Nar Phu (Manang), 3. Chum (Syar) Gorkha, 4. Nubri (Larke) Gurkha, 5. Poike (Dolpa) and 6. Serake (Seke) is Mustang. According to the 2068 census, the number of languages ​​spoken in Nepal is 123, with the addition of eight later, the total number of languages ​​has now reached 131. 15. Where has commercial shrimp farming been started with the aim of increasing the productivity of livestock and crops? Chitwan. 
16. According to the decision of the Council of Ministers on October 25, 2074, how many local levels have been included in backward areas? 57.- Eight municipalities and 49 rural municipalities are in the backward area.- District Bajhang (6) is the most local level in the backward area.
17. Which is the first child friendly municipality of Bagmati province? Bhimeshwar Municipality, Dolakha. 
18. Who is the person honored by the Global Teacher Prize-2020 to be given by Warke Foundation with the help of UNESCO? Ranjit Singh Disley (India), prize money 1 million US dollars. 
19. Who will Nepal Science and Technology Pragya Pratishthan award Science Award-2076? Dr. Yadavkumardev Bhattarai (Norvik International Hospital). 
20. In the audit of the year 2075-76, which was the best local level in Beruju Pachryot? Thaha Municipality (Makwanpur).
21. When was the Asia Pacific Economic Cooperation (APEC) established? Year 1989.- There are only 12 countries in this organization at the time of its establishment, and currently there are 21 member countries.- Its head office is in Singapore.- The first conference of this organization was held in Australia in 1989. 
22. What has been done by changing the name of Mahakali Municipality of Kanchanpur? Dodhara-Chandni Municipality. 
23. In which country was Leonardo da Vinci, a rich and great painter, born? Italy.- He was born in Italy on April 15, 1452 and died in France on May 2, 1519.- Mona Lisa, The Last Supper, The Virtuous Men, Lady with an Ermine are his world-famous paintings.
24. Since when has the government implemented the grading system (technical side) in the SLC examination (now: SEE)? From the year 2071 SLC examination 
. Since when has the government arranged for a 'smart card' in driver's license? November 14, 2072. 
26. If the animal that never closes its eyes is a fish, which animal never sheds tears? Chimpanzee. 27. What is the wind blowing in the Indian Ocean and Bay of Bengal known as? Cyclone. (The hot air flowing in the Thar and Gobi deserts is known as 'Lu') 
. 28. Which caste is meant by Khas Arya? Brahmin, Kshetri, Thakuri, Sanyasi-Dasnami. 
29. What is the minimum educational qualification required for appointment to the post of Chief Election Commissioner or Election Commissioner? Graduate level.
30. Where is the headquarters of Green Climate Fund (GCF)? South Korea.- This fund was established with the aim of conducting various programs to keep the global temperature increase below 2 degrees Celsius.- Currently, this fund has 10 billion US dollars. 
Presenter: Tank Casey
The possibility of electricity export in Nepal1. Why was the agricultural sector not developed as expected in Nepal? Write the reason. Agriculture accounts for about 27 percent of Nepal's gross domestic product, 60 percent of the people depend on it, the right to food is recognized as a fundamental right by the Constitution of Nepal, and it is a pity that agriculture cannot develop in an agricultural-dominated country that has constitutional policies on agriculture and land reform. There are various reasons for the failure of the agricultural sector to develop as expected in Nepal, which can be written as follows: - Real farmers do not own land, about 80 percent of people own 20 percent of the land. - About 23 percent of farmers are landless, - 18 percent of the total land is arable land and only 56 percent of it has irrigation facilities, - Farmers lack knowledge, skills and experience of modern farming systems,
2. What are the basic principles of government budget? write An estimated statement of government income and expenditure is the government budget. It is made up of income and expenditure of the government. It is created by the Ministry of Finance under the Executive, approved by the Legislature and then implemented by the Executive. Since it is made according to the country's constitution, periodical plans and annual policies and programs of the government, various parties are involved in its structure. Therefore, these and similar topics are the basic principles of the government budget, which can be mentioned as follows: - Revenue: tax revenue and non-tax revenue, - Grants: direct grants and unconditional grants, - Debt: internal debt and external debt, - Current expenditure: salaries - Regular expenses such as allowances, - Capital expenses: Development construction, project, project expenses, - Financial system expenses: Internal debt and external debt payment expenses, - Similarly, executive, finance ministry, legislature, constitution, laws, rules, periodical plan,
3. Discuss the trend of migration in Nepal and mention the causes of migration. Migration is the movement of people from one place to another. Migration in Nepal is increasing. The trend of migration in Nepal is found to be as follows:- a. From the mountains to the mountains - b. Hills, from the mountains to the plains - c. From the village to the city - d. From other places to the capital - e. From Nepal to foreign countries. Migration factors - The basic migration factors are attraction and repulsion factors, which can be mentioned as follows: - a. Reasons for internal migration: - Aversion to mountains such as: poverty, unemployment, low production, lack of education, lack of health etc. - Attraction to Terai such as: arable land, friends, employment, transportation, education, health facilities, etc. - b. Factors of international migration: a. Aversion to Nepal due to migration: poverty, Unemployment Attraction to foreign countries: high salary, employment, facilities etc. Attraction to Nepal due to immigration: quiet, open borders, shortage of skilled manpower/labourers, social and religious relations.
4. What is the current situation of hydropower production in Nepal? Is there a possibility of Nepal's electricity export? Give your opinion. An important source of energy in Nepal is hydropower. At present, 1,233 megawatts of hydropower has been produced in Nepal. Electricity has reached 90 percent of people. In the current Fifteenth Plan, the target is to produce 5,000 megawatts of hydroelectric power and to reach 99 percent of the population. Possibility of electricity export in Nepal: - In Nepal, the construction of major projects including Upper Tamakosi hydropower is in the stage of completion. From this, it seems that there will be sufficient electricity in the country and the possibility of export to foreign countries will increase. The possibility of exporting electricity to neighboring countries such as Bangladesh and India has increased. There is also a situation where the government has started taking necessary initiatives for the export of electricity.
5. Nepal is a multi-religious, ethnic, linguistic and culturally rich country. Throw light on the policy arrangements made to promote and develop the various languages ​​and cultures prevalent in Nepal. The policy arrangements made to promote and develop the various languages ​​and cultures prevalent in Nepal can be highlighted as follows: - In Article 32 of the Constitution of Nepal, language and culture are provided as fundamental rights and the following provisions are made: - a. Every person and community has the right to use their own language, - b. Every person and community has the right to participate in the cultural life of their community, - c. Every Nepali community living in Nepal has the right to promote and protect its language, script, culture, cultural civilization and heritage, - social harmony while respecting cultural diversity, The social and cultural objective of the state is to strengthen national unity by maintaining unity and harmony, Article 50 (2) Article 51 (c) of the Constitution has adopted the following policy in relation to social and cultural transformation: - a. To preserve and develop the language, script, culture, literature, art, film and heritage of different castes and communities on the basis of equality and coexistence while maintaining the cultural diversity of the country, - b. Adopting a multilingual policy, - Provisions regarding the formation of Language Commission in the Constitution for the protection, promotion and development of languages, Article 287
6. What are the basic characteristics of public service delivery? write Goods and services provided by the state to the general public are public services. It is based on the law as the service has to be provided by following the methods and procedures of the prevailing law. It is continuous because it has to be provided yesterday, today and tomorrow regularly. There is uniformity in service delivery from all government agencies. Therefore, law-based, continuity, uniformity and other issues are the basic characteristics of public service delivery, which can be mentioned as follows: - Fairness: It will be delivered without discrimination to anyone, - Simplicity: Simple methods, procedures and standards will be adopted. - Diversity: Because every type of service has to be delivered, there is diversity in public service delivery. - Based on organization: It is based on organization because it provides services by building various organizations from the center to the local level. - Principle-based: It is principle-based because service delivery should be based on principles such as coordination, communication, hierarchy, control, reporting, etc. Homeland, abroad, people need service from birth to death. - Universal acceptability: It is accepted by all citizens because everyone needs it. - Quality: Quality is maintained in public service delivery. - Changeability: Service delivery needs to be improved according to time reference, It is variable because new services have to be provided. For example: current passport service, current electronic payment service, online service etc. are changing services. - Transparency: There should be no delay, irregularity in service delivery, there should be equal access to the service, so there is transparency in it.
7. Mention the importance of registered invoice in office operation and management. In the operation and management of the office, the registered chalani has a multifaceted importance, which can be mentioned as follows: - Registration helps to keep the initial record of the letters and documents of the office and the challan helps to keep the final record, - It is possible to get information about which letter was received from where and where and when the reply was sent. - It is possible to get information about the action of the letter received at the office, - It is possible to protect the letter received at the office, - The possibility of losing the letter received at the office is less, if the letter is lost, information can be obtained from the register and invoice book, such as: registration number of the letter , the letter can be searched by invoice number, letter date, letter number, letter subject, etc. - The office receiving the letter shall be deemed to have received the letter,
8. What are the provisions in the Constitution of Nepal regarding the appointment and qualifications of the Chief Justice of Nepal and Supreme Court Judges? write Article 129 of the Constitution of Nepal has the following provisions regarding the appointment and qualifications of the Chief Justice of Nepal and the Supreme Court Judge: - In addition to the Chief Justice of Nepal, the Supreme Court shall have a maximum of twenty judges. The President appoints the Chief Justice on the recommendation of the Constitutional Council and other judges of the Supreme Court on the recommendation of the Judicial Council. The term of office of the Chief Justice is six years and if the position of the Chief Justice becomes vacant or if the Chief Justice is unable to perform his duties for any reason or if the Chief Justice is not present at the Supreme Court due to being on leave or going out of Nepal, there is a provision that the most senior judge of the Supreme Court shall act as the Chief Justice permanently. Eligibility for:- At least three years of service as a judge of the Supreme Court, Eligibility for appointment to the post of judge of the Supreme Court: - Having obtained a bachelor's degree in law and working as a chief justice or judge of the High Court for at least five years - Having obtained a bachelor's degree in law and having advocated continuously for at least fifteen years as a senior advocate or advocate, - At least fifteen years as a judge or Having continuously worked in the field of law and gaining fame as a distinguished jurist, - having worked for at least twelve years in a gazetted first class or higher position in the judicial service. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
1. Who are the successful players to be declared the best player of the year in the award program held on December 28, Bikram Samvat 2077? On the men's side: Mandekaji Shrestha and on the women's side: Gaurika Singh - Under the Pulsar Sports Awards 2076, Gaurika Singh and Mandekaji Shrestha were declared the best players of the year. - Taekwondo head coach Naveen Kumar Shrestha was declared 'Best Coach of the Year', Women's National Volleyball Team was declared 'Team of the Year 2076' under the award. Similarly, Taekwondo's Ayesha Shakya and Athletics' Santoshi Shrestha were honored with the 'Special Award of the Year'.- Para cricket team captain Digamsingh Chemjong was honored with the 'Para Athletic Award'. Honored.- Volleyball captain Aruna Shahi won the People's Choice title.- Subas Shrestha of golf was declared the best young player.
2. Who is the first American president to face impeachment for the second time? Donald Trump.- On January 7, 2020, Trump supporters entered the US Parliament building at the Capitol House and created a disturbance. On the day considered as the worst day in American history, Trump has been accused of inciting his supporters and expressing violence. Seven people were killed in police action while controlling violent activities by Trump supporters. 
3. In which district is the longest part of National Pride Road Project Madhyapahari Lokmarg? Baglung (137 km). 
4. When was Nepal Oil Corporation Limited established? December 26, 2027.- It was established as a private company under the Companies Act-2021 on December 26, 2027.- The corporation was changed to a public company on July 6, 2033.
5. What is the slogan of National Yoga Day celebrated on January 1, 2077? Let's keep doing yoga, covid will go away. 
6. When is International Customs Day celebrated? January 26. 
7. When did Nepal get the membership of Association of National Numbering Agencies (ANNA)? June 23, 2016.- Anna has been working on the credibility development of the mortgage market. Its headquarters is in Germany. 
8. When will India start the vaccination campaign against Corona? January 16, 2021.- (Indian Prime Minister Narendra Modi inaugurated the campaign which is regarded as the world's largest vaccination campaign. The aim of this program is to vaccinate more than one billion and 30 million people against the corona virus.) 
9. How high in the atmosphere is the ozone layer? 25-40 km.
10. IUCN has divided the endangered and rare animals into how many parts (status)? 5 (endangered, endangered, highly sensitive, rare and endangered). 
11. What is the main purpose of setting up cytis? Protection and promotion of rare animals and birds. 
12. Which is the team that holds the record by successfully climbing Mt K To for the first time in winter? Nepalese team (January 16, 2021).- The team led by Changdawa Sherpa of Seven Summit Trekking has reached the peak of Mount Ketu.- The height of Mount Ketu is 8,611 meters.
13. When did the government of Nepal launch the 'Citizen App' with the slogan 'Communication and Information Technology Support, Hand in Hand Government Services'? January 2, 2077.- The government launched this app with the goal of providing government services to the citizens by making the highest use of communication and information technology.- Through this app, details of citizenship, passport, educational certificate and voter ID card can be obtained. You can get PAN number by applying for the card, and you can also get information about taxes paid to the government through the mobile set itself. The details of any one of the voter or passport should be mentioned.- In the future, the app will include property tax, land reform, vehicle tax,
14. By what period has the government set a program to create digital Nepal? Year 2025. 
15. When was the Nepal 'Passport' app launched so that the passport form can be filled through the mobile app? December 19, 2073. 
16. Currently (January 2077), how many districts have reached the implementation of health insurance? 64 (64th district: Lamjung) - Health insurance program started in Lamjung from 2nd January 2077. Now it is yet to be expanded to 13 districts.- There is a plan to implement this program in all 77 districts of Nepal in the coming financial year. 
17. Which local level is conducting the 'Zero Home Delivery' campaign with the aim of reducing child and maternal mortality? Malika Rural Municipality, Gulmi.- (As part of the campaign, a green flag was buried in the house of a pregnant woman in that rural municipality.)
18. When was the decision to establish a policy research institute made by the Cabinet meeting of the Government of Nepal? 2075 October 5. 
19. How many castes of Nepal have been classified as minority castes by the government? 98 (2074 Baisakh 8). 
20. What is the process of the earth rotating on its axis called? circumambulation – (Earth rotates once on its axis in 23 hours 56 minutes 4.09 seconds.) 
21. What is the name of the fire lit by a saint? tune 
22. 'Ramcharitra Manas' of ancient times and 'Kushnayana' of modern times are famous epics in which language? duration 
23. What is meant by trade deficit? Import trade is more than export trade. 
24. What is the lake called when the river is blocked by the snow (rocks, soil, sand, weeds etc.) brought by the glacier? Himodha lake.
25. When was the construction of the long-awaited national pride postal route connecting Terai-Madhesi districts formally started? Financial year 2065/066.- Until now (December 2077), the overall physical progress of the project has reached 56 percent. - When the construction of the project was started, it was said to be completed in the year 2074/075, but later it was revised and extended to the year 2079/080. likewise,
26. Badghar custom is prevalent in which community? Tharu. 
27. What is the length of the single span suspension bridge that connects Baglung's Ramrekha to the side of the mountain? 567 meters.- The construction of the bridge was completed in April 2077 and was inaugurated by the Speaker of the National Assembly Ganesh Timilsana on January 3, 2077. The longest single bridge in the country is in the form of a suspension bridge.- The longest suspension bridge in Nepal is a bridge (1452.96 meters) built over the Mahakali river connecting Chandni and Dodhara. 
28. Which mountain region is known as Moddar mountain region? Mahabharata mountain.- (The upper part of the curved mountain is called Pratinati and the lower part is called Sannati.) 
29. Which is the wind that flows from the sea to the land in summer and from the land to the sea in winter? Monsoon wind. 
30. How many types of monsoon air? Two (summer monsoon and winter monsoon).
31. Who is the king who reigned for the longest time in Shah dynasty history? Shri 5 Tribhuvan. 
Presenter: Tank KC 
Role of Parliamentary Committee
1. Why are parliamentary committees formed? Discuss the role that parliamentary committees play in promoting good governance. Parliament is large (number of members is large). It is impossible to hold a parliament session at any time. There is more party influence in the parliament, it is not possible to invite subject experts, it is also difficult to reach a consensus on the bills after regular discussion. Therefore, taking into account the knowledge, experience and background of the members of the parliament, the parliamentary committee is formed in a small size so that all the members are represented as much as possible. This is the main reason for forming parliamentary committees. Other reasons are as follows: - To reduce the work load and time of the Parliament, - To discuss the Bill in a comprehensive, intensive and detailed manner - To rise above party politics and discuss the subject matter fairly, - To prepare a common vision without being partisan, - To facilitate, the recognition of parliamentary values to promote, - To make the government responsible and accountable by making the parliamentary system more effective, - Under the federal parliament of Nepal, there are 16 parliamentary committees in total, consisting of ten in the House of Representatives, four in the National Assembly and two joint committees representing both houses. - The role played by the parliamentary committee to promote good governance - In the parliamentary committee, all the actions of the government are evaluated, there is extensive discussion, and if there are weaknesses, instructions are given for improvement. By making the government responsible through these actions, emphasis is placed on increasing transparency in government activities. Good governance will be promoted through such activities. Its other roles can be mentioned as follows: - To study and analyze the state of implementation of the government's annual policies and programs and give instructions to make them more effective.
2. What are the basic principles of office management? Office management is the task of managing all the human, physical, informational, and financial resources in the office to deliver goods and services. These and the combination of these subjects are the principles of office management, which are as follows: - Goals and objectives, - Goods and services, - Organizational structure, - Human resources, - Physical resources, - Information and communication, - Economic / financial means, - Policies, Acts, Rules, Laws, Laws, Procedures, Action Plans, Principles and Values, Values, Service Providers and Service Receivers.
3. In the constitution of Nepal, what kind of policies has the state made? In Article 51 of the Constitution of Nepal, the state has made a policy on the following matters:- (a) Policy on national unity and national security- (b) Policy on political and governance- (c) Policy on social and cultural transformation- (d) Economy, industry and Policy on commerce – (e) Policy on agriculture and land reform – (f) Policy on development – ​​(g) Policy on conservation, promotion and use of natural resources – (h) Policy on basic needs of citizens – (i) Policy on labor and employment – ​​(j) Social Policy on Justice and Inclusion – (k) Policy on Justice and Criminal Justice – (l) Policy on Tourism – (d) Policy on International Relations
4. What are the challenges in manpower development in Nepal? write There are various challenges in manpower development in Nepal, which can be presented as follows:- a. Lack of quality education, even though there is provision of free education up to secondary level, there is lack of access to education. - b. Lack of training and skill development, lack of professional and employment-oriented training and skills. - c. Through study visits, sufficient knowledge, experience, and information are exchanged, which is lacking in Nepal.- d. Although there is a right to information system, there is a lack of access to information in the name of privacy. - Research/discovery develops new values, it is an essential principle of human development, there is less investment in it, less importance is given to it in Nepal. - f. Although basic health services are provided free of charge, there is a lack of access to health, there is a lack of quality health services, and it has become a compulsion to get expensive health services from private sector hospitals. - Six. Food nutrition is a human need, there is a lack of food in remote areas, there is a lack of knowledge about nutritious food, which has a direct impact on human development. - J. The situation of employment and income generation in Nepal is weak. Due to this, it has an effect on education, health and nutrition. Unemployment has increased, poverty has increased. As a whole, there is a weakness in every field of human development. This is the big challenge of human development.
5. What are the functions of microfinance institutions? Mention. Banks and financial institutions in Nepal are divided into "A", "B", "C" and "D" categories on the basis of minimum paid-up capital, financial transactions and scope of work. Commercial banks and infrastructure development banks are classified as "A", "B" for development banks, "C" for finance companies and "D" for microfinance institutions. At present, the number of microfinance institutions belonging to the "D" category in Nepal has reached 85. The activities (banking and financial transactions) performed by this microfinance institution can be mentioned as follows: - Deposit acceptance and payment: The conditions set by the bank with the approval of Nepal Rastra Bank are subject to restrictions. Accepting deposits and giving payment of such deposits, - Microcredit disbursement: providing microloans to operate small businesses, - Obtaining and using loans and grants: Banks and financial institutions,
6. Discuss the arrangements related to leadership development in civil service of Nepal. Leadership is the ability and skill to mobilize subordinates to achieve the objectives and goals of the organization. In order to build competent and efficient leadership in the civil service of Nepal, there are various provisions related to leadership development in the Civil Service Act-2049 and Civil Service Regulations-2050, which can be discussed as follows: a. Appointment:- Only people recommended by the Public Service Commission and the Promotion Committee on the basis of merit will be appointed in the civil service, b. Posting:- Arrangements to be appointed on the basis of educational qualification, training and experience, the ability to bear leadership should also be taken into account when being appointed to the position of departmental head, joint secretary, provision of performance agreement for the designated departmental head and office head, c. Arrangement of services, groups and sub-groups: - Presently 10 services, Arrangement of 50 groups and 42 sub-groups, gazetted special category, grouping of 6 services for the purpose of specialization of service up to secretary, arrangement of appointment and transfer of secretaries to the positions of grouping based on qualifications and experience, arrangement for promotions of secretaries to be promoted only from among the co-secretaries in the related grouping service, d. Provision for admission:- 10% open competition for the post of joint secretary and deputy secretary, candidates under 45 years of age with specified educational qualification and experience can be candidates, minimum educational qualification is a master's degree in a related subject, in case of experience, deputy secretary and joint secretary in official level positions of government or organizations established according to prevailing laws For five years and seven years of experience respectively, if there is a bachelor's degree, the experience period will be reduced by two years, e. Leadership evaluation system:- System of leadership evaluation committee to evaluate the leadership of joint secretary or above civil servants, f. Provision of training:- Domestic and foreign training, provision of educational studies and study tours, clear legal basis for the distribution of such opportunities. Arrangement of transfer:- Arrangement of transfer schedule, basis of transfer clearly defined, arrangement of timed transfer to give experience of geographical area, j. Arrangement of promotion:- Promotion based on seniority, efficiency, performance evaluation, educational qualification, training, experience of working in geographical area etc., involvement of Public Service Commission, arrangement of promotion committee, etc. Provision of reward and punishment: - Provision of reward and punishment based on performance, provision of a clear basis in the law and regulations, j. Retirement arrangement:- Provision of clear legal basis for retirement, Chief Secretary 3 years and Secretary 5 years tenure,
7. What are the characteristics of management? Management is the act of planning, coordinating, controlling and managing the resources available to achieve the set objectives and goals. The following are the characteristics of management that emphasize the completion of overall tasks at reasonable cost, time and quality: - Having certain goals and objectives, - Organizational structure is necessary, - Art, skill, skill, - Continuous process, indispensability and high importance of human resources, - Dynamic work. , Resource-based, - Inevitability of information flow, - Law-based, - Use of principles and values, environment-oriented. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
1. Since when has the Bagmati clean-up campaign entered four hundred weeks? Vikram Samvat 25th December 2077.- During the Bagmati clean-up campaign which started on May 5, 2070, more than 20,000 metric tons of waste has been removed from the river. According to the Civilization Integrated Development Committee. Kathmandu metropolis is also joining hands in this campaign. - The Kagmati River has been returned to its old drainage area in an area of ​​about seven kilometers from Sundarijal to Gokarna. Based on the survey map of 2021, when the river was returned, the local landowners got 1,100 ropani of land. An agreement was reached between the empowered Bagmati Civilization Integrated Development Committee and the Nepali Army on December 19, 2066 to return Bagmati to its original state.
2. Who was awarded the Haritara Movie Award of 2076? Lyricist Sahdev Dhuddhana.- (The Haritara Movie Award of 2075 was awarded to actors Madandas Shrestha and Krishna Malla.) 
3. According to the report published by the World Bank on 21st January 2077, what is the estimated economic growth rate of Nepal in the financial year 2077-078? 0.6 percent.- In the next financial year, the improvement in the economy of Nepal may reach 2.5 percent, according to the same bank. - The report mentions that among the South Asian countries, the growth rate of India and Bhutan will be negative by 9.6 percent and 0.7 percent respectively. The World Bank estimates that the growth rate of Bangladesh will be 1.6 percent and that of Pakistan will be 0.5 percent.- The Bank estimates that the economic growth rate of the entire South Asian country will reach 3.3 percent on average in 2021.
4. According to the statistics published by the Department of Cooperatives on December 20, 2077, what is the current number of cooperatives in Nepal? 29 thousand 886. 
5. Where is the Secretariat of BIMSTEC? Dhaka (Badhaladesh) 
6. Which is the first conservation area established in Nepal? Annapurna Conservation Area.
7. How many years has the Asian Development Bank (ADB) published a strategy (Country Partnership Strategy CPS) for Nepal? Five years. - The strategy prepared by ADB in collaboration with Nepal for 2020 to 2024 will make a significant contribution to the economic and social development of Nepal in the future. .- ADB said that the strategy focused on three areas, namely investment infrastructure development, improved services and environmental sustainability, will help Nepal's high economic growth, poverty alleviation, and improvement of living standards. 
8. Who is the first woman Deputy Prime Minister of Nepal? Shailaja Acharya. 
9. Which peace treaty was signed after the fall of Napoleon Bonaparte? Treaty of Paris.
10. When was the National Climate Conference held at Gufadanda, Melamchi Municipality, Sindhupalchok? 16th and 17th December 2075. - The National Climate Conference issued a 10-point Gufadanda Manifesto for climate adaptation and mitigation of its effects. - It is mentioned in the Gufadanda Manifesto that it emphasizes increasing public awareness by encouraging scientific research and research on climate change and its effects. The Gufadanda Conference announced the initiative to establish climate measurement centers in every rural municipality and municipality to identify scientific facts and realities about climate change and its effects. 
11. What is the main carbon that destroys the ozone layer of the earth? Chlorofluorocarbon.
12. Who is Siddhartha Gautama Buddha's religious wife? Yashodhara.- It is believed that Yashodhara was born from the womb of Amrita and Suppabuddha in Devdah of Koliya state in the eastern region of Rupandehi district.- A son Rahul was born from the womb of Siddhartha and Yashodhara. 
13. When was the printing press (printing machine) started in Nepal? Year 1908.- This press was brought by Rana Prime Minister Jaddha Bahadur from Britain. It is known as Gidhe Press because of the image of a vulture on its head. Gorkhapatra was printed on this. After Gidhe Press, 'Manoranjan Press' was established as the second press. 
14. Which is the lowest valley in the world? Arun Valley (located in the lap of Makalu Himal).
15. Which is the world's long-distance air service? Australia's national flag carrier Qantas. - (After a direct flight of about 19 hours, the Qantas passenger plane landed from New York to Sydney, Australia on October 20, 2019.) 
16. When was Martin Luther King's assassination? April 4, 1998 (by James Earl Ray). 
17. What is the period of the national strategy draft of nature conservation for public sustainable development in 2073? 2072-2087. 
18. Who is the first Prime Minister of Nepal to address the United Nations General Assembly as the head of government? BP Koirala. 
19. If Machhapuchche Himal is known as Kumari Himal, which mountain is known as White Himal? Dhaulagiri Himal.
20. What is the list of endangered wild animals prepared by IUCN known as? Red Data Book. 
21. Changunarayan Temple is a temple built in which style? Pagoda. 
22. What is the length of the electric railway to be constructed from Kakkadbhita in Jhapa to Gaddachouki in Kanchanpur? 945 km. 
23. Who is there to order compensation according to the law to the person who suffered from the violation of human rights? National Human Rights Commission. 
24. A tiger's cub is called Damaru, and what is a camel's cub called? Owl. 
25. When was the foundation stone of the dry port laid in Rasuwa's Gosarinkunda rural municipality-2 Timure? November 4, 2076.- A memorandum of understanding was signed between Nepal and China on May 29, 2076 for the construction of the dry port, which aims to be completed in two and a half years.
26. When was the foundation stone of Nagahuddha-Naubise tunnel laid? November 4, 2076.- The Japanese company Hazma-Ando GV ​​will build this tunnel. The length of the tunnel will be 2.68 km.- The Japanese International Cooperation Agency (JICA) for the construction of the tunnel prepared a preliminary study in 2015 and a DPR for a 2.7 km long tunnel in 2018. About two and a half kilometers access road, seven bridges, 11 culverts and two flyover bridges will be built to reach the said tunnel towards Dhading and Kathmandu. 
27. Which is the mobile app launched by the Nepal Tourism Board covering major tourist destinations and various activities related to tourism? Welcome Nepal (released on the occasion of New Year 2074).
28. When did the Piskar scandal take place? January 1, 2040. 
29. Mahakavi Lakshmi Prasad Devkota became the education minister during the time of which prime minister? KI Singh. 
30. 'Unity Journal' is a journal published by which security agency? Nepali Army. - The unity journal published by the Army for the first time was released on Army Day and Mahashivratri festival (2076). - It is said that Unity Journal will be important for intellectual participation and in-depth study and discovery of issues such as security, economy, climate, change, and international relations. Presenter: Tank KC 
who is in the Constitutional Council
1. Mention the method of formation of the Constitutional Council according to the Constitution of Nepal. Article 284 of the Constitution of Nepal has provisions related to the method of formation of the Constitutional Council to recommend the appointment of the Chief Justice of Nepal, heads of constitutional bodies and officers, which can be mentioned as follows: (a) Prime Minister – Chairman (b) Chief Justice – Member (c) Speaker of the House of Representatives - Member (d) Speaker of the National Assembly - Member (e) Leader of the Opposition Party in the House of Representatives - Member (f) Deputy Speaker of the House of Representatives - Member When the position of the Chief Justice is vacant, the Minister of Law and Justice shall remain as a member in the Constitutional Council when recommending the appointment of the Chief Justice. The Chief Secretary shall act as the Secretary of the Constitutional Council, one month before the post becomes vacant, or within one month of the vacancy due to death or resignation.
2. What is climate change? Write the measures to be taken to reduce the effects of climate change. The sun's light and heat will reach the earth through a kind of layer formed in the atmosphere from carbon dioxide, methane and other gases produced by increasing industrialization, but the earth's heat cannot be released into the atmosphere, and the temperature of the earth will rise and the weather will change, this is called climate change. Measures to be taken to reduce the impact of climate change Climate change is caused by gas emissions including carbon dioxide, so such gas emissions from industries, factories, transportation and human activities should be minimized. The following measures should be taken to reduce the impact of climate change: preventing deforestation due to poverty and other causes, making human activities and development processes environmentally friendly, institutionalizing environmental impact assessment, Determining and implementing pollution standards, implementing international treaties and conventions related to environmental protection and climate change, adopting the concept of green economy, formulating and implementing low carbon emission development strategies, increasing public awareness on environmental protection, proper waste management, orderly urbanization and proper Arranging housing, making environmental monitoring, inspection and reporting work effective and maintaining environmental governance, making the environment department more active for this work. 3. Write a short comment. (a) Food security Adequate production of food, proper storage and easy supply according to demand is called food security. This is a situation where there is no food crisis. It believes that everyone should have easy access to food. gas, bass, Cotton is one of the basic needs of people. It is the natural right of everyone to get adequate and suitable nutritional food after being born as a human being. The Constitution of Nepal includes food security as a fundamental right and stipulates in Article 36 that every citizen has the right to food. All people are not always treated with equal service facilities and opportunities. Therefore, it is the responsibility of the welfare state to treat the groups with special problems and difficulties with special priority and concessions. This is social security. The Constitution of Nepal includes social security as a fundamental right and provides for the right to social security in Article 43. The security of social service facilities provided by the state to the unemployed and backward classes is called social security. All people are not always treated with equal service facilities and opportunities. Therefore, it is the responsibility of the welfare state to treat the groups with special problems and difficulties with special priority and concessions. This is social security. The Constitution of Nepal includes social security as a fundamental right and provides for the right to social security in Article 43.
4. Briefly discuss the role of private sector in Nepal's economic development. The overall development of the economy is economic development. Economic development occurs when economic growth is high, sustainable, broad and fair. Since the constitution of Nepal has a policy to develop the economy in the country through government, cooperatives and private sector, it is clear that the private sector has an important role in economic development among these three carriers. The role it plays in the economic development of the country can be discussed in the following points: increasing the production and productivity of goods and services, creating employment, creating a competitive environment, controlling price increases, increasing exports, making maximum use of our own knowledge, skills, experience and capital. Introducing new technologies in the country, earning foreign currency, contributing to revenue collection, aspects of economic development, manpower, agriculture, industry, trade,
5. What is civic education? Write in short. Education given to make a person a good character citizen is called civic education. This is the teaching of self-governance. It is also an act of awareness, debate and advocacy. Civic education makes every citizen conscious and aware of their rights and duties. It enables individuals to reach their own potential by exposing their inherent potential. It develops the ability of self-determination, self-management and self-control. The purpose of civic education is to create competent, cultured and responsible citizens. Civic education helps to make the way of life of democracy systematic and functional. 6. What is Management Information System? Explain its importance to the office. In the management information system office, management decides, Policy making and planning should be done. Management Information System (MIS) is a mechanism that collects, processes and submits the information and data required for such tasks to the management and supports the management. Its purpose is to make the office successful by assisting the management in managerial work. In the decision-making process of the management information system in the office, reliable information is available and the decision-making process is fast, the right decision is made, the decision is enforceable, the managerial tasks performed by the management are edited quickly and reliably, the management should control and coordinate all the work of the office. Its use makes this task more organized. In the current era of competition, its use increases the efficiency and effectiveness of the office. It helps to create implementable policies and plans. Overall, it helps to make the office competent, competitive, professional.
7. Throw light on the meaning and significance of the law. Law is the sovereign rule applied by the state to regulate human behavior and conduct. Law is a collective form of rules, which regulates the entire area of ​​the country. Laws include constitutions, acts, rules, regulations, orders, directives, circulars, etc. Laws are basically created by the legislature, implemented by the executive and interpreted by the judiciary. The significance of the law covers the entire area of ​​the country, so the significance of the law is multifaceted and multilateral. Its importance can be highlighted as follows: - To maintain peace and security and justice in the society, to organize human behavior and conduct, to bring changes in the society, to maintain equality in the society, to remove economic inequality, to make a judicial system of distribution, to end the access of limited people to the economy, to protect the country To defend, to ensure the rights of the people.
8. Mention the role of service providers in public service delivery. The services provided by the government to the common people are public services. All the public servants who deliver this public service to the doorsteps of the people on behalf of the government are service providers. The role of these service providers in public service delivery is multifaceted. Which can be mentioned from the following points: Acting as a representative of the government and bringing public service facilities to people's doorsteps in an easy, accessible and simple way, maintaining fairness in service delivery, being committed to service delivery, providing services by maintaining frugality, following laws and regulations Providing services, helping to further strengthen the relationship between the government and the people through service delivery, speeding up service delivery using modern technology, providing quality services within the prescribed cost and time,
9. Mention the objectives of government budget. Discuss the budget formulation process of Nepal. The government budget is the estimated statement of income and expenditure of the government. This is the policy and program of the government. The paramount purpose of the government budget is to manage government income and expenditure and distribute resources for social welfare. Its other objectives are as follows: To determine the functions and responsibilities of the government, to create employment opportunities, to increase the economy, to maintain economic stability, to assist in maintaining social justice, to maximize the mobilization of resources, to assist in the implementation of periodic plans, the budget formulation process of Nepal. There are legal and institutional arrangements to regulate the drafting process. There is a constitutional provision in budget formulation. There are economic procedure laws and regulations. Direction has been implemented in budget formulation. Ministry of Finance, The National Planning Commission and related ministries are active in the budget formulation process. The budget formulation process of Nepal is found to be as follows: (a) Expenditure estimate/expenditure estimate (b) Income estimate (c) Budget draft preparation (d) Budget presentation, discussion and passage in the parliament (e) Budget implementation (f) Budget monitoring and evaluation. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
1. When did the British Parliament pass the Brexit trade agreement with the European Union? December 30, 2020. 
2. Expressing his reluctance to live in Britain after Brexit, the father of British Prime Minister Boris Johnson has applied for the citizenship of which country? His mother was born in France. Stan Johnson supported Britain's membership of the European Union in the 2016 referendum. He has stated that he will always be a European and said, 'It is certain that you cannot call me British.'
3. Who won the title of the Prime Minister's Cup National Women's T-20 cricket tournament held in Dang in December 2077? Province 1. (Province 1 defeated the defending champion APF Club by 6 runs. Along with the title, Province 1 received five lakhs in cash and the runner-up APF received three lakhs.)
4. Which two vaccines against Corona have been approved for use in India? Serum Institute of India and Bharat Biotech vaccines. These two vaccines are allowed to be used in emergency situations. Officials said that even though the vaccine does no harm, it can have some auxiliary effects. The Office of the Drug Controller of India said that the serum vaccine met the standards set on January 1 and 2, 2021. Bharat Biotech's vaccine is ICMR and National Institute of The official also said that it was jointly developed by Virology. Two doses of serum and Bharat Biotech's vaccine will be required, and this vaccine can be stored at two to eight degrees Celsius. It is prohibited to use this vaccine under normal or regular conditions. According to the official, the work of its development and testing is still going on. The vaccine against corona virus prepared by Sinopharm, a Chinese state-owned drug manufacturing company, Biological Products Institute Limited, has been allowed to be used in China and India. The vaccine produced by the said company has been tested up to three stages.
5. When is the International Nepali Topi Day celebrated? January 1. The International Nepali Topi Day has been celebrated in Nepal since January 1st, 2014. Some leaders say that the influence of western culture is increasing in the country. Started celebrating.
6. 12 brothers and sisters from the same family, which is the family that succeeded in holding the world record for the highest age? De Cruz. A family of 12 brothers and sisters with a total age of 1,042 years has managed to hold a Guinness world record. According to Guinness, the age of the De Cruz family is theirs. 75 to 97 years old. Guinness awarded the certificate because the world record was set by adding all the ages of 12 brothers and sisters alive on December 15, 2020. Those brothers and sisters who were born in Pakistan are currently living in America, Britain, Switzerland and other countries.
7. Since when has Nepal Telecom been operating IP TV service through Fiber to the Home under ATTV brand? Vikram Samvat 2077 Pus 17. Currently, Telecom is providing voice service and data service through FTTH service, now it is going to add IP TV service as well. The company that needs access to FTTH network for ATTV service. reported. 
8. When was the trade agreement called 'RCEP' signed by the 15 countries of the Asia Pacific region? November 15, 2020. China, Japan, South Korea, Australia and New Zealand were among the parties to the agreement. A similar trade agreement was also signed between Europe, America and Mexico. China's view of RCEP brought 
9. Trimurti Niketan gave the Devkota Poetry Award (2077) to whom? Poet Shailendra Sakar. 
10. Who is known as Shah Jahan of Nepal? Khadgashamsher.
11. Which region is understood as Adiprayag? Devghat. 
12. Since when was there a tourist police system in Nepal? Year 2035. 
13. Where is the famous religious and touristic place Sundravati Setidevi Kund located? Dolakha.- There are seven wonderful and attractive kundas in the same rock around Sundravati Setidevi Temple. - A big fair is held in Sundravati Setidevi Kunda on festivals like Ekadashi, Ram Navami, Phagupurnima. 
14. When was the successful test of the watercraft under construction for commercial operation in the Narayani river of Chitwan?
15. Who is the successful footballer who won the 'Player of the Century' award at the Soccer Awards held in December 2020? Cristiano Ronaldo. He was chosen as the winner based on his success from 2001 to 2020. Similarly, Pep Guardiola, the manager of Manchester City, was awarded the best coach award. Also, Spanish La Liga club Real Madrid was given the 'Club of the Century' award. Likewise, Bayern's striker Robert Lewandowski was awarded the best male footballer of the year 2020, Bayern's Hansi Flick was awarded the best coach of the year, and Bayern received the best team of the year award.
16. When was Nepal's (WTO) trade policy reviewed for the first time in the World Trade Organization? Year 2012. - The second review of Nepal's trade policy was held on December 3 to 5, 2018. Likewise, the next trade policy of Nepal will be reviewed in the year 2025.- (WTO) The trade policy of underdeveloped member countries is reviewed every six years. 
17. Which is the first country in the world to measure success based on citizen health? New Zealand. 
18. Since when was the senior citizens day celebrated in Nepal? Year 2062. 
19. Which station did the work of the current civil library first? Commandery Library.
20. Where was Nepal's National Vibhuti Balbhadra Kunwar born? Kavrepalanchok. He was born on 15th Paush 1845 B.S. as the youngest son of Subba Chandraveer Kunwar and Ambikadevi at Bhamarkot in Panchkhaal municipality of Kavrepalanchok district. Her paternal grandfather is Sardar Jayakrishna Kunwar and Mavali's grandfather is Amarsingh Thapa. He was the captain of the old Gorakh Gana of the Nepali Army. He led around 600 people on behalf of Nepal to defend Nalapani during the British-Nepal war. Despite the defeat of the Nepalese in that war, the British army, appreciating the bravery of Nepali, installed an inscription saying ``Samannopahar'' in the memory of our brave enemy Balabhadra and his brave Gorkhali, and honored each body with a dosalla odha.
21. National Bibhuti Balbhadra Kunvar park with salik has been built where? Dhulikhel Napa-9, Devisthan (Kavre). 
22. When did the historic meeting between North Korean Supreme Leader Kim Jong Un and South Korean President Moon Jae In take place? April 27, 2018. 
23. Which is the first district of Nepal where the Bio Village model program was conducted? Tanahun. 
24. Which constitution declared Nepal as a Hindu state for the first time? Constitution of Nepal-2019. 
25. What is the name of the movement in Iraq in 2005? Purple Revolution. 
26. Since when was the 'locking system' arranged with the aim of preventing the fuel imported from India from leaking on the way? 2075 Baisakh 11 
27. When did the Internal Revenue Department start the central tax system? December 1, 2074.
28. When was the Quick Action Team (Quick Action Team) formed to control air pollution in Kathmandu Valley? 
29. When is European Union Day celebrated? May 9. 
30. Administrative Reorganization Planning Commission-2013 Who is the chairmanship of the Commission? Tank Prasad Acharya. Presenter: Tank KC
It is the duty of every country to provide opportunities through a fair competitive method for those who want to enter the national service through civil service, it is a citizen's right to get such an opportunity. The Constitution of Nepal has guaranteed such a right under the right to equality. Such rights are considered not only the beauty of democracy, but also the basic foundation. With the establishment of democracy in Bikram Samvat 2007, the Public Service Commission was established on June 1, 2008 with the aim of appointing civil servants from special independent and autonomous bodies. In Article 242 of the Constitution of Nepal, the Public Service Commission has been provided with constitutional status and responsibility. Section 243 provides that the Commission's functions, Duties and rights have been specified. According to the federal government structure adopted by Nepal, Article 244 of the Constitution provides for the presence of Provincial Public Service Commissions in all seven provinces. As federal and state public service commission is a new practice in Nepal, there is a need for gradual improvement and modification. The Public Service Commission has the status of a federal commission. The commission has clarified the need for an institutional structure for coordination between the three levels of administrative mechanisms in accordance with the federal structure. The view of the commission to make service delivery effective by eliminating some deficiencies in the current administrative procedure has been publicized. According to the Public Service Act-2066, the functioning commission has to work according to the Constitution of Nepal, and in some respects, problems have been seen. The constitution expands the jurisdiction of the commission, except for the university and teacher service commission, and the government of Nepal owns 50 percent or more shares or equity. Owned or controlled institutes, companies, banks, committees or commissions, institutes, authorities, corporations, foundations, boards, centers, councils and other organized organizations of a similar nature, established as per federal law or constituted by the Government of Nepal. For this too, the commission should be made a wider environment. Also, it is seen that a clear law should be made regarding the division of duties and responsibilities between the Public Service Commission and the State Public Service Commission. The commission said that the suggestions made from time to time for the improvement of the public service have not been implemented as expected, and it expects the suggestions given in the last three annual reports to be included in the Federal Civil Service Act. In the sixth and final report (2076/077) after the appointment of the current officers of the Commission, since the term of office of all the officers of the Commission will expire on the 10th of March, civil, The Commission has indicated the need to appoint the officers of the Commission on time so as not to stall the process of filling the posts of security agencies and organized organizations. In order to make the Commission agile and active, it is necessary to amend the laws in time, draft them and make them full of resources. According to the constitutional obligation, not only the appointment of employees, but also the Nepali Army, Nepal Police, Armed Police Force, The Public Service Commission should be consulted on the general principles to be adopted for promotion to posts in Nepal and other federal government services. Similarly, the Public Service Commission should be consulted about the law related to the service conditions of employees of an organized organization and the general principles to be adopted in the promotion and departmental action of such service posts, but in some cases, it seems that such actions are done by ignoring the Public Service Commission. Amnepali has basically become the center of faith of the youth who want to enter the national service, the Public Service Commission is lively in the fairness and neutrality of its administration. Since history, the commission has gained confidence in the appointment of civil servants. In the case of other organized organizations, the commission is bound to be strong in the responsibilities given by the constitution and law. The public service commissions (central/federal) have earned the same trust that the state public service commissions also have to establish a foundation of trust. In order to create such an environment, it is necessary to strengthen the coordination hand of the government and all related parties and create competent Public Service Commission(s).
 
Kathmandu, December 16th. President of Public Service Commission Umesh Prasad Mainali told President Bidya Devi Bhandari about the financial year of the Commission 2076. The annual report of 077 has been submitted. In accordance with Article 294 of the Constitution of Nepal, the report was submitted today at Rashtrapati Bhawan, Sheetal Niwas, the Assistant Spokesperson of the President's Office, Keshav Prasad Ghimire, informed through a statement.
Problems of foreign employment 1. What are the problems seen in foreign employment in Nepal? write Ilam, work, profession, trade, business done abroad for living is foreign employment. Legal and institutional arrangements have been made to manage foreign employment in Nepal, but foreign employment has not been limited. Various problems have been seen in it, which can be mentioned as follows: a. Compulsory foreign employment: - Due to the lack of employment opportunities in the country, lack of respect for work, foreign employment has become compulsory rather than voluntary for Nepalis. b. Lack of accurate information: - There is a lack of accurate information about how many Nepali workers have worked in which country and under what conditions. The Foreign Employment Promotion Board is not seen to be active in this regard. c. The destination country that does not implement the commitment: - After going abroad, not doing the work as per the commitment, not providing facilities, giving low wages, Problems such as lack of health and safety have been observed. d. Weaknesses of the Foreign Employment Department: - The irresponsibility of the work of this department, which is the responsible body for the registration, renewal, and regulation of foreign employment professionals, has created problems rather than solving the problems. The main weakness of this department is not acting in accordance with the law, and not making the regulation of foreign employment professionals effective. e. Opaque employment professionals: - Some foreign employment professionals have a tendency to take more money from the workers, give false assurances, not send them abroad, do not get the work abroad, do not get money, and cheat. The non-transparent behavior and bad behavior of foreign employment professionals also seems to have created a big problem. f. Ineffectiveness of economic diplomacy: - Protection of the rights and interests of Nepalis working abroad, promotion of employment, rescue of those in trouble, relief, The role of Nepali diplomatic missions abroad has been seen to be weak in coordination and other tasks. is. Lack of skilled training:- Due to the lack of sufficient skilled training in the labor laws, language, lifestyle, work skills, etc. of the destination country, Nepalis have to do particularly difficult, risky and dirty work left by workers from other countries. Illegal emigration from outside Nepal: Apart from the 110 countries that are currently open for foreign employment, there is a situation where people from outside Nepal have gone abroad illegally from countries including India. J. Low mobilization of capital and skills obtained from abroad: - Capital, skills, knowledge, experience, and capabilities obtained from foreign employment have not been mobilized in the productive sector. J. Weak monitoring and evaluation: - The foreign employment department that registers, renews and regulates foreign employment professionals is itself problematic. Likewise, the high-level foreign employment coordination committee formed under the coordination of the Minister of Labor has not been able to effectively coordinate, monitor and evaluate foreign employment management work. 2. According to Article 292 of the Constitution of Nepal, there is a provision for a parliamentary hearing before the appointment of the following positions to be appointed on the recommendation of the Constitutional Council in Nepal:- a. The post of Chief Justice, – b. Post of Supreme Court Judge, – c. The position of a member of the Council of Justice, - d. The position of the head and office bearer of the constitutional body, - e. Ambassador's position, - For parliamentary hearings, a joint committee of 15 members will be formed, consisting of members of both houses of the federal parliament. According to Article 292 of the Constitution of Nepal, there is a provision for a parliamentary hearing before the appointment of the following positions to be appointed on the recommendation of the Constitutional Council in Nepal:- a. The post of Chief Justice, – b. Post of Supreme Court Judge, – c. The position of a member of the Council of Justice, - d. The position of the head and office bearer of the constitutional body, - e. Ambassador's position, - For parliamentary hearings, a joint committee of 15 members will be formed, consisting of members of both houses of the federal parliament. According to Article 292 of the Constitution of Nepal, there is a provision for a parliamentary hearing before the appointment of the following positions to be appointed on the recommendation of the Constitutional Council in Nepal:- a. The post of Chief Justice, – b. Post of Supreme Court Judge, – c. The position of a member of the Council of Justice, - d. The position of the head and office bearer of the constitutional body, - e. Ambassador's position, - For parliamentary hearings, a joint committee of 15 members will be formed, consisting of members of both houses of the federal parliament.
3. When selecting the candidate for the post of Armed Police Inspector, what kind of examination is there to be selected? There is a provision to select the candidate for the post of Armed Police Inspector through the following examination:- a. Initial physical examination, – b. Physical tolerance, - c. Detailed health examination, – d. Psychological Personality (IQ) Test, – e. Written examination, – f. Qualitative examination, - Ch. Special health examination, – h. Interview.
4. What should be the role of union, state and local level in achieving Nepal's national goal of 'Prosperous Nepal, Happy Nepali'? Discuss. The economic growth rate is high, sustainable, wide, fair and inclusive, and the overall economy is free and self-sufficient, and the independent and developed Nepal is a prosperous Nepal. All the Nepali citizens who live in this prosperous Nepal with health, education and high standard of living are happy Nepalis. In order to achieve the national goal of 'Prosperous Nepal, Happy Nepali' with a double digit economic growth rate, it seems that the current three levels of government in Nepal, the union, state and local levels, should have the following roles: The role of the union: - Playing a leading role in the country's prosperity and development, - Setting the national policy and plan. To do, - to determine the standards of regulation, to coordinate, to implement, - peace and security,Developing capacity by maintaining coordination, cooperation and coexistence, - Facilitating the activities of the private sector, non-governmental sector, cooperative sector, Role of the province: - Assisting and cooperating in achieving national thinking, goals and objectives, - Formulation of provincial policies, plans and programs, Implementing and monitoring, coordinating, - preparing a suitable environment for investment, - cooperating, coordinating, competing for development and prosperity between provinces and local levels, - maintaining good governance, - increasing employment, - providing services, - Developing institutional capacity, - Developing manpower, role of the local level: - Assisting and cooperating in achieving the goals and objectives of the development of the federation and the province, - Creating an investment environment, - Emphasis on local infrastructure, social and rural development with integrated thinking. Giving, - Expanding the local economy,- Increasing employment, - Developing human resources, - Delivering basic goods and services as the closest government to the people, - Maximizing the use of local resources, - Coordinating and collaborating with organizations operating at the local level, - Democracy, good governance from the local level, To institutionalize development and prosperity
5. What are the banking and financial transactions done by commercial banks? Mention. Banking and financial transactions that can be done by a commercial bank can be mentioned as follows: - Accepting deposits, - Mobilizing deposits, - Paying deposits, - Transactions of banking and financial transactions, - Intermediation work, - Money transfer, - Hire purchase, leasing , providing loans such as housing, overdrafts, - granting loans under the guarantee of foreign banks and financial institutions, - issuing bank guarantees, - refinancing from Nepal Rastra Bank, - granting loans from other banks and financial institutions, - writing off loans subject to prevailing laws, - Issuance of shares, debentures, debentures etc., - issuing, accepting, paying, discounting, buying and selling of promissory notes, bills of exchange, promissory notes, cheques, travelers cheques, drafts and other financial instruments;
6. Name any five communicable diseases. Any five communicable diseases are:- a. Tuberculosis, – b. Diarrhea, - c. Covid-19, corona virus - d. Typhoid, – e. Sexually transmitted diseases (Viridih / AIDS) 
7. What are the multifaceted principles of manpower development? Write. The multifaceted principles of manpower development are as follows:- a. Education – b. Training – c. Study tour – d. Information – E. Research – Search – f. Health- c. Nutrition – h. Employment/Earnings
8. How can biodiversity be protected in Nepal? Discuss. Protecting the habitat of living animals and plants and their genetic quality is biodiversity conservation. There is also a difference in biological diversity in each province of Nepal, which is divided into mountains, hills and plains. It is necessary to protect them. In Nepal, it can be protected as follows: - By studying the biodiversity in each geographical area of ​​Nepal, taking information about the status, habitat, and condition of each animal and formulating and implementing conservation programs accordingly, - By increasing the active participation of local organizations and communities in the protection of biological diversity, - Biodiversity By increasing public awareness about the importance of protecting forests, by increasing greenery, by conducting environmental protection programs, by reducing the use of forest resources, by protecting wild animals, by reducing the use of chemical fertilizers and pesticides, - By drafting and implementing laws to protect biological diversity, - By using religious and cultural traditions. For example: by awakening papil, tulsi, bel, rudraksha etc. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
1. Who is the person who has been declared 'Times Person of the Year-2020'? Newly elected American President Joe Biden and Vice President Kamala Harris.- Charles Lindbergh was declared 'Times Person of the Year' for the first time in 1927 by the US-based Times magazine. In 1999, Albert Einstein was declared 'Man of the Decade' and 'Person of the Century'. In 2019, the Times magazine declared 16-year-old environmental activist Greta Thanvarg as the Times Person of the Year. 
2. Who is the foreign personality who received honorary Nepali citizenship from Nepal government on January 12, 2020? Umm Dangil
3. Which is the first 'humanoid AI robot' developed by Nepal Institute of Science and Technology? Mechanical robot.- (Published on November 3, 2077) 
4. When is International Volunteer Day celebrated? December 5. 
5. In how many years is there a provision to review the reservation system in the civil service? Every 10 years. - (The provision of reservation in Nepal's civil service has been initiated from the year 2064 after the second amendment to the Civil Service Regulations.) 
6. Who is the scholar who said that 'politics without history has no root and history without politics has no fruit'? Sealy. 
7. According to the Constitution of Nepal (2072), who will be in charge of the general direction, control and operation of governance? Council of Ministers.
8. When was 'Rana Tharu' included in the tribal/tribe list? May 5, 2077.- Along with this, the number of people listed in the list of tribals and tribes has reached 60.
9. Who is the politician honored with America's prestigious 'Legion of Merit' award? Indian Prime Minister Narendra Modi (December 2020).- This award is given to US military officers including heads of other countries. Donald Trump himself proposed Prime Minister Modi's name for the honor. Apart from Prime Minister Modi, Trump has already given this honor to Australian Prime Minister Scott Morrison and former Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe. America has good relations with both those countries. To defeat China's challenge, the US has also formed the Quard along with India, Japan and Australia.
10. Since when was the provision made for civil servants to wear the same type of dress? 2068 July 1. 
11. In which place of Nepal will the cooperative museum be established? Chitwan.- (The process of building a national cooperative museum in Nepal's first cooperative organization 'Bakhan multi-purpose cooperative society' has been started.) 
12. Where has the first branch of Nepal Institute of Science and Technology (NAST) been expanded? Mahendranagar. - (For the first time in the 34-year history of NAST, a branch office was opened in the Far West Province.) 
13. Which is the oldest tennis tournament in the world? Wimbledon tennis tournament. - (First played at the All England Lawn Tennis and Croquet Club in 1877.)
14. Which international organization is going to support the construction of dry port and international exhibition place in Chobhar, Kathmandu? World Bank. 
15. In which districts has the gemstone processing product development center been established for precious metals, stone cutting and polishing? Dhading, Surkhet and Doti. 
16. The Supreme Court has to submit its annual report every year to whom? President. 
17. When was the new national health policy announced? 2076 June 16.- This policy was introduced with the aim of developing and expanding skilled manpower according to the population, geography and federal structure to make health services accessible, efficient and quality. - This policy is a roadmap for the development of the health system.
18. How many citizens have gone missing due to terrorist activities in Nigeria in the past decade? 22 thousand. - About 22,000 Nigerian citizens have gone missing since the terrorist organization Boko Haram started its attacks a decade ago. - This fact was revealed in a report published by the International Red Cross (ICRC) on September 12, 2019. This is the first time that the list of such a large number of missing citizens has been published.- Since 2009, Boko Haram has been carrying out an armed violent movement in Nigeria, as a result of which 27,000 people have died and about two million people have been displaced. 
19. Where was the Asia Pacific conference of Kiwanis International, an international organization working in the field of children, held recently? Nepal (March 2020).- (400 people including 300 foreign guests participated in the 45th conference of the Asia Pacific region.)
20. What is known as a fund established to reduce the risk of power purchase agreement (PPA) in US dollars to attract foreign investment in the development of hydropower sector? Hedging fund.- (After the establishment of the fund, the risk of foreign currency fluctuations will be borne through this fund. It is believed that the fund will help to increase foreign investment.) 
21. What is the environmental impact assessment that is done again on the proposal submitted to partially modify the physical infrastructure, design or form, transfer or change the structure, forest area or increase the capacity of the project in the environmental impact assessment proposal that has been approved once? Additional environmental impact assessment.
22. When was the first paper currency introduced in Nepal? Year 2002 October 1.- Rana Prime Minister Juddhashamsher issued an ordinance in Nepal and introduced paper currency from October 1, 2002. - For the first time Rs. 1 hundred, Rs. 10 and Rs. 5 rate paper notes were issued.- The treasurer who signed those notes issued by Sadar Mulukikhana was Janakraj. 
23. Which is the Nepali Airlines to get ISO 9001-2015 related to the prestigious Quality Management System (QMS)? Himalaya Airlines.- Himalaya Airlines, a Nepal-China joint venture, received the certificate in September 2020.- ISO 9001-2015 is a globally recognized quality standard developed and published by the International Organization for Standardization (ISO).
24. In collaboration with Canada's Fraser Institute and the Samruddhi Foundation, the report on economic freedom released in the year 2020 on September 10 - where is Nepal in 2020? 109th.- According to the report which was prepared covering 162 countries, Hong Kong, Siddapur, New Zealand, Switzerland and America managed to be among the top five countries. - The African Republic is among the countries with the least economic freedom. After that, the Democratic Republic of Kada, Zimbabwe, Republic of Kada, Algeria and Iran are there. - Among the various indicators related to determining economic freedom, Nepal ranks 71st in the credit, labor and business regulation index, 104th in the legal system and property rights index, 111th in the index of being able to conduct international trade freely, and 137th in the index related to access to cash. Out of 10 points determined for measuring economic freedom, Nepal scored 6. Obtained 48 marks. - In 2019, Nepal was ranked 110th in economic freedom index.
25. According to the Industrial Business Act-2076, an industry that exports more than what percentage of its production is called an 'export-oriented industry'? 40 percent (excluding energy industry). 
26. Which are the districts selected by the government in the first phase (one each of seven provinces) for the distribution of farmer classification identification cards? Jhapa (Province-1), Parsa (Province-2), Kavre (Bagmati), Kaski (Gandaki), Kapilvastu (Province-5), Surkhet (Karnali) and Kanchanpur (Far West). One person will be given an identity card. - Distribution of farmer classification ID cards has been done since July 2076. The distribution of farmer ID cards in Nepal has started from the financial year - 2071-072.
27. According to the Administrative Courts Act-2076, if the appellant retires from service or dies before the Supreme Court or the Administrative Court has decided the appeal, what is the provision regarding the appeal? Appeal should not be dismissed (must be final). 
28. Everest Bank is the first bank to start ATM card service, then which bank is the first to start internet banking? Kumari Bank.- The first bank to launch a credit card: Himalaya Bank). 
29. Since when has the provision of mandatory use of social media by public bodies to provide information to service users been implemented? 28 July 2075.
30. When was the approval from the Council of Ministers regarding the implementation of the Ministry Budget Information System in all the seven provinces for budget formulation? Year 2076 Baisakh 5 (from AW 2076-77). Presenter: Tank KC 
Expense Management 1. What is expense management? What are the areas that need to be improved? write Expenditure management is the task of reducing non-productive expenditure in current expenditure, maintaining thrift, increasing transparency and efficiency in capital expenditure and making expenditure productive. This is the work of increasing the efficiency of means and resources. It emphasizes on allocating public spending to priority areas with broad impact, quick returns. Areas to be improved in this – a. Budget allocation – b. Budget release – c. Decision making process – d. Accounting and auditing – e. Financial Information Flow – f. Monitoring and evaluation.
2. What are the functions of the Inspector General of Police? Write. Public peace, security, improvement of police organization, police personnel management, disaster management, participation in the international level related to security are the tasks of the Inspector General of Police. Which can be mentioned as follows: a. Public peace, security-related work - to send reports on disturbing social harmony, adverse security, illegal and serious criminal activities and extraordinary political activities to the Ministry of Home Affairs as soon as possible, - to formulate and effectively implement the necessary plans in relation to the prevention and control of adverse security, illegal and criminal activities, To carry out, - To make and implement the necessary policies and plans to enhance the effectiveness of the investigation of crimes designated to be investigated by the police, to carry out, - Promoting and conducting the protection of human rights, making and implementing special plans related to the protection of the rights and rights of the helpless, women and children, - Providing opinions and advice to the Government of Nepal on matters related to the internal peace and order of the country, - Submitting a report according to the instructions received from the Government of Nepal. . The work of improving the police organization and personnel management - general control, supervision and direction in the police head office and all police offices under Soma, proper supervision and control over the work and actions of the additional inspector general of police and deputy inspector general of police, - order to make the work and action of the police organization effective. To implement the series effectively, to maintain an environment of coordination and cooperation between the subordinate police offices, to maintain the conduct and discipline of the police personnel, In order to increase efficiency and performance capacity, to make them conscientious and to keep morale high, to formulate and implement effective policies, - To evaluate the work of police offices and police personnel, and to carry out moral development activities such as punishment, reward, transfer, promotion, etc., - To make the police service timely and Formulating and implementing policies and plans to make them public-facing, - Arranging the proper management of peer-to-peer management of police personnel, - Arranging the necessary timely training for police personnel, - Inspecting the police offices of at least three districts within each region once a year and reporting on the same. Sending to the Ministry of Home Affairs, - Sending the annual report of the police administration to the Ministry of Home Affairs. c. Disaster management activities - To involve the police carefully in the disaster management and rescue operations of the victims. d.
3. What are the banking and financial transactions that can be done by the finance company? Mention. The Banks and Financial Institutions Act-2073, which is designed to regulate the establishment, operation, management, regulation, inspection and supervision of banks and financial institutions in Nepal, defines banks and financial institutions as "A" class, "B" class, "C" class and "D" class. Divided into categories. In which commercial banks and infrastructure development banks are placed in "A" category, development banks in "B" category, finance companies in "C" category and microfinance institutions in "D" category. Under this, the banking and financial transactions that can be carried out by the finance company under category "C" can be mentioned as follows: - Accepting deposits, handling, making payments, - Accepting deposits through electronic devices, making payments, making transactions, acting as intermediaries, transferring money, etc. Acting, – Hire Purchase, Leasing,
4. What kind of policy regarding agriculture and land reform in Nepal has been adopted by the Constitution of Nepal? Mention. Article 51 (E) of the Constitution of Nepal has adopted the following policies related to agriculture and land reform in Nepal: - to end dual ownership of land, - to carry out scientific land reform taking into account the interest of farmers, - to discourage absentee land ownership, - to restrict production and productivity of land. Increasing, - Protecting and promoting the rights and interests of farmers, - Adopting land use policy to increase agricultural production and productivity, - Land management and commercialization, industrialization, diversification and modernization of agriculture, - Regulating and managing land based on productivity, nature and environmental balance. Making proper use, - Arranging agricultural materials for farmers, fair price of agricultural produce and access to the market.
5. Mention the role of government, private sector and community organizations for environmental management. Environmental management is the work of maintaining balance without negative impact on natural resources. In this work, the government sector, private sector and community organizations have a big role, which can be mentioned as follows: The role of the government sector - to protect forests, water bodies, water ponds, - to adopt the concept of green development to reduce the impact of climate change, - to build development Mandatory environmental impact assessment, - air pollution, water pollution, noise pollution, land pollution, food pollution, setting quality and standards to prevent industrial pollution, role of private sector - following the policies, laws and standards implemented by the government, - industry, Proper management of the waste coming out of the factories, - Environment-friendly public construction works,
6. What are the objectives of the United Nations? Mention. The objectives of the United Nations, which was established on October 24, 1945, are as follows: - to maintain international peace and security, - to develop friendly relations among nations, - to create a state of equality among nations, - to encourage international cooperation, - to enhance the dignity and worth of human beings, - To protect the human community from the scourge of war,
7. What are the sources of nutritious food? Mention. Nutritious food is food with a balanced amount of carbohydrates, proteins, fats, minerals, vitamins and water needed to provide strength to the body, grow the body and protect the body. Nutritious food has nutritional value. Nutritious food is needed to mobilize body parts and avoid diseases. Its sources are: a. Foods that give strength to the body such as: corn, wheat, rice, barley, potato, millet, pepper, ghee etc. b. Body-building foods like: meat, flowers, fish, milk, pulses, pulses, etc. c. Foods that protect the body like: vegetables, fruits. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
Expense Management 1. What is expense management? What are the areas that need to be improved? write Expenditure management is the task of reducing non-productive expenditure in current expenditure, maintaining thrift, increasing transparency and efficiency in capital expenditure and making expenditure productive. This is the work of increasing the efficiency of means and resources. It emphasizes on allocating public spending to priority areas with broad impact, quick returns. Areas to be improved in this – a. Budget allocation – b. Budget release – c. Decision making process – d. Accounting and auditing – e. Financial Information Flow – f. Monitoring and evaluation.
2. What are the functions of the Inspector General of Police? Write. Public peace, security, improvement of police organization, police personnel management, disaster management, participation in the international level related to security are the tasks of the Inspector General of Police. Which can be mentioned as follows: a. Public peace, security-related work - to send reports on disturbing social harmony, adverse security, illegal and serious criminal activities and extraordinary political activities to the Ministry of Home Affairs as soon as possible, - to formulate and effectively implement the necessary plans in relation to the prevention and control of adverse security, illegal and criminal activities, To carry out, - To make and implement the necessary policies and plans to enhance the effectiveness of the investigation of crimes designated to be investigated by the police, to carry out, - Promoting and conducting the protection of human rights, making and implementing special plans related to the protection of the rights and rights of the helpless, women and children, - Providing opinions and advice to the Government of Nepal on matters related to the internal peace and order of the country, - Submitting a report according to the instructions received from the Government of Nepal. . The work of improving the police organization and personnel management - general control, supervision and direction in the police head office and all police offices under Soma, proper supervision and control over the work and actions of the additional inspector general of police and deputy inspector general of police, - order to make the work and action of the police organization effective. To implement the series effectively, to maintain an environment of coordination and cooperation between the subordinate police offices, to maintain the conduct and discipline of the police personnel, In order to increase efficiency and performance capacity, to make them conscientious and to keep morale high, to formulate and implement effective policies, - To evaluate the work of police offices and police personnel, and to carry out moral development activities such as punishment, reward, transfer, promotion, etc., - To make the police service timely and Formulating and implementing policies and plans to make them public-facing, - Arranging the proper management of peer-to-peer management of police personnel, - Arranging the necessary timely training for police personnel, - Inspecting the police offices of at least three districts within each region once a year and reporting on the same. Sending to the Ministry of Home Affairs, - Sending the annual report of the police administration to the Ministry of Home Affairs. c. Disaster management activities - To involve the police carefully in the disaster management and rescue operations of the victims. d.
3. What are the banking and financial transactions that can be done by the finance company? Mention. The Banks and Financial Institutions Act-2073, which is designed to regulate the establishment, operation, management, regulation, inspection and supervision of banks and financial institutions in Nepal, defines banks and financial institutions as "A" class, "B" class, "C" class and "D" class. Divided into categories. In which commercial banks and infrastructure development banks are placed in "A" category, development banks in "B" category, finance companies in "C" category and microfinance institutions in "D" category. Under this, the banking and financial transactions that can be carried out by the finance company under category "C" can be mentioned as follows: - Accepting deposits, handling, making payments, - Accepting deposits through electronic devices, making payments, making transactions, acting as intermediaries, transferring money, etc. Acting, – Hire Purchase, Leasing,
4. What kind of policy regarding agriculture and land reform in Nepal has been adopted by the Constitution of Nepal? Mention. Article 51 (E) of the Constitution of Nepal has adopted the following policies related to agriculture and land reform in Nepal: - to end dual ownership of land, - to carry out scientific land reform taking into account the interest of farmers, - to discourage absentee land ownership, - to restrict production and productivity of land. Increasing, - Protecting and promoting the rights and interests of farmers, - Adopting land use policy to increase agricultural production and productivity, - Land management and commercialization, industrialization, diversification and modernization of agriculture, - Regulating and managing land based on productivity, nature and environmental balance. Making proper use, - Arranging agricultural materials for farmers, fair price of agricultural produce and access to the market.
5. Mention the role of government, private sector and community organizations for environmental management. Environmental management is the work of maintaining balance without negative impact on natural resources. In this work, the government sector, private sector and community organizations have a big role, which can be mentioned as follows: The role of the government sector - to protect forests, water bodies, water ponds, - to adopt the concept of green development to reduce the impact of climate change, - to build development Mandatory environmental impact assessment, - air pollution, water pollution, noise pollution, land pollution, food pollution, setting quality and standards to prevent industrial pollution, role of private sector - following the policies, laws and standards implemented by the government, - industry, Proper management of the waste coming out of the factories, - Environment-friendly public construction works,
6. What are the objectives of the United Nations? Mention. The objectives of the United Nations, which was established on October 24, 1945, are as follows: - to maintain international peace and security, - to develop friendly relations among nations, - to create a state of equality among nations, - to encourage international cooperation, - to enhance the dignity and worth of human beings, - To protect the human community from the scourge of war,
7. What are the sources of nutritious food? Mention. Nutritious food is food with a balanced amount of carbohydrates, proteins, fats, minerals, vitamins and water needed to provide strength to the body, grow the body and protect the body. Nutritious food has nutritional value. Nutritious food is needed to mobilize body parts and avoid diseases. Its sources are: a. Foods that give strength to the body such as: corn, wheat, rice, barley, potato, millet, pepper, ghee etc. b. Body-building foods like: meat, flowers, fish, milk, pulses, pulses, etc. c. Foods that protect the body such as: vegetables, fruits. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
 
1. When was the House of Representatives of the Federal Parliament dissolved by President Bidya Devi Bhandari on the recommendation of the Prime Minister? Bikram Samvat 2077 December 5.- Prime Minister KP Sharma Oli dissolved the House of Representatives in accordance with the decision of the Council of Ministers and recommended to the President for the election of another House of Representatives. According to the decision of the meeting of the Council of Ministers, as recommended by the Prime Minister, the date has been fixed for the election to be held in two phases on 17th and 27th of May 2078, as recommended by the Prime Minister. It seems - When the country is facing economic and other crises due to the Corona Virus (Covid-19) epidemic, especially when the internal consensus within the ruling party Nepal Communist Party (NCP) is breaking down, the decision was taken by Prime Minister Oli to dissolve the House of Representatives and go to the elections. Only the National Assembly will remain.
2. Who has been honored with the 'Nepal Pragyalankar' award by the Nepal Pragya Pratishthan? Chinese Professor Wang Hongwei (award amount: three thousand US dollars) - Professor Wang was given this honor for his contribution to the development of Nepal in the fields of language, literature and diplomacy. ÷ Culture ÷ Philosophy Award (Amount: 2 lakh) Prof.Dr. Birendra Prasad Mishra and Nepal Pragya Bhasha Award (amount: 2 lakh) Prof. Dr. Awarded to Tejaratna Kansakar.- Similarly, the Nepal Pragya Nepali Literary Award of one lakh rupees was awarded to Harihar Khanal and Raviman Lamjel, Purna Vaidya, Indra Bahadur Gurung, Chaturbhujlal Das Kevarat and Hansawati Kurmi for literature in the mother tongue spoken in the mountains and Terai.- Similarly,
3. Who is the most successful person in the list of the highest-earning celebrities recently published by the world-famous Forbes magazine? American television personality and cosmetics entrepreneur Kylie Jenner - Kylie surpassed other celebrities by earning 540 million dollars this time. Half sister Kim Kardashian's husband and rapper Kanye West were included.- Similarly, the famous tennis player Roger Federer, Portuguese football player Cristiano Ronaldo and Argentine football superstar Lionel Messi were in the third to fifth place respectively.
4. According to the United Nations Development Program (UNDP) on December 16, 2020, according to the public global human development index report - 2020, what is the position of Nepal? 142nd. - Previously, in 2018, Nepal was in the 147th position. - According to the report, Nepal's human development index is 0. It has reached 602. Last year such indicator was 0.596. - However, the public Nepal Human Development Index report on 28th March 2077, in collaboration with the National Planning Commission and UNDP, showed that Nepal's index was only 0.587. The position of South Asian countries is 72nd: Sri Lanka. 95th: Maldives. 129th: Bhutan. 131st: India. 133rd: Bangladesh. 142nd: Nepal. 154th: Pakistan. 169th: Afghanistan. 189 countries included in the report. According to the report, the average life expectancy of Nepal has reached 70 years and 8 months. The time spent in school is 12 years and 8 months. - According to the report, the share of poverty population is 34 percent. Among the population above 15 years of age, the share of employed population is 82.6 percent.- 65 percent of the total population is based on agriculture. Likewise, the population involved in the service sector is 19.9 percent. - According to the report, based on the total national income, the per capita income has reached three thousand 457 dollars.
5. According to the National Bank, for how long is it arranged that banks cannot change the fixed interest rate in personal periodic loans? 7 years 
. Who is the successful talent to win the title of the famous dance reality show Dancing with the Stars Nepal which is being broadcasted by Himalaya Television? Sumi Moktan and Biju Parki. (Along with the title, the pair of Moktan and Parki received 2 million cash prizes and gift hampers.) 
7. When did the government announce the 'National Water Resources Policy-2077'? December 2, 2077.
8. The 39th General Assembly of the Olympic Council of Asia (OCA) held in Muscat, Oman in December 2020, where will the 2030 Asian Games be held? Qatar's capital Doha. Similarly, the 2034 Asian Games will be held in Riyadh, the capital of Saudi Arabia. In the voting to select the host country in the 39th General Assembly of Osijek, Qatar received the most 27 votes, while the other contender, Saudi Riyadh, received 10 votes. 8 votes were neutral. - Doha hosted the Asian Games for the last time in 2006. 9. When is the International Migration Day celebrated? December 18.- (December 18 from the United Nations, taking into account the discrimination against immigrants on the basis of country, caste, religion, language, etc.
10. What is the power generation capacity of the Rahughat-Mangale hydropower project located in Myagdi? 35.5 megawatts 
. Who is known as the first scientist of Nepal? Gehendra Shamsher. - (He made guns, cannons, automatic motors, etc. with his helpers.) 
12. What is the process of bending or changing direction when a ray of light enters from one medium to another called? Rotation of light.- (The speed of light varies in different mediums, so the rotation of light occurs.) 
13. What is the process of separating the rays of different seven colors from sunlight using a prism? 14. What is the total number of waves generated per second? Frequency. 
15. When was Nuclear Suppliers Group (NSG) established? May 1974.
16. In which census the population growth rate of Nepal was negative? Second and third. - (The highest growth rate is in the 2038 census.) 
17. When was the Asian Development Bank established? December 19, 1966.- In the beginning, 31 countries were involved in ADB, currently there are 67 countries including 48 from Asia and 19 from other countries. - Its head office is in Manila, Philippines. - At the beginning of 2015, Japan has 15.7 percent, America 15.6 percent, China 6.5 percent, India 6.5 percent and Australia 5.8 percent investment in ADB.
18. In the 18th edition of the Kathmandu International Mountain Film Festival (KIMF) held in November 2077, which film won the title of best film (prize amount 2 lakhs) in the international category? The Silhouettes. - In the international category, 'The Beloved Daughter' won the first runner-up (Rs. 150,000) and 'Bato' won the second runner-up award (Rs. 100,000). Won an award (amount of one lakh). 
19. Which is the largest lake in the SAARC region? Chilka Lake (India). 
20. Since when elephant polo competition started in Nepal? Year 1982. 
21. From which district has the distribution of farmer ID cards been started in Nepal? Baglung.
22. Who is the successful player to be named FIFA Best Player (Male)-2020? Poland's Robert Lewandowski.- Similarly, England's Lucy Bronze was declared the best female football player. Jurgen Klopp of Liverpool was declared the best coach. He won the title of the best coach for the second time in a row.- Sarina Wiegman, who led the Netherlands to the final of the World Cup in 2019, was declared the best female coach. - South Korea's Sun Heung Min, who plays for Tottenham, was declared the best goal against Burnley. - Manchester United and England forward Marcus Yasford was honored for running a campaign to eradicate children and poverty.
23. What is the '0' degree longitude line called the Prime Meridian and the '0' degree latitude line? Equator. 
24. Which continent has the most linguistic diversity in the world? Africa. 
25. What is the most spoken language country in the world? India. 
26. Among SAPTA, BIMSTEC, TRIPS and SAFTA, which one is related to World Trade Organization (WTO)? Trips. 
27. Who was awarded the Alternative Literature Award this year (2077)? Senior linguist Shanta Das Manandhar.- (Similarly, Ramesh Vikal Creation Award was given to writer and beauty thinker Ahuti and Ramesh Vikal Art Music Award was given to senior artist Hari Prasad Sharma.)
28. Who is the successful Nepali doctor to be honored with the 'World Health Award 2020' given by the Swiss Foundation in collaboration with the World Health Organization? Doctor Dr. Pashupati Mahat and Dr. Arunraj Kunwar.- He is the first Nepali doctor to receive this award given to a doctor who works effectively in the health sector.-Dr. Mahat is the president of Napliz Association of Clinical Psychologists while Kunwar is working in the Child Psychiatric Unit at Kanti Children's Hospital. 
29. Saipal Himal and Urai Bhanjyang are located in which district? Bajhang. 
30. Which Nepali organization won the ICI Marketing Innovation Award at the ICI Award 2020 ceremony organized in Shanghai, China? Outreach Nepal.- (This award was given for the Basic Humanity campaign carried out by Outreach, according to the company.) Presenter: Tank KC
1. Who is the talent who won the first place in the National Poetry Festival 2077? Bhairavi Geography of Nuwakot.- His poem 'Song of Nepal' managed to win the first place. Ganesh Prasad Khatiwada of Solukhumbu's 'Mother's Order', Devaki Abhilashi of Dolakha's 'Ama Ek University' and Regina Apgai's 'Dream of a Prosperous Nepal' poem came third. - 50,000 rupees, 40,000 rupees for second and 30,000 rupees for third place in the competition. 
2. What is the height of Mount Everest, the highest peak in the world? 8,848.86 meters (29,031.7 feet).- The new height was announced jointly by Nepal and China on December 23, Bikram Samvat 2077.- The two countries cooperated to measure the height of Mount Everest. For the past 65 years, its height was accepted as 8,848 meters or 29,28.87 feet.
3. National Planning Commission has decided how many indicators of prosperity and happiness to achieve the goal of 'Prosperous Nepal and Happy Nepali'? Prosperity: 32 and happiness: 23. 
4. How many countries are included in the Indo-Pacific region? 24. 
5. Which is the first electric motorcycle made in Nepal? Yatri. 
6. Who is the youngest local level head elected in local level election-2075? Uday Kumar Yadav (24 years old), (Sahid municipality, Siraha). 
7. Which village was declared as the first cooperative village in Nepal? Chuhandanda, Tehrathum. 
8. When was the decision to transfer the district offices under the union to the local level? July 1, 2075.
9. Recently NASA scientists have grown which plant in space? Radish. - NASA astronaut and flight engineer Kate Ruvins harvested radish grown on the International Space Station for the first time. Kate said that 20 radish plants were packed and kept in cold storage to be brought to earth in 2021.- The name of this experiment of NASA was named 'Plant Hevitate 02'.- Earlier, wheat was grown in space. It is said that it is being tested that it can be useful for long-term astronauts. 
10. Which is the first SAARC country to ratify the Paris agreement on climate change? Maldives. (Nepal ratified this agreement on October 24, 2016.)
11. What is the Incheon Strategy (2013-2022) related to? Rights of persons with disabilities. 
12. Nepal government has decided to establish an intellectual property protection office under which ministry? Ministry of Finance. 
13. Where is the place where the Sugauli Treaty was signed 
? Naam dance is popular in which district of Nepal? Lamjung. 
15. Which country is Nepal a party to the Biological Weapons Convention? 177th. - (Approved by Nepal on November 19, 2073.) 
16. Paulo Rossi is a player related to which sport? Football. - He He played an important role in bringing Italy the football title in 1982. - Rossi is the only player to win the Golden Boot, Golden Ball and FIFA Player of the Year in the same year. - Rossi died in December 2020 at the age of 64.
17. Who is the girl who won the title of Mrs. Nepal Tourism-2020 held in the capital with the original slogan of "Together for Tourism"?Manita Risal Budhathoki (Bafal, Kathmandu) 
. Which is the first human rights friendly village in Nepal?Ranchuli village, Kalikot. 
19. Which municipality announced the national anthem first? Tilottama municipality (Rupandehi). 
20. When did the government of Nepal make a provision that one cannot climb the mountains alone? 
21. Where is Shashwatdham, a model of unique craftsmanship? Nawalpur (Nawalparasi Wardghat-Susta East). 
22. When was email given legal recognition in government agencies in Nepal? November 26, 2075.
Where has the construction of the world's second longest Superman-style zipline been started? Kusma (Mountain). - A 1400 meter long zipline is going to be constructed from Chakleko Dil in Kusma Municipality-5 through the deep gorge of Kaligandaki to Saune Bagar. - The foundation stone of the adventure tourist structure with superman style zipline constructed by Harness Zipline Pvt. The 2800 meter zipline is located in Dubai. - In the classic zipline, you float on the rope as if you were sitting on a chair, while in Superman, you reach your destination by lying on your back like Superman. Although the classic style zipline in Nepal is longer than this, it is said to be the second longest in the world in the Superman style.- According to the construction company, the speed of the zipline depends on the speed of the wind and the weight of the players, but when the journey starts on the zipline, it flows at a speed of 130 km per hour and slowly as it approaches the destination.
24. What is the slogan of the 72nd International Human Rights Day celebrated on December 10, 2020? Recover Better: Stand up for Human Rights. - (National slogan: Human rights in an epidemic: Expanding access to health services for all). 
25. When was the air agreement between Nepal and Australia? September 30, 2019. 
26. Who is the Chinese citizen who successfully climbed Mount Everest with the help of both artificial legs? Jia Wuyu (May 14, 2018).
27. Almost two years after the split, when did the reunification between the Viveksheel Nepali Party and the Common Party take place? November 24, 2077.- The formal announcement of the unification between the Viveksheel led by Milan Pandey and the Common Party led by Ravindra Mishra was made on November 24. The name of the unified party is Viveksheel Common Party and the old election symbol is scales.- The president of the unified party is Mishra and the coordinator is Pandey.
28. According to the public human development report by the National Planning Commission on December 28, 2077, what is the human development index of Nepal? 0.587.- The value of the human development index of Nepal has reached 0.587. Last year it was 0.579. According to the report, Nepal is ahead of some South Asian countries in terms of gender development index, gender inequality index and human development index. Although Nepal is lagging behind in terms of income, human assets and financial risk criteria have been met. With this, the foundation has been prepared for Nepal to enter the list of developing countries from the least developed country in 2022.- For the past five years, Nepal has been in the list of medium human development. An HDI score above 0.550 to 0.690 is considered moderate. Since 1998, Nepal has started publishing the Human Development Report.
29. Who is the author of A Brief History of Time? Stephen Hawking. 30. Since when did the Montreal Convention come into effect so that foreign and Nepalese passengers get the same insurance and other facilities for the risk of international flights? December 29, 2075 (December 15, 2018).- This important treaty regarding civil aviation has been applied to Nepali Air Service Company and passengers since November 29. On the 7th of August, the Parliament of Nepal passed the 'Convention on the Unification of International Air Transport Regulations' and it came into effect 60 days after Nepal submitted the Convention to ICAO. - Previously, Nepal received 20,000 US dollars per person when claiming air insurance according to the Warsaw Convention and the Hague Protocol. After the implementation of the Montreal Convention, he will receive one hundred and sixty thousand rupees for that insurance, i.e. about two and a half million rupees. The Convention is known as the Montreal Convention. The convention has been implemented since 2003.- The purpose of this convention is to implement the same rules and conditions for international flight airlines and air passengers around the world. Presenter: Tank Casey
What is the behavior of employees? 1. What should be the behavior and conduct of employees towards customers? write The customer is the service recipient, the employee is the service provider. The service provider must display good behavior and conduct towards the service recipient. Which should be according to the following: - The work of the customer should be done on time, if the work cannot be done on time, the basis and reason should be given, - The customer should be treated with dignity, while answering politely, - Be responsible to the customer, work with the interests of the customer in mind, - Elderly, infirm, handicapped, Priority should be given to pregnant women, children, and the helpless, - To provide services in simple and easy language, - To increase the reach of service users in service delivery, - To inform the service users about the process of receiving services, the time taken, and the cost in a timely manner, - To follow the conduct according to their position, - To provide quality service in a fair manner. To deliver, - To deliver service quickly,
2. Briefly discuss the introduction of information technology, the arrangements made in Nepal and its importance. Information technology is the use of electronic devices including computer systems and their software, hardware and internet to manage information. It is a computer-related work, in which devices such as the Internet, servers, hardware, software, printers, TVs, and telephones are used. It is the design of hardware and software. It is also a function of data processing. - It processes, stores and protects information. It helps to increase efficiency, reduce costs, maximize utilization of resources and prevent leakages and embezzlement. It provides online services, e-government, e-business, e-education, e-learning, Concepts like electronic admissions can be implemented. It helps to control corruption by establishing automatic system in every sector. Therefore, information technology can be considered as a major tool for corruption control. Arrangements made in Nepal - Electronic (Electronic) Transactions Act-2063 and Electronic Transactions Regulations-2064 have been implemented, this Act has made various provisions. Provisions have been made for the establishment of Information Technology Judiciary to initiate and prosecute computer related crimes. Information and Communication Technology Policy-2072 issued,- Ministry of Communication and Information Technology and the establishment of the National Information Technology Center under it,- formation of National Information Commission,- Right to Information Act-2064 and Regulations-2065 issued,
3. Mention the role of political parties in democracy. Democracy is a system in which government is run by representatives of the people. Since political parties are the representatives of the people, these political parties are the main actors in running the governance system in a democracy. Since politics is the basic policy of all policies and is also the leader of the administrative leadership of the country as a whole, the role of political parties in democracy is multifaceted. Which can be mentioned as follows: - To act as a representative of the people, - To represent the country and the people at home and abroad, - To formulate laws and regulations suitable to the country, time and situation, to fully support the administration in implementing the laws and regulations by fully complying with the laws and regulations, - To be elected by the people and lead the overall governance of the country, - To honestly fulfill the commitments made to the country and the people, - To protect and promote democracy and human rights, - Not for party and personal interests,
4. What are the political and governance policies in Nepal's constitution? Mention. Article 51 of the Constitution of Nepal stipulates the following policies related to political and governance under the state policies: - Protecting, strengthening and developing political achievements, guaranteeing the best interests and development of the people through economic, social and cultural transformation, - Maintaining the rule of law while protecting and promoting human rights. - Implementation of international treaty agreements to which Nepal is a party - Ensuring good governance by making public administration clean, competent, fair, transparent, corruption-free, responsive and participatory to the public by ensuring equal and easy access to services provided by the state - Clean and healthy mass media , making necessary arrangements to make it fair, decent, responsible and professional, - responsibilities between federal units,
5. What are the causes of population growth? write The causes of population growth are: - high birth rate, - lack of awareness, - early marriage, - polygamy, - hope for sons, - religious superstitions, - low effectiveness of family planning programs, - migration - open borders. 
6. Give a brief introduction about the mission and mission chief in the Nepal Foreign Service. Mission in Nepal Foreign Service refers to Nepalese embassies abroad, permanent missions, Nepali Consulate General, consulates and any other body established by the Government of Nepal to represent abroad from time to time. Similarly, there is provision for the following heads of missions in the mission: (1) Ambassador, (2) Permanent Representative, (3) Consul General, (4) Acting Ambassador, (5) Acting Permanent Representative, (6) Consul, (7) Others designated by the Government of Nepal. Officers.
7. Mention the importance of maps. A map is a picture drawn on paper or other similar material to represent the surface of the earth or a certain part of it. In this, the map that shows the physical aspect is called the physical map and the map that shows the political aspect is called the political map. Due to lack of space, symbols are used to show various things on the map. Generally, the north direction on the map is prepared facing upwards. Maps are a source of information. It is also a repository of knowledge. It gives a lot of information. Its importance can be mentioned as follows: - to show the available natural resources, to present the population distribution of the country, - to depict the geographical situation of the offices for development, construction and expansion and operation of service facilities, - to inform tourists about the geographical situation of the country, roads, service facilities, etc. , to facilitate teaching and learning in schools and universities,
8. Mention five ways to conserve biodiversity. Following are the five measures to protect biological diversity: 1. Protecting the habitats of living animals and plants and their genetic properties, 2. To study and research the biological diversity in different geographical areas and to formulate and implement conservation programs accordingly, to increase the active participation of local associations and communities, 3. Protecting forests, increasing greenery, protecting the environment, 4. By reducing the use of forest resources, 5. Less use of chemical fertilizers and pesticides.
9. What are the problems seen in consumer health in Nepal? Consumer health is keeping information about health-related topics such as the quality of consumer goods, consumption period, benefits and harms. It is a big problem that consumers in Nepal are not aware of these issues. Due to the lack of health awareness and knowledge, various problems related to this have been seen. Which are as follows: - Consumers not being aware of their health, - Not being able to find out the quality of goods and services, - Not having enough information about the consumption period of goods and services, advantages and disadvantages, etc. Failure, lack of consumer education, - consumers not taking care of their rights and responsibilities, - failure to make producers commit to the quality of goods and services, - failure to control artificial shortage of consumer goods and black market, lack of conscious consumers.
Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
Features of the current constitution 1. Write the additional and different features of the present constitution of Nepal than the previous constitutions. In Nepal, seven constitutions have been issued namely Nepal Government Statutory Law 2004, Nepal Interim Government Statute 2007, Constitution of the Dominion of Nepal 2015, Constitution of Nepal 2019, Constitution of the Dominion of Nepal 2047, Interim Constitution of Nepal 2063 and Constitution of Nepal (2072). The 2004 constitution could not be implemented. All other constitutions have been implemented. In the constitution till 2047, monarchy had a place in Nepal. The constitution of 2063 ended the monarchy and declared a republic in Nepal. The constitution of 2072 institutionalized the republic forever, it transformed Nepal into a federal state and arranged for seven provinces and districts accordingly. This is the first constitution made by the Constituent Assembly. This constitution envisages three levels of government namely federal, state and local levels. It is comprehensive and inclusive. Republic, federalism, secularism and inclusiveness are the main features of this constitution. Organized into 35 parts, 308 articles and 9 schedules, this constitution is bigger than any other constitution before it. By adding fundamental rights, it has reached 31, and by adding constitutional bodies, it has reached 13. These provisions are additional and distinct features of the present constitution than the earlier constitutions. Other additional and separate features are as follows: - Provision of non-resident citizenship, - Provision of citizen's duties, - No no-confidence motion cannot be submitted for 2 years after the Prime Minister has been in office.
2. What are the rights and obligations of the customer in public service delivery? Mention. Ordinary citizens who receive the services provided by the government are the service users. There are both rights and responsibilities of service users in public service delivery. Which can be mentioned as follows: - The right of the customer - The right to choose goods and services, - The right to receive quality services, - The right to receive respectful treatment, - The right to be protected from goods and services that harm health and property, - The right to receive compensation. Rights, - The right to seek the assistance of a lawyer or auditor for defense, - The right to get consumer education, - The right to access services, - The right to a clean and healthy environment, - The right to be informed, - The right to be heard. The responsibility of the service user - To follow the provisions of the law, - Always be aware of your rights and responsibilities,
3. Mention the prerequisites necessary for the success of democracy. Not one party, but fair competition between multiple parties and parties, - stable government, - periodic elections, - independent judiciary, - complete freedom of the press, - civil liberties, - fundamental rights, human rights, - child suffrage, - rule of law, - end of impunity, - Corruption control, - peace, security, good governance. 4. What should be the role of civil society in Nepal's social empowerment and development? Discuss. Civil society is a voluntary organization that helps to make the government responsible and accountable to the people, outside of the government state system. Civil society has a multifaceted role in empowering the weaker sections in the society and bringing effectiveness in the overall development. Poor, illiterate, poor service delivery, laxity like Nepal,
5. Mention the qualities of good records management. Records management should be informative, concise, relevant, up-to-date, reliable, authentic and reliable. It should have the following qualities: – informative but concise, – inexpensive, economical, – simple to understand, – timely updated, – future proof, – easily accessible, – classified, – all Covering the side.
6. Mention the objectives of government budget. The government budget is the estimated statement of income and expenditure of the government. The paramount purpose of the government budget is to manage government income and expenditure and distribute resources for social welfare. Its other objectives are as follows:- Determining the functions and responsibilities of the government,- Creating employment opportunities,- Economic growth, maintaining economic stability,- Helping to maintain social justice,- Maximizing resource utilization,- Helping in implementing periodical plan. do
7. What are the indicators of economic development? write Indicators that reflect and provide information about the overall development of the economy are economic development indicators. It includes four sectors of the economy, which can be mentioned as follows: Real sector – Gross Domestic Product, – Gross Domestic Savings, – Total National Income, – Total National Savings, – Inflation Rate. b. Public Finance Sector - Revenue Mobilization: Tax Revenue, Non-Tax Revenue, - Government Expenditure: Current Expenditure, Capital Expenditure, Financial System, - Outstanding Public Debt: Internal Debt, Foreign Debt. Banking and financial sector - loans to the private sector, - narrow money supply, - wide money supply, - total deposits. d. External sector or foreign trade and payment sector - export, import, - trade deficit, - tourism income, - remittance income, - foreign exchange savings, - foreign exchange reserves.
1. When did the government publish Nepal's foreign policy-2077 as an integrated document for the first time? v. No. November 21, 2077 – This policy was passed by the cabinet meeting on November 4. - According to the integrated foreign policy, bilateral relations will be expanded and strengthened on the basis of universal equality, mutual respect and benefits with all friendly countries including neighbors. It is said in detail about the issues of bilateral relations - to maintain free and balanced relations, to promote the overall national interest of Nepal through cooperation and collaboration, to solve the border problem through diplomatic and peaceful means based on historical treaties, agreements, facts and evidence, to protect and manage the border, Nepalese land Neighbor's interests will not be allowed to be adversely affected.- Similarly, promotion of bilateral, tripartite and multilateral partnership in matters of common interest. As a landlocked country, issues such as ensuring uninterrupted, simple and easy use of transportation facilities are included in the foreign policy with importance. - 'Economic diplomacy' has been embraced as an important dimension. - Nepal should abandon the mentality of a small and weak country and a backward country. The policy includes topics such as bilateral relations, multilateral cooperation, rules-based world order, regional cooperation, economic diplomacy, protection of the rights of natural and legal persons, public diplomacy and the use of 'track two' diplomacy. - Peace and non-violence, geopolitics of the country, multi-caste,
2. Who is the girl who won the title of Miss Nepal-2020? Namrata Shrestha - She won the title of 26th edition of Miss Nepal in the grand finale held on 20th November 2077. - He also managed to win the titles of Miss Confidence and Miss Intellectual. She has been selected for Miss World 2020. - Supriya Shrestha won the title of Miss Nepal Earth-2020.- Similarly, Sandhya Sharma from Mahottari won the title of Miss Nepal International 2020.- Simal Kanaujia from Kathmandu won the title of Miss Supranational 2020. 
3. Who is the Napali girl who was recently listed among the top 100 inspiring women by the British media BBC? Sapna Roka Magar (Sapna affiliated with Bewarise Management and Rehabilitation Center has been active in the management of bewarise corpses for the past three years).
4. Which is the banking institution of Nepal awarded with The Banker of the Year 2020? NMB Bank - The bank has received this honor for the third time in the last four years. - The award was given by the magazine 'The Banker' published from London.
5. Which is the energetic plant removed from the list of narcotic drugs by the fourth conference of the United Nations Convention on Narcotic Drugs? Marijuana - With this decision, the 59-year ban on marijuana as a narcotic drug has been lifted.- After the demand for a review of the various chemical substances found in marijuana initiated by the World Health Organization, a vote was taken at the conference on December 2, 2020. Out of 53 member states participating in the vote, 27 members voted in favor of removing marijuana from the list of narcotic drugs. During this time, Nepal also voted in favor of removing marijuana from the list of narcotic drugs.- This decision of the union also opened the way to use the medicinal properties of the herbal plant marijuana.
6. When was the decision to change the name of Pokhara-Lekhnath Metropolitan Municipality and make it Pokhara Metropolitan Municipality (from the Government of Nepal, Council of Ministers)? v. No. 23 July 2075 
7. Haritara movie award of 2076 was awarded to whom? Lyricist Sahdev Dhungana (Similarly, the 2075 Haritara Movie Award was awarded to actors Madandas Shrestha and Krishna Malla.) 
8. When was the campaign 'One Nepali One Fruit Plant' started? v. No. June 21, 2075 - Prime Minister KP Sharma Oli launched a campaign to plant lychee and avocado saplings at Singha Darbar. - The campaign was launched on the occasion of World Environment Day on June 5, 2018. 
9. Construction of Madan Bhandari Highway by GovtWhen was the decision made? v. No. 2075 June 6- This route is from Shantinagar in Jhapa to Rupal in Dadeldhura. - The length of this highway is about 1200 km. 
10. Where is the highest bridge in Nepal? Manang (Tamrang Bridge) - Nasong rural municipality-2 (Nache) located in Manang and ward no. The bridge that connects 5 (Thache) villages is 412 meters above the water level of the Drona river and is 135 meters long. - This is the fifth highest bridge in the world. - The highest bridge in the world is the Dunge bridge (565 meters) built in China. 
11. In the SAARC countries, Nepal is on the fourth place in terms of area, and in terms of population, how many places is it? the fifth
12. According to the constitution of Nepal (2072), who will be the chairman of the inter-provincial council formed to resolve political disputes between the federation and the provinces and between the provinces? Prime Minister (The other members of the four-member interprovincial council, including the president, are the home minister of the government of Nepal, the finance minister and the chief minister of the respective province.) 
13. When was the first inter-provincial council meeting completed? v. No. 23-24 November 2075 (Arrangements related to Inter-Pradesh are made in Article 234 of Part 20 of the Constitution.) 
14. According to the current constitution of Nepal, what is the state's executive, legislative and judicial powers and residual rights? State power 
15. Since when did the government start imposing taxes on pollution charges with the aim of controlling air pollution? A.W. 2065÷66
16. When is International Volunteer Day celebrated? December 5
17. Which is the only mammal that cannot jump? Elephant - even when it runs, at least one leg is touching the ground. - Elephant is the longest gestation period (22 months) of mammals. - African elephant baby is big at birth. A newborn calf weighs up to 120 kg.- A calf can stand within 20 minutes of birth, walk within an hour and can walk in a group after two days. - The 'temporal lobe' in the brain of an elephant is bigger and thicker than that of a human. For this reason, even when the elephant migrates after a long time, the path it takes, The source of water is never forgotten.- An elephant's trunk holds up to eight liters of water. - Although the elephant is a huge creature, it can run at a rate of about 25 miles per hour. - The ears of the African elephant are larger than those of the Asian elephant. - The elephant hates bees and even fears bees. Therefore, farmers in different places keep bees to protect their crops from elephants. - Just like humans, elephants mourn the death of their loved ones. Even after several years, he goes to the place of grief and observes silence and cries.
18. If the Pacific Ocean is triangular in shape, what is the shape of the Andhra Ocean? (a) 
19. What is meant by three dimensions? Length, width and height 
20. Who is called Prince of Experiment? Michael Faraday 
21. What is the length of Kanti Lokpath connecting Hetauda Buddha Chowk to Lalitpur Satdobato? 90 km - The construction of this Lokpath started in 2013. - The part of this route is 51 km towards Makwanpur and 39 km towards Lalitpur. 
22. What is the process of the earth rotating on its axis called? Rotation (Earth rotates once on its axis in 23 hours 56 minutes 4.09 seconds.) 
23. What kind of energy sources are solar energy, wind energy, water source energy and tides? Renewable (Renewable) 
24. What kind of energy sources are natural gas, mineral oil, coal etc.? inexplicable
25. What is the name of the world's first Artificial Intelligence (AI) female journalist built by China? Shin Shaomeg - Shaomeg can read the news for 24 hours and read the news like a professional news anchor. - Shaomeg was released on February 20, 2019. 
26. When was the first meeting of the Federal Parliament (House of Representatives and National Assembly) held? v. No. February 20, 2074 - Oath was taken by the members of the House of Representatives and the National Assembly in this meeting.- Oath was administered by Mahanth Thakur as a senior member on behalf of the House of Representatives and Taradevi Bhatt (as a senior member) on behalf of the National Assembly.- By the senior member Mahanth Thakur on February 20, 2074 from the President. Oath taken.
27. When was the first meeting of the House of Representatives organized after the election of the federal structure? v. No. February 21, 2074 - The first meeting passed its interim procedure. - As a senior member, Mahanth Thakur initiated the work related to the conduct of the meeting. 
28. Where is the office of the United Nations High Commissioner for Human Rights? Geneva (Switzerland) 
29. How many types of monsoon air? Two (Summer Monsoon and Winter Monsoon)
30. Convention on Access to Genetic Resources and Fair and Equitable Sharing of Benefits Derived from Genetic Resources 'Convention of Nayoga' was signed when? 2010 October 29 - This treaty in Nayoga, Japan has been implemented since 2014 October 12. - This convention issued under the Convention on Biological Diversity was approved by the National Assembly and the House of Representatives of Nepal and the letter of entry into this convention. No. Submitted to United Nations Secretary General Antonio Guterres on 14th December 2075 (28th December 2018).- After 90 days of formally submitting the letter, Nepal became a party to the Convention.
1. Who has been selected as the president by the 54th General Assembly of Nepal Confederation of Industry and Commerce held in December 2077? Shekhar Golcha.- According to the constitution of the Mahasangh, Shekhar Golcha became the president according to the provision that the senior vice president automatically becomes the president. - Chandra Prasad Dhakal was elected as the senior vice president in the election other than the president (2077 November 13). Likewise, Ramchandra Sanghai was elected as Vice President (Associates), Anjan Shrestha as Vice President (Materials) and Dinesh Shrestha as Vice President (District/City).
2. When did the government lay the foundation stone of more than 300 basic hospitals in all seven provinces at once with the aim of expanding primary healthcare services in rural areas? Bikram Samvat 2077 Mangsir 15.- To ensure access to quality basic health services at all local levels, a basic hospital is going to be built. 
3. Which municipality has established a sister relationship with Kathmandu metropolis recently (December 2077)? Ramgram Municipality. 
4. Who was elected to the post of president in the election of Nepal Municipality Association held in August 2075? Ashok Kumar Vanju (Best) 
5. What is the color of the 'black box' attached to the plane? Orange color.
6. When and where was the first meeting of the chief ministers of all the seven provinces held? In 2075 August 21, Pokhara (Gandaki Province), Naubunde common opinion was decided. 
7. What percentage of the global emissions of greenhouse gases is from Nepal? About 0.027 percent. 
8. When was the announcement of the 'Nepal Clean Environment Mahabhiyan' program covering various schemes related to environment protection? Year 2075 June 22.- (This campaign includes programs such as tree planting, garbage management, river cleaning, pollution control, etc.) 
9. What is the concept of Jituji related to? Vedic employment. 
10. What was the main purpose of the underwater cabinet meeting in the Maldives on October 16, 2009? Contribution to carbon gas reduction.
11. When did the high-speed wireless internet service 'WiMax' start in Nepal? November 27, 2069. 
12. Since when was the Singha Darbar used as an office of the Nepalese government? Year 2007.- (Singh Darbar was built by the then Prime Minister Chandra Shamsher as his private residence in year 1960. The state hall and gallery meeting are the main attractions in the palace, which is considered a model of neoclassical architecture. This building, built in European style, was considered the most famous building in Asia at that time. It was considered a big palace. After the end of the Rana rule, the building was used as an office of the Government of Nepal from the year 2007. In 2030, a fire destroyed part of this building and some parts were rebuilt.)
13. In addition to fish and meat, what do you call a person who does not consume dairy products such as curd, ghee, chali (butter), paneer? Began 
14. What is the name of the clothes worn while playing Taekwondo? Dobok. 
15. Since when has the work of giving labor approval from each province been started by the government for the ease of workers going to foreign employment? December 15, 2075. 
16. Which country uses Nyayuri instead of dogs in the army? Sri Lanka. 
17. Since when was it started to provide permanent identity card to the Route community? 2075 June 30, Gurans Rural Municipality, Dailekh. 
18. Who is known as the person who started the game of cricket in Nepal? Madanshamsher Jabra. 
19. Which is the longest blockade in the world so far? The US-imposed embargo on Cuba (1961-2015) for about five and a half decades.
20. What is the method of adapting your watch to sunrise and sunset? DLST (Day Light Saving Time). 
21. What is the method of preparing a measurement map of the earth and presenting it statistically and graphically? Cartography. 
22. How many teams participated in the FIFA World Cup (1930)? 13 teams.- Later, 24 teams were added in 1982 and 32 teams in 1998.- 48 teams will participate in the 2026 World Cup. FIFA made a decision on this on January 10, 2017. 
23. The United Nations Development Policy Committee's meeting held from March 12-16, 2018 recommended how many countries should be upgraded to developing countries?- Four (Bhutan, Kiribati, Sao Tome and Principe and Solomon Islands).
24. Who is the youngest recipient of the Nobel Prize? Malala Yusuf Zai, (2014). 25. What is the 90-90-90 strategy related to? AIDS disease.- Various organizations including UN AIDS have conducted the strategy against AIDS, according to which, by the year 2020, 90 percent of those infected with HIV will know about their condition, 90 percent of them will have access to drug treatment, and among those who have access to drug treatment, the goal is to control the infection in the body of 90 percent. - By 2017, it is estimated that there are 37 million people infected with HIV/AIDS around the world. - In the 80s, some achievements were made in controlling this disease, which was in the form of an epidemic. In the period from 2010 to 2017, new infections in the world increased by 16 percent, The number of infections in children decreased by 35 percent and the number of deaths due to AIDS decreased by 51 percent. - The United Nations Sustainable Development Agenda aims to end the AIDS epidemic by 2030.
26. When was the first meeting of the Intergovernmental Finance Council of Nepal held? 24 May 2075. 
27. Which country has the custom of naming the people by the government? Hungary.- (In Hungary, it is customary for the government to set certain names and no one can name their child outside of these names.) 
28. When did Nepal succeed in removing itself from ICAO's security list? 2074 July 6 (Year 2017 July 21).- (Nepal was included in that list since 2013.)
29. Where has the Nepal Quality and Metrology Department constructed the 'tanker calibration tower'? Hetauda.- The Quality and Weights and Measures Department has built the first tanker calibration tower in Nepal to check and certify the capacity and quality of the tanks in the tankers transporting petroleum products and put it into operation from June 20, 2076. Established at a cost of 5 million rupees.- It is believed that it will help in leakage control and consumer welfare.
30. In which museum of Nepal are moon rocks collected? National Museum in Cantonment.- Some of the lunar rocks brought by the American astronauts who reached the moon for the first time on July 20, 1969 were also brought to Nepal and those pieces were collected in the National Museum.- Three American astronauts Neil Armstrong, Edbin Aldrin and Michael Collins on July 16, 1969 They left for the moon through Apollo 11 and reached the lunar surface on July 20.- Armstrong and Aldrin were the first to set foot on the surface of the moon from the spacecraft. After that, a piece of rock brought by NASA's Apollo 17 has also been exhibited in the National Museum. Presenter: Tank Casey
Method of meeting
1. Mention the tasks to be done while managing a meeting in the office. Meeting management is the task of mutual discussion, interaction and drawing actionable conclusions on various matters such as policies, plans, programs, budgets, service delivery etc. in the office. This is a regular function of management. It provides transparency, responsibility, accountability and legitimacy to every work of the office. For this purpose, the preparation and operation of the meeting must be done, which can be mentioned in the following points: Preparation for the meeting: - Writing correspondence to the participants in the meeting clarifying the topic of the meeting, the date, time and place of the meeting, - Written or oral notice to be submitted to the meeting, What are the statistics and documents to be prepared?
2. What role should the local level play to maintain good governance? write
 Responsible and accountable governance is good governance. This is a people-oriented work by every organ of the state system. In the federal structure of Nepal, there are three levels of government namely union, state and local level. Among these, the local level is active as the local government, which is closest to the people. In the executive level of the local government, there will be officials directly elected by the people and they will run the government there. Schedule 8 of the Constitution of Nepal includes 22 subjects and there is a provision of single authority at the local level. In these matters, the village assembly or municipal assembly makes laws, makes annual budgets, makes policies, makes decisions, makes plans, and implements them. Local Government Operation Act-2074, Inter-Governmental Finance Management Act-2074 have been implemented to further organize the provisions of the constitution. Within the authority given by the law, the local level within its area, economic, political, administrative, judicial, Can do remarkable work in social and other fields. The local level is free and autonomous to act within its area. Therefore, the local level should play a multi-faceted role to maintain good governance at the local level by increasing transparency, accountability and participation in all activities from maintaining peace and security at the local level, which can be written as follows:- Drafting local laws in accordance with the constitution, promoting and disseminating local laws, Ensuring full compliance, - Strengthening and enabling the national service mechanisms working at the local level, including the civil service, police, etc. : Drinking water, roads, education, health, electricity, Building physical infrastructure based on participation, local roads, electricity, irrigation, etc., all works are done on war footing, creating wide employment and maintaining development, good governance and prosperity - the cornerstone of local democracy is the local level. Being the closest government to the people, its first responsibility is to maintain good governance. Therefore, from the local level, strengthening of democracy, rule of law, control of corruption, making service delivery agile, it seems that the local level should maintain good governance in all its activities to increase the trust of the people towards the local government.
3. Why is good governance considered an important subject in public administration?
 The Public Administration Act is a permanent structure of the government that implements rules and regulations and mobilizes government resources. From collecting revenue to spending, keeping accounts, providing public services in accessible and remote areas of the country, assisting the government in policy making, and the government's regular, emergency and developmental work mechanism, since public administration is the mechanism of government's regular, emergency and developmental work, such operations should be people-oriented, so good governance is an important subject in public administration. It is considered Other reasons why good governance is considered an important subject in public administration can be mentioned as follows:- to use public resources, means and assets sparingly,- to make public service delivery more efficient,- to make service providers responsible and accountable to service users,- to increase the active and meaningful participation of stakeholders in the state system. - To increase good relations between the government and citizens, to gain trust,
4. What is urbanization? How can population be managed in the city? write
 A city is an area with facilities and facilities such as roads, electricity, drinking water, education, health, industry, trade and business. Urbanization is the expansion of this city. This is the work of developing the city. Urbanization is directly linked to population growth. Urbanization is not a problem in itself, but urbanization without the development of minimum infrastructure is a problem. Ways to manage the population in the city - The population in the city is naturally high due to various service facilities and employment in the city. Therefore, population management in the city is to prevent the population from increasing in the city by creating an environment where the people of the village live in the village. For this, the following measures can be adopted: - providing government service facilities easily to the villages, - preparing the environment for the establishment of industries and factories in the villages, - extending the road network to villages, pitching unpaved roads, - Lowering the cost of electricity used in the village than in the city, - Meeting the needs of the farmers in the village, such as: fertilizers, seeds, agricultural education, etc. - Developing a modern agricultural system, providing adequate training to farmers, - Creating an investment environment in the village, - Emphasizing the establishment of government and private schools and campuses in the village, - Organizing migration from the village to the city.
5. What do you understand by environmental management? Discuss the interrelationship between environmental management and sustainable development.
 Environment is the collective form of air, water, soil, atmosphere, forests, minerals, organisms and animals in this universe. Environmental management is the act of not disturbing these elements on earth, their interactions and interrelationships, making good use of them, promoting and protecting them. It is also a proper use of natural resources. It is also an action that does not affect the natural environment while doing development work. Interrelationship between environmental management and sustainable development – ​​Sustainable development requires population, Emphasizes to maintain the balance of development and environment. - Environmental management emphasizes the interaction and interrelationship of the components of the environment. - Sustainable development advocates that the use of natural resources is the right of the present and future generations. It emphasizes on the quality of development without impacting the environment in the development work. - Environmental management builds, protects and develops all the elements in the universe. - Sustainable development focuses on fulfilling human needs while protecting the environment. - The ultimate goal of environmental management is the proper use of natural resources. - The ultimate goal of sustainable development is the proper use of natural resources in development work. - Therefore, both emphasize on the conservation, development and use of natural resources. There is a deep positive relationship between these two as they both believe that the environment should not be affected in the development work. Protects and develops.- Sustainable development focuses on fulfilling human needs while protecting the environment. - The ultimate goal of environmental management is the proper use of natural resources. - The ultimate goal of sustainable development is the proper use of natural resources in development work. - Therefore, both emphasize on the conservation, development and use of natural resources. There is a deep positive relationship between these two as they both believe that the environment should not be affected in the development work. Protects and develops.- Sustainable development focuses on fulfilling human needs while protecting the environment. - The ultimate goal of environmental management is the proper use of natural resources. - The ultimate goal of sustainable development is the proper use of natural resources in development work. - Therefore, both emphasize on the conservation, development and use of natural resources. There is a deep positive relationship between these two as they both believe that the environment should not be affected in the development work. Both emphasize development and use. There is a deep positive relationship between these two as they both believe that the environment should not be affected in the development work. Both emphasize development and use. There is a deep positive relationship between these two as they both believe that the environment should not be affected in the development work.
6. What are the development policies mentioned in the constitution of Nepal? write
 Article 51 (f) of the Constitution of Nepal contains policies related to development, which can be mentioned as follows: - conducting regional development plans for inclusive economic development, - formulating and implementing sustainable socio-economic development strategies and programs, - giving priority to backward areas, - To develop physical infrastructure in a balanced, environmentally friendly, quality and sustainable manner, - To increase local people's participation in the process of development, - To increase investment in scientific studies, research and innovation, upgrading and development of science and technology, - To protect scientific, technical, intellectual and special talents. To do, - To develop and expand information technology according to national needs and to ensure easy and simple access to it by the general public, - To make the highest use of information technology in national development,- Giving priority to the poor citizens in the distribution of the benefits of development and making arrangements for the common people to receive them fairly, - Developing an integrated national identity management information system, managing all types of information and details of citizens in an integrated manner and linking it with the service facilities available from the state and the national development plan, - Updating the demographic data, linking it with the National Development Plan.
7. Mention the importance of cultural heritage. 
 The historical, religious and archeological assets that give the original identity of the country are the cultural assets. These are specific, which help to make the country known to the world. Buddha's birthplace Lumbini, Changunarayan, Pashupatinath, Patan Palace, Bhaktapur Palace, Swayambhunath etc. are the cultural heritage of Nepal. Its importance can be mentioned as follows: - The distinct identity of the country in the world, - Earning foreign currency by promoting tourism, - Assistance in job creation, - Building social values, recognition, - Religious identity, protection of religion.
1. When has the International Cricket Council (ICC) decided the Women's T-20 World Cup cricket tournament? February 9-26, 2023 South Africa. - The ICC has postponed the Women's T20 World Cup cricket tournament by one year. The ICC has announced that the T20 World Cup will be held a year later than the scheduled schedule, citing the reason of 'Common Wealth Game'. The tournament was scheduled to be held in South Africa in November 2022.- The Common Wealth Games will be held in the UK in 2022. Cricket is also included in this year's Common Wealth Game. According to the ICC, the players who participated in the Common Wealth Games will lack time to prepare for the World Cup and the date has been changed to prepare for the tournament.- If the Corona virus had not spread as an epidemic, the ICC would have organized three major tournaments in 2022. The Women's ODI World Cup cricket tournament was postponed. The Women's ODI World Cup, which was postponed due to the Corona virus, will be held in New Zealand in 2022, according to the ICC. was postponed. The Women's ODI World Cup, which was postponed due to the Corona virus, will be held in New Zealand in 2022, according to the ICC. was postponed. The Women's ODI World Cup, which was postponed due to the Corona virus, will be held in New Zealand in 2022, according to the ICC.
2. Which is the financial institution of Nepal awarded with European Micro Finance Award-2020? Muktinath Bikas Bank.- In a program held in Luxembourg, the bank was honored due to the effectiveness of the latest and customer-friendly inclusive savings services provided to low-income members affiliated to the small and micro banking program and the positive changes it has made in the lives of members. - 70 organizations from 37 countries participated for the award. - The bank received 100,000 euros for the award. 
3. When did the World Rugby Association grant Nepal Rugby Association recognition as an associate member? November 18, 2020. (In 2018, Nepal Rugby received supplementary membership of the Asia Rugby Federation.) 
4. Which country has used lethal micro web weapons in the disputed border area between China and India? China (November 2020).
5. What is the slogan of the 9th National Tax Day celebrated in November 2077? Clean, transparent and technology-friendly tax administration / development, prosperity and good governance.- Surya Nepal became the taxpayer company that paid the most tax to the government in the financial year 2075/076. Vijay Bahadur Shah became the chairman of Jawalakhel Group of Industries, the taxpayer who paid the highest income tax. Every year on the occasion of National Tax Day, the department has been honoring the best taxpayers by publishing their names on 1st of December, but this year due to public holidays (Vitika) falling on 1st of December, the names of the best taxpayers were not announced on that day. Nepal – Taxpayers paying a lot of income tax (individual side) : Vijay Bahadur Shah – Remittance side : IME Limited – Business side : Agni Incorporated – Export side : Dabur Nepal – Agriculture and livestock industry side :
6. Which team is successful in winning the title of the 13th IPL held in the United Arab Emirates in 2020? Mumbai Indians.- After defeating Delhi Capitals by five wickets, Mumbai Indians became the champions of the 13th edition.- Especially the IPL in India this time was held in the United Arab Emirates due to the corona virus. Due to the corona epidemic, the IPL, which was supposed to be held in March and April, was completed in October and November after a long time. 
7. When was the decision to establish employment service centers at all 753 local levels? Vikram Samvat 2075 November 3. 
8. With the aim of stopping the use of plastic and plastic-related materials, when was the 'Plastic-Free Society Building Campaign from Himal to Terai' started from Rara Lake? November 26, 2075 9. When and where did water ATMs start in Nepal? February 21, 2075, Lalitpur.
10. Which is the website launched by the Central Statistics Department with the aim of implementing a one-door system in the notification of statistics? Labatshyalabamibatb.Nayakh.Lau (from 2075 Baisakh 15). 
11. When was the start of smart parking service in Kathmandu Metropolitan City? June 1, 2076 
12. When did Nepal's first satellite Nepal Sat-1 start orbiting the earth? June 2, 2076 (June 17, 2019). 
13. Who will be the chairman of the International Development Aid Mobilization Policy Implementation Committee? Finance Minister 
14. After Kavrepalanchok, which district has been declared self-sufficient in milk? Chitwan. 
15. State no. When was Harit Pradesh campaign launched on 2nd? August 7, 2076. 
16. What is the old name of Bhimsen Stambha i.e. Dharahara? Minar.
17. Which is the district where PKDanda i.e. hidden diamond can be seen from Kanchenjunga in the east to Dhaulagiri Himal in the west? Solukhumbu. 
18. What is the target of reducing the rate of malnutrition in Nepal by the year 2030? 14 percent (by 2025: 24 percent). 
19. Who has been selected as the Speaker by the Democratic Party, which has the majority in the American lower house 'House of Representatives'? Nancy Pelosi.
20. Which Nepali company has won the popularity award at Remtech Awards 2020 held in Florida, USA? City Express Money Transfer. (The company won the award beating 31 competitors from around the world.) 
21. Which place is known as Bardali to see Mount Everest? Pathaledanda (Border of Solukhumbu and Okhaldhunga). 
22. Who is the first governor of independent India? Lord Mountwetton. 
23. What is the required age for obtaining a national identity card? 16 years. 
24. Who is the first doctor to transplant a human heart? Dr. Christian Barnard (South Africa). 
25. Japan is known as the Great Britain of the East and which country is known as the Great Britain of the South? New Zealand.
26. If Mercury is known as the planet without atmosphere, then which planet is known as the planet without 'magnetic field'? Venus 
27. Which is the first space station? Salyut (established by Russia). 
28. Which is the first man-made satellite? Sputnik-1. 
29. According to the Constitution of Nepal-2072, what is meant by national language? All native languages ​​spoken in Nepal. 
30. Since when was the 'Hello Health' program started by the Nepal government? November 29, 2069. 
Kathmandu, November 9th. The Ministry of Federal Affairs and General Administration is going to make standards and procedures for the staff teaching preparatory classes of the Public Service Commission. Although the secretary of the relevant ministry will make a recommendation for approval, the spokesperson of the ministry, Vasant Adhikari, informed that standards and procedures will be made for the long term.
The government has banned national service employees from going to private institutes running preparation classes for competitive exams conducted by the Public Service Commission or other agencies or sending them for online training without permission. It is arranged that the staff of Joint Secretary or above should be approved by the Council of Ministers and other staff of the General Ministry. He said that in order to make the civil service orderly and dignified, it has been arranged that no one can teach unless he is approved. "Employees should work for the all-round development, prosperity and welfare of the country's citizens," he said. "That is why there should be a civil administration with the objective. That didn't happen. That is why we are trying to discourage the preparation class by putting a curb on it.” It has been said that government agencies will strictly monitor whether any employee is involved in training without the approval of the Ministry and action will be taken if training is found. He informed that even though he arranged to teach such preparatory classes only with the permission of the relevant ministry, many employees did not get permission. "Even before this, we had arranged to take mandatory permission", he said, "but it has been found that many people have not taken permission." The relevant ministry does not have any statistics.” "But it has been found that many have not taken permission. The relevant ministry does not have any statistics.” "But it has been found that many have not taken permission. The relevant ministry does not have any statistics.”    
Rammani Dahalhetauda, ​​November 8th. After the formation of the State Public Service Commission in Bagmati Province, for the first time, it has advertised for the filling of vacant posts at the state government and local level. One year after the establishment of Provincial Public Service Commission Bagmati province, the commission has published an advertisement in Gorkhapatra Daily on Monday for the recruitment of employees for vacant posts at the fourth level of the demand form of the provincial government and local level. State Public Service Commission Bagmati Province for the recruitment of 469 employees through seniority and performance evaluation, internal competitive written examination and open and inclusive written examination. Hetauda has advertised. According to the commission, 36 people will be promoted through seniority and performance evaluation, and 36 people will be promoted through internal competitive written examination, and 81 people will be filled in the fourth level of administrative and technical. Advertisement has been made for 388 employees including 249 employees in the open sector. The Chairman of the State Public Service Commission, Sureshman Shrestha, said that on the basis of inclusiveness, 69 women, 40 tribals, 21 Sadheshis, seven Dalits and two disabled persons have been advertised for the fourth level vacancies. According to him, notices have been given for the recruitment of staff in the local levels of the province and two ministries of Bagmati province. Employees have been requested for general administration, accounting, agriculture, health, engineering services and miscellaneous services. like this, According to the commission, 90 employees have been advertised for general administration and five employees for accounting. 447 employees at 44 local levels across the province, 21 employees from the Ministry of Social Development of Bagmati province and one employee from the Ministry of Physical Infrastructure Development have been advertised based on the form sent to the commission. The commission said that the commission did not send the employee demand form to Kathmandu and Lalitpur metropolitan cities, including only Hetauda sub-metropolitan city, despite repeated requests to send them. On the other hand, Bharatpur Metropolitan Corporation has sent an advertisement as per the demand form for filling up vacant posts through the Commission. Among the 119 local levels of the province, 44 local levels and out of the seven ministries of the provincial government, only two ministries sent the employee demand form to the Public Service Commission. Even though the Public Service Commission was formed and started work, the state government and local levels are hiring employees on their own accord
Who is the person who will win the presidency in the election held in November 2020 in America? Joey Biden - Democratic Party candidate and former Vice President Joey Biden was elected as the 46th President of the United States after defeating the incumbent President Donald Trump. - After three decades in the history of America, the candidate of the other party, Biden, won by defeating the incumbent president. Earlier in 1992, Bill Clinton was elected by defeating President George Bush. - 77-year-old Biden is the oldest candidate to be elected in the history of US presidential elections. He will become the elected president with the most popular votes ever. Previously, this record was in the name of Barack Obama.- During Barack Obama's term, he was the vice president. In a special event to be held at the White House on January 20 (year 2021), he will officially become the president Also, Kamala Harris was elected as the first woman vice president in the history of the United States. He is the first attorney general of the state of California and the first black senator.
2. Who was awarded the Bhairav ​​Award of one lakh (for the year 2076-2077) established in memory of Bhairav ​​Aryal, the pinnacle of Nepali comic literature? Ramkumar Pandey, Bhairav ​​Pratibha Award (for the year 2076-2077) was awarded to comedian Rajaram Poudel. Since 2046, these awards have been awarded every two years, and will be awarded annually from the coming year. 
3. Since when was the live question and answer program between MPs and Ministers started in the House of Representatives under the Federal Parliament? Bikram Samvat 2075 August 18.- Direct program was started according to the provisions of paragraph (8) of the House of Representatives Regulations-2075.
4. When was the Provincial and Local Road Construction and Improvement Program Operating Procedure-2076 approved by the Council of Ministers? November 21, 2076. (The government has planned to connect the local level centers that have not yet reached the road network in the country to the national highway within four years.) 
5. How many families has the government initiated a plan to provide safe housing within the next five years (2079-80)? One lakh 25 thousand.- The government announced a new housing arrangement program through the budget of the financial year 2074-075. Accordingly, there is a plan to provide safe civilian housing to 25,000 families in the first year. - According to the program, the government has planned to build safe civilian housing to bring the households with straw and thatched roofs under zinc leaf roofs.
6. According to the Commercial Coffee Farming Survey (2075), which is the first district of Nepal in coffee production? Kavrepalanchok.- According to the survey, Syangja and Sindhupalchok are in the second and third place respectively. - In the survey, farmers who cultivate more than 50 plants are listed as commercial farmers. - According to the survey, there are 6,346 coffee farmers. - Province no. in coffee production. 3 in first place. - According to the statistics department, out of 77 districts, coffee is being cultivated in 32 districts of Madhyapahari region.
7. When will the seventh national agricultural census be conducted? Year 2078. - The seventh national agricultural census will be conducted in the year 2078 with the aim of making various plans for the state of Nepal's agriculture and the development of agriculture. - In the past, agricultural census was done only at the district level, so as to provide agricultural statistics at the local level as well, an agricultural census is going to be conducted about 753 farmers and the state of agriculture at the local level. 
8. Since when has the government arranged for a 'smart card' in driver's license? November 14, 2072.
9. Since when the HD technology was officially started in all four channels of Nepal Television? January 17, 2075.- On the occasion of the 34th anniversary of Nepal Television, HD technology was adopted in the broadcasting of all four channels Nepal Television, NTV Plus, NTV News and NTV Kohalpur. - Nepal Television, established in the year 2041, has gained fame as the oldest and leading television broadcasting organization in Nepal. 
11. Which is the first country in the world to use credit cards? America. 
12. When was the embargo imposed by the US against Turkey withdrawn? October 23, 2019. 
13. What is the Boston Tea Party related to? American War of Independence.
14. Which is the first country to renounce the membership of the International Criminal Court? Burundi (October 27, 2017 
) Which district has the most local level? Sarlahi (20 local levels with 11 municipalities and 9 rural municipalities).- Province with the most local levels: Province no. 1 (137). - The province with the lowest local level: Province no. 6 (79).- Number of districts with two sub-metropolitan cities each: three (Sunsari: Dharan and Itahari, twelve: Jitpur and Kalaiya and Dang: Tulsipur and Ghorahi). 
16. The person who discovered the ozone layer is Jesse Farman, but who is the person who discovered the fact that the ozone layer is thinning? Sherwood Rowland.
17. In terms of area, the largest sub-metropolitan city is Ghorahi (Dang) and which is the smallest sub-metropolitan city? Nepalganj, Banke.- The largest sub-metropolitan city based on population: Janakpur.- Sub-metropolitan city with the largest number of wards: Kalaiya (twelve, 27 wards). 
18. Since when was the system related to Mohiani rights removed in Nepal? December 14, 2053. 
19. When was Lalitpur Metropolitan Municipality declared a Handicraft City? November 28, 2075. 
20. Who is the treasurer who signed the first paper note introduced in Nepal? Janakraj. 
21. Which district has the potential of uranium mining mainly in Nepal? Mustang. 
22. There are 63 articles in the Magna Carta and how many articles are there in the Declaration of Human Rights? 30
23. If Viking-1 is the first spacecraft to reach Mars, which is the first spacecraft to reach the moon? Luna-2. 
24. According to the Local Government Operation Act-2074, there is a minimum number of wards in a rural municipality? Five (at most 21 wards) 
. Who is the scholar who said, "The responsibility of a modern teacher is not to cut down the forest, but to irrigate the desert"? CS Lewis, British novelist. 
26. Where is Manahunkot, a picturesque tourist spot? Tanahun. 
27. To solve the problem of malnutrition in Nepal, how many years multi-sectoral nutrition plan was implemented since 2013? Five years. (After the completion of the first plan, now the second phase five-year (2018-2022) plan has been implemented.)
28. Who will be the coordinator of the local revenue consultation committee to be formed in the municipality? Deputy head of the municipality. 
29. When was Social Security Day celebrated for the first time in Nepal? 2075 November 11.- "The slogan of the first Social Security Day: Let's participate in the social security scheme, ensure a safe future". 
30. When was the recognition of ODI cricket given to Nepal by ICC? March 15, 2018.  
 
Presenter: Tank KC 
What are the employee benefits?
1. What facilities are currently being provided to civil servants in Nepal? Mention and present your suggestions regarding facilities to further attract civil services. It is a compensation provided by the government for the investment of labor, skill and time by the civil servants in the civil service. Such service facilities are usually monetary and non-monetary. Monetary service facility is related to currency while non-monetary service facility is related to service facility other than money. According to Civil Service Act-2049 and Civil Service Regulations-2050, the following facilities are being provided to civil servants in Nepal: Monetary service facility- monthly salary, provision of allowance,- provision of salary increase after one year of service, (grade provision)- paid leave Arrangements,- Arrangements for gratuity or pension on retirement from service,- Heart, Provision of additional financial assistance up to five lakhs in case of kidney and cancer disease,- Provision of life insurance up to one lakh rupees,- Provision of getting an amount equal to one month for festive expenses every year,- Provision of getting one month pension amount for festive expenses for retired employees,- 10 percent of salary Arrangement of deducting the amount and adding 100% of the amount to the employee provident fund, - 12 months salary for gazetted employees, R.P. 18 months salary for unclassified first class and other R.P. Arrangements for provision of 21 months salary for medical expenses for classified and unranked employees,- Arrangements for two-thirds of the increase in pension when the salary of existing employees is increased,- Arrangements for family pension and gratuity,- Special financial benefits of one hundred and fifty thousand to the family in case of death while in service, - Setting objective and scientific indicators of performance and implementing a policy of rewards and punishments based on work progress, - Speeding up the process of filling vacancies in the civil service, making arrangements to take public service exams at least twice a year, - Improving the working environment and making it interference-free, - Federal structure Developing appropriate civil service laws and regulations and improving the working system, developing them as good conduct and ethical mechanisms, civil servants should be capable and motivated as they are the conductors of economic and social transformation of the country. For this, the monetary and non-monetary system should be reformed. The recruitment process should be improved and the talented people of the market should be admitted. They should be made neutral towards politics, committed to the goals and responsible to the service users by efficient use and mobilization of them. - Speeding up the process of filling vacancies in the civil service, arranging for public service exams to be given at least twice a year, - Improving the working environment and making it interference-free, - Improving the working system by formulating civil service laws and regulations compatible with the federal structure, as a mechanism for good conduct and ethics. Developing, - Since civil servants are agents of economic and social transformation of the country, they should be capable and motivated. For this, the monetary and non-monetary system should be reformed. The recruitment process should be improved and the talented people of the market should be admitted. They should be made neutral towards politics, committed to the goals and responsible to the service users by efficient use and mobilization of them. - Speeding up the process of filling vacancies in the civil service, arranging for public service exams to be given at least twice a year, - Improving the working environment and making it interference-free, - Improving the working system by formulating civil service laws and regulations compatible with the federal structure, as a mechanism for good conduct and ethics. Developing, - Since civil servants are agents of economic and social transformation of the country, they should be capable and motivated. For this, the monetary and non-monetary system should be reformed. The recruitment process should be improved and the talented people of the market should be admitted. They should be made neutral towards politics, committed to the goals and responsible to the service users by efficient use and mobilization of them. - Civil service laws and regulations conforming to the federal structure, improving the working system, developing it as a good conduct and ethical mechanism, - Since civil servants are the conductors of economic and social transformation of the country, this force should be capable and motivated. For this, the monetary and non-monetary system should be reformed. The recruitment process should be improved and the talented people of the market should be admitted. They should be made neutral towards politics, committed to the goals and responsible to the service users by efficient use and mobilization of them. - Civil service laws and regulations conforming to the federal structure, improving the working system, developing it as a good conduct and ethical mechanism, - Since civil servants are the conductors of economic and social transformation of the country, this force should be capable and motivated. For this, the monetary and non-monetary system should be reformed. The recruitment process should be improved and the talented people of the market should be admitted. They should be made neutral towards politics, committed to the goals and responsible to the service users by efficient use and mobilization of them. - Since civil servants are conductors of economic and social transformation of the country, they should be competent and motivated. For this, the monetary and non-monetary system should be reformed. The recruitment process should be improved and the talented people of the market should be admitted. They should be made neutral towards politics, committed to the goals and responsible to the service users by efficient use and mobilization of them. - Since civil servants are conductors of economic and social transformation of the country, they should be competent and motivated. For this, the monetary and non-monetary system should be reformed. The recruitment process should be improved and the talented people of the market should be admitted. They should be made neutral towards politics, committed to the goals and responsible to the service users by efficient use and mobilization of them.
2. What are the current challenges in Nepal's economy? Discuss. Various challenges are currently seen in all the four sectors of Nepal's economy. Especially, Covid-19 has added many challenges to the economy of Nepal as well as to the economy of other countries in the world. The four main sectors of the economy, the real sector, the public finance sector, the banking and financial sector and the external sector, i.e. the foreign trade and payment sector, are all problematic. The challenges of the economic sector, social, In other aspects, including physical infrastructure, there has been a huge challenge. Similarly, Nepal's small economy is also likely to be affected by the epidemic that has spread around the world, and the aid received from abroad may also be affected. The current challenges in Nepal's economy can be discussed as follows:- Out of the size of Nepal's economy of 39 trillion, it is estimated that 2 trillion will be lost and will shrink to 37 trillion, the gross domestic product is decreasing, - The economic growth rate is low, the economic growth which was targeted at 8.5 percent last year. It is estimated that the growth rate will be 0.6 percent, - Tourism movement has been stopped, the visit year has been postponed, there has been a huge economic loss, - Agriculture has been affected the most in vegetables, meat and dairy business, and there has been a lot of loss, - Delay in the construction of physical infrastructure. While both cost and construction time are increasing, - There has been a contraction in both government expenditure and revenue collection, current expenditure is increasing and capital expenditure for development construction is decreasing, - Exports are decreasing, - Apart from essential goods, there is a decline in the import of goods such as vehicles, fuel, construction materials, industrial raw materials, etc. There has been a decrease. Even though savings after research is strengthened, it does not seem sustainable and reliable. - The remittance income did not decrease significantly, this is a good thing, but the new destination countries for foreign employment stopped, almost all those who came home on vacation stayed in the country, the number of people who went for foreign employment is increasing. The wage-earning class had to starve to death in the evening. It seems that the lower class is extremely distressed by the fact that around 500 people stand in line for free food in Tundikhel every day. As the government expenditure also decreased, deposits in banks and financial institutions increased and there was no investment. Liquidity increased. On the one hand, the cost of banks and financial institutions increased, and profits decreased. By 2022, it is aiming to upgrade from a least developed country to a developing country and to become a middle-income country by 2030, achieving sustainable development goals. Like the overall development and construction work, the date of completion of these goals has also been pushed to some extent. - Nepal has set a goal of upgrading from a least developed country to a developing country by 2022 and becoming a middle-income country by 2030. Like the overall development and construction work, the date of completion of these goals has also been pushed to some extent.
3. What is the need and importance of management information system in the office? Explain with examples. Requirement - Management has to do various managerial tasks in the office and many related decisions. Management needs information and data to perform such tasks. There is a separate mechanism in the office to collect, process and submit such information and data to the management, which is the Management Information System (MIS). Every activity of management is based on decision and planning. Every process of decision and planning is based on information. Factual decision making and practical planning are indicators of management success in the office. Information and data are both the backbone and the brain of management. It maintains institutional memory, It helps to formulate realistic plans and make reliable decisions. It helps the management to decide the future strategy by comparing the past and the present. For example: Nepal Rastra Bank to formulate the current year's monetary policy and the Ministry of Finance to formulate the current year's annual budget provide the actual information and data of the past and present economic conditions, provided by the above-mentioned bodies. The importance of management information system in the office - support in obtaining reliable information easily and quickly, - safe storage by integrating scattered information, - ensuring information flow, - frugality in the acquisition and use of information, - support for quick decisions, - support in conflict and dispute resolution, Aadhaar - Public Service Commission, with the help of its information system, ascertains the total number of candidates appearing in various advertisements and arranges all the work related to exam preparation, including the number of question papers, the exam building, etc. Likewise, other ministries and agencies of the Government of Nepal such as the Ministry of Federal Affairs and General Administration, the work of staff management, the Ministry of Finance, budget preparation, the Office of the Prime Minister and the Council of Ministers, are carrying out various managerial tasks such as monitoring, coordinating and directing the work progress of all subordinate ministries with the help of information systems in their offices. are
4. What is capital market? The market in which capital is created by demand and supply of capital is called capital market. In the capital market, long-term capital is mobilized. It involves the issuance, purchase, sale and exchange of long-term financial instruments of capital mobilization such as shares, stocks, bonds, debentures, government bonds, savings bonds, etc. It deals with buying and selling of shares and bonds as well as merchant banking, mutual funds, Commodity trading also covers business. The capital market is also considered as a basis for measuring the country's financial strength. It helps to integrate the scattered small savings and flow the money to the productive sector. It also helps in the overall economic development of the country by increasing investment by supplying the required capital from both the government and private sectors. It is also a long-term financial market that mobilizes funds for a long period of time. - The Nepal Securities Board has been established to effectively regulate the capital market in Nepal. As the central bank, Nepal Rastra Bank has also been helping in this. Infrastructures like central deposit system of securities, collective investment fund, credit rating company have been established for the stability of the capital market, timely development of the capital market. Similarly, to manage the capital market, Securities Act-2063, Commodity Exchange Act-2074,  
Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
1. According to the report published in October 2020 by the Lobby Institute in Australia, which countries are in the list of the most powerful (super power) countries in the world? America and China.- In this list America is at the top with 81.6 points. Similarly, China is in the second place with 76.1 points.- America and China have been given the rank of superpower based on the score, while Japan, which is in the third place, has been placed in the rank of major power. With a score of 39.7, India has been included in the list of middle powers. - Every year, the Lobby Institute releases this list after studying the economic capacity, military capacity, internal situation, future plans, economic relations with the second country, defense network, political and diplomatic influence and cultural influence of the world's major countries.
2. According to the statistics published by Nepal Rastra Bank, how many local levels have commercial banks reached across the country by the end of August 2077? 747.- Now the banking access has reached only six local levels.- The number of banks and financial institutions licensed by Nepal Rastra Bank has reached 149 by the end of August 2077. According to this, commercial banks: 27, development banks: 19, finance companies: 21, microfinance: 81 and infrastructure development banks: 1 are operating. The number of branches of banks and financial institutions reached 9,851 by the end of August.
Ranipokhari damaged by the 2072 earthquake and when was the Balagopaleshwar temple in between inaugurated after reconstruction? Vikram Samvat 2077 November 5th. - The historical Ranipokhari reconstructed in the Malla period style has been inaugurated by President Bidya Devi Bhandari by unveiling a copper plate. On this occasion, the pranapratistha and kshamapuja of Balagopaleshwar temple were also performed. It is customary for brothers who don't have sisters to go there on Tihar and wear Bhaitika.- Balgopaleshwar Temple was rebuilt in the Granthkuta style of Pratap Malla's time. - The foundation stone for the reconstruction was laid on the occasion of Earthquake Protection Day on 2nd January 2072, the same year as the earthquake.- In 1726, the then king of Kantipur, Pratap Malla, ordered the construction of Ranipokhari to free his queen, who was drowning in grief. - Reconstruction of Balagopaleshwar temple in dome style after Janga Bahadur Rana's visit to Britain was done After the foundation of the temple collapsed due to the earthquake of 1990, it was rebuilt in dome style by Juddhashamsher Rana.
4. Where is the world's rare animal red panda research center going to be built? Taplejung.- (With the facilitation of the Himalayan Conservation Forum and the financial support of the Red Panda Network, the building of the Red Panda Study Research Center is being constructed.)
5. Who is the Nepalese who won the 'Honorable Mention Award' in the 'Global E-Competition on Astronomy and Astrophysics' conducted in 2020? Rahul Ranjan Shah (St. Xavier's College, Maitighar) and Anshuraj Sedhain (CCRC, Koteshwar).- This competition was conducted from October 9, 2077 to October 7.- In the competition conducted in individual and group category, Nepal won two individual awards.- In the competition, Nepal including 279 individuals from 40 countries and more than 150 participated in the group. 6. Since when was the system of clean feed (transmission of commercial-free programs by foreign television channels) implemented in Nepal? On November 8, 2077.- Foreign television channels currently broadcasting in Nepal used to charge money from customers for watching television and included advertisements, but after November 7, foreign television channels are not allowed to broadcast any type of advertisements, logos, promos or promotions except for programs.- Advertisement According to sub-section (1) of section 6 of the (Regulating) Act-2076, foreign television channels broadcasting in Nepal must broadcast without advertisements (clean feed). - It is seen that it will help to expand Nepal's advertising market. Foreign advertising agencies should come to shoot advertisements in Nepal, Nepali artists and models will get places.
7. When was Nepal elected as a member of the executive board of UN Women, the United Nations agency on gender equality and women's empowerment? 2018 April.- Nepal has been elected as a board member of this organization for the first time (for the year 2019-2021). - India, Bangladesh, Saudi Arabia and Mongolia are among the other countries selected from the Asia-Pacific region as board members. - Likewise, Nepal has also been elected as a member of the Science and Technology Commission for Development for the next three years. Along with Nepal, China, Thailand and Iran have been elected to the commission from the Asia-Pacific region. 
8. According to the detailed project report published by the Nepali Army on August 11, 2076, what is the length of the Kathmandu-Tarai Durat Marg (Khokna-Nijgarh)? 72.5 km.
9. If Kaski is the first district of Nepal declared open direction free, which is the first zone declared open direction free? Dhaulagiri.- (Similarly, the first village to be declared open direction-free is Bandipur (Tanahun).)
10. According to the sixth agricultural census 2068, which is the district that produces the most food crops? Morang.- According to this calculation, the districts with the most agricultural land (main five) are Morang, Jhapa, Sarlahi, Sirha and Sunsari.- Similarly, the districts with the least agricultural land are Manang, Mustang, Dolpa, Rasuwa and Humla.- According to the calculation, the highest cash crop production Sarlahi, Dang in oil crops, Ilam in vegetable production and Bara are districts where irrigated areas have been reached.- Irrigation facilities have reached 53.12 percent of the total arable land. 25 thousand hectares.- The total number of farming families is 38,31,000. 
11. When did the custom of sticking stamps on letters start in Nepal? On June 11, 1944.
12. When was the SLC Board established in Nepal? On November 16, 1990. 
13. Everest Bank is the first bank to start ATM card service, then which bank is the first to start internet banking? Kumari Bank.- (The first bank to launch a credit card: Himalaya Bank) 
14. Which is the first bank to start electronic payment system in Nepal? Nabil Bank. 
15. Since when has the provision of mandatory use of social media by public bodies to provide information to service users been implemented? On July 28, 2075. 
16. When was the approval from the Council of Ministers regarding the implementation of the Ministry Budget Information System in all the seven provinces for budget formulation? 2076 on Baisakh 5 (from financial year 2076-077).
17. Nepal is the first country to have double tax exemption agreement? India (on January 18, 1987).- So far, Nepal has signed tax exemption agreements with 11 different countries. - Countries with double tax exemption agreements are: India, Bangladesh, Sri Lanka, Pakistan, Norway, Thailand, Austria, Mauritius, Qatar, South Korea and China. 
18. Since when was the senior citizen health insurance program and bank account program for all Nepalis started by the government of Nepal? On May 1, 2076. 
19. When was the first seed ATM operation in Nepal? On July 7, 2076.- The first seed ATM has been put into operation in the Lalitpur Metropolitan Municipality premises.- More than three dozen types of vegetables and fruits will be provided from this seed ATM. 
20. When was the formation of the National Development Council-2075? December 2075 on Chait 8.
21. Which country officially declared itself a Jewish state in 2018? Israel. 
22. If Lake Victoria is in Africa, where is the Great Victoria Desert? Australia. 
23. Jasmine Revolution and Arab Spring are related to Tunisia, Lotus Revolution is related to which country? Egypt. 
24. When did the US withdraw from the missile treaty between the US and Russia during the winter war? On February 1, 2019.- Likewise, Russia announced its withdrawal from the treaty on February 2, 2019. This treaty was held in the year 1987. Under the 'Intermediate-Range Nuclear Force Treaty', a winter treaty on medium-range nuclear missiles, land-launched missiles with a range of 500 km to 5500 km were banned.
25. When did India start imposing additional taxes on American goods? On June 16, 2019. 
26. Who is the personality known from the Himalayan encyclopedia Upman? Elizabeth Halley. 
27. When was Mother Teresa awarded the Nobel Peace Prize? In 1979. 
28. Who is the person who said 'Peace begins with a sweet smile'? Mother Teresa. 
29. What is the electric wire used to protect people and farmers from wild animals? Engiver. 
30. Which planets do not have satellites? Mercury and Venus.- (The planet with the most satellites is Jupiter.) Presenter: Tank KC Obstacles to 
development and prosperity
1. What is corruption? What are the reasons for the increase in corruption in Nepal? Mentioning, what role do you see in corruption control? Discuss. The act of misusing public resources, resources, assets, rights and responsibilities for personal gain is called corruption. Misinterpretation of laws, wrong application, financial transactions, misuse of government assets, revenue embezzlement, wrong accounting, paperwork without material progress, etc., are all irregular acts in various forms. Not doing what should be done and doing what should not be done is also corruption. It is the responsibility of the state to investigate some of these criminal acts and prevent corruption. To prevent corruption that hinders development and prosperity, constitutional, legal, Many arrangements have been made, including institutional arrangements, but corruption has not been controlled and good governance has not been established in Nepal. Economic, social and political reasons are responsible for the increase in corruption in Nepal. It seems that corruption has increased due to political, institutional, procedural and behavioral reasons. All these reasons can be mentioned as follows: - Lack of strong willpower from the high political level (even from behavior) to control corruption, - Election expenses are uncontrolled, worker mobilization is expensive, - Social structure does not exclude corruption, - AMRashtra Sevak's salary facilities are low, - Lack of operational coordination among agencies involved in corruption control, - Lack of legal action against those who abuse government tools, resources, property, government service providers are not responsible and accountable to the service users, actions are not transparent, government work is not clean, Not being people-oriented, long and complicated procedures, not having a good and fast working practice, not following the provisions of laws, regulations etc. - Non-implementation of control, punitive and promotional strategies to prevent irregularity and corruption-related actions from subordinate offices by higher authorities, - lack of development of customer survey, investigative journalism, - keeping the work of government agencies and information confidential, not fully implementing the right to information, - all government work - Not implementing a one-door system using modern high information technology in the operation and service flow, dispersing the service flow, lack of functional coordination between service providers, - lack of informational coordination between regulatory bodies, - lack of fair evaluation of the work done by service provider employees, having the same behavior between those who work and those who do not work, - Clients not being aware, not having the habit of asking questions and asking for answers, There are many reasons for this increase as it is a matter related to personal behavior. Corruption has also increased because people's speech and behavior are different. Corruption is rampant in Nepal as a bad culture rooted from the past. The role of agencies in corruption control - The main and responsible agency for corruption control in Nepal is the Authority Abuse Investigation Commission. Cooperation and partnership are necessary to control corruption. The partnership of various agencies is necessary. Parliament and its committees - Finding alternatives to the expensive electoral system, developing an electoral system that is less expensive and frugal, - Keeping a close watch on the activities of all service-providing government agencies, deciding and implementing reform strategies, giving instructions, - Acts, rules, laws up-to-date Revise and speed it up, - make the government agencies responsible to the service users, monitor, evaluate, Creating a small and agile government, monitoring and evaluating the functioning of all ministry bodies and applying rewards and punishments for improvement, - Mechanisms to increase direct contact with the people such as: by expanding programs such as Hello Government, Prime Minister with the People to identify the real problems of the people, delay, irregularity, and corruption. If found, develop a strategy to take action at the place, etc. Commission for Investigation of Abuse of Authority - to play a strong role as the main and responsible agency for corruption control by adopting promotional, preventive and punitive policies to control corruption, - to speed up the investigation of corruption-related activities, to find the real culprits through informational investigations, - to work among the agencies involved in corruption control Increasing coordination, - identifying risk areas where corruption may occur and increasing surveillance,Identifying and alerting the relevant offices, - Identifying institutions where corruption is high, and increasing monitoring and surveillance, - Creating an environment where corruption does not occur, finding ways to simplify the public service process, giving advice on reforming laws and regulations, - Increasing the awareness of service users by surveying the service users. ,- Collaborating with Aduaa to put an end to corruption-related activities. Revenue Investigation Department- Identifying the real revenue potential of the country and finding and controlling the areas of leakage, - Making the information system effective and conducting investigations based on revenue risk, filing cases if found guilty, - Faster patrolling and emergency patrolling Making, - increasing the surveillance of the revenue collection agencies and alerting them. - Asset Laundering Investigation Department - Investigate intensively the legalization of money obtained from illegal and criminal activities and file a case against the guilty. - Regular monitoring of banking and financial transactions, - Establishing operational coordination between agencies involved in crime investigation. - The role of the district administration office - to simplify the service flow of the overcrowded office in the district, - to create an environment that does not allow corruption and irregular activities by coordinating and expanding communication between all government offices in the district, - to increase awareness by providing information to local consumers, service users and the general public, - local Conducting anti-corruption campaigns at the district level with the support of media organizations and journalists. Office of the Controller of Finance and Accounts - Speeding up the internal audit work, requiring the immediate removal of weaknesses, errors, irregularities, - Publishing the income and expenditure details of government offices. Related service providers. Office - Fast service delivery, - First come first serve by applying token system, If the service cannot be received, question the head of the office and ask for an answer. Acting to reduce the expenses of other social activities.- Private sector, non-governmental organizations, civil society, and anti-corruption organizations all play a significant role in corruption control. It seems that by bringing transparency in their respective fields, creative support should be given to public bodies to make them people-oriented, and actions such as raising awareness among citizens and warning should be intensified. Corruption is in society as a distortion. Individuals, families, society and state agencies should all work together to control it. To provide creative support to end procrastination in government offices by helping other service users who cannot read. Society - To conduct a social boycott campaign against corrupt people, - To improve social conduct, behavior, and traditions, and to work to reduce the expenses of other social activities including the increasing festival expenses. - Private sector in corruption control, Non-governmental organizations, civil society, and anti-corruption organizations all play a significant role. It seems that by bringing transparency in their respective fields, creative support should be given to public bodies to make them people-oriented, and actions such as raising awareness among citizens and warning should be intensified. Corruption is in society as a distortion. Individuals, families, society and state agencies should all work together to control it. To provide creative support to end procrastination in government offices by helping other service users who cannot read. Society - To conduct a social boycott campaign against corrupt people, - To improve social conduct, behavior, and traditions, and to work to reduce the expenses of other social activities including the increasing festival expenses. - Private sector in corruption control, Non-governmental organizations, civil society, and anti-corruption organizations all play a significant role. It seems that by bringing transparency in their respective fields, creative support should be given to public bodies to make them people-oriented, and actions such as raising awareness among citizens and warning should be intensified. Corruption is in society as a distortion. Individuals, families, society and state agencies should all work together to control it. Improving the tradition and working to reduce the expenses of other social activities including the increasing festival expenses.- The role of the private sector, non-governmental organizations, civil society, and anti-corruption organizations is significant in controlling corruption. It seems that by bringing transparency in their respective fields, creative support should be given to public bodies to make them people-oriented, and actions such as raising awareness among citizens and warning should be intensified. Corruption is in society as a distortion. Individuals, families, society and state agencies should all work together to control it. Improving the tradition and working to reduce the expenses of other social activities including the increasing festival expenses.- The role of the private sector, non-governmental organizations, civil society, and anti-corruption organizations is significant in controlling corruption. It seems that by bringing transparency in their respective fields, creative support should be given to public bodies to make them people-oriented, and actions such as raising awareness among citizens and warning should be intensified. Corruption is in society as a distortion. Individuals, families, society and state agencies should all work together to control it. It seems that actions such as warning should be intensified. Corruption is in society as a distortion. Individuals, families, society and state agencies should all work together to control it. It seems that actions such as warning should be intensified. Corruption is in society as a distortion. Individuals, families, society and state agencies should all work together to control it.
2. What are the fundamental rights of Dalits in Nepal's constitution? In Article 40 of the Constitution of Nepal, Dalits have the following rights as fundamental rights: - Dalits will have the right to participate in all state bodies based on the principle of proportional inclusion, special provisions will be made for the empowerment, representation and participation of the Dalit community in public service and other employment sectors, - Dalit students From primary to higher education, free education with scholarships will be arranged according to the law, special arrangements will be made for Dalits in technical and professional higher education according to the law, special arrangements will be made according to the law to provide health and social security to the Dalit community, the Dalit community will be able to use and protect their traditional professions, knowledge, skills and technology. and the right to develop,
1. Analyzing the reasons why the annual growth rate of Nepal's population has gradually decreased in recent years, discuss the positive and negative effects of this on the economic and social sector of the country. In Nepal Since 1968, the work of counting the population has started. In the census conducted every ten years, the population growth rate was negative in the initial period. Then the increasing population From the year 2028 By the year 2058, it remained around two percent. It decreased to 1.35 percent in 2068. V.No. Since 2068, the population growth rate has been decreasing annually. Every day about fifteen hundred young manpower from Nepal go abroad for foreign employment, currently about 3.5 million people live abroad. When young men and women with reproductive capacity stay abroad for employment, the population growth rate in the country will decrease. This is the main reason why the annual growth rate of the population in Nepal has gradually decreased in recent years. Other reasons for this are: the tendency to marry at a late age, the availability of temporary and permanent means of family planning, the easy availability of safe abortion services throughout the country, women's right to reproduction. The establishment of rights, the development of the belief that both sons and daughters are equal, the concept of only two children coming into vogue. The impact on the economic and social sphere of the country Nepal is a very rich country in terms of social and cultural aspects, even though it is a little small in terms of geography and economy. small geography, If the population is small, the development of the country is good. If the population is decreasing, it will be easier for the government to provide services such as employment, social security etc. Both villages and towns are organized. Environmental pollution is reduced. Social distortions are reduced. These are positive effects. Population growth rate is the growth rate of human birth order. When the birth of human life in the country is low, the resources available in the country may not be used efficiently, when there is a shortage of skilled manpower, the economic and social development of the country becomes less dynamic. The population growth rate will decrease, people will become old, and the country may turn into an old age home. These are the negative effects of declining population growth. It is easy for the government to provide services including social security. Both villages and towns are organized. Environmental pollution is reduced. Social distortions are reduced. These are positive effects. Population growth rate is the growth rate of human birth order. When the birth of human life in the country is low, the resources available in the country may not be used efficiently, when there is a shortage of skilled manpower, the economic and social development of the country becomes less dynamic. The population growth rate will decrease, people will become old, and the country may turn into an old age home. These are the negative effects of declining population growth. It is easy for the government to provide services including social security. Both villages and towns are organized. Environmental pollution is reduced. Social distortions are reduced. These are positive effects. Population growth rate is the growth rate of human birth order. When the birth of human life in the country is low, the resources available in the country may not be used efficiently, when there is a shortage of skilled manpower, the economic and social development of the country becomes less dynamic. The population growth rate will decrease, people will become old, and the country may turn into an old age home. These are the negative effects of declining population growth. The country may turn into an old age home. These are the negative effects of declining population growth. The country may turn into an old age home. These are the negative effects of declining population growth. There is a shortage of skilled manpower in the country and the country's money may go abroad as it has to be imported from abroad. The population growth rate will decrease, people will become old, and the country may turn into an old age home. These are the negative effects of declining population growth. There is a shortage of skilled manpower in the country and the country's money may go abroad as it has to be imported from abroad. The population growth rate will decrease, people will become old, and the country may turn into an old age home. These are the negative effects of declining population growth.
2. What are the ways to make the mobilization of foreign aid effective in Nepal? write Grants, loans, in-kind aid, technical aid, humanitarian aid etc. received from foreign donor agencies and friendly countries are all foreign aid. Constitutional, legal and institutional arrangements have been made to manage the mobilization of foreign aid in Nepal. Article 51 (d) (11) and Article 59 (6) of the Constitution of Nepal (2072) have constitutional arrangements related to foreign aid. Development Assistance Policy, 2071 has been implemented. In the Ministry of Finance, there is an international financial aid coordination division, and even foreign aid mobilization in Nepal has not been effective. For this, it seems that the following measures should be adopted: Identifying the areas that receive and do not receive foreign assistance, selecting donor agencies, improving the tendency to receive any kind of assistance from any donor agency,
3. What are the duties, duties and rights of the Tribal Commission? Mention. In order to identify, protect, promote and empower the history and culture of the tribal communities in Nepal, the Tribal Commission has been established in the Constitution of Nepal and the Tribal Commission Act, 2074 has been drafted. 6: To study the overall situation of the tribal community and recommend to the Government of Nepal regarding policy, legal and institutional reforms to be done in this regard, to formulate and implement a national policy and program for the protection and promotion of the rights and interests of the tribal community and for the empowerment of such community.
4. How can public participation in development be increased? Write the solutions. Economic, social and physical transformation is development. This is a positive and qualitative change in every field. Since development is a multifaceted subject, active and meaningful participation of all stakeholders is necessary. People's participation has significant importance in development. Therefore, to make the development sustainable and reliable, development should be based on people's participation. For this, people's participation in development can be increased by adopting the following measures: a. By selecting projects based on the demands and needs of the people, b. By arranging for the operation of the project through the consumer committee, c. By creating an environment for consumers to invest in the project, d. By making consumers participate in the distribution of returns, e. By creating an opportunity to ensure public participation in project implementation, monitoring and evaluation, f. By giving the responsibility of maintenance of the project to the consumer, Ch.
5. Discuss the stages of public policy making. Public policy is the guidance of state management. The stages of public policy making are generally not universal. The country's period, situation, need, and time refer to the stages of policy making. Since public policy is a matter of public concern, it seems that stakeholders should be actively and meaningfully involved in its formulation. In general, the following steps are followed in the formulation of public policy: This work of preparing the concept paper of the policy is done by the relevant ministry. The need for policy is realized in this. b. Drafting of the policy The concerned ministry prepares the initial draft of the policy. c. Extensive revisions are made in the policy by taking suggestions from the stakeholders, discussing and holding meetings. Its main purpose is to make the policy universally acceptable, to make the policy implementable. d. Consent is taken from relevant bodies such as: Ministry of Law, Ministry of Finance, Ministry of General Administration, Public Service Commission etc. Opinions, suggestions and consultations are also taken on the subject of the policy. e. Approval of the policy The policy is approved by the minister of the ministry, the council of ministers or the parliament, depending on the content of the policy. Publicizing the approved policy, implementing it, monitoring the implementation, evaluating the policy, and taking endorsements are done after the policy is approved.
Written/Compiled by: Hemchandra Sharma 
 
National-Reference
1. When was Nepal's national flag satellite 'Nepal Sat-1' launched into space for the first time? V.No. Baisakh 5, 2076 (April 18, 2019) The satellite, also known as Bird NPL, weighs about one and a half kilograms and measures 10x10 cm. Length, width, height. It was launched from a place called Mid-Atlantic Spaceport Launchpad in Virginia, USA. The American space company Orbital A.T.K. took responsibility for the launch. The satellite was launched by Cygnos Cargo. It was about 400 km from the earth. The satellite that stays above (at an angle of 90 degrees from the Equator) will stay in the sky of Nepal for five to 10 minutes every day. Built in collaboration with the Kyuse Institute of Technology (CUTECH) and Birds Project in Japan, the UHF band of 437 MHz is used in this satellite. The flag of Nepal on this satellite, Nast's logo and the pictures of two scientists who are the makers of satellites are engraved. Along with the said satellite, Japan's Ugisu and Sri Lanka's Ravana-1 satellites also reached space. Nepal built this satellite under the 'Borders Project' which is aimed at countries that do not have their own satellites. The satellite was prepared by Abhas Maske and Hariram Shrestha, a Nepali student studying at the Cutek Institute in Japan. NAST is coordinating the program under the Borders project in Nepal. This project has been operating for the past 6 years. Nepal will also be able to receive the facilities of other satellites sent into space under the Borders project. NAST has built a 'ground station' in its premises to receive the information provided by the satellite. 'Stall' is also provided,
2. When and where was the first meeting of Nepal-India Enlightened Group (BEN) held? V.No. June 20-21, 2073 (July 4-5, 2016), the latest i.e. the ninth meeting of Kathmandu. June 15-16, 2075 accordingly, it was held in Kathmandu on June 29-30, 2018. Formed with the aim of solving various problems between Nepal and India, this enlightened group consisted of Bhesh Bahadur Thapa (coordinator), Suryanath Upadhyay, Rajan Bhattarai and Nilambar Acharya from Nepal. Similarly, Bhagatsingh Kosiari (Coordinator), Jayanta Prasad, Mahendra P. in EPG from India. Lama and B.C. Upadhyay. The EPG is particularly focused on peace and friendship treaties, open borders, security, trade, transportation and water resources. Even after a long time has passed since the EPG report was prepared, no further process has been carried out. 
3. Who is the designer of the national flag of Nepal? Shankar Nath Rimal
4. Where has the turtle conservation center been established? Sunkhani Wetlands in Jhapa 
5. According to the statistics of 2010, where is Nepal in the country of ginger production? Third 
6. Where is the stork breeding center located?- Kapilvastu is the district with the highest number of storks in Kapilvastunepal. The stork is also known as the farmer's friend. 
7. When did the Nepal Electricity Authority announce the end of load shedding across the country? V.No. 2075 Baisakh 31 
8. What is the target of reaching the number of rhinos in Nepal by the year 2021? 800 
9. According to the Land Act, 2021, what is meant by 'Department'? Department of Land Management and Records
10. Who is the creator of Aaj Ratim Cha Kriti? Indra Bahadur Rai, who was involved in literary movements such as 'Third Dimension', 'Ayameli'. Conducted the 'Third Dimension' movement together with Ishwar Ballab, Bairagi Kaila. Raiko was born in 1984. He passed away on February 22, 2074. His first work 'Vipna Kakhi' was published in 1961. His other works include Kathastha, Kathaputli ki Mana, Aadhaars of Nepali Novels, Supplements, etc. 
11. When was Machine Redevel Passport distributed for the first time in Nepal? V. No. 2067 December 11, the first person to receive MRP was Ramvaran Yadav and the first commoner was Anuradha Koirala. The watermark of the 32-page MRP was printed. The MRP printing work was done by Overther Company in France. 
12. Shankar Koirala is the author of Taruni Chhoti and who is the author of Taruni Kheti? devotee
13. When was Birganj and Birganj declared as metropolitan cities? V.No. 2074 June 17 
14. Since when has Nepal Rashtra Bank fully implemented Wassel-3 in the commercial banks of Nepal? V.No. 2073 July 1 
15. When was the Central Statistics Department established? V.No. 2014 
16. Sarje Himal is known as Shanti Peak while Kanchenjunga Himal is known as what? Nepal pick 
17. Since when has Chinese Internet been operating in Nepal? V.No. 2074 Dec 28 Internet connection was connected through Rasuwa by land route through optical fiber. Now Nepal's information route is possible from both India and China in the global environment. 
18. Since when has the rule that financial institutions cannot accept awards or honors from foreign bodies without the permission of the National Bank come into effect? V.No. 2074 January 11
19. In which place has the business of rearing turkey birds been started in Nepal? Kaski's Batulechaur 
20. When was the 'Think Tank Conference' held for the first time in Nepal? V.No. January 4, 2073 (January 17, 2016) 
21. How many annual plans have been formulated for the development of Karnali by the Karnali Development Commission? 10 years (AD 2073÷74-2082÷83) (The plan announced on January 2, 2074 aims to reduce the population of Karnali, which is currently below 50% poverty line, to 21% in the next 10 years.) 
22. Where is the country's oldest 'National Museum' located? Cantonment, Kathmandu (This museum has a collection of more than 18,000 important and rare art and objects in the world and has been opened to the public for a fee since February 1, 1995.) 
23. Bakraha river (Morang) is known by what name in India? Luna
24. When is National Information Day celebrated in Nepal? August 3 (The day the Right to Information Act, 2064 came into force, August 3 (year 2064) is celebrated as National Information Day every year.) 
25. Since when did polymer notes come into circulation in Nepal? V.No. 2059 October 14 (2002 September 30) 
26. Currently, how many local levels are listed as backward areas in Nepal? 5727. What is the name of the base established during the time of Prime Minister Janga Bahadur Rana regarding the prevention of corruption? Religion Court 
28. Which is the first industrial sector established in Nepal? Balaju Industrial Area (2016) 
29. East Rapti River originating from Makwanpur merges into which river? Narayani 
Vishwa – Reference 30. When was the photo of the black hole made public for the first time? April 10, 2019
31. Who is the person who conducts the Action for Peacekeeping program? 
 No. Secretary General Antonio Guterres 
32. Which country declared itself as a Jewish state in 2018? Israel 
33. When was Asia Co-operation Dialogue (ACD) established? June 18, 2002 (Nepal became a member of ACD on March 10, 2016.) 
34. When was the Norwegian aid organization Lichbm established? On December 1, 1968, Norwegian Agency for Development Co-operation (NORAD) is a donor organization established under the Ministry of Foreign Affairs of Norway. It has been providing support for education, health, capacity building of civil society and quality of life. Its headquarters is in Oslo, Norway.
35. Aung San Suu Kyi is the author of Freedom From Fear and who is the author of Freedom in Exile? Dalai Lama (Tenzing Gyatse) 
36. Who is the first woman Prime Minister of the world? Sirimao Bandaranaike (Sri Lanka), 1960 
37. When was the 'Wassel Convention' regarding the proper management of toxic and harmful wastes? March 22, 1989 (in Wassel, Switzerland) 
38. When was the high-level talks between North and South Korea completed? On January 9, 2018, the world community watched the talks with great interest in Panmunjom, a border village of the two countries. In the talks, there were serious discussions about establishing peace on the Korean Peninsula, the reunification of the two Korean families, and North Korea's participation in the Winter Olympics. The country agreed.
39. When did the United States and Israel announce that they would be separated from UNESCO? 2017 October 12 
40. When did the South Asian country Maldives re-enter the Commonwealth? February 2020 Maldives separated itself from the Commonwealth of Nations on human rights issues about three years ago. He requested in December 2018 to rejoin the Commonwealth of Nations. The Maldives seceded from the Commonwealth after warnings of suspension due to its human rights record and lack of progress on democratic reforms. 
41. Who is the longest reigning king in the world? Bhumibol Adulyadej (Thailand) He ruled for 70 years. He died on October 13, 2016 at the age of 88. 
42. When and where was the First World Women's Conference held? 1975, Mexico
43. Asian Leadership Summit 2019 was held in which country? Bhutan 
44. When was the Global Center for Cyber ​​Security established by the World Economic Forum? The organization was established on January 26, 2018 with the aim of providing a safe cyber space by discouraging cyber crime related activities. The headquarters of this organization is in Geneva, Switzerland. 
45. Which is the largest country in the continent of Africa? Algeria (previously it was Sudan) 
46. What is the other name of the second phase of the Russian revolution? Bolshevik Revolution - October Revolution 
47. If the residents of the Netherlands are called Dutch, what are the residents of Switzerland called? Swiss 
variety
48. When was the Trans-Pacific Partnership Agreement (TPPA) signed? February 4, 2016 (The 30-point charter was issued at the signing ceremony in Auckland, the capital of New Zealand.) 
49. V.No. What is the slogan of the 5th National Yoga Day celebrated on January 1, 2076? National Unity: Relevance of Yoga 
50. Who is the first Nepali woman player to take two hat-trick wickets in international cricket? Ruveena Chhetri
51. When and where was the Nipah virus first discovered? 1998, Malaysia Nipah virus was first discovered in Malaysia in 1998. Since 2001, this infection has been seen from time to time in various places in India and Bangladesh. In April-May 2018, 14 people, including a nurse, died in an infection that spread in Kerala, India. In 5-10 days after being infected with this virus, people develop fever, chills, vomiting, sore throat, and then chills, memory loss, breathing problems and Problems such as hearing loss appear. Bats that spread Nipah virus are also found in Nepal and pigs are imported from India, so there is a high risk of contracting this disease in Nepal. To avoid this infection, the following measures should be taken: 1. Do not eat fruits eaten by bats and be careful when approaching sick or dead pigs. 2. Arranging the importation of pigs imported from India only after health check. 3. Be careful when approaching or touching the patient. Wash hands thoroughly with soap and water after caring for the patient.
52. What is the full form of 'MFN' related to trade business? 
 Most Favored Nation 
53. Narayani Stadium is located in Birgunj and where is Gauritar Stadium? Hetauda 
54. Who is known as the father of Olympic Games? Pierre de Couvertin
55. When and where was the famous scientist Stephen Hawking born? On January 8, 1942, Britain, he introduced the concept of the origin of the universe from the explosion of a black hole, which is known as 'Hawking radiation'. His famous book on the universe 'A Brief History of Time' (published in 1988) has sold more than one million copies. Suffered (since the age of 21) from a neurological disease called 'neuron'. He died on March 14, 2018. Ya nshbaltak (ddannadd)nyam richhabbatbham tajabh kslatabhanbhachak (ddannach)tjab nachabalam mbhakasnal (ddangnyan)tjab mchabhabm tjabat katgaashk mbambh (ddangnyagna)th dyachashbha jaskatyachath (ddangnyagh)
56. The age limit for Nepali women going to America/Europe continent is 18 years, but what is the minimum age limit for women going to Gulf countries as domestic workers? 24 years (Minimum age for a woman to become a caregiver in Israel: 25 years) 
57. When was the South Asian Football Confederation established? December 26, 1995 in which all SAARC countries are members. There is a provision to organize a football tournament every two years by the confederation. The first SAFF football tournament was held in Kathmandu from September 4-13, 1997. India won the first SAFF football and Maldives became the runner-up. 
58. If crocodile is the animal that sheds tears after eating, which animal never sheds tears? Chimpanzees 
59. If the bird without wings is the bird, which is the bird that eats the burning fire? laukat
60. 'No one can develop great talent without perseverance.' Who is the thinker? Aristotle 
61. Stephen Tatav is a player related to which sport? Football (The former captain of the team that led Cameroon to the quarter-finals in the FIFA World Cup in 1990, Tataw, died in August 2020 at the age of 57. Under the captaincy of Tataw, Cameroon presented a brilliant game in that World Cup. Cameroon created a sensation in that World Cup by defeating Argentina, Romania and Colombia.) 
62 . What is Kuwer's garden called? Chaitrarath 
63. Which civilization is known as Vedic civilization? Aryan Civilization 
64. Where has it been decided to place the secretariat of the South Asian Olympic Council? Nepal 
Writing/Composition: Tank K.C.
What is insurance? 1. Identify the problems seen in Nepal's insurance business and discuss the role that the agencies involved in making the insurance business effective. Insurance is the process of transferring risk from one person to another by paying a fixed fee. It is a financial security. Legal and institutional arrangements have been made to manage the insurance business, which is an integral part of the financial system of Nepal, and yet it is not found to be problem-free. The problems seen in the insurance business of Nepal can be identified as follows:- The scope of the insurance business is narrow, covering only about 16 percent of the total population,- The level of public awareness about insurance is low,- The institutional structure of insurance cannot be expanded according to the federal structure,- The insurance claim payment process is complicated and slow. To be,- Inability to increase the qualitative service along with the numerical growth of insurance companies, - Insurance Act - 2049 and Insurance Regulations - 2049, the law regulating the insurance business, cannot be amended at the same time. To make it effective, the roles that these bodies have to perform can be discussed as follows: 1. The role of the Ministry of Finance:- To modernize the Insurance Act-2049 and Regulation-2049,- To prepare the investment environment in the country and develop the insurance business as a safe, competitive and reliable investment sector,- To set the criteria for the selection of executive heads of insurance committees and insurance companies for fair competition. To prepare the environment, to develop the institutional capacity of the insurance committee, to give instructions to increase the institutional presence at the provincial and local levels according to the federal structure, 2. The role of insurance companies - To convince the insured by promoting transparency and accountability in all their operations while maintaining fair competition, - To develop the insurance business as a reliable sector of financial security, savings and investment, - To simplify and expedite the insurance claim payment process, insurance Providing incentives to the agent from time to time and bringing them to the rural level, - evaluating their assets and liabilities from time to time and informing the insured, - following the instructions of the insurance committee and submitting the details and progress of every work done to the insurance committee, 4. The role of an insurance surveyor - to make an actual assessment of the damaged property, - to accurately estimate and evaluate the loss, - to follow the instructions and policies of the insurance committee and the insurance company, - to renew your license on time, - to help in increasing insurance literacy. 5. The role of an insurance agent - To work as an agent of only one insurance company, - To increase public awareness about insurance, - To increase the number of insured people reaching the rural level, - To maintain inclusiveness in the insurance business, - To renew your license within time. 6. The role of the insured - to pay his insurance fee on time, - to keep information about the financial activities, details, balance sheet, etc. of the insurance company he has insured, - to encourage other people to get insurance. 7. The role of ordinary citizens - to insure themselves and their family members, to insure businesses according to their profession, as insurance helps to protect not only the economic and social activities of individuals and organizations, but also life itself, its wide expansion and development is necessary. It seems that insurance should be developed as a reliable sector of financial investment by the above bodies performing their respective roles. As it helps to protect life itself, its extensive expansion and development is necessary. It seems that insurance should be developed as a reliable sector of financial investment by the above bodies performing their respective roles.
2. According to the constitution of Nepal, there is a provision for the Prime Minister to inform the President about what matters? According to Article 81 of the Constitution of Nepal, the Prime Minister shall inform the President of the following matters: (a) Decisions of the Council of Ministers, (b) Bills to be submitted to the Federal Parliament, (c) Other necessary details requested by the President on the above matters, (d) Current situation and foreign relations of Nepal. subject
3. What are the work, duties and rights of the Governor of Nepal Rastra Bank? Mention. The Nepal Rastra Bank Act-2058 provides for the work, duties and powers of the Governor of Nepal Rastra Bank, which can be mentioned as follows: - Implementation of the decisions made by the Board of Directors of Nepal Rastra Bank, - Operation and management of Nepal Rastra Bank, - Nepal Rastra Bank must Organizing tasks, representing Nepal Rastra Bank in international associations and organizations, - Implementing monetary policy and foreign exchange policy, - Determining the necessary policy regarding the interest rate of deposits and loans in commercial banks and financial institutions, - Commercial banks and financial institutions Determining the necessary policy regarding the interest rate to be taken or given in loans or deposits by the institution,
4. What are the reasons for not being able to spend capital in Nepal? Mention and write the measures to increase capital expenditure. The expenditure for the development of the country is capital expenditure. All capital expenditure allocated for economic, social and physical infrastructure development should be investment. If this is not spent, it means that the development construction will not be completed. Public expenditure in Nepal includes current expenditure, capital expenditure and financial arrangements. Their share was 62.4 percent, 26.6 percent, and 11 percent respectively in the budget of the financial year 2076-077. In the current year 2077-78, their share is 64.4 percent, 23.9 percent, and 11. respectively. 7 percent. On the one hand, compared to the current expenditure, the capital expenditure seems to be allocated very little, on the other hand, not all of the allocated capital expenditure is found to be investment. It seems that only about 75 percent to 80 percent of the total capital expenditure allocated has been spent. The situation has been seen like this every year. On the one hand, the lack of resources, on the other hand, the failure to spend all the allocated capital investment, are responsible for many reasons, including policy, structure, and procedure. Which can be mentioned as follows: - Lack of tendency to spend by making a work schedule from the beginning of the financial year, - More small scattered projects, - Lack of active and meaningful participation of stakeholders in the project, - Implementation of the project without adequate preparation, compensation, compensation, tree cutting Work becoming complicated, lack of sufficient functional coordination between government agencies related to project implementation, - detailed study, - Using modern tools and machine tools in development works to make the work fast and quality, adopting transparency in aspects such as project expenses, accounting of expenses, income and expenses details and maintaining good governance by conducting timely internal and final audits. Involvement and cooperation seems necessary. It seems necessary to provide proper guidance and direction to the administrative level by preparing a suitable working environment for this issue related to the prosperity of the country, especially from the political level. Since capital expenditure is a development and construction work, it seems necessary to involve and support multi-agency. It seems necessary to provide proper guidance and direction to the administrative level by preparing a suitable working environment for this issue related to the prosperity of the country, especially from the political level. Since capital expenditure is a development and construction work, it seems necessary to involve and support multi-agency. It seems necessary to provide proper guidance and direction to the administrative level by preparing a suitable working environment for this issue related to the prosperity of the country, especially from the political level.
Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma 
1. Which instruments are included under Naumati instruments? Doi Sanahi, Doi Damaha, Tamko, Jhyali, Dholak, Karnal and Narsinga - (This is a traditional popular instrument of Nepal. It is played as a sign of marriage, fasting, and the arrival of auspicious days and victory.) 
2. When is International Poverty Eradication Day celebrated? October 17- In 2020, this day was celebrated with the slogan 'Acting Together to Achieve Social and Environmental Justice for All'.- The United Nations has been celebrating this day since 1993.
3. According to the Industrial Business Act-2076, which industries are included under energy-generating industries? Industries that produce energy from water sources, solar power, coal, natural oil and fuel or gas, biogas or other sources, industries that manufacture machines/equipment used to produce such energy, power transmission lines, power distribution systems, biogas based energy, co-production of sugar industry An industry that studies the potential of electrical energy produced in the form of energy. 
4. When was the Kerung border between Nepal and China declared as an international border? Vikram Samvat 2074 August 14. 
5. Which article of the Constitution of Nepal (2072) has provisions related to 'right to clean environment'? Section 30. 
6. According to environmentalists, what percentage of the area should be covered by forests for a healthy environment? 43 percent.
7. Which province has the highest share of forest area in the total area of ​​Nepal? Bagmati Province (53.73 percent).- (Lowest: Province No. 2 (27.49 percent). 
8. Since when has the cleanliness week been celebrated in Nepal? Year 2056- (On the occasion of the World Environment Day, the cleanliness week is celebrated every year in Nepal. 9. According to 
the United Nations' Decade in Review, who is the successful person to be declared as the famous teenager of the decade?- Malala Yousafzai. 
10. Since when has the fixed interest rate of personal periodical loans taken from banks for a period of more than one year been implemented? November 2077 1. 
11. According to a report published by the United Nations Children's Fund (UNICEF), which country has the highest rate of child marriage? Central African Republic.
12. Which is the first local level in Nepal where alcohol is prohibited? Rara Chaya Nath Napa (Mugu), November 2075. 
13. Which are the five major districts in Nepal with high literacy rates? Kathmandu, Lalitpur, Kaski, Bhaktapur and Ilam. 
14. Who is known as Himalayan Encyclopedia? Elizabeth Halley.- Born in America in 1923, Elizabeth Halley has done many studies and researches about Nepal. - He established 'Himalayan Database' and collected more than 400 data. - Also known as 'Himalayan Database Memory', Mountaineering Bank, a six thousand 182 meter high mountain in the Dhaulagiri snow range was named Peak Halli in his memory.- He passed away on January 26, 2018.
15. Nepal's largest national park She-Foksundo is spread over how much area? Three thousand 555 square km.- (Located in Dolpa and Mugu districts within this national park is Phoksundo Lake.)
16. What is called the vibration on the upper surface of the earth as a result of the process in the womb of the earth, i.e. shaking the earth's surface up and down or left and right? Earthquake - Earthquake is a natural process. It can neither be stopped nor avoided. It can happen anytime anywhere, especially in seismic areas. Seismic zone means the area where the boundaries of the collision between the earth's plates (plates) exist. - Earthquakes occur due to the friction between large rocky plates in the earth's womb and volcanic eruptions. The longer the friction between the rock plates, the stronger the earthquake. However, it does not seem that the rock that will bring about the cataclysmic earthquake that will destroy the entire world is in the womb of the earth. - According to geologists, friction between any rock in the womb of the earth causes 10. It is not capable of causing an earthquake of more than 5 Richter scale. - Nepal ranks 11th in the world in terms of seismic risk.
17. Who is the player who gave Nepal the first international medal? Jit Bahadur KC - (Runner Jit Bahadur KC won a bronze medal for Nepal in the Asian Fast and Track Championship held in Manila, Philippines in 1973. That medal was Nepal's first international medal.) 
18. Dr. Mukesh Kumar Chalise is an expert on which animal? monkey 
19. When did agriculture and livestock insurance start in Nepal? January 2069. 
20. What is 'Proxima b'? Recently discovered by scientists, a planet similar to Earth and thought to be suitable for life (the planet orbiting the star called Proxima Centauri is similar to Earth to a large extent. This planet is about 4.2 light years away from Earth, that is, about 41 trillion kilometers.)
21. When did the trend of virgins being considered as living goddesses start? Lichchavikal.- The selection of virgins will be made from the Sakya community.- There is a custom of changing virgins after reaching the age of 12.- After the establishment of the republic, Manita Shakya was selected as the first virgin (year 2065) and Trishna Shakya as the second virgin (on 12 October 2074). 
22. Since when was the world's biggest Nobel Prize awarded? Year 1901.- The Nobel Prize for Economics has been awarded since 1968.- The Nobel Peace Prize is awarded in Oslo, the capital of Norway, while other awards are awarded in Stockholm, the capital of Sweden. - Up to three people can get this award jointly. 
23. 'Virtual' currency started from which country? Japan.
24. In how many districts will the government conduct the survey program of poor households in the first phase? 26.- (The aim is to identify poor households and distribute identity cards and empower them socially.)
25. Nepal was re-elected as a member of the United Nations Human Rights Council for which period? Year 2021-2023.- In the election held on October 13, 2020, Nepal succeeded in being selected for a new term by getting 150 votes. passed Neighboring countries China, Pakistan and Uzbekistan are also elected as members of the council from this region.- The members of the council are Ivory Coast, Gabon, Malawi, Senegal from Eastern Europe, Russia from Eastern Europe, Ukraine, Bolivia, Cuba and Mexico from Latin America and Britain and France from Western Europe.- Elected All countries will hold office for three years from January 2021.
26. Education is a continuous dynamic and comprehensive process. What meaning of education does this statement indicate? Broad meaning of education. 
27. Which scientist is known as the father of genetics? Gregor John Mendel 
28. According to the Industrial Business Act-2076, what is meant by 'intellectual property'? Intellectual property such as patents, designs, trademarks, geographical indications, trade secrets, etc., as well as the subject matter defined as copyright by prevailing laws. Presenter: Tank Casey
Gorkhapatra online Kathmandu, November 3rd. The Public Service Commission has postponed all the written examination programs scheduled to be held from 16th October. According to today's decision of the Commission, it has been postponed until further notice due to the increased number of corona infections among the employees of the Public Service Commission and fear among the candidates. Spokesperson of the commission, Geethakumari Homegain, said that public service has postponed the exams of all, including civil and organized organizations. He said that the examination was going to be held for only about 3000 civil posts. He said that he is not sure if the examination is going to be held for some posts in organized institutions. 

 
 
Narayan Kafle Kathmandu, October 29th.
Kathmandu, October 29th. The Supreme Court has issued an interim order not to implement the norms related to examination 9conduct and management0 recently issued by the Public Service Commission. The Supreme Court has issued an interim order on a petition filed by the Human Rights Defenders Network stating that the standards issued by the Commission are discriminatory and disrespectful to those infected with Corona. With the interim order, the implementation of the criteria issued by the commission to exclude those infected with corona in the examination has been stopped. The court has also ordered the Commission to arrange for the exam to be conducted while maintaining the confidentiality of the infected after meeting the health standards. The single bench of Judge Sapna Pradhan Malla found that the criteria of the commission were constitutionally mandated occupation, right to employment, right to equality, It has been mentioned in the order that the right against discrimination on the basis of health and the right against untouchability and discrimination are contrary. Exam Postponement In the meantime, according to the order of the Supreme Court, the commission has postponed the examination program for the post of information technology expert for the first class level published in the gazette on October 9. The commission had fixed the dates of the examination for October 29 and 30. Earlier, the Commission had advertised for the same post on 29 October 2076. According to the advertisement, the names of three people were recommended from the written test and the date of interview was fixed on June 31, 2077. But the Commission published a notice on 29 July 2077 canceling the entire process up to the publication of the written exam results. With the cancellation of the old process, on 9th August 2077, the advertisement of various services was again published and the examination schedule was fixed. But written by Rameshraj Subedi who joined the exam and got selected for the interview
1. What is the slogan of World Habitat Day 2020? (Hunger for All, A Better Urban Future (Housing for All: Prosperous Urban Development) - United Nations Habitat Program (UN-Habitat) decided to celebrate the World Habitat Day on the first Monday of October every year since 1986. Since 2001, this day has also been celebrated in Nepal. Celebrating.- Part-3 of the Constitution of Nepal under the fundamental rights and duties of Article 37, Sub-section 6 of Article 40 and Sub-section 2 of Article 42 recognizes the right to housing as a fundamental right and respects, protects and fulfills the right of all citizens to safe, suitable and environment-friendly housing. and arranged to provide housing facilities to homeless citizens.- By the end of the 15th plan of Nepal, the population living in safe housing (constructed according to the standards of the National Building Code) will increase from 37.8 percent to 60 percent, families living in their own housing will increase to 89 percent,
2. What is the average monthly salary of employees working as employees according to the first national economic calculation by the Central Statistics Department? Rs. 20 thousand 543.- According to the report, 1.7 lakh nine thousand people are involved in various organizations to get salary. The average monthly salary of employees working in large organizations is 26,700 rupees, the average monthly salary of employees working in medium-sized organizations is 25,800 and the average monthly salary of employees working in small organizations is 16,768 rupees. The difference between the monthly salary of employees working in large organizations and small organizations is more than 10,000 rupees. According to the report, 4 billion 21 billion 31 million rupees are spent annually on salaries. however, Among the total income earned by such organizations included in the study, the share of salary is very low. It was found that the two hundred and nineteen thousand and three hundred institutions covered by the report across the country had an annual income of 24 trillion 86 billion 11 billion. Out of that, the annual expenses of such organizations including salaries are 17 trillion 83 billion 35 billion rupees. The report pointed out that the remaining seven billion two billion 750 million rupees were earned. Profit share is 28.3 percent of total earnings. Similarly, the salary expenses are 16. Only 9 percent. In other words, the profit made by such organizations is two trillion 81 billion rupees more than the salary of the employees.- In the study, 21 different sectors were classified and the data was collected accordingly. Out of that, it was seen that registered organizations spent 4.6 billion rupees annually and unregistered industries/organizations spent 14.84 billion rupees annually. 45 crores to 18 billion 31 crores
Districts with low salary distribution District Talbarukum East 10 million Manang 10 million 3 million Rasuwa 17 million 30 million Dolpa 19 million 5 million Humla 29 million 80 million 
3. When was the first edition of 'Amarkosh' published by Nepal Pragya Pratishthan? Vikram Samvat 2026. (The second edition of the Amarganth 'Amarkosh' of historical Mahava was published in 2077 (51 years after the publication of the first edition).) 
4. When was safe abortion legally recognized in Nepal? No. 2059 October 10. (Abortion up to 12 weeks has been recognized. In special cases, abortion up to 28 weeks has been approved by the Act.)
5. According to the report published by the World Bank in October 2020, what is the estimated economic growth rate of Nepal in the fiscal year 2077-078? 0.6 percent.- This was mentioned in the public South Asia Economic Focus Report on October 8, 2020.- In the budget statement of the current financial year, it is mentioned that the economic growth rate of Nepal will be seven percent. 
6. When was the electric bus service started in Kathmandu Valley? 23 August 2076. 
7. Since when the evening aarti was started in Pashupatinath? Year 2064.
8. Who are the scientists who will be awarded the Nobel Prize in Medicine in 2020? Michael Hutton (UK), Harvey Alter (USA) and Charles Rice (USA) According to the award committee.)
9. Who was awarded the Nobel Prize in Physics in 2020? Roger Penrose (UK), Reinhard Genzel (Germany) and Andrea Gage (USA). Who was awarded the 2020 Nobel Prize for Literature? American poetess Louis Gluck.- The award was given in appreciation of the incomparable poetic creation that makes personal existence sovereign in a very beautiful style.- In the 190-year history of the Nobel Prize, which began in 1901, the prize for literature has been postponed twice. It was postponed for the first time in 1943 during the Second World War, and the second time in 2018 was postponed due to accusations of sexual abuse against Jean-Claude Arnault, the husband of Katrin and a member of the jury of the Swedish Academy.
11. Who was awarded the Nobel Peace Prize of 2020? 
World Food Program (WFP) Who was awarded the 2020 Nobel Prize in Chemistry? Jennifer A. Doudna (USA) and Emmanuel Sarpentier (France).- The award was given to them for discovering the correct method in genome editing. With the use of this method and equipment, researchers were able to manipulate the DNA of animals, plants and micro-organisms very precisely. - American biochemist Jennifer A. Doudna and French micro-biologist Emmanuel are the first women to jointly win the Nobel Prize, while they are the sixth and seventh women to win the prize for chemistry.
13. Who is the 2020 Nobel Prize winning economist for economics? Paul R. Milgrom (USA) and Robert B. Wilson (USA) 
14. Where is Valmiki Ashram? Chitwan. 
15. What is the name of the province decided by the provincial assembly meeting of province 5? Lumbini (October 20, 2077).- The provincial assembly meeting passed the naming of the permanent capital and the province by a two-thirds majority. 
16. Where has Nepal's first wildlife hospital been established? Sauraha (Chitwan). 
17. According to the detailed project report published by the Nepali Army on August 11, 2076, how much length of the Kathmandu-Tarai Expressway (Khokna-Nijgarh) will be maintained? 72.5 km.
18. Which country has announced to ban petrol and diesel vehicles by 2030? Ireland. 
19. According to a recently published report, which country has the highest number of Internet users? China. 
20. When did the US declare the Iranian soldiers as terrorist organizations? April 9, 2019.- Baisakh 5 of the year 2076 (from AD 2076-77). 
21. When was the MoU signed to upgrade Biratnagar Airport as an international airport? No. 2077 October 19.- Nepal Civil Aviation Authority, provincial government and Biratnagar Metropolitan Municipality have a tripartite agreement with a goal to be completed in five years. The estimated cost of the project is eight billion rupees.
22. When was the ban on 'horn' announced in Butwal and Nepalgunj? November 1, 2075. 
23. Who is the successful Nepali scientist to complete the scientific contribution related to displacement formula tested by Galileo, a great scientist of the sixteenth century? Bhavindra Kunwar (Magdi). 
24. Which country officially declared itself a Jewish state in 2018? Israel. 
25. When did the Ministry of Communication and Information Technology ban the sharing, publishing and broadcasting of obscene content from the Internet? 2075 October 5. 
26. When was an interim order given by the Supreme Court not to implement the government's decision to ban the use of plastic less than 30 microns thick? 2075 August 17. 
27. Which district accounts for almost two-thirds of the agricultural income from cardamom farming? Taplejung.
28. The Administration Restructuring Commission, 2065 was formed under the chairmanship of Rekha Sharma, while the Administration Reform Suggestion Committee-2069 was formed under the chairmanship of whom? Kashiraj Dahal. 
29. Since when was the International Vulture Awareness Day celebrated? (Photo of vulture is Keshavji) Year 2009.- Vulture awareness day was started to gather participation in its conservation after it was about to become endangered in the world.- Vulture is known as the scoundrel of nature because it cleans the environment by eating food.- There are 23 species of vulture in the world and nine species of vulture are found in South Asia. - The main cause of vulture destruction is diclofenac, a drug used in the treatment of animals. From 2015 to 2019, conservation work has been carried forward by making a vulture conservation action plan.
30. The vulture breeding center is in Chitwan and where is the stork breeding center? Kapilavastu. 
What is economic diplomacy?
1. What is economic diplomacy? Discuss the ways to make Nepal's economic diplomacy effective. Keeping in mind the country's economic interests, increasing relations with friendly nations and the international community, giving support, understanding and coordinating to strengthen the country's economy is called economic diplomacy. This is another major part of foreign policy. This is the expansion of international economic relations, including activities other than pure diplomatic activities such as: expansion and diversification of foreign trade, promotion of foreign investment, transfer of technology, promotion of foreign employment, protection of the rights and interests of Nepali workers working abroad, human resource development, tourism promotion, regional and Works like expansion of regional relations etc. are included. It not only increases the country's identity, but also economic dependence. It helps to maintain mutual economic interdependence. - Organizations required to manage economic diplomacy - Economic diplomacy is a multi-faceted issue as it includes many economic issues. Therefore, not only the government agency, but the involvement of multiple agencies and their roles may be needed to manage it. The agencies required to manage it can be identified as follows: - Government of Nepal, Ministry of Foreign Affairs, - Nepalese Embassies abroad, - Consulate Generals abroad, - Labor Assistants abroad, - Non-resident Nepalis and their organizations, - Nepal Tourism Board, - Private sector representative associations. Organizations such as: Confederation of Industry and Commerce, Federation of Industries, Federation of Domestic and Small Industries, Federation of Women Entrepreneurs etc. - Measures to make Nepal's economic diplomacy effective - In order to make Nepal's economic diplomacy effective, Article 51 (d) of the Constitution of Nepal has provided policy on international relations. Private sector organizations and entrepreneurs are also active in expanding international economic relations from their respective fields and even Nepal's economic diplomacy has not been effective. For this, the following measures should be adopted: - Nepali diplomatic missions abroad should widely publicize economic interests such as investment opportunities, legal environment, business conditions, tourism potential in Nepal, and present such issues in the forum of bilateral and regional negotiations, - the role of the Ministry of Foreign Affairs and diplomatic missions abroad To make others more effective, to increase the posts for this, to provide resources, to increase capacity,
2. Discuss the reasons for excess liquidity in Nepal's financial system, its effects and liquidity management measures. Savings i.e. increasing deposits in banks and financial institutions, but accumulating money in the bank without increasing loans and investments is more liquidity. Although there are policy, legal and institutional arrangements for liquidity management in the financial system of Nepal, this task is becoming complicated in the economy of Nepal. The reasons for excess liquidity in Nepal's economy, its effects and its management measures can be discussed as follows: Reasons for excess liquidity - Lack of demand for new loans, - Accumulation of deposits, - Government not raising internal loans, - The process of disbursing loans to banks and financial institutions is complicated. - Not being able to identify new areas of investment, - Stakeholder bodies such as: Government of Nepal, Ministry of Finance, Nepal Rastra Bank, banks and financial institutions, The Ministry of Finance should create a favorable environment for investment, - Nepal Rastra Bank, which is a regulatory body, should keep a close watch and take a visionary policy. It seems that when there is a general crisis in the economy, investment cannot be made and when there is general enthusiasm, it is not possible to get loans from the banks, the responsible bodies such as the Government of Nepal, the Ministry of Finance, the Nepal Rastra Bank, banks and financial institutions should conduct a timely study and analysis and take visionary decisions. Adopting a visionary policy.- Accumulation of investable capital (currently: about two billion) in the bank instead of investment can affect the cycle of the economy. It seems that when there is a general crisis in the economy, investment cannot be made and when there is general enthusiasm, it is not possible to get loans from the banks, the responsible bodies such as the Government of Nepal, the Ministry of Finance, the Nepal Rastra Bank, banks and financial institutions should conduct a timely study and analysis and take visionary decisions. Adopting a visionary policy.- Accumulation of investable capital (currently: about two billion) in the bank instead of investment can affect the cycle of the economy. It seems that when there is a general crisis in the economy, investment cannot be made and when there is general enthusiasm, it is not possible to get loans from the banks, the responsible bodies such as the Government of Nepal, the Ministry of Finance, the Nepal Rastra Bank, banks and financial institutions should conduct a timely study and analysis and take visionary decisions.
3. Mentioning the problems seen in Nepal's civil service, what are the ways to make this service more people-oriented? Make it clear. The civil service is a professional group of permanent employees with specific knowledge, skills, and abilities who get salary benefits from the state fund. Its basic purpose is to serve the country and the people by impartially implementing the laws and regulations of the civil service, being neutral towards politics and committed to the policies and programs of the government. Legal and institutional arrangements have been made to manage the civil service in Nepal and yet the country's civil service is not public oriented. The problems seen in this can be mentioned as follows: - The legal and institutional arrangements in accordance with the federal structure cannot be effective. association, The work of staff adjustment at the provincial and local levels is not finished. Lack of Federal Civil Service Act in the work of personnel administration at the state and local level is causing problems. The lack of coordination between the three levels of government in the transfer of state and local level employees, - What will the future civil service be like? Lack of a clear long-term policy with an action plan in this regard, - Organizational structure, number of employees and work load are not matched, performance cannot be result-oriented, - salary facilities of employees cannot be contemporary and relevant, incentives and motivation are weak, - the basis of moral development of employees is not transparent, scientific and judicial. Not on the basis of performance, - every work done by the civil service cannot be simple and modern, due to the delay in the highest use of modern technology, the traditional work system and customs are dominant,But monitor and evaluate and associate it with rewards and punishments. 
Public Hearing
1. Discuss the importance of public hearings in public service delivery. Public service delivery is the provision of goods and services by the government to ordinary citizens. A public hearing is a function of discussing and exchanging ideas between officials of government agencies and interested service users to make this public service delivery clean, transparent and easy. It is also a formal meeting between the service provider and the customer. Such a program takes place on the date, place and time specified by prior notice to the customer. It helps to improve the service delivery by removing the deficiencies found in the services-facilities provided by the public bodies. This is its paramount importance. Its other additional importance can be discussed in the following points: - Information about the work of the office to the customer, - Discussion about the work of the office,
2. What is alcoholism? Mention the impact of this on the society. Alcoholism is the act of consuming alcohol such as liquor, wine, beer, and whiskey. This is the consumption of alcoholic liquids. Although alcohol is harmful to health, people use it in the name of religion, on the pretext of feasting and gatherings of friends. Effects on society - Drinking alcohol has a negative effect on health. Alcohol causes health problems such as heartburn, high blood pressure, stroke, and cancer in body parts. A person becomes addicted to alcohol. People get involved in crime due to lack of money to consume alcohol daily. Alcohol helps to increase social crimes like theft, robbery, murder, domestic violence. Increases quarrels in the family, causes enmity between one person and another person in the society. Alcohol harms individuals and society.
3. By identifying the main reasons and problems of ineffective public expenditure management in Nepal, what kind of regulatory arrangements, procedures and systems do you see need to be developed to improve the public expenditure management system, and how do you see the need for which agencies to carry out their responsibilities? Expenditure management is the act of bringing frugality, efficiency and effectiveness in government expenditure. Although policy, legal, institutional and procedural arrangements have been made to organize expenditure management in Nepal, it is not found to be so organized. The main reasons, problems and other aspects of this can be mentioned as follows: Main reasons: - The person responsible for spending does not take responsibility for spending, - Budget spending is opaque, short-sighted and wasteful, - Budget allocation efficiency and spending ability are weak, - Budget at the end of the financial year Convert money, - financial, - Finally, since the government expenditure is the tax money paid by the people, it is necessary to have frugality, transparency, effectiveness and reasonableness in its expenditure. For this, all the three levels of government should bring the current expenditure within the desired limit and increase the capital expenditure. Government spending should be more focused on economic, social and capital building. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
1. When was the Nepal Police and State Police (Operation, Supervision and Coordination) (First Amendment) Ordinance-2077 issued?
 Vikram Samvat 2077 Oct 12th.- The name of the 'Metropolitan Police Office' formed for peace security and crime control in Kathmandu Valley was changed to 'Federal Capital Police'. It is arranged that the leadership will be from the Deputy Inspector General of Police (DIG).- With the issuance of the ordinance, the matter related to the security responsibility of the valley has been concluded. According to which, by adding section 10 (a) of the original Act, it is said, 'Regardless of what is written in section 8 and 9, the Nepal Police will also investigate the work, duties and powers of the provincial police in Kathmandu, Lalitpur and Bhaktapur districts and the investigation of crimes investigated by the provincial police.' - There will be police offices under the Nepal Police in all the three districts of the valley for the work to be done by the Nepal Police. like this,
2. When did the war between Armenia and Azerbaijan start again over the decades-old border dispute? September 27, 2020.- These two former Soviet republics once again entered the battlefield over the disputed Nagorno-Karabakh. Internationally, it is considered as a part of Azerbaijan. However, the majority of the residents there are Armenians. More than 30,000 people died in the war that started in the late 1980s and lasted until the 1990s, while more than 1 million were displaced. In this war, the separatists occupied some territories of Nagorno-Karabakh. However, even after the ceasefire in 1994, the stalemate in the region continues.
3. Acid and other hazardous chemical substances (regulation) Ordinance- 2077 when was issued? 2077 October 12. - There are provisions in the ordinance for up to 20 years of imprisonment in case of acid attack. - The provision of immediate compensation to the victim by freezing the assets of the acid attack and in case of damage to the face, eyes, nose, ears, neck and sensitive organs, the ordinance provides for up to 20 years of imprisonment for the perpetrator.- Body There is a provision in the ordinance to pay 10 years of punishment even if acid is spilled on any part. There is also a provision in the ordinance that acid cannot be kept in bottles of other beverages. The ordinance stipulates that acid can only be sold in sealed bottles and open sale and distribution is completely prohibited.- The seller must also keep a photocopy of the identity card showing the quantity of acid he brought, the punishment of acid attack cannot be waived, acid attack cases should be given priority by the court and grocery should be taken, treatment from the attacker There is a provision in the ordinance that the amount to be spent and the fine should be recovered from the criminal's property within 35 days from the date of the court's decision.
4. Who has been appointed as the vice chancellor of Pokhara University? Prof.Dr. Premnarayan Aryal (October 2077). 
5. Who has been appointed as the chief secretary by the government now? Shankardas Vairagi - Vairagi was appointed as the Chief Secretary in the cabinet meeting on October 15, 2077. He was previously working as Foreign Secretary. Vairagi, who was born in Parvat district in 2023, started his foreign service in 2044 from Nayiv Subba. 
6. Which is the first five-star hotel in Province 1? Hotel Mechi Crown.- (A five-star tourist-oriented hotel has been opened in Mechinagar, the eastern border of Nepal, connected to the Asian highway.) 
7. Which is the first bank to start electronic payment system in Nepal? Nabil Bank. 
8. Where has the Nature Conservation School been established? Kasara, Chitwan.
9. Which is the first company in the world to produce mobile phones? Motorola (USA), April 1973. 
10. Which is the first city of Nepal to be declared a bicycle city? Dharan (December 19, 2069). 
11. Which mountain region is known as Moddar mountain region? Mahabharata mountain. 
12. The part that rises above the Moddar hill is called Pratinati and what is the part that goes down? Circumcision. 
13. In the Middle Ages, there were twenty-two kingdoms in the far west, and what kingdoms were there in the central region? Twenty-four states. 
14. What was the marriage between Ram and Sita? A mighty marriage. 
15. 'Ramcharitra Manas' of ancient times and 'Kushnayana' of modern times are famous epics in which language? period. 
16. How many judges are there in the International Court of Justice? 15 people.
17. When was the NATO Convention on Access to Genetic Resources and the Transparent and Equitable Sharing of Benefits Derived from Their Use signed? October 29, 2010 (Nayoga, Japan). - The Convention of Nayo came into effect on October 12, 2014. - This treaty was approved by Nepal on September 4, 2017. Nepal became the 101st country to ratify the treaty. 
18. What is the policy of remaining neutral without joining any military group, adopting the principles of international peace? non-alignment policy. 
19. According to the National Census 2068 of Nepal, which are the five most populous cities? Kathmandu, Pokhara, Lalitpur, Biratnagar and Bharatpur respectively.
20. How many citizens disappeared due to terrorist activities in Nigeria in the past decade? 22 thousand. - About 22,000 Nigerian citizens have disappeared since the terrorist organization Boko Haram started its attacks a decade ago. - This fact was revealed in a report published by the International Red Cross (ICRC) on September 12, 2019. This is the first time that the list of such a large number of missing citizens has been published.- Since 2009, Boko Haram has been carrying out an armed violent movement in Nigeria, as a result of which 27,000 people have died and about 2 million people have been displaced. 
21. Who is known as the great poet of Nepali language? Siddhidas Amatya.- (The 153rd birth anniversary of the great poet Siddhidas, who is also known as a poet as well as a high-class thinker, was celebrated on August 30, 2077. More than 50 works of Siddhidas, the creator of epics such as Siddhi Ramayana, Sajjan Hridayavaran, etc., were published.
22. When was the new national health policy of Nepal announced? June 16, 2076.- This policy was introduced with the aim of developing and expanding skilled manpower according to the population, geography and federal structure to make health services accessible, efficient and quality. - This policy is a roadmap for the development of the health system. 
23. From when has the Public Service Commission arranged the entrance examination for non-technical gazetted First Class (Nayav Subba) and Second Class (Kharidar) posts? Financial year 2072÷073. - (The Public Service Commission is currently conducting the examination for the gazetted third category i.e. branch officer (non-technical) post in two stages.) 
24. Since when was the 'Hello Health' program started by the Nepal government? November 29, 2069.
25. Which of the SAARC countries is the first country to provide e-passport to its citizens? Maldives (year 2007). 
26. What is the length of the Kaligandaki Corridor, which connects India from Sunauli to Kaligandaki through the Korla border to China? 435 km. - (It is believed that the construction of the corridor will help Nepal in expanding trade with both neighboring countries India, China and third countries.) 
27. Since when has the Child Labor Prevention National Master Plan (2075-2085) been implemented in accordance with the objective of ending all forms of child labor in the country and creating a country without child labor? July 1, 2075.- This Master Plan, which was approved by the Council of Ministers on June 24, 2075 and came into effect on July 1, aims to end unlimited and substandard child labor by 2079 and all forms of child labor during the plan period.
28. If Sir Walter Scott of Canada is known as 'Wizard of North', who is known as 'Uncle Ho'? Ho Chi Minh (Vietnam). 
29. When was the first time a baby was born through 'test tube' technology in Nepal? 2061 February 20 (Om Hospital).- (Nepal's first 'test tube baby' is Ommani Tamang. - More than five hundred test tube babies have been born in Nepal through 'IVF' technology. According to this system, artificial insemination is carried out in a test tube by extracting male sperm and female eggs. And after the development of the embryo, it is placed in the woman's uterus to give birth. The world's first test tube baby 'Louise Brown' was born on July 25, 1978.) 
30. What is meant by the principle of energy conservation? Shakti can be changed from one form to another but cannot be created or destroyed. Presenter: Tank Casey
Gorkhapatra online Kathmandu, October 15th. Foreign Minister and Government Spokesperson Pradeep Kumar Gyawali Dr. He requested Govind KC to withdraw his fast and be active in the common fight against Corona. Minister Gyawali made this request at a press conference held at the Ministry of Communication and Information Technology on Thursday while announcing the decision of the Council of Ministers. 
Dr. Casey is currently on leave at a teaching hospital. Stating that there is no need for hunger strike and hunger strike as the demands raised by him have been addressed and implemented, Minister Gyawali said, "Now the country is in crisis, this is not the time for hunger strike, dharna and strike in an unusual situation. Let us take back the fast and join the common fight against Covid-19.”
Dr. Spokesman Gyawali said that according to the demand raised by KC, medical colleges have been established in all the seven provinces and are in the process of implementation. Similarly, he said that a law related to medical education has been created, a high-level commission has been formed and is in the process of implementation, and its regulations have also been made. He informed that the demand for 75% student scholarship has also been implemented. 
Accordingly, as the fight against Corona continues, spokesperson Gyawali urged everyone to help from their place. He also urged everyone to strictly follow the necessary safety measures while working at the workplace. He added that everyone should be aware when the death toll from Corona exceeds five hundred.
According to spokesperson Gyawali, the Ministry of Education has given in-principle consent to draft the bill related to Madan Bhandari Industrial University. Similarly, according to the proposal of the Ministry of Federal and General Administration, it has been decided to give permission to the Public Service Commission to conduct the Public Service Commission examination, which was previously advertised but could not be conducted. The exam was postponed last May due to Corona.
Problems of infrastructure development 1. What are the problems seen in infrastructure development in Nepal? write Infrastructure development includes transport, electricity, communication, information technology, urban and rural development, housing and settlement development, building, science and technology, and reconstruction. Legal and institutional arrangements have been made for infrastructure development in Nepal and various problems have been observed in infrastructure development. which are as follows: lack of capital for investment, lack of experienced and skilled manpower, lack of development of methods and systems despite political and policy stability, inconvenient geographical structure, difficulty in doing development work in places like uphill, downhill, Bhirpakha, Dandakanda, Galchi, etc. It is slow and expensive, the favorable environment for domestic and foreign investment is not yet ready in the country, there is no functional coordination and cooperation between the agencies involved in the development work. Legal and institutional structures cannot be contemporary, complex, cannot be investment friendly, the practical side of tax exemptions and concessions is weak, government services and facilities cannot be investment friendly, monetary and non-monetary facilities, concessions and incentives to increase investment in development work are not effective, institutional governance 2. What are the functions of the Infrastructure Development Bank? Mention. According to the Banking and Financial Institutions Act-2073, which is designed to organize the establishment, operation, management, regulation, inspection and supervision of banks and financial institutions in Nepal, Nepal Rastra Bank has classified banks and financial institutions as "A" class, " B" class, It is divided into "C" class and "D" class. In which commercial banks and infrastructure development banks are placed in "A" category, development banks in "B" category, finance companies in "C" category and microfinance institutions in "D" category. The said Act has regulated the activities to be performed by all the above categories of banks and financial institutions. Under this, the activities of the Infrastructure Development Bank can be mentioned as follows: providing loans and investing in shares in infrastructure development projects, investing in securities of companies operating infrastructure development projects, purchasing, selling, supplying and installing machine tools and tools necessary for the construction and operation of infrastructure development projects. Opening letters of credit for business and issuing bonds, With the approval of Nepal Rastra Bank, in order to raise funds necessary to invest in infrastructure development projects, issuing financial instruments in various types of domestic foreign currency and obtaining loans, mobilizing resources by accepting deposits of a long-term nature and issuing debentures, 'leasing' transactions with the approval of Nepal Rastra Bank To do, to accept the guarantee of foreign banks and financial institutions and to provide loans and facilities in the project, to do other tasks specified by Nepal Rastra Bank. 3. What is financial policy? Mentioning the objectives of financial policy, how are the instruments of financial policy used to achieve those objectives? Discuss. tax on the country's economy, The policy of effecting the need through government spending and borrowing is called fiscal policy. Government mobilizes and allocates resources through financial policy. It is a part of macroeconomic policy. It helps to deal with economic recession and price rise in the economy. Its scope and influence are wide. It stands on a political and social foundation. It is formulated by the government. It is closely related to the government budget. It is issued before the beginning of the financial year. Objectives of fiscal policy a. Economic growth, b. Economic stability, c. Tools of Social Justice Finance Policy. tax, b. Government expenditure, c. Government debt. Use of financial policy tools. Financial policy tools. Financial policy objectives. Economic growth, They have contributed to maintaining economic stability and social justice. They are used as follows: Use of tax to achieve economic growth should increase investment in the productive sector. Taxes do the work of raising resources for investment. The production and productivity of goods and services can be increased by giving discounts on exports, by giving concessions to industries in remote areas, by providing facilities to industries that provide more employment. Progressive taxation helps to maintain social justice. The money raised by taxing higher income earners can be spent on poverty alleviation. Income tax helps to maintain social justice. To protect indigenous industries by customs, excise and value added tax, They help to increase the export. All these actions help to achieve the objectives of the financial policy. Use of Government Expenditure Focusing government expenditure on infrastructure construction and productive sectors leads to economic growth. Implementing a balanced budget helps to maintain economic stability. Investing in areas like education, health, agriculture directly benefits the poor. Investing in the areas of social security such as old-age allowance, pension, medicine, etc. helps to maintain social justice. Use of government debt The government collects debt through a deficit budget. A deficit budget is introduced to raise capital expenditure. This will help to achieve economic growth. However, the government debt raised in excess may increase inflation, the private sector may be without resources, so government debt should be mobilized keeping these things in mind. 4. Formation and work of the National Council for Disaster Risk Reduction and Management, Write about duties and rights. The Disaster Risk Reduction and Management Act-2074 has established a National Council for Disaster Risk Reduction and Management under the chairmanship of the Prime Minister in order to carry out disaster management activities effectively. which are as follows: (a) Prime Minister – Chairman (b) Ministers of the Government of Nepal – Member (c) Leader of the Opposition in the House of Representatives – Member (d) Chief Minister of all Provinces – Member (e) Vice Chairman of the National Planning Commission – Member (f) Chief Minister of the Government of Nepal Secretary - Member (g) Commander-in-Chief, Nepalese Army - Member (h) Secretary of the Ministry of Home Affairs - Member (j) Three nominated by the council including at least one woman from among the people who have gained expertise in the field of disaster management - Member (j) Executive Head of National Disaster Risk Reduction and Management Authority - Member Secretary The term of office of the nominated member as mentioned above shall be five years, What are the objectives of the United Nations? Mention. The objectives of the United Nations, which was established on October 24, 1945, are as follows: maintaining international peace and security, developing friendly relations between nations, creating a state of equality among nations, encouraging international cooperation, enhancing human dignity and value, and protecting the human community from the dangers of war. 6. What are the five characteristics of Nepal's constitution? Mention. The five features of the Constitution of Nepal, which has hundreds of features and has been implemented since August 3, 2072, are as follows: a. Federalism, b. Republic, c. Inclusivity, d. Independent, impartial and competent judiciary, e. Periodical elections. To develop friendly relations between nations, to create a state of equality between nations, to encourage international cooperation, to enhance human dignity and value, to protect the human community from the scourge of war. 6. What are the five characteristics of Nepal's constitution? Mention. The five features of the Constitution of Nepal, which has hundreds of features and has been implemented since August 3, 2072, are as follows: a. Federalism, b. Republic, c. Inclusivity, d. Independent, impartial and competent judiciary, e. Periodical elections. To develop friendly relations between nations, to create a state of equality between nations, to encourage international cooperation, to enhance human dignity and value, to protect the human community from the scourge of war. 6. What are the five characteristics of Nepal's constitution? Mention. The five features of the Constitution of Nepal, which has hundreds of features and has been implemented since August 3, 2072, are as follows: a. Federalism, b. Republic, c. Inclusivity, d. Independent, impartial and competent judiciary, e. Periodical elections. What are the five characteristics of Nepal's constitution? Mention. The five features of the Constitution of Nepal, which has hundreds of features and has been implemented since August 3, 2072, are as follows: a. Federalism, b. Republic, c. Inclusivity, d. Independent, impartial and competent judiciary, e. Periodical elections. What are the five characteristics of Nepal's constitution? Mention. The five features of the Constitution of Nepal, which has hundreds of features and has been implemented since August 3, 2072, are as follows: a. Federalism, b. Republic, c. Inclusivity, d. Independent, impartial and competent judiciary, e. Periodical elections.
1. When was the official inauguration of the Young Scientists Forum (YSFN) with the aim of developing and promoting science and technology by the Nepal Institute of Science and Technology (NAST)?
 Vikram Samvat 2077 Oct 9 The forum was established in the year 2018 by Nast. After two years, the forum was formally inaugurated by the Minister of Education, Science and Technology Girirajmani Pokharel through a virtual program. The forum was established with the aim of developing the science sector by expanding coordination and cooperation between Nepali researchers at home and abroad. According to NAST, this organization is the only youth scientific forum formed by the government mechanism. The forum has also received the recognition of the Nepal Chapter of the World Foundation of Young Scientists. 2. According to the 2020 report on the measurement of innovation in the economy issued by the World Intellectual Property Organization, what is the position of Nepal? Among the 131 economies included in the 95th report, Nepal is in the 95th place. Recently, the use of technology, Improvements in e-commerce and dematerialization of payment systems have helped Nepal to increase its position in the list. Nepal has managed to be among the top three in the list of 16 low-income countries. 3. When were two trains brought to Nepal recently for operation from Janakpur to Jayanagar in India? 24 October 2077 When was the Second World Health Conference of Non-Resident Nepali Association (NRNA) International Coordinating Council completed? 2077 October 2-4 (September 18-20, 2020) Conference issued 26-point World Nepali Health Declaration. Emphasis on building a global network of Nepali nurses and mental health specialists to include all health workers scattered around the world, emphasis on the production and development of herbal medicine, maternal and child health. Health, Children, Adolescent and Youth Health, Chronic Disease Management, The manifesto includes topics such as solidarity of all health workers for the promotion of social awareness. 5. What is the 'operation' conducted by Nepal and China against cyber crime related activities in Nepal known as? Charlie Foxter 6. Since when has automatic price system been implemented in petrol and diesel in Nepal? 2071 October 137. Which is the first country in the world to use facial verification? Singapore will adopt the facial verification method under its national identity scheme. With this, Singapore became the first country in the world to identify citizens through facial verification. By using the biometric facility, Singapore citizens can access private and government services. 8. Who is the artist who presented his talent by singing the national songs of 50 countries of the world? Ramji Nepali (Baglung) (photo is) On the occasion of World Tourism Day-2020, he sang the national songs of 50 countries of the world and conveyed the message of world brotherhood, cultural tourism and goodwill. The audience was surprised to hear the national songs of 50 countries composed in different languages, styles and rhythms. He had a unique experience. The Nepalese singer, who has been on a world tour campaign since 2015, said that he will start his world tour again after the Corona crisis subsides. Currently, the Nepali, who is used to the national anthems of 56 countries, said that his goal is to reach more than 130 countries and do justice to the national anthems of all countries. 9. Rasuwa is known as the district of seven ponds, Kaski is known as the district of seven lakes, and which one is known as the district of seven ponds? Kathmandu10. When is World Tourism Day celebrated? On September 27, 1970, after the establishment of the United Nations World Tourism Organization on September 27, this day has been celebrated since 1980 in commemoration of the same day. In 2020, this day was celebrated with the slogan 'Tourism: Building Peace, Fostering Knowledge'. 11. When did Anirudh Prasad Singh, the former Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, pass away? Year 2077 August 3012. According to the Citizen Pension Scheme implemented by the Citizen Investment Fund, how many years does the saver have to accumulate money in order to get a pension? This scheme was introduced with the aim of encouraging the common people to save for 15 years, to mobilize such savings for the economic development of the country and to facilitate the life of the savers from the amount accumulated during their active life. If the participant dies after starting to receive pension, the spouse of the deceased will be given a family pension equal to the amount he or she is receiving. It is said that the person receiving pension from Nepal government or elsewhere can also participate in this scheme. 13. Who has been appointed by the government as the vice-chancellor of the University of Agriculture and Forestry? Prof. Dr. Punya Regmi (2077 October) (Also, Prof. Dr. Yadav Prakash Lamichhane was appointed as the Vice-Chancellor of Nepal Sanskrit University.) 14. Who is the successful cricketer in making the record of the world's youngest player to score a half-century in international cricket? Kushal Malla (Nepal) (Photo Hai) Kushal scored a half-century against the USA (25th January 2076) in the ICC World Cup League-2 series at Kirtipur University Cricket Ground and set the record (at the age of 15 years and 335 days). Kushal's record is not only in ODIs, In overall cricket, this record was previously held by Nepal's Rohit Kumar Paudel. Rohit scored 55 runs in the second ODI match against UAE on 12 January 2075 (at the age of 16 years and 146 days). The coincidence of Kushal breaking Rohit's record is interesting. In the match against America, Kushal got a chance to play in place of Rohit. He broke the record of the one in whose place he was able to play. Before Rohit, the record of scoring a half-century in ODIs at a young age was held by Pakistani cricketer Shahid Afridi. 15. When did the record climber Angrita Sherpa pass away? 2077 October 516. What is called a standard quantity made for measuring a physical quantity? Unit (Unit) (Units of physical quantity are divided into two parts, basic unit and virtual unit.) 17. When was the first paper currency introduced in Nepal? October 1, 2002 - In Nepal, Rana Prime Minister Juddha Shamsher issued an ordinance and introduced paper currency from October 1, 2002. - For the first time Rs. One hundred, Rs. 10 and Rs. Paper notes of five rates were issued.- The cashier who signed those notes issued by Sadar Mulukikhana was Janakraj. 18. What is meant by 'blue tooth'? Short-range wireless file sharing technology 19. When was the Asia Cooperation Dialogue (ACD) established? June 18, 2002 (Nepal became a member of ACD on March 10, 2016. Currently, there are 34 countries in ACD including Nepal.) 20. Who has been given the responsibility of coordinator from Nepal side in Nepal-India Enlightened Group (EPG)? Dr. Bhesh Bahadur Thapa (from India: Bhagat Singh Kosiari) 21. When was the famous Oscar Award, which is regarded as the Nobel Prize in the field of film, awarded for the first time? Established in 1929, this award was first given to the movie 'Wings' in 1929. 22. A female pig is called Bhuni, and what is a male pig called? Bucho 23. Which period has been declared as Forest Decade in Nepal? Year 2071-208024. Asiad Which is the first Asian sports competition held in two cities in history? 18th Asiad (2018) (Jakarta and Palemwang, Indonesia) 25. What is the agreement made in Nepal, India, Bhutan and Bangladesh to operate direct bus services? BBIN Initiative (2015 in Thimphu, Bhutan) The agreement on June 15.) 26. Which country is the first BIPPA agreement made by Nepal? France 27. Who is the Nepali girl who was successful in being honored with America-based Goalkeepers Goal Progress Award-2020? Bonita Sharma (The award was presented to Sharma in appreciation of her contribution to improving the nutritional health of Nepali mothers and babies despite the epidemic of Covid-19.) 28. Since when has the National Human Rights Commission been established as a constitutional body? Year 2063 January 1 (with the Interim Constitution of Nepal-2063) 29. Which is the international organization that supports government reform program in Nepal? Asian Development Bank 30. Which article of the current constitution (2072) provides for the right of free higher education for disabled and economically disadvantaged citizens according to the law? Article 31 (3) Since when has the National Human Rights Commission been established as a constitutional body? Year 2063 January 1 (with the Interim Constitution of Nepal-2063) 29. Which is the international organization that supports government reform program in Nepal? Asian Development Bank 30. Which article of the current constitution (2072) provides for the right of free higher education for disabled and economically disadvantaged citizens according to the law? Article 31 (3) Since when has the National Human Rights Commission been established as a constitutional body? Year 2063 January 1 (with the Interim Constitution of Nepal-2063) 29. Which is the international organization that supports government reform program in Nepal? Asian Development Bank 30. Which article of the current constitution (2072) provides for the right of free higher education for disabled and economically disadvantaged citizens according to the law? Article 31 (3)
1. Which country started the '5G' telecommunication service in the world? South Korea 
2. According to the 'Asian Development Outlook 2020 Update' published by the Asian Development Bank (ADB) on September 15, 2020, what is the estimated economic growth rate of Nepal in 2077-078? 1.5 percent - ADB predicts that Nepal will rank third among SAARC countries. It is predicted that Nepal will be among the least affected SAARC countries after Bangladesh and Bhutan.- It is estimated that Nepal's inflation will be around 5.5 percent in the fiscal year 2077-78.
3. Who is the highest paid football player in 2020 according to the public report on September 14, 2020 by Forbes? Lionel Messi (Captain of the Spanish club Barcelona and the Argentine national football team) - In becoming the highest paid footballer this year, he surpassed Italian Serie A club Juventus and Portugal's Cristiano Ronaldo. Last year, Ronaldo became the highest earning football player.- The second highest earning football player is Cristiano Ronaldo and the third place is the Brazilian footballer Neymar of the French club PSG. On the fourth place in the list are PSG and France's Clian Mappé and on the fifth place are English club Liverpool and Egypt's Mohamed Salah.
4. What is called the movement conducted by the American youth that the protection of the earth's environment should be given first priority and only other actions should be taken? Earth First 
5. What is the slogan of the second 'World Patient Safety Day' celebrated on September 17, 2020? Safe health workers: safe patients 
6. What is the slogan of the 8th National Science Day celebrated on October 1, 2077? Science for health and quality of life
7. Who is the person who will be honored with the well-known Prabal Janasewashree (first) on the occasion of Constitution Day on October 3, 2077? Dr. Ark Ruit 1. Awarded by the famous Prabal Janasevashree (II) 2. Deepkumar Karki (Judge, Supreme Court)3. Naveen Kumar Ghimire (Former Chief Commissioner, Adua) 4. Purnachandra Thapa (Maharathi / Commander-in-Chief, Nepali Army) 5. Shailendra Khanal (Inspector General of Armed Police, Armed Police Force) awarded with Sukirtimaya Rashtradeep (III) 1. Dr. Ganesh Raj Joshi (Commissioner, Adua) 2. Dr. Tirtha Bahadur Shrestha (Botanist, Sanepa, Lalitpur)3. Kedar Bahadur Adhikari (Secretary, Culture Tourism and Civil Aviation) 4. Ganesh Prasad Adhikari (Chief Research Director, National Research Department)5. Pushparam KC (Additional Inspector General of Armed Police, Armed Police Force)6. Ram Sharan Paudel (Additional Inspector General of Armed Police, Armed Police Force)7.
8. Where is the Indian Premier League (IPL) 2020 being held? Dubai (United Arab Emirates) - This competition will be held from September 19 to November 10, 2020. The opening match of IPL was between the previous winners Mumbai Indians and Chennai Super Kings.- Earlier IPL 2020 was scheduled on March 29. However, due to the corona virus epidemic, it was postponed time and again. This competition, which was scheduled in India, was organized in the UAE due to the Corona epidemic.
9. Who is the creator honored with the Madan Award of 2076? Chandraprakash Baniyan - Baniya of Myagdi was honored with the award for the historical novel 'Maharani'.- Former MP Baniya's story Maharani focuses on the internal power struggle within the palace of the then mountain state and the use of women's love and feelings to gain power.- Taking a break from active politics, history, Banyans active in culture and literary writing have published funeral rituals, Kulpuja, historical mountain kingdom books.- Among the 151 books received according to the Madan Prize Guthi, Joker's Gun (Bimal Niva), Dharsaidharsa's Chakravyuh (Tirtha Shrestha), Abandoned (Bhuvan Dhungana), Maharasnighantu (Vol. 1–3, Yogi Dharmamaharas), Maharani (Chandraprakash Baniyan), Mohpath (Lalit Bishta) and Yatrama (Sharda Sharma) were selected as 'Madan Award List 2076'.- The amount of the award is four lakh rupees. Earlier (2075) Yogeshraj's Ranhar novel won the Madan Award.
10. Who is the creator honored with the Jagdambashree award of the year 2076? Singer and Musician Shanti Thatal - This award was presented to the singer and musician Thatal from Darjeeling for making a special contribution to the development of Nepali song and music sector. - The amount of the award is four lakh rupees. Prizes will be awarded. This award was given to Narayan Gopal Guruvacharya for the first time. 
11. When was Lekhnath Paudyal awarded the title of Kavi Shiromani? Vikram Samvat 2008 
12. When was Nepal Administrative Training Institute (Staff College) established? Year 2039 
13. What is called a check that is not paid due to insufficient funds in the bank account? Bounced check
On September 16, 2020, who was elected by the Parliament of Japan as the Prime Minister? Yoshihide Suga - Former prime minister Shinzo Awe's closest supporter and ally, Suga is expected to continue his policies. - In the voting for the post of Prime Minister, Suga won 314 votes out of a total of 462 votes. Served. Suga, who became a member of the Diet in 1996, also became a minister in Prime Minister Junichiro Koizumi's government in 2005. - Suga, a famous politician and a member of the cabinet for a long time, took the leadership of Japan, which is considered to be the third largest economy in the world, when the corona virus epidemic is ravaging. - About one-third of Japan's total population is over 65 years of age. Japanese
15. The oldest statue of Nepal is Virupaksha, which is the smallest statue? Patan Vishwarup statue 
16. If ancient fort is in Mahottari district then where is Dugunagadhi? Sindhupalchok 
17. What was the slogan of the first family day celebrated on 2071 Oct 2 (18 September 2014)? Arranged family: basis of health and development 
18. What is the land left empty 10 yards wide on both sides from the boundary pillar established on the border between two countries? Dasgaja area (No Man's Land) - (a border area between the two countries that is considered to be under the jurisdiction of no one and extends through 10 yards in width.) 
19. Which is the largest and deepest ocean in the world? Pacific Ocean
20. Nepal occupies 0.03 percent of the land area of ​​the world, and how many percent of the land area of ​​Asia is occupied? 0.3 percent (occupying three percent of the territory of South Asia.) 
21. After which event in the world, the need for partnership between the government and the private sector was emphasized? Economic Depression of 1930 
22. If Narraj Dhakal is known as Music Proveen, who is known as Music Shiromani? Yagyaraj Sharma 
23. What happens to the sea like the banks of the river? Coast 
24. Which international level sports competition is conducted only in Nepal? Elephant Polo 
25. If Rupse waterfall is in Myagdi district, where is Suligadh waterfall? Dolpa 
26. If the old name of Japan is Nippon, what is the old name of the Netherlands? Holland 
27. Who is the thinker who said that 'excessive ambition causes the deity to fall'? Shakespeare
28. Which is the first written document regarding human rights in the history of the world? Magna Carta 
29. How long did the second people's movement last? Year 2062 Chait 24-2063 Baisakh 11 (lasted for 19 days) 
30. How many types of joints are there in the human body? Three (Fixed joints, Semi-movable joints and Movable joints.) 
Presenter: Tank KC 
Accumulation and Expenditure
1. Mention the vision, long-term goals, objectives and functions of the Employees Provident Fund along with its historical background. Historical background - Establishment of 'Sanik Dravykosh' in 1991 with the aim of providing financial relief to soldiers in their retired life, - Later on, 'Civil Provident Fund' in 2001 and 'Police Fund' in 2012 respectively, - by integrating the provisions related to Provident Fund Establishment of the Employees' Provident Fund Department under the Ministry of Finance in 2017, with the aim of making Provident Fund management more effective, the Employees' Provident Fund Act-2019 was issued on 31st August 2019 for civil servants, including the Nepalese Army and Nepal Police, as a self-governing organization with unbroken succession. Establishment of provident fund,
2. Mention the measures to make government expenditure management effective in Nepal. Expenditure management is the task of making the overall expenditure successful by maintaining frugality, efficiency and effectiveness in government expenditure. Legal and institutional arrangements have been made at the government level to make government expenditure management effective in Nepal, but the country's government expenditure management work is not found to be effective. For this, it seems that the following measures should be adopted:- To prepare standards of current expenditure and keep it within certain limits, to increase capital expenditure,- To create and apply standards for government subsidies, government assistance, compensation, etc.- To arrange that no liability can be created without determining the source of payment. ,- Prepare and implement sectoral expenditure policy,- Implement gender budget to make public expenditure gender responsive,- Build a mechanism to measure government expenditure efficiency,
3. Briefly discuss the role of National Planning Commission in budget formulation of Nepal. A budget is an estimated statement of government income and expenditure. The budget is also the annual policy and program of the government. In Nepal, although the Ministry of Finance is responsible for preparing the budget, the role of the National Planning Commission is important in budget formulation. The role of the National Planning Commission in budget formulation can be discussed as follows:- Determining the policy goals of the development program, preparing guidelines,- Preparing preliminary estimates of the budget limit in coordination with the Ministry of Finance, submitting it to the Budget Committee and Resource Committee,- Ministry budget in coordination with the Ministry of Finance Preparing the limits, - Discussing the policy on the budget estimate, - Approving the annual program, preparing and revising the medium-term expenditure structure.
4. What is public debt? Mention the objectives of public debt. Debt taken by the government from within the country and from outside the country is called public debt. The government collects such loans from individuals, firms, banks and financial institutions. Loans taken from within the country are called internal loans, while loans taken from abroad are called foreign loans. In most cases, such a loan has to be returned with interest after the specified time. Although the practice of collecting debt by the government started in the eighteenth century, it has become widespread since the time of the First World War. The traditional economist Adam Smith, Bestball, has thought that the government's borrowing increases wasteful spending and creates a bad economic situation, while modern economists have taken it as a productive tool. If the expenditure of the government is not enough from the revenue, it takes a loan to cover the current deficit. Bonds to raise public debt, Financial instruments like treasury bills are used. Public debt is also an effective tool of government fiscal policy. Objectives of public debt - to meet government deficit budget, - to control economic recession, - to control price increase, - to provide financial resources for economic and social development of the country, - to deal with crisis situations, - to increase economic growth, to maintain economic stability, - Building physical infrastructure, - Increasing production and productivity, - Increasing investment in priority areas, - Creating job opportunities.
5. According to the Constitution of Nepal-2072, what policies are there to be adopted by the state regarding social justice and inclusion? write According to Article 51 (J) of the Constitution of Nepal (2072), the state has to adopt the following policies related to social justice and inclusion:- Giving priority to single women who are in a helpless situation in employment based on their skills, abilities and qualifications and making appropriate arrangements for earning a living,- Those who are at risk, Rehabilitate, protect and empower women who are socially and family excluded and make them self-reliant. Free Kamaiya, Kamalari, Harwa, Charwa, Haliya, Landless,
1. What is the slogan of National Children's Day-2077? Ensuring children's rights in disaster: a common commitment of all of us - In commemoration of the day Nepal ratified the United Nations Convention on the Rights of the Child, 1989 on August 29, 2047 (September 14, 1990), National Children's Day has been celebrated every year on August 29 since 2063.- No. From 2021, this day was celebrated on 4th of August. - Article 39 of the Constitution of Nepal provides provisions related to child rights. The best interests of children are given priority in Article 51 of the Constitution.- The National Child Rights Council, Central Children's Organization and district-based organization structure, various donor agencies and non-governmental organizations in accordance with the Children's Rights Act, 2075 in Nepal, a party to the United Nations Convention on the Rights of the Child, 1989 Activities carried forward.
2. Which is the Nepali Airlines (Airline) that has obtained ISO 9001-2015 related to the prestigious 'Quality Management System' (QMS)? Himalaya Airlines - Himalaya Airlines, a Nepal-China joint venture, received the certificate in September 2020. - ISO 9001-2015 is a globally recognized quality standard developed and published by the International Organization for Standardization (ISO).
3. In collaboration with Canada's Fraser Institute and the Samruddhi Foundation, the report on economic freedom released on September 10, 2020 - where is Nepal in 2020? 109th - According to the report prepared with 162 countries, Hong Kong, Singapore, New Zealand, Switzerland and America managed to fall under the top five countries. - The African Republic is among the countries with the least economic freedom. After that, there are Democratic Republic of Congo, Zimbabwe, Republic of Congo, Algeria and Iran respectively. 
4. According to the Industrial Business Act, 2076, an industry that exports more than what percentage of its production is called an 'export industry'? 40 percent (excluding energy industry)
5. Nepal has been honored with which award in the context of the 141st Inter-Legislative Association Conference held in Belgrade, the capital of Serbia? Future Policy Silver Award - This award was given for the constitutional, arrangement about youth participation and rights. - The award was received by the Speaker of the National Assembly, Ganesh Timilsina. 
6. Which are the districts selected by the government in the first phase (one each of the seven provinces) for the distribution of farmer identification cards? Jhapa (Province-1), Parsa (Province-2), Kavre (Bagmati), Kaski (Gandaki), Kapilvastu (Province-5), Surkhet (Karnali) and Kanchanpur (Far West) – Based on data from Central Statistics Department ID will be provided. - The distribution of farmer identification cards has been done since July 2076. - In Nepal, the distribution of farmer identification cards started in Happened from 2071-72.
7. What is SODIS technology? Method of water purification by solar power 
8. When was the first airplane landing in Nepal? 2006 May 11 
9. When and where was the first World Cup football tournament? 1930, Uruguay (Uruguay won the title of the first World Cup football tournament, while Argentina was the runner-up.) 
10. Since when has the government arranged 'smartcard' in driver's license? V.No. 2072 November 14 
11. When was Dhowadi Falamkhani Limited established? V.No. Paush 16, 2076 - The industry was established in Dhowadi, Nawalpur, Gandaki Province. The iron ore mine was discovered in 2066-67.
12. When was the first canal and geological base established for geological studies and mining exploration in Nepal? V.No. 1986- Canal and Geology Department was made Mining Department in year 1999 and Geological Survey Department in year 2024.- In 2033 the department was named Mines and Geology Department. 
13. When did the United States withdraw from the missile treaty between the United States and Russia during the Winter War? February 1, 2019 - Likewise, Russia announced that it withdrew from the treaty on February 2, 2019. - This treaty took place in 1987. to five thousand five hundred km. A ban was placed on long-range land-launched missiles.
14. Since when has the Kathmandu Metropolitan City decided to assess and collect integrated taxes through an electronic system? V.No. October 1, 2077 - All 32 wards can pay taxes through an electronic system from October 1, 2077. - This system was launched to prevent tax leakage and develop the metropolitan city as a 'smart' metropolis. The first is said to be at the local level. 
15. Which is the metropolitan city with the largest number of wards? Pokhara Metropolitan City 
16. Which country has formed 'Green Army' for environment protection? Australia 
17. What is the slogan of World Health Day celebrated on April 7, 2020? Help nurses and midwives.
18. When was the arrangement made by Rashtra Bank that the interest rate of personal periodical loans will not change? V.No. August 23, 2077 - The integrated guidelines published by the National Bank on August 23 - This provision was made in 2077. - Loans of more than one year (house, car etc.) taken in personal name cannot change the interest throughout the payment period. To be able to maintain a variable interest rate.- If this provision is not applicable to loans issued in the name of organizations or companies. 
19. How many people are awarded the best civil service award every year? 10 people (Best Civil Service Award will be given to one person and Civil Service Award will be given to 30 people.)
20. According to the 'Nepal Job Diagnostic Report-2018' published by the World Bank, how many jobs have been added in Nepal in the decade between 2008 and 2018? 39 lakh 50 thousand - The study also showed that the creation of good quality jobs in the country is still weak. According to the World Bank, the impact of the corona virus on the country's employment was not mentioned in that study.- In 2008, only 17 percent of the total employment was in wage-earning jobs, but after a decade, it increased to 24 percent. The study showed that only 6.6 million Nepalis are working for salary or wages, 3.8 million within the country and 2.8 million outside the country.- In 1998, the contribution of the agricultural sector to the economy was 38 percent, but in 2018, it decreased to 32 percent. 
21. Whose reign is considered as golden age of Lichchavikal? Anshuvarma
22. What was the name of the place where money was given to soldiers and civil servants in the administrative system of the Rana period? Tejarath Adda 
23. What is the health problem caused by lack of balanced food called? Malnutrition 
24. What is the full form of Computerized Method (OMR) used in answer book examination? Optical Mark Reader. 
25. Which is the fastest growing plant? Bamboo 
26. According to the 2068 census, among the languages ​​of the Burmese language family, which language is spoken by the largest number of people in Nepal? Tamang 
27. 'There are two parts of business: marketing and innovation.' Who said that? Peter Drucker 
28. When was the Administrative Court Act, 2076 issued? V.No. 24 October 2076
29. According to the Administrative Courts Act, 2076, if the appeal filed by the Supreme Court or the Administrative Court is not resolved, if the appellant retires from service or dies, what is the provision regarding the appeal? APPEAL NOT DISMISSABLE (Should be final edged) Presented by: Tank KC
Pillars of the Economy – Cooperatives1. Write a solution to the problems seen in the cooperative sector of Nepal. A cooperative is a voluntary group of common people for earning income. Cooperation, mutual support and trust are the essence of cooperatives. Nepal has a constitutional system to strengthen the national economy through the participation and independent development of the public, private and cooperative sectors. Among the three pillars of the economy, there is a legal and institutional system to manage it by accepting a cooperative as one pillar. Cooperative Acts, Rules, Policies, Ministry, National Cooperative Development Board, Cooperative Departments and subordinate offices are in place, and even Nepal's cooperative sector is still not problem-free. For this, the cooperative sector should be developed as a strong pillar of the national economy by making it systematic, transparent and accountable by adopting the following measures:
2. What are the provisions related to constitutional amendment in Nepal's constitution (2072)? Mention. The Constitution of Nepal, Part 31 of 2072, Article 274 has the following provision regarding the amendment of the constitution: Provisions that cannot be amended - Subject - There is a provision that the constitution cannot be amended in such a way as to be contrary to the sovereignty, geographical integrity, independence and sovereignty vested in the people of Nepal. Apart from these immutable subjects, other subjects can be changed in the constitution, so this constitution is up-to-date, It is dynamic and changing. - A constitution amendment bill can be submitted in any house of the federal parliament - Subject to the above provisions of the constitution, there is a provision that a bill amending or repealing any article of the constitution can be submitted in any house of the federal parliament. The bill must be publicly published - The bill submitted in this way is presented in the relevant house. There is a provision that it should be published publicly for the information of the general public within a day. To be sent to the provincial assembly for approval - If the bill submitted for the amendment of the constitution is related to the change of the boundaries of a province or the rights of the province mentioned in schedule-6, the speaker of the relevant house within thirty days of the presentation of such bill in the federal parliament. or the chairman should send it to the provincial assembly for approval, There is a provision that the bill sent in this way should be approved or rejected by the majority of all members of the relevant state assembly within three months and the information about it should be sent to the federal parliament. In the event that no provincial assembly is in existence, such provincial assembly should be approved or rejected within three months from the date of its first meeting. If information is not given that the constitutional amendment bill has been accepted or rejected within the specified period, the house of the federal parliament where the bill originates will not be hindered from proceeding with such a bill, and if the majority of the provincial assemblies reject the constitutional amendment bill within the specified period of three months, then such bill will become inactive. Constitution Amendment Bill must be passed by both Houses of the Federal Parliament - The constitution amendment bill that does not require the consent of the Provincial Assembly or has been approved by a majority of the Provincial Assemblies in accordance with the above provisions, must be passed by at least two-thirds majority of the total number of members immediately existing in both the Houses of the Federal Parliament. Verification by the President – ​​The Constitution Amendment Bill passed as above will be submitted to the President for verification.
3. What are the ways to make Nepal's insurance business effective? write Insurance business helps the economic development of the country by significantly contributing in areas such as job creation, revenue collection, capital mobilization. Economic activities cannot be conducted without its full development. It seems that the overall insurance business should be made competitive, transparent and effective by strengthening the legal and institutional aspects. For this, the following measures should be adopted: - Increasing public awareness about the importance of insurance, extending insurance services to remote rural areas, expanding crop and livestock insurance to rural levels, - Broadening the scope of insurance business, such as: loans, deposits, securities transactions, health, transportation. To expand in areas like tools, agriculture, etc., - to prepare legal and institutional structures to assist in the modernization of insurance,
4. What is motivation? write The act of bringing out the inherent potential in a person and putting it into practice is called motivation. It is related to human resources. It helps to transform the passive qualities in a person into active qualities. Motivation is an act of leadership. It is a continuous process. In the organization, monetary and non-monetary incentives are arranged to motivate employees towards work. Motivation is firstly related to the person who works, i.e. the employee, which includes topics such as the employee's desire to work, ability and his commitment to work. Then it is related to the work to be done by the employee and the working conditions. Therefore, when motivating any employee towards work, attention should be paid to these things gradually.
5. The Good Governance (Management and Operation) Act, 2064 stipulates on what basis the performance should be carried out while conducting administrative work? Mention. In section 6 of the Good Governance (Management and Operation) Act, 2064, which was designed to guarantee good governance in the country, there is a provision that when performing administrative functions in accordance with the prevailing laws, the officials who perform the functions must perform the functions on the basis of the following in addition to the provisions of the constitution and other prevailing laws: (a) Nation and people Greater interest, (b) equity and inclusion, (c) rule of law, (d) guarantee of human rights, (e) transparency, objectivity, accountability and honesty, (f) economic discipline and corruption-free, agile and people-oriented administration, (g) Neutrality and impartiality of administration mechanism, (h) Public access to administrative mechanism and decisions, (i) Decentralization and decentralization,
Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
1. V.No. What is the slogan of the 17th Civil Service Day celebrated on August 22, 2077? Clean and Competent Civil Administration: Prosperity and Good Governance in Nepal Since 2061, this day has been celebrated every year on the 22nd of August. The slogan of the first Civil Service Day celebrated in 2061 is: Good governance and the effectiveness of services provided. 2. According to the Forest Act, 2076, what is called a living or dead body of a wild animal or any part of their body in a recognizable state and any substance of the body of a wild animal or any substance prepared from a mixture of such substances? Akhetophar 3. According to the Forest Act, 2076, what is meant by 'forest'? An area fully or partially covered with trees or shrubs. According to that act, private forest means a forest that is planted or protected on private land to which a person has the right in accordance with the prevailing law. - National forest means forest managed by the government, forest conservation area, community forest, Partnership forest, religious forest, confessional forest, national forest within the province or inter-regional forest. 4. Where in Nepal is the Habre (red panda) breeding center? Elam5. Where is Indrasarovar? Makwanpur.- The 7 km long reservoir built for the Kulekhani hydropower project in Makwanpur district is called Indrasarovar. Named Indra Sarovar in memory of Princess Indra Rajya Lakshmi Devi Shah, it is the largest man-made lake in Nepal. This lake has become an attractive place for fishing and tourism. 6. If Khairala Palace is in Kailali, where is Hatuwagadhi Palace? Bhojpur7. laying eggs Where is Indrasarovar? Makwanpur.- The 7 km long reservoir built for the Kulekhani hydropower project in Makwanpur district is called Indrasarovar. Named Indra Sarovar in memory of Princess Indra Rajya Lakshmi Devi Shah, it is the largest man-made lake in Nepal. This lake has become an attractive place for fishing and tourism. 6. If Khairala Palace is in Kailali, where is Hatuwagadhi Palace? Bhojpur7. laying eggs Where is Indrasarovar? Makwanpur.- The 7 km long reservoir built for the Kulekhani hydropower project in Makwanpur district is called Indrasarovar. Named Indra Sarovar in memory of Princess Indra Rajya Lakshmi Devi Shah, it is the largest man-made lake in Nepal. This lake has become an attractive place for fishing and tourism. 6. If Khairala Palace is in Kailali, where is Hatuwagadhi Palace? Bhojpur7. laying eggsWhich mammal is ?Platypus8. If Olangchungola is in Taplejung, where is Chekampar? Gorkha9. Tamu Museum is in Lamjung and where is Lepcha Museum? Elam10. The world's smallest Laliguras flower is found in Raratal region of Mugu district, where is the biggest Laliguras flower found? Elam 11. How many women candidates won directly in the House of Representatives election, 2074? Six people.- (Pavitra Niraula Kharel-Jhapa, Pampha Bhusal-Lalitpur, Padmakumari Aryal-Syangja, Durga Poudel-Pyuthan, Kamala Roka-East Rukum and Vina Magar-Kanchanpur)12. When did the government of Nepal decide to cancel the provision of five development areas? V.No. 28th of Chait 2075. 13. Who is the author of 'From Third World to First'? Lee Kwan Yew. 14. How long has it been announced that Nepal will become digital Nepal? By the year 2025. 15. What is 'laser speed gun' related to? Vehicle speed measurement technology. 16. What is the provincial main slogan decided by province 1? Clean, happy and prosperous province. 17. Since when was the ban on driving 20-year-old public vehicles in Kathmandu Valley? v. No. 2073 February 18th.- According to the Department of Transportation, since February 18th, 20-year-old public vehicles have been prohibited from plying on the roads in the valley. Public vehicles that are over 20 years old will not be taxed, technical tests will not be carried out, sales will not be distributed and registration will not be done. According to the department, private, tourist carriers and government vehicles will not be removed immediately on the basis that they are 20 years old. In the first phase, it was decided to remove 20-year-old vehicles from Kathmandu and in the next phase, to proceed with its implementation outside the valley. 18. When was Kathmandu Valley Development Authority (KVDA) established? V.No. 2069 Baisakh 1st. - Its main office under the Ministry of Urban Development is located in Anamnagar (Kathmandu). 19. How long is the plan to make Nepal a zero hunger country? By the year 2025. 20. Since when was the world's biggest Nobel Prize awarded? Year 1901 - The Nobel Prize for Economics has been awarded since 1968. The Nobel Peace Prize is awarded in Oslo, the capital of Norway, while other categories of prizes are awarded in Stockholm, the capital of Sweden. Up to three people can get this award jointly. 21. When was the flag of Nepal hoisted on Burj Khalifa, the tallest building in the world? V.No. October 3, 2076. - (On the occasion of the Constitution Day of Nepal, the Nepalese flag was hoisted for one minute in that building.) 22. Since when has the single point service center been brought into operation with the aim of facilitating the investment environment? V.No. May 1, 2076. - This service has been operated so that all types of services are available to investors from one place. After the start of the service, all the necessary processes for the operation of the industry will be available from one place. V.No. 24. When is the International Literacy Day celebrated on February 5, 2076? On September 8. 25. What is the period from Aunsi to Purnima called? Shuklapaksha (Bright Half).- (The period from Full Moon to Aunsi is called Krishnapaksha (Dark Half). In Shuklapaksha, the bright part of the moon gradually increases, while in Krishnapaksha, the bright part of the moon gradually decreases.) 26. When did Nepal become a member of World Tourism Organization (UNWTO)? Year 1975. This organization was established on January 2, 1975. 27. When was Nepal Tourism Board established? V.No. 16th January 2055. – v. The tourism department established in 2018 was abolished and the board was established with the participation of the government and the private sector. Establishment of the Ministry of Tourism on February 12, 2033. In that ministry, V. No. In 2039, the Department of Aviation was renamed the Ministry of Tourism and Civil Aviation. In addition to the work of culture, V. No. The Ministry of Culture, Tourism and Civil Aviation was formed in 2057.- The National Tourism Promotion Committee was formed on June 31, 2072. It will be chaired by the Minister of Culture, Tourism and Civil Aviation.- The Prime Minister will be the chairperson of the Tourism Council. 28. Which 'trekking route' is known as 'Dhawalagiri Icefall Tech'? From Galeshwar in Myagdi to Leyte in Mustang (about one hundred km) 29. Which day was declared as Clean Air Day by the United Nations? September 7.- The day was announced by the General Assembly on December 19, 2019.- The United Nations said that the day will be celebrated as a clean day for blue skies (from 2020). 30. Nepal government has announced which year will be celebrated as tree planting year? A.W. 2076-77- The official start of the tree planting year. Done on June 14, 2076. Tree Planting Day is celebrated on June 14 every year in Nepal. Presenter: Tank K.C.
oath of office
1. According to the constitution of Nepal, there is a provision for the following person to take the oath of office and confidentiality? President, Vice President, Prime Minister, Chief Justice, Deputy Prime Minister, Minister, Minister of State, Assistant Minister, Head of State, Chief Minister of State, Minister of State, Minister of State of State, Assistant Minister of State. According to the Constitution of Nepal, the following persons are required to take oath of office and confidentiality before the following persons: a. The President before the Chief Justice, B. The Vice President before the President, c. The Prime Minister before the President, d. The Deputy Prime Minister to the President, Mr. Minister to the President, Ch. Minister of State to the Prime Minister, Ch. Assistant Minister to the Prime Minister, J. The head of state to the president, Jh. The chief minister of the province before the head of the province, J. Minister of the province before the head of the province, T. The Minister of State of the Province to the Chief Minister of the Province, Th. The assistant minister of the province to the chief minister of the province. 2. What is meant by citizen's responsibility? What is mentioned in the Constitution of Nepal regarding the obligations of citizens? The duty of citizens to play a positive role in the country's constitution and laws, to maintain social harmony in the society, and to play an active role in the country's economic and social development is called the citizen's responsibilities. It covers both the emotional aspects like dedication to the country, patriotism, patriotism and the duty to perform. - Responsibilities of Citizens in the Constitution of Nepal Article 48 of the Constitution of Nepal mentions some topics as the duties of citizens, as those duties must be followed by every citizen, such duties are also the responsibilities of citizens, which can be mentioned as follows: - Being loyal to the nation, - Nationality, sovereignty and integrity of Nepal. To protect, - to follow the constitution and laws, - To perform compulsory service whenever the state wants, - To protect and protect public property. 3. According to the Local Government Operation Act, 2074, what are the duties, duties and rights of the District Coordination Officer? Mention. The work, duties and rights of the district coordination officer who works as the administrative head of the district assembly is mentioned in section 94 of the Local Government Operation Act, 2074:- To work as the secretary of the district assembly and the district coordination committee,- To implement the decision of the district coordination committee, To coordinate between the federal and provincial government offices and the local level in the district, to maintain records of financial transactions of the district assembly, to audit the income and expenses, to conduct the unduly expungement, to prepare the proposal of unduly minah and submit it to the district coordination committee. - Protecting, maintaining and updating the movable property of the District Assembly, Discuss the National Identity Card which is currently being distributed in Nepal. The National Identity Card is a national identity card that contains the personal and biological details of a person and is distributed by the National Identity Card and Registration Department under the Ministry of Home Affairs. The national identity card with biometric identification and unique number of all Nepalis has started from Panchthar district and expanded to other districts. With this multi-purpose certificate, it will be arranged that a Nepali will not have to carry more than one identity card within two years. This ID card based on chip technology will be given to people who have attained the age of 16 for the time being and later it is planned to be distributed to everyone. In this certificate, which can be filled online, the name, date of birth, gender, parent's name, address, type of citizenship, husband and wife's name, father's name, fingerprint, pupil of the eye, photograph, nationality, The signature is mentioned. This identity card that has been distributed to specific people of Nepal can be used as a national identity card, as a voter's ID card, as a record of land and other assets, as a banking transaction, as a social security card and as a supporting record for security management. Advantages of national identity card: - Clear identification of each person, - Biological and personal details of the person, - Different service facilities can be obtained from one identity card, help to create and operate national development plans and programs and maintain security, - Nepali, non-Nepali and foreigners Statistics will be verified, crimes such as creating duplicate identity cards and fake identity cards will be controlled. 5. Discuss the concept of community health and identify the major community health problems in Nepal. Community health is the activity of people in the community to identify health problems in the community and solve them, to improve personal and environmental health. Its basic purpose is to raise the health level of the community. Since it is not possible for a person to improve his health only through individual efforts, the concept of community health has been brought forward. Therefore, to improve the health of the community, there should be a joint effort of individuals, families, communities and the nation. Major community health problems in Nepal Due to geographical difficulties, lack of public awareness, lack of medicine, lack of health workers, etc., the community health of Nepal is suffering from various problems. mountains, hills, Everyone has health problems. More community health problems are seen in rural areas than in urban areas. In general, the main community health problems of Nepal are as follows:- Communicable diseases such as diarrhea, cholera, diarrhea, leprosy, etc.,- Infant mortality rate, child mortality rate, maternal mortality rate is high,- Lack of knowledge about balanced diet,- Malnutrition is increasing, lifestyle is unhealthy,- Health Lack of services, - Lack of health education, - Lack of skilled health-related manpower in rural settlements, - Increasing number of people who smoke, drink and consume drugs, - Overall health care is expensive, not accessible to the poor. 6. Write about the role of National Vigilance Center in controlling corruption. The National Vigilance Center has been established under the direct supervision and control of the Prime Minister to effectively control corruption-related activities and increase public awareness against corruption. This center, which is the official head of a special category of civil service, has been collecting information on whether the work that should be done regularly by all ministries, departments, offices and public institutions of the Government of Nepal has been done regularly, and if it is found that the work that should be done regularly by such bodies has been alerted to such bodies. Its role in corruption control can be described as follows: - Monitoring of property and income statements given by persons holding public office in accordance with prevailing laws, - Regular monitoring of places or work where corruption may occur. Arranging the necessary arrangements for investigation and investigation, - To make necessary suggestions to the Government of Nepal if there is any improvement in the policies, strategies and laws to be adopted in relation to corruption control, - To receive and update the necessary details or information related to corruption from the authorities or officials investigating corruption related offenses, - Corruption related Send any information received in writing to the relevant agency, perform other actions prescribed by the Government of Nepal. 7. Mention the role of government, private sector and community organizations for environmental management. Environmental management is the act of maintaining balance without negative impact on natural resources. In this work, the government sector, private sector and community organizations have a big role, which can be mentioned as follows: The role of the government sector - protecting forests, water bodies, water ponds, Adopting the concept of green development to reduce the impact of climate change, - Mandatory environmental impact assessment in development construction, - Establishing quality and standards to prevent air, water, noise, food, industrial, land pollution. - The role of the private sector, policies and laws implemented by the government. and following the standards, proper management of waste from industries, factories, - environment-friendly public construction works, - bearing social responsibility.- role of community organizations - emphasizing the use of organic fertilizers, - increasing public awareness about toilets and sanitation in villages, - preventing forest destruction To prevent, assist in the proper management of garbage. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma Determining quality and standards to prevent land pollution.- The role of the private sector is to follow the policies, laws and standards implemented by the government, to properly arrange waste from industries and factories, - To carry out environmentally friendly public works, - To bear social responsibility.- The role of community organizations- Emphasis on the use of organic fertilizers, - To increase public awareness about toilets and sanitation in village houses, - To prevent forest destruction, to assist in the proper management of garbage. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma Determining quality and standards to prevent land pollution.- The role of the private sector is to follow the policies, laws and standards implemented by the government, to properly arrange waste from industries and factories, - To carry out environmentally friendly public works, - To bear social responsibility.- The role of community organizations- Emphasis on the use of organic fertilizers, - To increase public awareness about toilets and sanitation in village houses, - To prevent forest destruction, to assist in the proper management of garbage. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma To assist in the proper management of garbage. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma To assist in the proper management of garbage. Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
1. When did former President of India Pranab Mukherjee pass away? 2020 August 31- Vibhushit Mukherjee became the President of India from 2012 to 2017 with the Bharat Ratna title. When Manmohan Singh was the Prime Minister, he took charge of the Finance Minister.- 84-year-old Mukherjee was in a coma for a few days after being treated for corona infection. 
2. Since when was the provision made for civil servants to wear the same type of dress? Vikram Samvat 2068 July 1st 
3. Who is the successful talent to become the title winner of Nepal Idol season-3? Sajja Choulagai - Sajja received a cash prize of 50 lakh rupees along with the title.- In that competition, Praveen Bedwal was the first runner-up and Kiran Kumar Bhujel was the second runner-up.
4. When was the first liver transplant done in Nepal? November 22, 2073 - 36-year-old Balram Naga (from Bhaktapur Suryavinayak) underwent liver transplantation at Human Organ Transplantation Center Bhaktapur. - His 41-year-old sister Sanumaya Lageju donated the liver. - Dr. A team of 14 people, led by David Kahn, performed a liver transplant. 
5. What is Interpol's motto? Connecting Police for a Safer World (police network for a safe world).- It was established on September 7, 1923.- Interpol (International Police) is an international organization of police. Its headquarters is located in Lyon, France. Interpol's conference is scheduled to be held every two years.- Nepal became a member (100th) of Interpol in 1967.- At present there are 194 member countries in Interpol. Currently, its head is South Korea's Kim Jong Yang (year 2018-2020).
6. Where has the gene bank been established for the purpose of protecting the genetics of animals and plants? Khumaltar, Lalitpur - Under the name of 'National Agriculture Genetic Research Center' under the Nepal Agricultural Research Council (NARC), seed bank was established.- The world's largest seed bank is located in Shenzhen city of Guangzhou province, China.
7. Which bird can turn its head up to 270 degrees? Latocosero - This bird, which cannot move its eyes, has to move its head when it has to look anywhere, and it can turn its head up to 270 degrees. - Latokosero, also known as the vehicle of Goddess Lakshmi, remains inactive during the day and increases its activity at night to search for food. - Out of the 225 species of Latocosero found in the world, 21 species have been found in Nepal so far. - The illegal poaching of Latocosero, which helps to maintain the natural balance by eating rats, snakes, frogs, cats, and snails, has added a challenge to its conservation. 
8. In which place of Nepal is 'Autovillage'? Butwal 
9. In which place of Nepal are cow and buffalo beauty contests held? Sunsari 
10. Where is the Multiracial Cultural Village of Nepal? Pathri, Morang
11. Mahahunt operation is related to what? Conservation of rare wild animals and plants 
12. When did American President Donald Trump announce that the United States would withdraw from the international nuclear agreement with Iran? May 8, 2018
When was the 'Montreal Convention - 1999' passed by the Parliament of Nepal, which has provisions regarding the unification of international air transport rules? 2075 August 7 - With the passage of the said Convention, Nepal became a party to this Convention - This Convention will be implemented after 60 days after registering with the International Civil Aviation Organization (ICAO) with the information of the Convention's passage. Foreign travelers will get insurance facilities in various incidents. Now, in case of loss of passenger's life while traveling through international air services, compensation of around 2.5 million rupees will be received.- Previously, Nepal was only a party to the 'Warsaw Convention-1929' and the Hague Protocol of 1955. According to that, the Nepalese who lost their lives in the air accident got only 20 thousand US dollars.- Among the SAARC countries
14. 'Buddha Theme Park' will be built in which country? Sri Lanka 
15. Yari Bhanjyang is in Humla district and where is Namja Bhanjyang? Mugu 
16. Jewelery Museum is in Bhadrakali (Kathmandu) and where is Bagmati Civilization Museum? Guhyeshwari (Kathmandu) 
17. When was National Women's Day celebrated for the first time in Nepal? Year 2076 June 16 
18. Where is the famous Ranimahal Palace located? Palpa - Ranimahal Palace, known as a symbol of love, is located on the banks of Kaligandaki river in Palpa district - King Khadgashamsher built the Ranimahal Palace after his younger queen (Mrs. Tejkumari) fell ill and died.
19. How many species of snakes are found in Nepal? 83 (The latest discovery is the Uduwa Lahere snake (looks like a dried wave) found in the Shuklaphanta National Park.) 
20. Where will Nepal China Friendship Park be built? Damak, Jhapa - The park has been named 'Damak Clean Industrial Park'. - Investment of 64 billion rupees has been approved for the construction of the park from the investment board meeting held on July 17, 2076. 
21. Astronomical bodies including stars, planets, satellites, asteroids, meteors, comets and very large groups of dust and gaseous matter are called what? Star cluster (The star cluster in the solar system is called the galaxy star cluster, which is arch-shaped.) 22. Where did Kazi Kalu Pandey achieve heroism in Nepal's unification campaign? Kirtipur
23. Where is the famous Gokarneshwar Mahadev Temple? Kathmandu (Gokarneshwar Mahadev Temple, also famous as an ancestral shrine, is located on the banks of the Bagmati River, about 10 kilometers north-east of Kathmandu.) 
24. Kharpunath (Shiva) temple is in Humla district, where is Chandannath temple? Jumla 
25. If the tallest building in the world is Burj Khalifa (Dubai), which is the largest building? New Century Global Center (China) (built in Sichuan Province, China, this building is 500 meters long, 400 meters wide and 100 meters high. An artificial beach has also been built inside the building. This building has been in public operation since July 1, 2013.) 
26. When was the first postage stamp published in Nepal? Year 1938
27. Who is the richest man who has set a new record as the richest person ever? Jeff Bezos - Amazon founder Jeff Bezos became the world's first owner of $200 billion. Last year, Bezos faced the most expensive divorce with his wife. In which he agreed to give his ex-wife 25 percent shares in Amazon. At the moment, the value of the shares is 63 billion dollars. However, he is currently the richest person in the world.) 
28. When did Nepal become a member of the United Nations? December 14, 1955 (On December 14, 1955, the resolution passed by the Security Council regarding the admission of 16 countries including Nepal to the United Nations is known as the Package Deal.)
29. When was the coin with Satya Mohan Joshi's photo released? Year 2076 August 24 (Coins of Rs. 100, Rs. 1000 and Rs. 2500 were released.) 
30. Since when was the box office system implemented in the film industry? July 1, 2075 - After this system is implemented, information about the income of the movies will be easy through online data. 
Presenter: Tank Casey
Human resource management1. What are the problems in human resource management in Nepal? Acquisition, development, utilization and management of human resources in the organization is human resource management. This is not only the arrangement of human resources for the organization, but also the arrangement and mobilization of competent manpower for the country as a whole. According to the National Planning Commission Formation and Operation Order-2067, the National Planning Commission is responsible for formulating long-term and short-term plans for the development of human resources necessary for the nation and including them in sectoral programs and implementing them. Various universities and campuses, higher secondary schools and schools in Nepal are also active in manpower building and development. Manpower attraction in civil service, service entry, capacity development of working staff, The Ministry of General Administration is working in aspects such as operations. The Public Service Commission has also been playing its role in this, and various problems have been seen in the acquisition, development, utilization and maintenance of human resources in Nepal. Which can be discussed as follows: Problems in obtaining human resources: - Lack of a clear plan of action regarding the acquisition of manpower in the public sector, inability of other agencies to formulate and implement an annual work schedule like that of the Public Service Commission in the civil service, - Simple and practical curriculum should be formulated according to the nature of the organization and the work to be done. Unable to connect the curriculum with the work to be done, the curriculum is becoming impractical, complicated and expensive, the situation is created for the examinees to study tuition classes in the market, - There is no operational coordination between the bodies that create manpower and those that acquire manpower.
2. What is meant by local government? Write about the needs of local government in Nepal. Local government is the mechanism that conducts all the regular work, emergency work and developmental work of the local people, including peace and security, development, and administration of the local area by the elected representatives of the local area. Local government is the governance of local institutions, in which representatives are elected by the people. Although the central government has general control and direction on matters of public importance, the local government has full authority and responsibility within its area for the specified matters. The central government coordinates and controls the country as a whole and the local governments, while the local governments coordinate and control within their regions. In a country, there is only one central government, while there are more than one local government. Nepal currently has three tiers of government namely the federal, provincial and local levels. In which village council, municipality and district assembly are taken as local level, in fact this is the local government of Nepal. The need of local government in Nepal - to eliminate the problems and differences that have been seen in the past from the central government system, - to increase the practical knowledge of politics in the local people, - to meet the needs of the people at the local level, - to develop local leadership, - to integrate and mobilize the power that is scattered at the local level, - To maximize the utilization of local resources, skills, technology, capacity and experience, - To develop the institutions from the local level of democracy - To make the local bodies responsible and accountable in local level plan management (plan identification, formulation, implementation, distribution of returns), - In the governance system To promote the active and meaningful participation of the people, - to provide service facilities to the people at the local level, - to establish good governance from the local level.
3. What is the role of civil servants in public service delivery? Write in summary. The role of civil servants is multifaceted to bring regular, emergency and developmental services to the doorsteps of the people such as public service facilities such as security, water, electricity, telephone, roads, communication, citizenship, passport, social security allowance, fire, earthquake, flood rescue and relief. which can be written as follows:- acting as a representative of the government and bringing public service facilities to the doorsteps of the people in an easy, accessible and simple way,- maintaining fairness in government service delivery,- being committed to the work of public service delivery,- frugality and transparency Tried to provide quality services by maintaining them, - Provided services by following the constitution, laws and regulations, - Helped to further strengthen the relationship between the government and the people through public service delivery. - Helped to speed up service delivery by using modern technology, - Coordinated with civil society and private sector to organize public service delivery, - Monitoring and evaluating public service delivery and removing deficiencies in service delivery work, - Civilian in public service delivery The role of the staff is from assisting in the formulation of service delivery policy to implementation, coordination in implementation, fairness, commitment, monitor and evaluator. It seems that the civil servants engaged in the service and development of the country and the people should now improve their behavior and conduct towards the customers, end procrastination, fair service, high morale and create a clean image to make their role more effective. - Coordinating with civil society and private sector to organize public service delivery, - Monitoring and evaluating public service delivery and removing deficiencies in service delivery work and improving it further, - The role of civil servants in public service delivery is primarily from assisting in the formulation of service delivery policy, to implementation. In the implementation, there is coordination, fairness, commitment, as monitors and evaluators. It seems that the civil servants engaged in the service and development of the country and the people should now improve their behavior and conduct towards the customers, end procrastination, fair service, high morale and create a clean image to make their role more effective. - Coordinating with civil society and private sector to organize public service delivery, - Monitoring and evaluating public service delivery and removing deficiencies in service delivery work and improving it further, - The role of civil servants in public service delivery is primarily from assisting in the formulation of service delivery policy, to implementation. In the implementation, there is coordination, fairness, commitment, as monitors and evaluators. It seems that the civil servants engaged in the service and development of the country and the people should now improve their behavior and conduct towards the customers, end procrastination, fair service, high morale and create a clean image to make their role more effective. - The role of civil servants in public service delivery is from assisting in the formulation of service delivery policy to implementation, coordination in implementation, fairness, commitment, monitoring and evaluator. It seems that the civil servants engaged in the service and development of the country and the people should now improve their behavior and conduct towards the customers, end procrastination, fair service, high morale and create a clean image to make their role more effective. - The role of civil servants in public service delivery is from assisting in the formulation of service delivery policy to implementation, coordination in implementation, fairness, commitment, monitoring and evaluator. It seems that the civil servants engaged in the service and development of the country and the people should now improve their behavior and conduct towards the customers, end procrastination, fair service, high morale and create a clean image to make their role more effective.
4. What are the provisions related to the National Security Council in the Constitution of Nepal (2072)? Mention. According to Article 266 of the Constitution of Nepal (2072), there is a National Security Council with the following chairman and members to formulate policies related to the overall national interest, security and defense of Nepal and to recommend to the Government of Nepal, the Council of Ministers for the mobilization or control of the Nepali Army: (a) Prime Minister - Chairman (b) Defense Minister - Member (c) Home Minister - Member (d) Foreign Minister - Member (e) Finance Minister - Member (f) Chief Secretary - Member (g) Commander-in-Chief of the Nepalese Army - Member - Secretary of the Ministry of Defense Member of the National Security Council - Acting as Secretary, - The National Security Council shall submit its annual report to the President and the President shall cause such report to be submitted to the Federal Parliament through the Prime Minister,
5. What is a decision? Discuss the basis of the decision and the decision-making process. The act of selecting the most appropriate option among the available options for solving a problem is called decision making. In addition to solving problems, decisions are made in activities such as fulfilling needs, using opportunities, bringing changes, and running the state. Theme/problem, decision maker and environment are the elements of decision making. There are three types of decisions: policy decisions, administrative decisions and ad hoc decisions. The decision is made by the designated official. The decision-making authority is usually designated by law. The decision is taken by the leadership. Looking at the content of the decision, the decision is made by the Legislative Parliament, Council of Ministers, Minister, Secretary, Head of Office. Basis of decision - Decision cannot be made outside the law. Constitution, Acts, Rules, Decisions should be made by following procedures. Therefore, the main basis to be adopted while taking decisions is the constitution, laws, rules and laws. Other bases of decision are as follows: - Information and statistics, - Past decisions, - Example, - People's expectations. Decision-making processes - When making decisions, various steps have to be completed, which are called decision-making process - levels of decision. Which are as follows: a. Identifying the problem - Collecting information and data, - Finding out that there can be many problems, - Prioritizing the problem by doing 1, 2, 3, - Identifying the main problem. b. Search, development and analysis of alternatives - searching for alternatives to solve the problem, - searching for as many alternatives as possible, - analyzing the impact and impact of all alternatives, - considering the pros and cons, risks, opportunities of the alternatives, evaluating the alternatives, - the pros and cons Distinguish between good options 1, 2, 3. c. Selection of the appropriate option – choosing the best option among the options, making a decision, d. Implementation of decisions - preparing action plans, - determining resources, mechanisms, procedures, - distributing responsibilities, - preparing indicators of implementation. Monitoring and evaluation - Creating indicators and monitoring on the same basis, - Accounting of the impact and impact, - Continuing the monitoring and evaluation work, - Providing support.
Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
1. When did national poet Madhav Prasad Ghimire pass away? V.No. 2077 August 2.- V. no. National Poet Ghimire, who was born in Pustun, Lamjung on October 7, 1976, entered his hundred years in October 2075. Ghimire was a skillful writer, poet and lyricist with romantic sentiments and sophisticated style.- V.S. National Poet Ghimireka Gauri, Maltimungale, Himalpari Himalwari, Rajeshwari, Indrakumari, Rashtranirmata, Kinnar-Kinnari, Charu Charcha, His Bansuri Own Song, Ghampani, Naya Nepal, Vishkanya, Shakuntala etc. are popular in Nepali society. Ghimire's 'Nepali Hami Rahula Kahan', 'Sings a Nepali song, the nose of the flower has flowed away, what did I see in my dream today and at night, it rained softly on June night,' Dozens of classical songs including 'Sarangi Ta Rete Phani Bajchha Mihe Dhun' have echoed in the hearts of Nepali people. His works are full of national spirit.- Life member of Nepal Pragya Pratishthan, Ghimire served as vice chancellor for two terms and as chancellor for two years.- He has six daughters and two sons. After the death of his first wife Gauri in 2004, he married Mahakali for the second time.
2. Who is the Nepali child karate player honored by the World Book of Records, UK Award? Aryan Ranjit.- (Aryan was honored with the award in recognition of his contribution to sports at a young age.) 
3. Who was awarded the National Talent Award for Language and Literature (in 2077)? Prof.Dr. Dayaram Shrestha.- Similarly, the National Talent Award for fine arts was given to Shyamalal Shrestha.- The National Talent Award for music and theater was given to Satyanarayan Chaudhary. The amount of national talent award is Rs.1 lakh and the amount of regional talent award is Rs.50,000. 
4. Mahakavi Devkota Award of the year 2076 was awarded to whom? Poetry: Mohan Sitaula, Essay: Prof. Keshav Subedi, for drama: Padmavati Singh, for children/folklore: Dr. Towards Madhusudan Giri and Language Literature: Bhairav ​​Risal.
5. Who was awarded the Gopal Prasad Rimal National Talent Award for the year 2076? Abhi Subedi (for drama) and Ghanshyam Upadhyaya Kandel (for poetry). 
6. Who was given the Sarvajit Human Dignity National Award for the year 2076? Navraj Wick (for social reform campaign, posthumously), Tribhuvanchandra Wagle (for human rights) and Tilak Pariyar (for skills, arts, education, writing and research). 
7. When was the foundation stone of the dry harbor laid in Rasuwa's Gosainkunda rural municipality-2 Timure? V.No. 2076 November 4. - It is estimated that the construction of the port, which is to be completed in two and a half years, will cost one billion and 98 million rupees. The memorandum of understanding was signed on May 29, 2076.
8. What is the full form of FTTH? Fiber to the home. - Nepal Telecom started high speed internet service FTTH V.No. It was done on 23rd August 2076 at Suryapura Bazar in Gaidahwa rural municipality of Ruppandehi district. - Through FTTH technology, instead of traditional copper wire, optical fiber can be delivered to the house and triple play, i.e. voice, high speed internet and video services can be provided. 
9. Which is the first country in the world to use credit cards? America.
10. When did Chinese President Xi Jinping introduce the concept of One Belt One Road (OBOR)? Year 2013.- Nepal Decided to sign OBOR on May 25, 2074. Accordingly, it was signed by Nepal on 29th Baisakh 2074.- Foreign Secretary Shankardas Vairagi on behalf of Nepal and Ambassador Yu Hong on behalf of China signed the partnership agreement related to OBOR. 
11. When was the establishment of 'Open Government Partnership' (OGP) with the aim of creating an effective government by promoting transparency? September 20, 2011. - Among the founding countries of OGP are America, Mexico, Brazil, Indonesia, Philippines, South Africa, UK and Norway. - This organization currently has 75 member countries with 15 sub-regional government mechanisms.
12. Which is the first country to renounce the membership of the International Criminal Court? Burundi (October 27, 2017).- (Philippines, the second country to withdraw from membership. The Philippines announced withdrawal from membership on March 17, 2018.) 
13. When was Karnali province declared free of water on the road for cooperation? V.No. January 4, 2076.- (The province has been declared a destitute, helpless, infirm, parentless road-free province.) 
14. When was video conferencing technology inaugurated by Sudur Paschim Pradesh? V.No. January 29, 2076.- Coordination committee of each district and local level can discuss through audio-visual conference technology. - It is said that video conference technology has connected all the nine districts for the first time and it will help in parliamentary openness and law making.
15. When did the government of state 5 approve the criteria for determining state pride projects, 2076? 2076 February 2.- (According to that standard, in order to be a proud project of the province, at least 500 million rupees should be invested and the construction of the project should be completed within three to five years. Likewise, at least 50,000 in urban areas, 10,000 in rural areas, and 10 It has been arranged that the projects that can benefit thousands of people will be taken as projects of state pride.) 
16. At which local level has the One Ward One Lake campaign been started? Ghorahi sub-metropolitan city (Dang).- (Ghorahi sub-metropolitan city made a special plan for irrigation and environment and started conducting an artificial lake construction campaign.)
17. Who is the singer who created new history by winning four awards at the Grammy Awards 2020? Willie Eilish.- At the 62nd awards ceremony held in Los Angeles, USA on January 26, 2020, he won four Grammy Awards, including Best New Artist, Best Record of the Year, Best Album and Pop Vocal Album. Willie became the first woman to win the above four awards at the same time and the second artist overall. Previously, in 1981, Christopher Cross received the award in this category.- Former American First Lady Michelle Obama's song 'Becoming' won the award in the audio book category at the ceremony. Likewise, Lady Gaga's I'll Never Love Again won the Best Song for Visual Media Award, Luke Now won the Traditional Pop Vocal Album Award, Willie Nation's Me Backholm won the Country Solo Performance Ride Award, and Tyler won the Rap Album Award.
18. Where is the Center for Nepal and Asian Studies? In Tribhuvan University, Kirtipur campus.- This institution was established as a research center for linguistics, history, geography, political science, social science and religious culture. - V.No. Institute of Nepal Studies established on July 1, 2029. In August 2034, the then Tri.V. According to the Act, it was converted into Center for Nepal and Asian Studies (SINAS). - The journal published by SINAS reaches the universities of 112 countries in the world, but currently it reaches only 58 universities. - Economic Development and Administration Center (SEDA), Applied Science and Technical Research Center (SERID) are operating under TRIV. 19. What is generally known as the tax levied on domestic production and importation of goods and services? Excise duty.- In principle, excise duty is levied on luxury items that have a negative impact on human health and the environment. Excise tax is levied mainly at the level of producers and importers. Excise duty is the tax levied at the time of export on domestic products or imported goods or services provided that are determined to be subject to excise duty, at the time of export, based on the cost of producing such goods or services and the profit of the establishment.
20. When was the first paper currency introduced in Nepal? v. No. 2002 October 1.- Rana Prime Minister Juddhashamsher issued an ordinance in Nepal. From October 1, 2002, paper currency was introduced. - For the first time Rs. 100, Rs. 10 and Rs. 5 rate paper notes were issued.- The cashier who signed those notes issued by Sadar Mulukikhana was Janakraj.
21. When was the Citizen Investment Fund established? V.No. 2047 Chait 4.- Pursuant to the Citizen Investment Fund Act, 2047, the fund was established with the main objective of encouraging common people to save for the economic development of the nation, as well as increasing investment opportunities and bringing dynamics to the development of the capital market. - To invest in priority sectors (hydropower sector, infrastructure development, productive sector, tourism and export promotion, capital market instruments).- To invest funds in low risk sectors.- Market maker and To facilitate the wholesale purchase of shares.- To make the capital market service equipment/tools effective.
22. What is the production capacity of the upper Arun semi-reservoir hydropower project? 1061 MW.- For the construction of this project, which is listed as an attractive project under the People's Hydropower Program, the government has granted a survey permit (November 2076) to Upper Arun Hydro Electric Limited, a company wholly owned by the Nepal Electricity Authority. Agreed to build.- This project belonging to Sankhuwasabha is above Arun 3rd.- V. No. The construction cost of this project, which aims to be completed within 2083, is 1 trillion 20 billion rupees. It is said that the financial management will be based on the model of 49 percent public shares and the investment of the World Bank, the European Investment Bank concessional loan and the employees' savings fund, the citizen investment fund and other domestic financial institutions. .
23. When did the Internal Revenue Department start the Central Billing System? V.No. 2074 November 1. 
24. Which organization is the first to take census in Nepal? Census Goshwara. - Census in Nepal Started from 1968.- Until the fourth census in Nepal (year 1998), scientific counting was started from the fifth census (2009-11). For doing V.No. Since 2018, the Central Statistics Department has been taking. From 2028, the use of computers in the census will be started. 
25. To solve the problem of malnutrition in Nepal, how many years multi-sectoral nutrition plan was implemented since 2013? Five years.- (After the completion of the first plan, now the second phase five-year (2018-2022) plan has been implemented.)
26. What is Nepal's position in the SDG Goal Index-2019? 103rd- In this ranking which is prepared based on the progress of the goals determined in SDG, Nepal is at the position with 63.9 points.- Denmark, Sweden, Finland, France and Austria are in the first five positions of the list which includes 126 countries in the study. In the last place are Central African Republic, Chad, Dominican Republic, Congo and Nigeria. 
27. When was the famous Oscar Award, which is regarded as the Nobel Prize in the field of film, awarded for the first time? 1929.- (This award established in 1929 was first given to the movie 'Wings' in 1929. So far, 'Benhur' and 'Titanic' movies have won the Oscar Award in the most 11-11 categories.) 
28. What has the government created by changing the name of the education department? Center for Education and Human Resource Development.
29. Since when has the District Education Office been made 'Education Development and Coordination Unit'? V. No. 2074 Chait 29.- (Ministry of Education, Science and Technology abolished all district education offices on Chait 28 and instructed the district education officer to establish a unit office. The ministry arranged for the district education officer to work as the head of that office. Nationwide He had been working in the District Education Office since 2018.)
30. Where are the remains of Ramapithecus found in Nepal? Tinau - Butwal).- Dr. of National Geographic Society of America. J. According to research carried out from 1979 to 1982 by researchers from Tribhuvan University of Nepal including H Hutchison, the jaw (teeth) of Ramapithecus, which is 10 million years old, was found. A 'dummy' of the jaw has been made and placed in the natural museum of Tribhuvan University for public display.- After the identification of this fossil, a series of stamps called 'Fossils of Nepal' was issued in 2013. For the promotion of Ramapithecus, Ramapithecus Park has been built and established near Tinautat. Besides, the construction of 'Ramapithecus Botanical Garden' at Lower Siddhababa Dham was also done by the initiative of both the committees of Siddhababa Dham, which is considered to be the confluence of Palpa district and Rupandehi. Presenter: Tank K.C. 
Acts of the Legislature
1. What is the legislature? What are the functions of the legislature? Make a list. The highest law-making body of the state is called the Legislature. This is the place of people's representatives. National concerns are discussed in this body. The formation and dissolution of the government is also done by this body. In this, the representatives of the people represent the people and make laws for the benefit of the people. The state operates on the basis of the laws created by the legislature. There are two types of legislatures, unicameral and bicameral. The Constitution of Nepal provides for a bicameral federal parliament at the center with a 275-member House of Representatives and a 59-member National Assembly. - Acts performed by the Legislature include making laws, passing bills, amending the constitution, amending laws, repealing laws, passing the budget, discussing the budget regularly, To pass, to set tax rates, to control expenditure, to form a government, to control. To control the government by asking questions about the actions of the government in the parliament, by making motions to draw attention, by criticizing, by making motions of no confidence.- To control and direct the executive branch and the agencies under it. Review and pass or fail the government's policies and programs. Impeachment according to the constitution. Voting on matters submitted for decision in Parliament, passing motions of confidence and no-confidence. Conducting parliamentary hearings on persons to be appointed to designated constitutional positions. To approve the order to remove the obstruction. Approval of crisis. To ratify international treaty agreements. To control the government by criticizing and passing a motion of no confidence.- To control and direct the executive branch and the agencies under it. Review and pass or fail the government's policies and programs. Impeachment according to the constitution. Voting on matters submitted for decision in Parliament, passing motions of confidence and no-confidence. Conducting parliamentary hearings on persons to be appointed to designated constitutional positions. To approve the order to remove the obstruction. Approval of crisis. To ratify international treaty agreements. To control the government by criticizing and passing a motion of no confidence.- To control and direct the executive branch and the agencies under it. Review and pass or fail the government's policies and programs. Impeachment according to the constitution. Voting on matters submitted for decision in Parliament, passing motions of confidence and no-confidence. Conducting parliamentary hearings on persons to be appointed to designated constitutional positions. To approve the order to remove the obstruction. Approval of crisis. To ratify international treaty agreements. To pass motions of confidence and no confidence. Conducting parliamentary hearings on persons to be appointed to designated constitutional positions. To approve the order to remove the obstruction. Approval of crisis. To ratify international treaty agreements. To pass motions of confidence and no confidence. Conducting parliamentary hearings on persons to be appointed to designated constitutional positions. To approve the order to remove the obstruction. Approval of crisis. To ratify international treaty agreements.
2. Confirm that Nepali society is unity in diversity. Social diversity is the diversity that appears in Nepali society, especially in ethnic, linguistic, religious and cultural aspects, while living in harmony with each other and respecting each other in the same society is unity within diversity. This special quality of Nepali society can be confirmed as follows:- There are different castes in the same society and Nepali society has been moving forward together. Trying to maintain unity. Nepal has religious diversity as well as religious freedom and one religion respects another religion.- In Nepali society there is diversity and freedom in social customs, behavior, dress, values, dignity, etc. However, one caste, The culture and traditions of other caste communities are being respected and protected by the community. - In this way, in addition to the diversity of caste, language, religion and community in Nepal, it can be said that there is unity in diversity in Nepali society because they respect each other, accept existence and live in harmony with each other.
3. Introduce biodiversity and discuss its importance. Being different in living animals and plants, being different is called biological diversity. This is the difference in living resources on earth, the difference in billions of souls. Different forms of humans, plants, animals, micro-organisms etc. come under biodiversity. Biodiversity varies from place to place. Biodiversity is of three types namely ecosystem diversity, species diversity and genetic diversity. - Importance of biological diversity Biodiversity is the source of all things that humans need. It is important to people's village, residence, lifestyle, social and economic aspects. Its importance can be mentioned as follows: assistance in increasing the production of agricultural products, assistance in increasing the production of livestock, assistance in increasing the production of plants, helping to improve the genetics of animals and plants and help to preserve their existence.
4. What are the work, duties and rights of the executive head of banks and financial institutions? write The Act on Banks and Financial Institutions, 2073 provides for the duties, duties and rights of the executive head of a bank and financial institution, who is accountable to the board of directors for his/her work: - to prepare the annual budget and action plan of the bank or financial institution and submit it to the board of directors for approval, - to manage the necessary manpower under the staff regulations of the bank or financial institution, - by the general meeting To implement the decisions made, - Act on Banks and Financial Institutions,
Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma   
1. According to the Nepal Electricity Authority, how many percent of households have received electricity from the national transmission system through the national grid by the financial year 2076/077? 86.44 percent.- According to the Ministry of Energy, Water Resources and Irrigation, electricity has reached more than 90 percent of the population due to the electrification done by solar, small hydropower, etc. The government has a goal. Currently, per capita energy consumption is 260 units.
2. When did Indian cricketer Mahendra Singh Dhoni announce his retirement from international cricket? August 15, 2020. Dhoni is one of India's most successful captains in terms of leadership and success. Leading the Indian national team, he has won the title of three major tournaments of the International Cricket Council (ICC). He led India to the top of the ICC Test rankings under his own leadership.- Dhoni is considered as the best 'finisher' in limited-overs cricket and a player with a sharp mind.- Dhoni from Ranchi was included in the Indian team for the first time in 2004. He also announced his retirement from international cricket (August 15, 2020).
3. Who is the Nepali talent who has succeeded in setting world records in 17 different genres of storytelling and song writing? Dr. Dr Upadhyay 
. What is the slogan of the International Youth Day celebrated on August 12, 2020? Youth Engagement for Global Action. (National Slogan: Youth Participation for the World Campaign, Youth Engagement in Employment, Promotion and Environmental Protection)
5. Where in Nepal is the golden turtle found? Janakpur. (This turtle was seen for the first time in Janakpur on April 14, 2018. It took two years to conduct a global study and confirm it. It was published as a study report in Herpeto Notes on August 6, 2020, confirming the first record of a golden-colored turtle in Nepal.) 
6 . Where will Chepang Museum be built? Raksirang, Makwanpur.
7. When was the English version of the updated map of Nepal approved? 2077 July 30. - The map prepared by the Survey Department was approved by the Minister of Land Management, Cooperatives and Poverty Alleviation, Padmakumari Aryal.- With the publication of the English version of the map, the way to send it to the United Nations, diplomatic missions and the entire international world is open. It was published in May.
8. Which is the first country to announce that a vaccine against corona virus has been prepared? Russia (August 11, 2020).- The President of Russia, Vladimir Putin, announced (on August 11, 2020) that the world's first vaccine against the corona virus was made by Russia. - The vaccine was named 'Sputnik V' (from Russia's first satellite, Sputnik). - Gemelia Research Institute in Moscow developed this vaccine based on adenovirus. 
9. Who is the woman of Indian origin who will be the vice presidential candidate for the Democratic Party in the American presidential election? Kamala Harris.
10. Astimki festival is prevalent in which caste? Tharu.- There is a tradition in the Tharu community of celebrating Astimki festival for two days by fasting and worshiping women.- On the first day of the festival, in the village Bhalmansa or Badghar's house, there is a tradition of plastering the walls of the bahari (meeting room) and painting them with lime and drawing pictures based on Lord Krishna and his life. - Lord Krishna will be worshiped in the morning on the second day of the festival. After the puja, the puja materials offered there are washed in the river in the morning. After bathing from rivers and streams, dishes such as phuloori, fish sukuti, kharia etc. are eaten at home. Before eating, some portion is removed from each dish, which is called farhar. It is customary to give this dish to married daughters as an agrasan (Koseli).
11. Who is the successful politician to become the Prime Minister of Sri Lanka in August 2020? Mahinda Rajapakse.- He took the oath of office of the Prime Minister on August 9, 2020.- Leader of the Sri Lanka Podujana Peramuna Party and President Mahinda Rajapakse took the oath of the office of Prime Minister for the fourth time. Achieved.- In the history of Sri Lanka, brother Gotavaya President and brother Mahinda Rajapaksa managed to reach the two highest political positions in the country at the same time. 
12. Where is the tallest giraffe in the world? Australia. - Guinness World Records announced (August 2020) that the giraffe in the Queensland zoo in Australia is the tallest in the world. - The height of the giraffe is 18 feet 8 inches.
13. Who led the Nepali military team sent to help British India in World War II? Ekraj Shamsher and Brahma Shamsher. 
14. How long was the practice of writing the date and bar when mentioning the date in the documents in Nepal? January 1961. 
15. What kind of electoral system is there to be adopted in the election of members of the House of Representatives and the State Assembly? First-past-the-post electoral system and proportional electoral system. 
16. How many chambers is there in Nepal's provincial assembly? one 
17. Who is considered the first poet of Nepali language? Suwananda Das. 
18. What is the most popular and skilled player of the team known as? marquee player
19. The government is going to build integrated settlements in how many places in the seven provinces? 8.- In addition to losing the beauty of the city due to unorganized urban development, it will be expensive and difficult to build the infrastructure after settlement, so that integrated settlements will be developed with the aim of managing that matter. Along with the construction, the market will also be developed in some places. - The market to be built in the first phase,
20. When did the Supreme Court start the online dating service? 2071 November 14.- In order to provide convenience to the parties of the cases registered in the Supreme Court, it is arranged that they can get the online date from the nearest district court or appeal court without coming to the Supreme Court. - After this service, implemented in 31 district courts and nine appeal courts across the country, the common people will be relieved from the pain of having to come to the capital every day and unnecessary expenses. - In addition to this, it is arranged that information about the case registration number, registration date, payment date, order or judgment will be available through mobile SMS.
21. According to the Commercial Coffee Farming Survey (2075), which is the first district of Nepal in coffee production? Kavrepalanchok.- According to the survey, Syangja and Sindhupalchok are in the second and third place respectively. - In the survey, farmers who cultivate more than 50 plants are listed as commercial farmers. - According to the survey, there are 6,346 coffee farmers. - Province no. in coffee production. 3 in first place. - According to the statistics department, out of 77 districts, coffee is being cultivated in 32 districts of Madhyapahari region. 
22. According to the concept of energy banking, when was the electricity produced in Nepal started to be exported to India? June 27, 2076.
23. What is the full form of DANIDA (Danida)? Danish International Development Agency. - This organization has been providing support to various countries in the fields of democracy, human rights, social development, environment and sustainable development and was established in 1962. - Its headquarters is in Copenhagen, Denmark. 
24. How many days was the longest parliament session in the history of Nepal? 381 days (from 2073 Baisakh 21-2074 June 4).
25. What is the program that Nepal Science and Technology Pragya Pratishthan (NAST) has started to conduct with the aim of utilizing the knowledge and skills of Nepalese scientists abroad? Brain pooling.- A brain pooling program has been started to inspire scientists who are researching various subjects abroad to come to Nepal for new discoveries and research. NAST informed that the research will be conducted in the field of conservation and information technology.- NAST has previously conducted the program 'Fark Hai Fark Scientist, Teke Dakch Nepal'.
26. When was the first national public health survey conducted in Nepal? Year 1996.- Fifth National Public Health Survey was completed in Nepal in 2016.- Health survey is being conducted in Nepal every five years.
27. Since when did the government decide to ban 20-year-old vehicles? 2074 Chait 1.- According to the government's decision, vehicles 20 years old will not be allowed to run on any route from 1 Chait. Although some old vehicles were removed by this decision, most of the vehicles were taken outside the Kathmandu Valley and some vehicles were used as private vehicles by schools and others. It is said.- China, India, Britain, France, Norway and other countries have announced that all vehicles will be electrified by 2030.
28. Which year has the government announced as 'Special campaign year for safe motherhood'? 2075 (The campaign was started from the first week of May).
29. Since when has the 'Montreal Convention', a convention on the unification of international air transport regulations, been implemented? November 4, 2003.- The Convention on the Safety of International Air Passengers passed in Montreal, Canada on May 28, 1999 came into force on November 4, 2003. This convention will help to provide compensation.- This convention will be applicable to all international travel by airplanes for payment of persons, baggage and cargo.
30. Where is the longest train in the world? Australia.- This train, which was put into operation by BHP Bilison, an iron and steel producer based in Australia, for the transportation of its goods, has 682 bogies (boxes). 
Presenter: Tank 
 
K.C
1. What kind of provision is there in the constitution of Nepal regarding the head of state? Discuss. Part 13 of the Constitution of Nepal has provisions related to the provincial executive and part 14 of the provincial legislature. According to these provisions, the head of the state is a representative of the Nepal government and his appointment is made by the president. It seems that the role of the head of state in the state is similar to the role of the president in the federal parliament. The President of Nepal has to be elected by the members of the Federal Parliament and the Provincial Assembly, while the provincial head is appointed by the President on the recommendation of the Council of Ministers, and even though the term of office of the provincial head is five years, the President can immediately remove him from office. - Duties, duties and rights of the provincial chief - Appointing the leader of the parliamentary party with majority in the provincial assembly as the chief minister,
2. What is the existing political division of Nepal? Mention. Article 56 of the Constitution of Nepal provides for the structure of the state. According to which, the basic structure of Nepal will be three-tiered, federal, provincial and local levels, and state power will be exercised by the federal, provincial and local levels in accordance with the constitution and laws. In Schedule-4 of the Constitution, provision has been made for seven provinces and districts in the provinces. Regarding the existing political division of Nepal, this arrangement made in the constitution can be mentioned as follows: Province no. 1 1. Taplejung 2. Panchthar 3. Elam 4. Sankhuvasabha 5. Thirteenth 6. Dhankuta 7. Bhojpur 8. Khotang 9. Solukhumbu 10. Okhaldhunga 11. Udaipur 12. Jhapa 13. Morang 14. Sunsari Province No. 2 1. Saptari 2. Siraha 3. Dhanusha 4. Mahottari 5. Sarlahi 6. Rautahat 7. Twelve 8. Parsa Bagmati Province 1. Dolakha 2. Ramechhap 3. Sindhuli 4. Kavrepalanchok 5. Sindhupalchok 6. Rasuwa 7. Nuwakot 8. Dhading 9. Chitwan 10. Makwanpur 11. Bhaktapur 12. Lalitpur 13. Kathmandu Gandaki Province 1. Gorkha 2. Lamjung 3. Tanahun 4. Kaski 5. Manang 6. Mustang 7. Mountain 8. Sanja 9. Magdi 10. Baglung 11. Nawalparasi (East of Bardghat Susta) Province no. 5 1. Nawalparasi (Bardghat Susta West) 2. Rupandehi 3. Kapilavastu 4. Palpa 5. Arghakhanchi 6. Gulmi 7. Rukum (eastern part) 8. Rolpa 9. Pyuthan 10. Dang 11. Banke 12. Bardiakarnali Province 1. Rukum (western part) 2. Salyan 3. Dolpa 4. Joomla 5. Mugu 6. Humla 7. Calicut 8. Jajarkot 9. Dailekh 10. Surkhet Far Western Province 1. Bajura 2. Bajhang 3. Dottie 4. Surprise 5. Darchula 6. Baitadi 7. Dadeldhura 8. Kanchanpur 9. Kailali Nawalparasi (East of Bardghat Susta) Province no. 5 1. Nawalparasi (Bardghat Susta West) 2. Rupandehi 3. Kapilavastu 4. Palpa 5. Arghakhanchi 6. Gulmi 7. Rukum (eastern part) 8. Rolpa 9. Pyuthan 10. Dang 11. Banke 12. Bardiakarnali Province 1. Rukum (western part) 2. Salyan 3. Dolpa 4. Joomla 5. Mugu 6. Humla 7. Calicut 8. Jajarkot 9. Dailekh 10. Surkhet Far Western Province 1. Bajura 2. Bajhang 3. Dottie 4. Surprise 5. Darchula 6. Baitadi 7. Dadeldhura 8. Kanchanpur 9. Kailali Nawalparasi (East of Bardghat Susta) Province no. 5 1. Nawalparasi (Bardghat Susta West) 2. Rupandehi 3. Kapilavastu 4. Palpa 5. Arghakhanchi 6. Gulmi 7. Rukum (eastern part) 8. Rolpa 9. Pyuthan 10. Dang 11. Banke 12. Bardiakarnali Province 1. Rukum (western part) 2. Salyan 3. Dolpa 4. Joomla 5. Mugu 6. Humla 7. Calicut 8. Jajarkot 9. Dailekh 10. Surkhet Far Western Province 1. Bajura 2. Bajhang 3. Dottie 4. Surprise 5. Darchula 6. Baitadi 7. Dadeldhura 8. Kanchanpur 9. Kailali Kanchanpur 9. Kailali Kanchanpur 9. Kailali
3. What is meant by double accounting system? Write the reasons why Nepal government implemented this system. The system of keeping records in such a way that both the receiving and the paying parties of the financial transactions are affected is called the double accounting system. Among these two sides of financial transactions, one is debit and the other is credit. Both the debit and credit sides are equal. It helps to find out the real situation of financial transactions without making errors and mistakes in financial transactions. It was rendered by Luca Pacioli of Italy in 1494. The current accounting system of Nepal is based on this double accounting system. - Due to the implementation of the double accounting system by the government of Nepal - In the double accounting system, the accounts of both parties involved in economic transactions are kept. By keeping double accounts of both parties, there will be no errors and fraud in financial transactions, and if there are any, it can be easily detected. This will keep financial transactions clean, reflect transparency and increase trust. It helps to make reliable reports without errors on time. That is why Nepal government has implemented this system. Other reasons for this are as follows: - to find out the real state of government financial transactions, - to maintain accuracy in all activities including the initial records of financial transactions, from vouchers to bank cash books, budget statements, monthly, quarterly and annual reports, - government policies, plans, programs and To deliver the financial information required for budgeting on time, - to make the internal control system effective, - to simplify the government audit work, - to maintain uniformity in government financial transactions, - to make the government accounting system based on international standards. Transparency will be reflected and trust will increase. It helps to make reliable reports without errors on time. That is why Nepal government has implemented this system. Other reasons for this are as follows: - to find out the real state of government financial transactions, - to maintain accuracy in all activities including the initial records of financial transactions, from vouchers to bank cash books, budget statements, monthly, quarterly and annual reports, - government policies, plans, programs and To deliver the financial information required for budgeting on time, - to make the internal control system effective, - to simplify the government audit work, - to maintain uniformity in government financial transactions, - to make the government accounting system based on international standards. Transparency will be reflected and trust will increase. It helps to make reliable reports without errors on time. That is why Nepal government has implemented this system. Other reasons for this are as follows: - to find out the real state of government financial transactions, - to maintain accuracy in all activities including the initial records of financial transactions, from vouchers to bank cash books, budget statements, monthly, quarterly and annual reports, - government policies, plans, programs and To deliver the financial information required for budgeting on time, - to make the internal control system effective, - to simplify the government audit work, - to maintain uniformity in government financial transactions, - to make the government accounting system based on international standards.
4. Explain the meaning of the following topics related to banks and financial institutions? a. Electronic transactions b. Leasing c. Hypothecation loan d. Affidavit. Electronic transactions: - Deposit taking, payment, money transfer transactions through telephone, telex, computer, magnetic tape or other similar electronic devices are called electronic transactions. It also refers to transactions through terminals, automated teller machines (ATMs), cash dispensing machines, charge cards, debit cards and credit cards. b. Leasing: - The ownership of movable and immovable property remains with the bank and financial institution for a certain period of time, and the customer receives only the usufructuary rights and pays the amount on a fixed schedule for that purpose. Leasing is called leasing. c. Hypothecation loan: - The loan that is agreed upon between banks and financial institutions and the debtor on the collateral of goods stock is called hypothecation loan. In this, the right of enjoyment of goods stock remains with the respective debtor. d. Letter of Acceptance: - A letter written by a bank or financial institution in the name of another bank or financial institution to accept a check, draft, bill of exchange for a certain amount of money is called a letter of acceptance.
Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma 
1. When did a powerful explosion occur in the warehouse where 'ammonium nitrate' was stored in the port of Beirut, the capital of Lebanon? August 4, 2020.- More than 135 people died in a powerful explosion and more than 4,000 were injured.- Ammonium nitrate recovered from a cargo ship in 2014 was stored in that warehouse. 
2. Who is the woman who holds the Guinness World Record for flying a plane at the highest age (99 years)? Robina Asty (USA). - He set two Guinness world records by flying an airplane and giving flight instructions in the sky. 
3. Who is the organizer of the Friday for Future program? Greta Thunvarg (Sweden).
4. According to the Economic Survey 2076-77, how many public institutions are fully and majority owned by the Government of Nepal? 43. - In the fiscal year 2076-077, Nepal Food Institute and National Trading Limited were merged and Food Management and Trade Company Limited was established.- National Biovision Company Limited was merged with Agricultural Materials Company Limited. Ltd. was established.- Likewise, Dhowadi Falam Company Limited and Nepal Infrastructure Construction Company Limited were established in the year 2076-077.- According to the economic survey 2076-077, 26 companies are in profit and 13 companies are in loss, while the turnover of the rest of the companies is zero. 
5. According to the economic survey 2076/077, how many postal savings bank offices are there in Nepal? 65.
6. According to the Economic Survey 2076-077, what is the percentage of the population that has access to electricity from renewable energy sources in Nepal? 10 percent. 
7. If the Netherlands is the first country in the world to provide legal recognition to same-sex marriage, which is the first Asian country? Taiwan. 
8. When is Public Service Day celebrated by the United Nations every year? June 23. 
9. Where is the headquarters of the International Atomic Energy Commission? Vienna (Austria). 
10. Who is the first Nepali to receive the Global-500 award? Dr. Krishna Kumar Pandey. 
11. How many parts are there in the Civil Code that came into force on August 1, 2075? 6 parts.
12. What are the books selected by Madan Puskar Guthi for Madan Puskar 2076? Joker's Gun (Bimal Niva), Dharsaidharsa's Chakravyuha (Tirtha Shrestha), Parityakta (Bhuvan Dhungana), Maharasanighantu (Volumes 1-3) (Yogi Dharmamaharas), Maharani (Chandraprakash Baniyan), Mohpath (Lalit Bishta) and Yatrama (Sharada Sharma). 
13. Which is the first SAARC country to ratify the Paris Agreement on climate change? Maldives, (Approved by Nepal on October 24, 2016). 
14. When and where was the establishment of tourism information center in Nepal? 2076 June 18, Thamel (Kathmandu) 
15. Currently, how many governments are there in Nepal at federal, state and local levels? 761 (Association-1, State-7 and Local Level-753)
16. Who was declared as the first yoga district of Nepal on October 10, 2073? Bhaktapur. (It is estimated that 50 to 60 percent of the people here are involved in yoga in one way or another.) 17. Which is the portal launched by the Government of Nepal to facilitate the import-export work? Nepal Ted. 
18. What is the name of the voluntary organization that operates to protect the citizens in the conflict-affected areas of Syria? White Helmets. 
19. Which is the period declared by Nepal as tourism decade? Year 2020-2030. 
20. Which sports club has been ranked first in the list of the most valuable sports teams in the public by Forbes magazine? American rugby club 'Dallas Cowboys'. 
21. If Lake Victoria is in Africa, where is Victoria River? Australia.
22. National Vigilance Center falls under which ministry? Prime Minister and Council of Ministers Office 
. What is the full form of 'DFID'? Department for International Development. - As a British international aid organization, it was previously called UK Aid. - Since the aid provided by the UK was provided by the Foreign and Common Wealth Office, DFID was formed in 1997 and the related work was started through it. - The DFID office in Nepal was established in April 1999.
24. Since when science day was celebrated in Nepal? 2070 (Oct 1) .- Cabinet meeting on November 8, 2069 decided to celebrate Oct 1 as Science Day.- Seventh Science Day was celebrated on Oct 1, 2076. Transformation'. 
25. When was the World Wildlife Fund established? April 29, 1961.- The motto of the fund is For a Living Planet.- The headquarters of this organization active in the conservation of wild animals is located in Gand, Switzerland.- Its symbol is a rare animal red panda. 
26. Which is the precious herb known as 'Aloe Living Gold' in Nepal? Yarsagumba.
27. Which is the tallest statue in the world? Statue of Unity.- The height of the statue of Sardar Ballabhai Patel, the iron man of India and the first deputy prime minister of independent India, is 182 meters (597 feet). . 
28. According to the World Meteorological Organization, how many periods of average weather conditions are generally called climate? 30 years. 
29. If Karan Bahadur Shah is known as a reptile expert of Nepal, who is known as a rhinoceros expert? Kamaljung Kunwar.
30. When was the historical referendum held in Nepal? Year 2037 Baisakh 20. - On 10th May 2036, it was announced by the then King Birendra that a national referendum would be held on the topic of 'multi-party system or reformed panchayat'. . 
Presenter: Tank Casey
Social Justice in the Constitution1. According to the Constitution of Nepal-2072, what policies are there to be adopted by the state regarding social justice and inclusion? write According to Article 51 (j) of the Constitution of Nepal-2072, the state has to adopt the following policies related to social justice and inclusion:- Giving priority to single women who are in a helpless situation in employment based on their skills, abilities and qualifications and making appropriate arrangements for earning a living,- Those who are at risk, social and making self-reliant by rehabilitating, protecting and empowering women who are excluded from the family and victims of violence; – Free earners, Kamlaris, Haravas, Charavas, Haliyas, Landless, Identifying squatters and rehabilitating them by arranging arable land or employment for housing and livelihood, - Enhancing youth participation in national development and creating an environment for full use of political, economic, social and cultural rights. For the empowerment and development of the youth, by providing special opportunities in the fields of education, health, employment, etc., to develop personality and to provide suitable opportunities to contribute to the overall development of the state, to ensure the right to live with dignity, with the identity of the tribal people, to be concerned with this community by making special arrangements for opportunities and benefits. To participate in decision-making and to protect and promote traditional knowledge, skills, culture, social traditions and experiences of indigenous peoples and local communities,
2. What is a public institution? Write the objectives of a public institution. A public enterprise that produces and sells goods and services is called a public corporation. Public institutions have full or partial investment by the government, because they are owned by the government, they have government control and direction, but they also have autonomy in management, professional qualities, public accountability, legal independence, and the purpose of providing services. The United Nations has defined that an organization that does business under the full or majority control of the government is called a public corporation. In Nepal, public institutions are not legally defined anywhere, Companies Act, Corporations Act, Development Committee Act, Banks and Financial Institutions Act, Public institutions are managed by their own laws etc. when the institution was established. Currently, there are 43 public institutions in Nepal. The objectives of public institutions are to provide essential goods and services easily in all accessible and remote areas, to end the monopoly of the private sector, to prevent artificial scarcity, black market and unnecessary price increase, to support economic development, to create employment opportunities, Bringing modern technology to the country, - Assisting in infrastructure construction, - Developing model enterprises, - Implementing government policies and programs, - Fulfilling social needs, - Assisting in revenue mobilization, - Enhancing public welfare as a whole.
3. What are the problems seen in the privatization of public institutions in Nepal? write Privatization is the act of transferring public institutions under government ownership and control to the private sector. This is the reform of the economic sector. Privatization Act-2050 has been implemented in Nepal in accordance with the policy of economic liberalization in order to increase the efficiency of industries and businesses run by government investment and to increase productivity and reduce the financial and administrative burden on the government. A Privatization Committee has been formed under the chairmanship of the Minister of Finance or Minister of State. So far, a total of 30 public institutions have been privatized and dissolved. On the one hand, the privatization of institutions has not been effective, on the other hand, the privatized institutions have not been able to provide employment, increase production and productivity. There are currently 43 public institutions under government ownership and control in Nepal, the operation of these institutions, There has not been a general political consensus on privatization and disintegration, the government has been unstable in the past, different policies and programs have been adopted by political parties and governments. One of them took the policy of privatizing, canceling, and dissolving, while the other took the policy of investing and operating closed industries, so that the process of privatizing public institutions could not be effective. Other problems seen in this are as follows:- Weakness of the private sector, lack of competent private sector,- Inability to increase foreign investment due to lack of favorable environment for investment,- Inability of sufficient coordination between the Ministry of Finance and the Ministry of Industry,- Inability of the government to raise the funds required for privatization. Not being able to, not arranging sufficient budget, - land encroachment, sale of property, liability to be borne by the government, employee facilities, liquidation, etc. various problems appear in privatization work, - Weakness of public awareness regarding privatization,
4. What is economic diplomacy? What are the ways to make Nepal's economic diplomacy effective? Mention. Keeping in mind the economic interest of the country, increasing relations with friendly countries and the international community, giving assistance and reaching understanding is called economic diplomacy. This is a work to strengthen the country's economy through international cooperation. It is the expansion of international economic relations, which includes activities other than pure diplomatic activities such as: expansion and diversification of foreign trade, promotion of foreign investment, transfer of technology, promotion of foreign employment, protection of the rights and interests of Nepali workers working abroad, human resource development, tourism promotion, Activities such as expansion of regional and regional relations etc. are included. It helps to increase the country's identity and maintain interdependence rather than economic dependence. Ways to make Nepal's economic diplomacy effective - Nepali ambassadors, ambassadors of commerce, and labor assistants abroad have been mobilized to organize Nepal's economic diplomacy. Article 51 (d) of the Constitution of Nepal (2072) provides policy on international relations. Private sector organizations and entrepreneurs are also active in expanding international economic relations from their respective fields. However, Nepal's economic diplomacy has not been effective. For this, the following measures should be adopted: - Building a permanent mechanism that works in a coordinated manner by prioritizing economic diplomacy, - Advancing cooperation with the private sector as a priority, - Making the role of non-resident Nepalis more effective,
5. What are the objectives of Nepal Rastra Bank? write According to Section 4 of the Nepal Rastra Bank Act-2058, its objectives are as follows:- To manage the necessary monetary and foreign exchange policies to maintain price and exchange rate stability for the sake of sustainable development of the economy, - To promote the stability and necessary liquidity of the banking and financial sector. ,- To develop a safe, healthy and efficient payment system,- To regulate, inspect, supervise and monitor the banking and financial system,- To enhance the overall banking and financial system of Nepal and increase the credibility of the general public towards it.
6. Briefly write about the climate found in the Himalayan region of Nepal and its effect on the people's life there. The Himalayan region of Nepal is an area that extends from three thousand meters to eight thousand 848 meters above sea level. Among the five climates found in Nepal, three climates are found in the Himalayan region namely cold temperate climate, Lekali climate and Himalayan climate. Rainfall is very low, it snows every twelve months, and the climate is cold and dry. Although there is some temperature in summer in this region, the temperature reaches zero degrees in winter. The high part of the Mahabharata in the Himalayan region, the lower part of the Himalayan and the upper part of the Himalayan region, the temperature goes up and down. The positive effects of the climate of the Himalayan region on people's life - cold, cold weather will reduce the incidence of diseases, - economic gains can be made through the herbs found in the Himalayan region, - sheep ,
Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma 
1. Who was appointed as the vice-chancellor of Madan Bhandari Institute of Health Sciences established by Bagmati State Government? Prof. Dr. Bishwaraj Joshi - The cabinet meeting of Wagmati province on July 14, 2017 appointed Joshi as the vice-chancellor of the foundation for four years. 
2. Stephen Tatav is a player related to which sport? Football (Tataw, the former captain of the team that led Cameroon to the quarter-finals in the FIFA World Cup in 1990, died in August 2020 at the age of 57. Under the captaincy of Tataw, Cameroon presented a brilliant game in that World Cup. Cameroon created a sensation in that World Cup by defeating Argentina, Romania and Colombia.)
3. How much government debt has reached the share of each Nepali by the financial year 2076-077? Rs. 42 thousand six hundred - Nepal government's debt liability has reached 13 trillion rupees. By the end of June 2077, the internal debt of the government has reached 6 trillion 67 billion rupees and the external debt has reached 6 trillion 14 billion rupees. When the government takes into account the loan received and the principal paid up to the last financial year, the total outstanding debt has reached 12 trillion 81 billion rupees. According to the Statistics Department, the population of Nepal has reached 338,000. Comparing the total debt with the population, the share of each Nepalese government debt has reached 42,600 rupees. In this kind of loan, the government arranges every year in the budget and pays the principal and interest of the loan. Government debt to each Nepalese share, GDP size and total debt in the last five years
4. What is the name of the examination to be conducted in class 11 according to the conduct, management, evaluation, result publication and certification procedure of class 11 prepared by the National Examination Board, 2077? Secondary Education Passing Examination (SLCE) - According to the procedure, the school should keep daily attendance records and only students with at least 70% regular attendance should be allowed to participate in the final examination to be taken from the school. 
5. Where has it been decided to change the current capital of Indonesia? Borneo (Proposed to move the capital on August 18, 2019 and decided on the proposal on August 27, 2019.)
6. The meeting of the Council of Ministers on July 19, 2077 will decide who will be appointed as the Chief Executive Officer of the Investment Board? Sushil Bhatt 
7. Currently, how many local levels are listed as backward areas in Nepal? 57 
8. When was the cycle lane launched in Lalitpur Metropolitan Municipality? Vikram Samvat 2076 November 15 
9. When did the United States announce its withdrawal from the United Nations Human Rights Council? 2018 June 19 
10. Who is the talent who won the title of the first edition of the reality show Comedy Champion broadcasted by Kantipur Television? Himesh Pant of Dhading 
11. When is Election Day celebrated in Nepal? February 7- The fourth election day was celebrated on the 7th of February 2076.- Election day was celebrated to commemorate the day when the first multi-party parliamentary election started in the year 2015.
12. When was the first conference on refugees and migrants organized by the United Nations? September 
13, 2016. According to a joint study by the National Planning Commission and UNICEF, what is the share of the productive population in Nepal in the age group of 14 to 64 years? 62.68 percent 
15. When was the first performance agreement made by Prime Minister KP Sharma Oli with all the ministers? 2076 July 15 - The basis of the agreement is the annual budget and the government's policies and programs. 
16. Indo-Pacific strategy is a program led by which country? America (with the rise of China in world economic politics, the foreign policy adopted by the United States with the aim of maintaining American dominance in Asian economic politics.)
17. Which country has implemented the new Islamic (Sharia) law with a strict provision of stoning to death for homosexuals? Brunei, April 3, 2019 
18. Who is the designer of the popular online game 'Pubji'? Brendan Green - This game started in March 2017. The full form of PUBG is 'Player Unknown's Battle Ground'. 
19. Who is the Nepali talent who received the 'Prithwi' award related to the United Nations climate? Sonika Manandhar (Awarded on the occasion of 'Earth Ceremony' held in New York on September 26, 2019.) 
20. When and where was the first Asian Civilizations Dialogue Conference organized? May 2019, Beijing (China)
21. Which bird is known as wife bird? Rajadhanesh - It is estimated that the number of this bird in the list of protected birds is about 150 all over Nepal. - Rajdhanesh, which shows interesting and unique behavior in the process of nest building and reproduction, makes a nest in the trunk of a large, old tree. The male regularly feeds the female from the outside during the period of pregnancy and after the hatching of the young, the male also feeds the young. 
22. Which article of the constitution states that 'the relationship between the federation, state and local level will be based on the principle of cooperation, coexistence and harmony'? Article 232 
23. Where is the proposed Charang airport located? Mustang 
24. Which national park is closest to the capital city of the country in the world? Shivpuri National Park
25. Which province is conducting the campaign called 'One Nurse, One School'? Bagmati Province
26. Where was the World Trade Union Asia Pacific Regional Conference-2019 held? Nepal (September 24-25, 2019) - In the conference organized by the World Trade Union Confederation, Coordination Committee Nepal, 28 delegates from 14 countries including India, Pakistan, Bangladesh, Sri Lanka, Malaysia, South Korea, Vietnam, Laos, Cambodia, Indonesia, Iran, Kazakhstan More than three dozen trade union representatives participated. This annual conference was held in Nepal in 2007. The conference held with the main slogan of 'Ensure the basic needs and social security of workers, invest in the production and employment sector', issued a nine-point manifesto. Celebrating it as Action Day and conducting labor mobilization campaign globally and on November 7, workers are given education, health,
27. SAARC Cultural Heritage Which city has been chosen as the cultural capital for the year 2016-17? Mahasthangarh (Bangladesh) 
28. Vishkhela festival is a popular festival in which caste? Satar (Vishkhela festival) The groups of 10 to 15 people who have learned the mantra around the playground or around the playground try to draw the poisoned person towards them with the help of the mantra. In this way, the one who can pull the poison towards them and get rid of the poison becomes the winner of the group or group. This festival is especially prevalent in Jhapa district.
29. When did Saudi Arabia first announce the entry permit for tourists? September 27, 2019 (In this country, which has an economy based on oil trade, it is said that tourism is going to be developed as another part of the economy from now on. Although it is open to foreign citizens to visit, some conditions have been made stricter. The officials said that a code of conduct has been made, especially for women. With this announcement of Saudi Arabia, which came on the day of World Tourism Day, it is felt that the scope of the world's tourism sector has expanded.) 
30. Which period has been declared as 'Energy and Water Resources Decade' in Nepal? Year 2075-2085 
Presenter: Tank KC
What are health care offenses 1. According to the Civil Crimes (Code) Act-2074, what actions are taken as offenses related to human health treatment and what kind of punishment is provided? Discuss. The Civil Crimes (Code) Act- 2074, which was drafted to maintain the morals, manners, virtues, facilities, economic interests of the common people and to maintain good relations between different religious and cultural communities, has provided that the following actions will be taken as offenses related to human health treatment and will be punished as follows: a. Unlicensed persons should not administer treatment: - If the person who commits or causes the offense shall be imprisoned for up to three years and fined up to 30,000 rupees. Imprisonment for up to a year, - Regardless of what is written in it, a person who has knowledge about treatment through long experience should take proper care and do not hinder the treatment of a minor disease by giving a medicine of a minor nature that does not have any adverse effect on the human body of a patient with a minor disease, b. Indecent treatment should not be done: - If it is done, the person who commits or commits the following offense will be punished as follows: (a) Killing someone if someone is killed, (b) Causing someone to be disabled if someone is disabled, c. Treatment should not be carried out through negligence or fraud:- If someone dies or is maimed as a result of the following work, in case of death or disability due to negligence, imprisonment for up to five years and a fine of up to 50,000 rupees, and in case of death or maiming due to fraud, imprisonment for up to three years and a fine of up to 30,000 rupees Being fined, d. Testing on the human body should not be performed without consent:- The person who conducts the test contrary to the above shall be imprisoned for up to three years and fined up to 30,000 rupees. Sale and distribution of dangerous drugs shall not be allowed:- If the person who commits or causes such offense shall be imprisoned for two years or fined up to 20 thousand rupees or both, f. It is not allowed to adulterate medicines or to sell adulterated medicines:- If the person who commits this offense shall be punished as follows: (a) If the person has already died due to the consumption of such medicine, as if he has committed suicide, (b) If there is a danger of death due to the consumption of such medicine. As if doing business to kill for the possibility, (e) Imprisonment for up to ten years and a fine up to one lakh rupees, if any part of the body is broken or its strength is weakened or lost due to consumption of such medicine, (e) Imprisonment for up to five years and a fine up to 50 thousand rupees, except in the above cases. Medicines that have expired or without prior warning should not be sold-distributed: - If selling-distributed, the person who commits or causes this offense will be imprisoned for up to one year and fined up to ten thousand rupees. One drug should not be sold and distributed as another drug:- If selling and distributing, the person who commits or causes such offense shall be imprisoned for two years or fined up to 20 thousand rupees or both, viz. False report of laboratory test shall not be given: - If given, the person who commits or causes the offense as mentioned above shall be imprisoned for up to three years and fined up to 30 thousand rupees.
2. Why is registration and receipt of letters necessary in the organization? open up Registration is the first record keeping of the letters that come into the organization, while the last record keeping of the letters going out of the organization is challan. Letters are entered through registration in the office and letters are issued through challan. The work in the office starts from the registration, while the responsibility for the work is transferred to others from the invoice. The need for registration and receipt of letters in the organization is as follows: - To keep the initial records of the letters received in the office, - To obtain information about which letters were received, when and where and what was the action of the received letters, - To protect the letters received in the office, - In the office The possibility of losing the received letter is less, if the letter is lost, information can be obtained from the registered book, such as: registration number of the letter, date of the letter, number of the letter,
3. What is social conflict? Mention the causes and effects of social conflict in Nepal. There are different people and groups in society. Different people with different castes, languages, religions, cultures and backgrounds live in the same society. Each person and group have different interests, temperaments, and feelings, so that they clash with each other, animosity, discord, disputes and disagreements occur among themselves, this is social conflict. Causes of social conflict in Nepal - not trusting and respecting each other, - unemployed Being, increasing poverty, - economic inequality in society, - non-compliance with social customs, - drinking alcohol, - lack of social justice, - lack of education, lack of awareness. - Promotion of social justice, - Increase in social unity and harmony. Negative impact - Disturbance in peace and order in the society.
4. How has the geographical situation of Nepal affected the overall development of the country? write The geographical situation of Nepal located in the Himalayas, mountains and Terai has influenced the overall development of the country as follows: Positive effect - Support in the development of tourism business, increase in income and employment, - Abundance of precious herbs, support in medicine production, - Diversity in agricultural production in the Himalayas, mountains and Terai, industrial Support in development, - Support in internal and external demarcation from mountains, mountains, rivers and rivers, - Sources of major rivers in the mountains, immense water flow, development potential, - Support in favorable migration from clean climate, clean environment. Negative impact - Geographical difficulty, distribution of services Obstacles, difficulties in transportation, - problems in the judicious distribution of means-resources due to the geographical condition of the mountains, - difficult life due to the cold climate in the mountains, - difficulties in the development of integrated settlements due to the scattered settlements in the mountains,
5. What are the problems seen in Nepal's public administration? Mention. Public administration is a mechanism that is neutral towards politics and committed to the plans and programs of the elected government and implements the policies formulated by the same government impartially and efficiently. The government is usually changed in five years, but it is not changed with the change of government, so it is also called permanent government. It is an administrative mechanism established by law. Nepal has constitutional, legal and institutional arrangements to manage public administration. The constitution of Nepal has provided for the formation and operation of federal, provincial and local government services, and yet Nepal's public administration has not yet been organized. Various problems such as policy, legal, institutional, procedural, technological, behavioral etc. have been seen in this. Which can be mentioned as follows: - What will be the public administration of the future? lack of a clear long-term policy with an action plan in relation to that, - the legal system that organizes public administration is not up to date, - the inability to attract new talents in the market to public service, - the inability to prepare the organizational structure according to the federal, state and local levels, - the national service employees working in the administration Salary facilities not being contemporary and relevant, - Basics of moral development of national service employees such as: transfer, promotion, posting, training, etc. not being transparent and scientific, - Every procedure of public administration not being simple and modern, - Timely improvement in the behavior of employees working in the administration Inability to be, - Inability to have operational coordination between government service delivery mechanisms,
Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma 
1. According to the 'Nepal Development Update' released by the World Bank on July 8, 2077, what is the economic growth rate of Nepal in the financial year 2076-077? 1.8 percent.- While the growth rate has been continuously above 6.5 percent for three years, the World Bank said that the growth rate was affected last year due to the restrictions issued to prevent the spread of Covid-19.
2. When did China launch the Tianwen-1 spacecraft to study Mars? 23 July 2020. - The spacecraft was launched from the Space Launch Center in Henan Province through Long March 5. - The five-ton Tianwen-1 is expected to return to Earth after about seven months in February 2021. - This mission consists of a Mars orbiter, a lander and a rover. - With the help of these instruments, Mars Chinese scientists said that the soil of the planet will be studied.
3. Where has the Internal Revenue Department implemented the Biometric System in the first phase in distribution of Permanent Account Number (PAN)? Kathmandu Valley.- In the first phase, this system was started in Taxpayer Service Offices within Kathmandu Valley from 2077-78.- At present, such a system is implemented only after providing Vipan (Business Permanent Account Number).- Biometric system will be gradually implemented in Taxpayer Service Offices across the country. 
4. When and where will the 32nd Olympic Games be held? 2021 July 23-August 8, Japan.
5. According to the trade statistics of the year 2076-77, which was published by the customs department on July 11, 2077, how much is Nepal's trade deficit? Rs. 11 trillion 64 crores. - According to the department, the trade deficit of Nepal in the year 2075-76 was 13 trillion 21 billion rupees due to the impact of import and export due to Corona, it remained at 11 trillion 64 billion in the year 2076-77.- Overall import decreased by 15.63 percent to 11 trillion 96 billion during the review period. reached Rs. In the previous year, Nepal imported goods worth 14 trillion 18 billion rupees. - Nepal exported goods worth 96 billion 150 million rupees in the year 2076-77, which is 0.98 percent less than the previous year. - A large part of the goods exported from Nepal is palm oil. Nepal has been bringing raw palm from Malaysia and Indonesia and processing it and selling it in India. According to the statistics of the department, there has been a decrease of 14.69 percent in the overall international trade of Nepal.
Major Five Trading Partners – India, China, Indonesia, USA, UAE Major Five Imported Commodities – Diesel, Crude Iron and Steel, Petrol, LP Gas, Rice Major Five Exported Commodities – Palm Oil, Soybean Oil, Carpets, Woolen Textiles, Jute
6. Since when was the lockdown issued by the government for the prevention and control of the corona virus (Covid-19) ended? Vikram Samvat 2077 July 7 (continued from 2076 Chait 11). - The closure that was implemented from Chait 11, 2076 was last continued until the midnight of July 6. - Although the infection is under control, the risk remains, although the formal closure has been ended, the measures related to the prevention, control and treatment of Covid-19 have been kept in place. - With the announcement of the end of the four-month long closure Relief felt.- Like the global impact in Nepal, every sector has become uncomfortable due to Corona.- Since the government ended the lockdown after evaluating the experience of other countries and the current situation of infection in Nepal, it is expected that this decision will give positive results to the economy and civil life.
7. When was the High Level Coordination Committee for Corona Prevention formed under the coordination of Deputy Prime Minister and Defense Minister Ishwar Pokharel? February 17, 2076. 
8. What is the position of Nepal among the countries that send peacekeeping troops to different countries at the call of the United Nations? 4th (since February 23, 2076, before this, Nepal was in fifth place.) 
9. When did the World Health Organization hold a conference of health experts in Geneva, Switzerland to discuss the Corona virus? February 12, 2020. (The conference decided the official name of the corona virus epidemic, Covid-19.) 
10. When was the SAARC Emergency Fund announced to fight against the Covid-19 epidemic? March 15, 2020.
11. What is the full form of 'MARD', a tool used by Nepal Police to arrest those who disobey the lockdown? Multi functional arrest and rescue device. 
12. When was the corona infection that started from Wuhan in China first seen in Nepal? January 10, 2076. 
13. Who is the scholar who said that 'disaster makes a man and wealth makes a monster'? Victor Hugo. 
14. Nepal Food Institute and National Trading Limited merged with each other and when was the establishment of 'Food Management and Trading Company'? 2076 July 28 
15. When was the first historic Constituent Assembly election in Nepal? Year 2064 Chait 28. 
16. When did the presidential educational reform program start? Year 2076÷77.
17. Where was the Asia Pacific conference of Kiwanis International, an international organization working in the field of children, held recently? Nepal (March 2020). 
18. What is the slogan of World Wetlands Day celebrated on February 2, 2020? Wetlands and biodiversity. 
19. When was the international conference on the protection of human rights of migrant workers organized in Kathmandu? November 26-28, 2076. 
20. Nepal Rastra Bank has implemented the interest rate corridor since when? November 29, 2074. 
21. If Tilavikram Nemwang (Vairagi Kainla) is known as a poet of dimensions, who is known as a 'modern poet'? Gopal Prasad Rimal.
22. Since when was Sripech viewing opened for public at Narayanhiti Durbar Museum? November 4, 2075. (On October 29, 2075, Prime Minister KP Sharma Oli visited Sripech under the new arrangement, and Sripech was opened to the general public from October 4.) 
23. When was the Truth and Reconciliation Commission established? 26 January 2071 
. When was the ninth amendment of Public Procurement Regulations-2064? December 14, 2076. 
25. Since when was the industrial census started in Nepal? Year 2022. - The first industrial census in Nepal was conducted in the year 2022. - The industrial census is conducted every five years. - The 11th industrial census started from February 15, 2076.
26. How long is there a government plan to eliminate measles-rubella disease in Nepal? Within the year 2023. 
27. What is the war between Russia and Saudi Arabia regarding the price of petroleum i.e. mineral oil known as? Price war. 
28. What is the identification number applied by the customs department for foreign trade? Exim code. 
29. Who is the Nepali youth honored with the Young Global Leaders Award-2020 given by the World Economic Forum in Davos, Switzerland? Pradeep Pariyar.
30. When did the parliament of Russia approve the constitutional amendment proposal with the provision to extend the term of the president? March 11, 2020. - According to the revised provisions, the term of President Vladimir Putin can be extended for another 12 years. - The term of President Putin is ending in 2024. According to the new proposal, the way to become the president for another 12 years after 2024 is open. During the tenure of the then President Medvedev, the term of the President was made 6 years. In 2012, Putin was re-elected as president and in 2018, he became president again for 6 years.- The amendment proposed by the lower house of Russia, the Duma, will further strengthen the executive power of the government and broaden the jurisdiction of the president.
Presenter: Tank Casey
 
Necessary infrastructure for industry operation 1. What is meant by industry? What are the necessary infrastructure for the operation of the industry? Write in summary. Production of goods in small and large quantities using skills and tools is called industry. The industries are domestic, cottage, small, medium and large scale. Industrialists play an important role in making the country independent and developed. Industrialists are carriers of economic development of the country. It is the cornerstone of job creation. - Necessary infrastructure for the operation of the industry - In the operation of the industry there is a need for a clear government policy and legal system, government support, facilitation, coordination and regulation, an investment-friendly environment in the country, a political system that supports the private sector, along with these, the following infrastructure is required for the operation of the industry: Raw materials, - transportation and communication facilities, - electricity and other energy, - skilled manpower, - market, - capital,
2. Mention the steps of recruitment process in civil service of Nepal. Vacancy in the civil service is the act of supplying staff by recruiting new employees. Recruitment is a continuous process. There are various stages in the recruitment process in Nepal's civil service, which can be mentioned as follows:- Annual schedule publication,- Demand collection and percentage determination,- Advertisement publication,- Application collection, application submission and approval,- Educational qualification and curriculum creation, revision and Revision, - Creation and modification of question paper, Selection of question paper, - Conducting written test, - Double coding of answer sheet, - Answer sheet test, - Written test result, - Practical test, skill test, group discussion, - Interview, - Qualification order recommendation.
3. What kind of political system is there in the constitution of Nepal regarding justice and penal system? Article 51 of the Constitution of Nepal has the following policy provisions regarding justice and penal system:- To make the administration of justice expeditious, accessible, frugal, fair, effective and accountable to the public,- To adopt alternative measures such as reconciliation and mediation to resolve disputes of a general nature,- Political, administrative, judicial , to adopt effective measures to control corruption and irregularities in all sectors including social.
4. What is economic growth and economic development? Make it clear. The increase in production of goods and services in one year is called economic growth. Economic growth is a prerequisite for economic development. This is a journey towards prosperity. It is the beginning of a developed nation. It is a means of development. Which is based on the growth model. There is an increase in only one sector, so it cannot cover the totality of the economy. That is why the economic growth rate can be high even if there is no growth in all sectors. The increase in the production of a region leads to the distribution of income, but the distribution of income is not equal to all. It creates employment, but there is no guarantee of full employment due to lack of growth in all sectors. Therefore, while economic growth is high, poverty may not be reduced. - Economic Development- The state of development of all aspects of the economy is called economic development. high economic growth, Economic development is sustained and expanded. Inclusive economic development has become a hot topic these days. This is the basic goal of the nation, the achievement of development. which is based on the development model. High and sustainable growth and area expansion are its basis. It encompasses all aspects of the nation as a whole. This is a state of prosperity in which all areas of the nation have developed. Due to the proportional distribution of income and the full development of production and distribution in the Herak sector, job creation is guaranteed and poverty is reduced. The achievement of development. which is based on the development model. High and sustainable growth and area expansion are its basis. It encompasses all aspects of the nation as a whole. This is a state of prosperity in which all areas of the nation have developed. Due to the proportional distribution of income and the full development of production and distribution in the Herak sector, job creation is guaranteed and poverty is reduced. The achievement of development. which is based on the development model. High and sustainable growth and area expansion are its basis. It encompasses all aspects of the nation as a whole. This is a state of prosperity in which all areas of the nation have developed. Due to the proportional distribution of income and the full development of production and distribution in the Herak sector, job creation is guaranteed and poverty is reduced.
5. Write about the role of National Vigilance Center in controlling corruption. The National Vigilance Center has been established under the direct supervision and control of the Prime Minister to effectively control corruption-related activities and increase public awareness against corruption. This center, which is the official head of a special category of civil service, has been collecting information on whether or not the tasks that should be performed by all ministries, departments, offices and public institutions of the Government of Nepal have been done regularly, and if it is found that the tasks that should be performed regularly by such bodies have been alerted to such bodies. Its role in corruption control can be described as follows: - Monitoring of property details and income given by persons holding public office in accordance with prevailing laws, - Regular monitoring of places or work where corruption may occur.
6. What are the functions, duties and powers of the National Security Council? Mention. The work, duties and powers of the National Security Council formed under the chairmanship of the Prime Minister are as follows according to the Constitution of Nepal and the Military Act-2063: - Formulating policies related to the overall national interest, security and defense of Nepal, - Preparing policies, plans and programs related to the mobilization, operation and use of the Nepali Army. To submit to the Government of Nepal, - To submit suggestions to the Government of Nepal regarding the number and organizational structure of the Nepalese Army, - To submit necessary suggestions to the Government of Nepal regarding the management of the Nepalese Army, - To submit necessary suggestions to the Government of Nepal regarding the management of weapons, ammunition and other military materials of the Nepalese Army, - To prepare an annual report and submit it to the President and the President shall cause such report to be submitted to the Federal Parliament through the Prime Minister,
7. What are the measures to be taken to reduce the impact of climate change? write Climate change is caused by the emission of gases such as carbon dioxide. Therefore, such gas emissions from industries, factories, transportation and human activities should be minimized. The following other measures should be taken to reduce the impact of climate change: - Preventing deforestation caused by poverty and other causes, - Making human activities and development processes environmentally friendly, - Institutionalizing environmental impact assessment, - Determining and implementing pollution standards, - Environmental protection and climate change Implementation of international treaties and conventions, - adopting the concept of green economy, - formulating and implementing a low carbon emission development strategy, - increasing public awareness on environmental protection, - proper management of garbage,
Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
1. When was the monetary policy of the financial year 2077/078 announced by Nepal Rastra Bank Governor Mahaprasad Adhikari? Vikram Samvat 2077 July 2.- The monetary policy was announced taking into account the priority of reducing the risk of the economy due to the impact of Covid-19. 50 billion through refinancing fund, based on certain criteria, the operation and continuation of businesses including tourism affected by Corona and domestic, small and medium enterprises, payment of wages to workers and employees in those areas and providing opportunities for entrepreneurship development to those who lost their jobs in the most affected areas, to provide loans from banks and financial institutions at five percent interest Mention in monetary policy.- Demand loans with payment period up to June 2077, Arrangements will be made to renew short-term working capital loans, including cash credit, so that banks and financial institutions can analyze the borrower's situation and renew them so that they can be paid by the end of December 2077. - The licensing of new microfinance institutions has been postponed. - The deadline for microfinance financial institutions operating at the provincial level to sell, close or transfer branch offices operating in areas other than the specified provinces and limit their entire business to one province has been extended from the end of June 2077 to the end of June 2078.- The interest rate charged by microfinance institutions to their customers will be fixed at a maximum of 15 percent.
2. Where has the Chawri Breeding and Resource Center been established? Bhimeshwar Napa-1, Dolakha.- Yak Breeding and Resource Center was established with the financial support of Wagmati State Government at a cost of one crore rupees. 
3. Who said that "we are taking the risk of destroying ourselves because of our greed and stupidity"? Stephen Hawking. 
4. Who was awarded the Dilliraman Regmi National Peace Award for the year 2077? National Innovation Center.- (Also, the Dr. Dilliraman Regmi International Peace Award was presented to the founder of Read Nepal, Dr. Antonia Neuber, in recognition of her contribution through the establishment of a model community library.)
5. What is the current national mineral policy in Nepal? National Mineral Policy-2074. 
6. According to the report published by the Swiss professional school Institute for Management Development (IMD) in July 2020, which countries are successful in being in the first five positions in the global competitive ranking? Singapore, Denmark, Switzerland, Netherlands and Hong Kong respectively.- According to the survey, Singapore's economy has become the most competitive for the tenth year in a row.- Due to the trade war between the two countries, the competitiveness of America and China has decreased. This year, America dropped seven places to 10th place and China dropped six places to 20th place. Since 2018, both countries have been engaged in a trade war. - Britain has climbed 4 places in the list and reached the 19th place. Similarly, Japan dropped 4 places to 34th place while India remained at 43rd place.
7. Which are the five hydropower projects approved by the investment board meeting on June 5, 2077? Upper Masryangdi-2 (327 MW), Kaligandaki Gorge (164 MW), Isuvakhola (97.2 MW), Myagdikhola (57.3 MW) and Ankhukhola Hydropower Project (42.9 MW). Project investment approved.- Approved project and investment 
Upper Masyangdi-2 78 billion 65 million Kaligandaki Gorge 28 billion 6 billion Isuvakhola 13 billion 57 billion Myagdikhola 10 billion 31 billion Ankhukhola 6 billion 30 billion Dang Cement Industries 32 billion 50 billion Samrat Cement Industries 15 50 billion 
- The five hydropower projects approved by the board have a production capacity of 688.4 megawatts.
8. Which is the local level that will be awarded as the best in Beruju Fachhryot? Do not know (Makwanpur). (From the audit of 2075-76, the Ministry of Federal Affairs and General Administration declared Thaha Municipality as the best with the assessment that it has done the best work by maintaining 2.54 percent of income.) 
9. When was Nepal's first iron ore industry "Dhowadi Falam Khani Limited" established? On 16th January 2076.- The company was established in Dhowadi located in Nawalpur of Gandaki province.- According to the decision of the Council of Ministers on August 8, 2076, Dhowadi iron mine was established.
10. When was the first canal and geological station established for geological study and mining exploration in Nepal? Year 1986. - Canal and Geology Department was converted into Mining Department in 1999.- Mining Department was made Geological Survey Department in 2024.- The Department was renamed as Mining and Geology Department in 2033. 
11. How many nationally recognized parties are there in the parliament? 3 (NCP, Nepali Congress and Janata Samajwadi Party). (According to sub-section (4) of Section 10 of the Political Parties Act 2076, Rashtriya Janata Party, Nepal and Samajwadi Party have been merged and registered as Janata Samajwadi Party Nepal Party from the Election Commission on 24 June 2077.)
12. According to National Tiger Census-2018, how many tigers have reached in Nepal? 235.- The result of that calculation was announced on October 7, 2075. The tiger count was conducted from December 1, 2017 to April 3, 2018. According to the count, the number of tigers in different parks:- Chitwan National Park - 93 - Bardia National Park. -87- Banke R.N. - 21- Parsa Ra.ni. - 18- Shuklaphanta R.N.- 18 
13. Janakpur region is known as 52 huts 72 ponds, which is known as 52 ponds 53 lakes? Rukum. 
14. What is the number of least developed countries in the world? 47. 
15. When did the internet start in Nepal? 1994. 
16. When was the National Commission for Women formed in Nepal? February 23, 2058. 
17. Damauli (Tanahun) is the birthplace and birthplace of Ved Vyas, where is the birthplace of Rishi Panini? Panena (Arghakhanchi).
18. In which hospital was the first genetic lab in Nepal? Veer Hospital (July 13, 2073). - The lab was put into operation with the investment of the World Health Organization and the Ministry of Health. - The genetic lab is a laboratory that studies chromosomes microscopically. 
19. Who is the first woman president of the world? Isabel Peron, Argentina. 
20. When was the first National Ghazal Festival organized by Nepal Pragya Pratishthan in collaboration with National Youth Council? 2076 January 15-16. (The national-level ghazal festival held for the first time issued a five-point manifesto.) 
21. Which is the first wetland of Nepal listed in Ramsar list? Kosi Tappu (1987).
- The convention held in Ramsar city to protect wetlands of international importance was named the Ramsar convention. - The Convention was held in 1971.- With the success of listing Kosi Tappu in Ramsar, Nepal became a party to the Convention. - In 2016, various lake clusters in the Pokhara Valley were listed in the Ramsar list, and 10 wetland areas of Nepal were listed in the Ramsar list. 
22. When was the launch of 'Nepaliport', which was developed to make the immigration security system of Nepal systematic and scientific? 2076 January 13. (It is believed that state-of-the-art immigration services with physical improvements can be provided through biometrics 'Nepaliport' information and security system installed in 13 immigration offices including Tribhuvan International Airport.)
23. Which is the first commercial bank to start electronic payment system in Nepal? Nabil Bank. (The bank started this service on 23 August 2074.) 
24. If white blood cells are more than necessary, which disease is caused? Leukemia. 
25. Who is the author of 'A Poom of Rome' and 'A Thorn of Paris'? Lainsingh Bangdel. 
26. What is the duration of the five-year plan announced by the government for the protection of the one-horned rhinoceros, which is rare in the world? Year 2017-2021. 
27. Which are the main four dhams related to Buddhism? Lumbini, Bodh Gaya, Sarnath and Kushinagar. 
28. Where has the 'Biodiversity Educational Park' been established? Lalitpur (October 3, 2073). 
29. Where is the turtle conservation center? Dry Wetlands of Jhapa.
30. Where is the first women entrepreneur green industrial village going to be established? Panchkhal (The first Green Women Entrepreneurs Industrial Village will be established in Ward No. 7 of Panchkhaal Municipality.) 
Presenter: Tank KC
 
Information technology friendly office management1. What are the main dimensions of office operation and management? How can information technology-friendly office management be done? All the work done to achieve the goals and objectives of the office is the operation and management of the office. It includes tasks such as formulating office plans, implementing plans, arranging staff and budgets, coordinating, directing, monitoring, and evaluating. Some different aspects are required to manage these tasks, which can be considered as the main dimensions of office operation and management. Which are as follows: a. Thrift – Management should act in a manner that provides quality performance at low cost and within specified time. b. Efficiency - The goal should be achieved by maximum utilization of available means and resources. c. Effectiveness – You should improve your effectiveness by achieving progress according to the target. d. Transparency - Management should inform stakeholders about their actions and decisions. e. Accountability – The management should answer the questions raised in relation to each of their actions. f. Virtue and ethics – not only the actions performed by the management, but also the behavior and character of the manager should be clean. Must be customer friendly. Information technology-friendly office management - Making the office a completely paperless office by using electronic devices such as the Internet, computers, printers, etc. in the office is information technology-friendly office management. Since the field of information technology is multifaceted, it can be used based on the nature of the work and scope of the office. it man, It organizes the information of goods, land, buildings, vehicles etc. The office can be managed as an information technology-friendly office by adopting the following measures: - By creating an office website, - By making regular arrangements for power supply, - By making full use of computer systems, - By using CC TV, - Telephone, fax, scanner, mobile , by using electronic tools such as radio, television, - by providing online services through the Internet, - by using social networks such as Facebook, Twitter, Skype, Viber, Instagram, IMO, - by arranging skilled staff who are friendly with information technology, - by ensuring complete security and privacy of information technology Finally, the present age is the age of information technology. It can be seen from individual's personal life, household, office, society, Today, the information network has expanded and developed in this way because it can be used in the whole world through the nation. Therefore, the office can be modernized by maintaining quality, speed and discipline in the work by making full use of the measures mentioned in the office.
2. Write about the accounting system adopted by government agencies of Nepal and its strengths and weaknesses. The new Sresta system is the accounting system adopted for the systematic recording of income and expenditure of the government agencies of Nepal and its accurate reporting. This policy was implemented from the year 2019 and was gradually implemented throughout Nepal until the year 2024-25. In this accounting system implemented at both the central and operational levels, accounts are kept in cash. It does not account for the remaining transactions. This accounting is based on double accounting system. Following are the strong and weak aspects of this accounting system, where allocation, revenue, bond, revenue and projects are kept separately. Strengths - Since it is based on double accounting, there is no error and fraud, if any, it can be easily detected, - It is simple because the account is kept in cash, - A certain form is prescribed to keep the account, - Budget control system, - Internal control system,
Discuss the impact of budget deficit on the economy. A budget deficit is a state in which government income is less than government expenditure. This is a situation of low finance. A small amount of finance is mobilized to fulfill this. Budget deficits are often incurred by countries like Nepal, which have less resources and need more development. Budget deficit was brought forward as an alternative to solve the problem of economic recession in the world in 1930. It was rendered by JM Keynes. In Nepal, it has been adopted since the year 2008 when the government budget system started. In the situation of budget deficit, the government in Nepal has been supplementing the low finance by mobilizing domestic and foreign loans. In the event that the expenses could not be raised even from the debt raised in this way, the insufficient amount is met from the cash balance. - As domestic and foreign loans will be mobilized to cover the budget deficit, it will have the following effects on the economy: Positive Effect - Scattered capital will be mobilized in an integrated manner, - Unused resources will be mobilized, - Investment will expand in the productive sector, - Employment will be created, - Foreign capital, technology and skills will be acquired, - Help in solving the problem of economic recession, - Facing natural disaster - The gap between internal savings and investment will be completed - Assistance will be provided to the balance of payments - Assistance will be given in determining the limits of the work done by the government and the private sector - Assistance in economic development. Negative effects - Budget deficit will increase the amount of money providers. creates demand, Price increases. - If the domestic production is not in accordance with the demand, the import increases to meet the domestic demand. Exports decrease. This increases the trade deficit. - Increasing trade deficit has a negative effect on the balance of payments. Foreign exchange rates may also be adversely affected. - When the government mobilizes internal debt through the deficit budget, the private sector may be left without resources - the amount of principal and interest payments of foreign loans will increase, - it may reduce the country's internal resource mobilization capacity, - dependence will increase.
4. The Soldiers Act-2063 stipulates that what acts are considered to be offenses related to discipline and conduct? Mention. The Military Act-2063 stipulates that if any of the following acts are committed, it is considered to be an offense related to discipline and conduct: - if he consumes drugs, - if he behaves rudely, unnaturally, reprehensibly or if he is cruel, - if he causes physical weakness or illness in himself, - despite being healthy. If he feigns illness or weakness or knowingly prolongs illness or prevents recovery, - If he injures himself or another person with the intention of disqualifying himself or another person for service, - Any officer, officer or officer under the jurisdiction of the Military Act If a person is mistreated by using criminal force as a lower rank than himself, - if he does not do any work to maintain order and military discipline or if he does any work against order and military discipline,
Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma 
1. Who will the government appoint as Inspector General of Police (IGP)? Shailesh Thapa Chhetri.- The cabinet meeting on 23 June 2077 appointed Additional Inspector General of Police Thapa Chhetri as Inspector General.- Thapa Chhetri of Bhaktapur Suryavinayak Municipality-6, Katunje became the 28th Inspector General of Police Organization. Inspector General Thakur Prasad Gyawali has compulsorily retired from June 24 due to 30 years of service.
2. What is known as the grasshopper-shaped insect that can cause the most damage to agricultural crops? Locust.- On June 13, 2077, locusts entered Nepal. In May 2077, locusts damaged more than 50,000 hectares of crops in a short period of time in the Indian states of Madhya Pradesh, Gujarat, and Rajasthan. Although it is expected that they will not enter Nepal, the risk of locusts causing great damage to food crops has increased.- Desert Locust, a type of locust found in the desert, has now entered Nepal causing great damage in Pakistan and India. 
3. When will the United States officially withdraw from the World Health Organization? July 6, 2020. 
4. William Kirk Patrick is the author of 'An Account of Kingdom of Nepal' and who is the author of 'An Account of Kingdom of Himalayas'? Tony Hagen. 
5. Where is the beautiful elephant face? Dolakha
6. Which is the first city in Nepal to be branded as 'City on the Hill' with the aim of attracting tourists? Kirtipur.- Branding of Kirtipur as a 'city on the hill' i.e. a city on a hill has started.- This is the first time that any city has been branded in Nepal. The logo of the brand was released in June 2077.
7. Which service has recently been launched in Nepal with the aim of providing the essential equipment used in the intensive treatment of Covid-19 patients in an easy and accessible way? Nepal Ventilator Bank.- An organization called 'Nepal Ventilator Service', established as a charitable organization, said that it will provide intensive care equipment including ventilators in public, community and private hospitals in Nepal. The organization will coordinate so that it can be mobilized.- The organization will currently focus on ventilators in Wagmati Province and later expand its branches to all the seven provinces of Nepal and arrange to provide the necessary ventilators from the branches of the same province. 
8. What is the age limit for women to become domestic workers in Gulf countries? 24 years.
9. When will the government take a decision to allow public transport, which has been shut down to control the corona virus, to operate? Bikram Samvat 2077 June 26.- As the threat of corona infection continues, the government has made arrangements to operate the transport with only half the number of passengers than the seating capacity. 
10. What is the slogan of World Population Day celebrated on July 11, 2020? Let's put an end to the covid-19 infection, protect the health and rights of women and girls.
11. When and where was the seventh edition of World Military Games held? 2019 October 18-27 (Wuhan, China).- 9 thousand 308 military athletes from 110 countries participated in the tournament.- China, Russia and Brazil won first, second and third respectively in 27 games.- Nepal participated in the tournament for the first time. .- The World Military Sports Competition was organized by the International Military Sports Council with the concept of establishing world peace through sports. 
12. Who won the Rugby World Cup title held in Yokohama (Japan) from September 20 to November 2, 2019? South Africa - South Africa became the world champion for the third time. Previously, South Africa won the title in 1995 and 2007. South Africa has placed itself on par with New Zealand, the three-time rugby world champion.
13. What is the slogan of International Poverty Alleviation Day celebrated on October 17, 2019? Cooperation for the empowerment of children, their families and communities for poverty alleviation. 
14. Who is the Nepali genius who set a world record by reading a book continuously for 124 hours and 30 minutes? Mukeshraj Joshi - Joshi from Bajhang held the record by reading a book for 6 consecutive days from 5-10 October 2076. - Earlier this record was held by a Nigerian citizen. He had continuously studied for 120 hours and set a record. 
15. When was the Prime Minister's Office and the Cabinet Secretariat merged into the Prime Minister's Office and the Cabinet Secretariat? Year 2060 October 2 
16. Who was awarded the Life Time Achievement Award 2076 given to a retired police officer who has made significant contributions to the police organization? Yadav officer.
17. When and where was the 18th summit of non-aligned nations held? October 25-26, 2019, Vaku, the capital of Azerbaijan. 
18. Which year is being celebrated as the 'Year of International Peace and Trust' by the Non-Alignment Movement (NAM)? Year 2021 
19. Which is the mobile app that was brought to make the Nepal Gazette simple and accessible? Nepal Gazette. 
20. Who is known as Kautilya of western politics? Machiabelli.
21. Who is the personality honored with the 100th Novel Peace Award of 2019? Prime Minister of Ethiopia Abi Ahmed Ali. - The award was given to him because of his significant role in achieving peace and achieving international coordination. - Ending the 20-year-long military standoff that began with the border war that lasted from 1998 to 2000, a peace agreement was signed between Ethiopia and Eritrea in July 2018, and Abi played an important role in it. - Since becoming the Prime Minister in April 2018, Abiy has done many reforms in Ethiopia.
22. What is the power generation capacity of Upper Trishuli-1 hydropower project? 216 megawatts.- An investment agreement of 51 billion rupees was completed on October 15, 2076 between the promoter Nepal Water and Energy Development Company and nine international financial institutions for this hydropower project, which is considered as the largest direct foreign investment in Nepal's hydropower sector. It is said that the project will be financed through 70 percent debt and 30 percent equity.
23. Since when did the government start distributing identity cards to poor families? June 29, 2075 - The distribution of identity cards was started for the first time from Mayadevi-6, Dumra, Kapilvastu. Identification of poor households and distribution of identity cards will be continued in the rest of the district . 
24. Which language is also called Tajpuri language? Dynasty
25. Which mountain is also referred to as the roof of Africa? Kilimanjaro - This mountain located in Tanzania in the African continent is also an attractive tourist destination there. - It is the highest mountain in Africa. - Climbing this mountain does not require special preparation and special equipment, but you may experience altitude sickness caused by the height. can 
26. When was National Natural Medicine Day celebrated for the first time in Nepal? June 20, 2075. - (The day was celebrated for the first time with the original slogan of 'Naturopathy in non-communicable diseases'.) 
27. What is the '0' degree longitude line called the Prime Meridian and the '0' degree latitude line? Plot line 
28. Which is the first country where Nepal signed a labor agreement? Qatar (April 21, 2005).
29. From which district has the distribution of farmer ID cards been started in Nepal? Baglung 
30. Which is the airline of Nepal that has got the international level ISAO certificate? National flag carrier Nepal Airline Corporation - The corporation received the certificate for excellent ground handling (ground handling). 
Presenter: Tank Casey
Nepal's International Relations Policy 1. What is Nepal's international relations policy? Mention. Article 51 (d) of the Constitution of Nepal has authorized Nepal's policy on international relations, which can be mentioned as follows: - To be active in protecting the sovereignty, geographical integrity, independence and national interests of Nepal, - Charter of the United Nations, non-alignment, principle of Panchsheel, international law And conducting an independent foreign policy based on the recognition of world peace, keeping in mind the paramount interest of the nation, - reviewing past treaties, - making treaty agreements on the basis of equality and mutual benefit.
2. What is group work? write The work done by two or more people working together to achieve a common goal is called group work. This is a collective work done by the group. In this, the members of the group are dependent on each other and interrelated for a common purpose. In this, groups will be formed for special work, mutual trust, harmony and cooperation will be increased among the members of the group, there will be extensive discussions among the members, there will be no position of bosses and subordinates, members will be independent and self-controlled. This increases the motivation of the employees and increases production and productivity. In general, the concept of group work has been developed in order to achieve a certain specific objective by involving specific people within the circle of a formal group.
3. The Labor Act-2074 stipulates what duties of the employer towards the workers? In relation to occupational safety and health, the Labor Act-2074 stipulates the following duties of the employer towards the workers: (a) Creating a safe working environment by making proper arrangements for safety and health at the workplace, (b) Using and operating chemical, physical, biological substances and equipment at the workplace. , making arrangements that do not adversely affect safety and health during storage and transportation, (c) Providing necessary information, information and training related to safety and health to workers as needed, (d) Necessary regarding the use and operation of chemical, physical, and biological substances related to equipment and work to workers Provide training and information in appropriate language, (e) Make proper arrangements for safe entry and exit from the workplace, (f) Provide workers with personal protective equipment as needed,
4. The Good Governance (Management and Operation) Act-2064 stipulates what procedures should be followed while performing administrative work? Mention. The Good Governance (Management and Operation) Act-2064, formulated with the aim of guaranteeing good governance by transforming the country's administration mechanism into a service provider mechanism and facilitator, stipulates that the following procedure should be followed when performing administrative tasks: 1. A certain procedure should be followed: - When deciding on a matter, if there is a procedure in the prevailing law, such a procedure should be followed, and if there is no such procedure, an appropriate procedure should be adopted considering the nature of the matter to be decided, 2. A decision must be made within a certain period of time: - When deciding on a matter, a decision must be made within a certain period according to the prevailing law, within the same period of time and if there is no such provision, the decision must be made within a period of time deemed appropriate by the authority who is entitled to make a decision based on the nature of the matter to be decided, if the necessary facts, information or evidence are not available. If it is not possible to make a decision within the period due to reasons, the official who has the right to make a decision should make a decision about the reason, 3. Transparency should be maintained while making decisions:- The decision-making authority should make decisions in a transparent manner when deciding on a matter. Those who are able to pay attention to the opinion and consultation of their subordinates on matters to be decided, and if the action of the matter to be decided starts from one level and is to be decided from another level, the officials involved in each level should submit their clear opinion on the matter to the decision-making authority. If any question is raised in the opinion submitted by the officials of each level involved in the decision-making process, the decision-making officer should also address such questions while making a decision. When making a decision, legal or technical questions must also be stated, and the officer who decides to take the opinion of a legal expert or technician on such a matter may take such opinion if he deems it appropriate, and if he takes such an opinion, he may also make a decision based on such opinion and if he sees that such opinion should not be accepted, he shall disclose the reason for it. You have to decide. 4. The basis and reason should be disclosed when making a decision: - When making a decision, the decision taken by the relevant official should be based on what and why such a decision had to be made, the clear basis and reason for the decision should be disclosed. 5. Decisions should not be made if there is a conflict of interest: - If the decision-making official directly has any interest, concern or interest in the matter to be decided, or if the decision made by him will directly affect a person entitled to eat Aputali on his behalf or another close relative, or if the business conducted by a person of his own accord , if there is a conflict of interest to directly benefit the business, such an official cannot make a decision on such a matter. If the decision-making officer should not make a decision under such circumstances, the reason should be disclosed, if an official like himself is in the same office, then he should be allowed to make a decision on the matter, if not, an official one level above him. but, The decision made by the official who has the right to make a decision for the greater public interest is not considered to be a conflict of interest. 6. A performance contract can be entered into: - If any work to be carried out by the Government of Nepal must be carried out within a certain period of time or must be carried out in such a way as to achieve a certain amount of achievement, or if any program or project that is a priority from the national point of view of the Government of Nepal must be implemented, a performance contract can be entered into with an official and the responsibility of carrying out such work can be given to him. , In addition to other things, in the performance contract, the details of the work to be done by the responsible official, the time period to be completed and the quality or quantity of the performance should also be mentioned, 7. Stakeholders and civil society can be consulted:- Before implementing any matter of public interest, the Government of Nepal can consult with stakeholders and civil society as necessary, and during such consultation, the positive and negative aspects of the subject proposed to be implemented should be analyzed comprehensively and the potential impact that can be obtained from it should be evaluated. , giving proper attention to the suggestions received from the consultation with stakeholders and civil society, 8. Do not shirk your responsibilities: - The officials who have to perform the work must perform the work they have to perform within the prescribed conditions and within the prescribed period. The Chief Secretary of the Government of Nepal (Council of Ministers), if the Secretary is the Minister concerned, if the official under the Ministry or the head of the department is the concerned Secretary and other officials under the department, if the official who employs others or shirks responsibility in any other way or does not perform the work within the prescribed period or does not achieve the performance according to the performance indicators The concerned head of the department may issue a warning, and if there is no improvement in the conduct and work of the official even after giving such a warning, departmental action should be taken against the official based on the lack of efficiency according to the prevailing law, 9. Can delegate authority: - An official can delegate authority according to the prevailing law so that the work he has to perform can be performed by himself or any other official under him. He is not considered exempted from his official responsibility just because he has delegated authority, the delegated authority can be returned at any time, the authority to decide in judicial proceedings cannot be delegated, 10. Provisions related to official or professional conduct: - A person holding a public office must follow the official or professional conduct as prescribed for a period as specified from the date of retirement or for whatever reason.
5. What is community health? What are the major community health problems seen in the community of Nepal? Identify. Community health is the activity of people in the community to identify health problems in the community and solve them, to improve personal and environmental health. Its basic purpose is to raise the health level of the community. Since it is not possible for a person to improve his health only through individual efforts, the concept of community health has been brought forward. Therefore, to improve the health of the community, the individual, family, community and the nation should all make a joint effort. - Major community health problems seen in the community of Nepal - Due to geographical difficulties, lack of public awareness, lack of medicine, lack of health workers etc., the community health of Nepal is suffering from various problems. mountains, hills, Everyone has health problems. More community health problems are seen in rural areas than in urban areas. In general, the main community health problems of Nepal are as follows:- Outbreak of various communicable diseases,- High infant mortality rate, child mortality rate, maternal mortality rate,- Lack of knowledge about balanced diet,- Increasing malnutrition,- Unhealthy lifestyle,- Lack of health services, - Lack of health education, - Lack of skilled health-related manpower in rural settlements, - Increase in the number of people who smoke, drink and consume drugs, - Overall health services are expensive, not accessible to the poor.
Presenter: Hemchandra Sharma
